	description	location	salary	title
241	"Job Description:About IntellifyIntellify is a data science and machine learning consultancy who helps our customers to increase their growth, operate more efficiently and build competitive advantage. Our team consists of leading data scientists, machine learning engineers and consultants that extensively use advanced (statistical) machine learning and optimisation techniques to create state-of-the-art solutions for business. As an emerging AWS consulting partner, we have the ability to scale our solution to any needs through their cloud platform.About the OpportunityAs we are growing at a rapid speed, we are seeking a senior full-time data scientist/machine learning engineer who has extensive experience in data science, machine learning and/or statistical modelling as well as programming. As part of this role, you will supervise and manage junior data scientists, and work on development to build data science solutions using a combination of the latest technologies and business strategies.With a startup culture and applying cutting-edge technology to real-world business problems, you have the opportunity to drive impact at some of Australia’s leading startups and enterprises as well as to learn and grow within a team of like-minded data scientists. Our client problems have ranged from pricing, inventory and workforce optimisation to computer vision applied to radar data for predictive maintenance. The work is varied and challenging, and will require someone who is dynamic in their thinking as well as willing to explore and try new ideas.Being a senior data scientist at Intellify you are charged with both being a mentor and learning from fellow specialist data scientists in an ever evolving and improving atmosphere. We want to see you thrive professionally and personally as we create a leading data science, machine learning and AI company of the future.What we offerThis is a full-time permanent role. This role will provide a unique opportunity to work in a collaborative team and learn from experienced data scientists, so you can advance your knowledge and get hands-on experience with state-of-the-art machine learning methods. Our salaries are competitive, and we offer flexible working hours. We also believe great data science comes from great teams, so invest continuously in upskilling and cross-training our data scientists, with lunch & learn sessions, training courses and certifications, and an opportunity to be a core part of our data science and machine learning communities. Furthermore, we offer the following:1) 10 x paid days of professional development per year (attend/ speak @ conferences, undertake courses and certifications)2) $2,200 Toolkit allowance to go out and buy your own tech3) Profit sharing4) Work with high-profile clients5) A defined career path with your 1-1 mentor6) Great team culture7) Have an impact in a small team where there is no politics8) Flexible & inclusive work-environment9) Work closely with AWS using cutting edge cloud technologiesRequired Skills: A computer science, robotics, maths, statistics, physics or related degree (graduated Bachelors, MSc, PhD or last year MSc/PhD student)5+ years of applied industry machine learning, optimisation and/or statistics experienceStrong Python or R programming experience and related data science libraries (such as scikit-learn, Pandas, Tensorflow/Keras)Strong SQL database and code versioning (e.g., Git) skillsGood software engineering principlesProject management / team management experienceExperience with data visualisation tools or frameworks i.e. tableau, D3.js, ggplot2 etc.Desirable skills: Knowledge or experience of software engineering practicesKnowledge or experience on time series/product forecasting/recommender systemsKnowledge of deep learning/neural networksExperience working with web development technologiesExperience working with cloud technologies i.e. AWS / Microsoft / Google Cloud.Portfolio evidence of your previous work is appreciated (i.e. blog, github repository, conference presentations etc).How to ApplyIf you wish to take the next step in your career working and learning with the best in an innovative data science company, please click on ""Apply now"" and include:Your CVYour portfolio of projects (eg GitHub, blog site etc)Desired salaryYour availabilityBrief details (3-4 sentences) of either:A machine learning or data science project you have developed or delivered previously; orPrevious team leadership experience, where you worked with a team to deliver a project.We are looking forward to hearing from you.*** STRICTLY NO AGENCIES ***Please note that our Company Policy dictates direct recruitment only.Job Types: Full-time, Part-timeSalary: $120,000.00 to $160,000.00 /yearExperience:machine learning, optimisation and/or statistics: 3 years (Required)"	 - Sydney NSW	Senior Data Scientist/ Machine learning engineerIntellify - Sydney NSW$120,000 - $160,000 a year - Full-time, Part-time	Senior Data Scientist/ Machine learning engineer
242	"The role will be focused on stitching together disparate data sources from across the business to enable machine learning and automated reporting and campaigns. Generically, provide a view on business issues/opportunities that cannot be revealed through standard reporting
What’s the role?
Analytics lead on internal strategic marketing projects designed to understand key customer behaviours that drive consumer revenue
Identify new opportunities to improve capability and optimise the business through analytics and modelling
Undertake proactive analysis of customer data processes that produce data driven analysis, reporting, insights and models
Provide data and analytical thought leadership that can be leveraged across the marketing teams
Consistent delivery of data programs that lead to more effective and improved customer experiences
Who are you?
The ability to interpret and convert complex data requests into prescriptive and actionable insights for a non-analytical audience.
Proactivity delivering data driven insights and recommendations
Senior stakeholder engagement and strong presentation skills
Must be advanced multi-lingual across various software languages (SQL, Python, R, SAS)
What’s in it for you?
Supportive and friendly environment. We encourage innovation, collaboration and creative thinking. Fun, fast-paced and excellent opportunities for growth and development.
Lucrative salary
Flexible working arrangements
Discounted health care
Employee discount with multiple brands including BMW, Qantas, Apple, Samsung etc
Work with some of Australia's most recognised and prestigious brands
On-site gym and wellbeing centre

Who are we?
We are Australia’s number one and most influential media organisation with more than 150 prestige brands across news, sport and lifestyle. Each month more than 17 million Australians choose to consume news and information from our digital and print products – more than any other media group in Australia.
Where do I sign?
Apply now or for more information on careers at News Corp Australia visit www.newscorpaustralia.com/careers"	 - Sydney Central Business District NSW	Data ScientistNews Corp Australia66 reviews - Sydney Central Business District NSWPermanent	Data Scientist
243	SparkBeyond has built an AI-powered research engine, capable of finding complex patterns in data by understanding their meaning. Operating at the intersection of Data Science and Artificial Intelligence fields, our Machine Learning technology is so ground-breaking that it’s been referred to as science fiction on multiple occasions. SparkBeyond Discovery Platform is being used by Fortune 500 companies across industries.What will you do?Solve various problems and make a true impact across unlimited domains and industries (Financial Risk, Health, Ecommerce, Marketing, Oil & Gas Exploration and more.).Deliver business value by translating complex data into meaningful insights.Be the face of the company and the product directly interfacing with our partners around the globe.Partner with our customers’ Data Science teams, helping them optimize their use of SparkBeyond’s Discovery Platform.Work directly with our in-house team comprised of the brightest minds in technology, research and mathematics as well as senior interfaces from leading companies across the globe (fortune 500 companies and many others).Use your analytical skills and deep product understanding to consult our partners and provide them with advice and input of the highest quality.What will you need?Significant relevant work experience - Professional work experience on data science and analytics issuesA very strong academic background - PhDs are very welcome, as are quantitative degrees - Math, Physics, Computer Science and the like.Proven experience in handling large scale end to end data science projects and presenting the findings and insights. Building models is great - creating impact is greaterProven experience in translating business challenges into data pipelines & model frameworkExperience with Machine Learning techniques. Supervised, unsupervised, traditional or deep learning - either is great, but you need to know your stuff, both in theory and in practice (e.g., MICE, scikit-learn, keras or weka)Programming skills that allow you to be self-sufficient in handling data. Python and R are our daily companions, and a solid grasp of SQL is always needed. Big bonus points if you know ScalaAlso welcome: Experience with large datasets and distributed computing (Hive/Hadoop, Spark)Willingness to travel. We understand the need for a work-life balance and family time, but the ability to be on location at our clients is regularly required.Why SparkBeyond?Sense of Purpose: We’re building something bigger than ourselves. Our team is building a machine that can help solve the world’s most critical problems. We do this through our Partner engagements and the pro-bono work we are passionate about.Exposure: Help insurers process claims faster. Or pharmaceutical companies improve their quality control. Or, on a pro bono basis, an NGO to upskill underprivileged teenagers. Choose what you will work on and where you will leave your mark.People: We are proud of the brilliant, passionate and engaged team at SparkBeyond, including our very own Gödel and Wolf Prize winner. Our people are our greatest asset and we believe in empowerment, ownership and constant growth.Platform: Our Data Scientists are passionate about our cutting-edge platform and can’t imagine returning to traditional data science.Credibility: We have established ourselves as an industry leader, partnering and making impact for our Fortune 500 clients. See what the market is saying about us:https://venturebeat.com/2016/04/02/deep-learning-will-be-huge-and-heres-who-will-dominate-it/https://www.gartner.com/doc/3311218/cool-vendors-data-science-Job Type: Full-timeSalary: $100,000.00 to $180,000.00 /year	 - Melbourne VIC	Data ScientistSparkBeyond - Melbourne VIC$100,000 - $180,000 a year	Data Scientist
244	"Deloitte is the world’s largest professional service firm, with one of the largest and most experienced Analytics, Information Management (AIM) & Data Automation practices. We have 400+ specialised consultants in Australia and more than 6,000 practitioners in the Deloitte global network.
With the ever increasing complexity and volume of data, the rise of in-memory, high performance computing, data discovery and visualisation solutions and the convergence of Big Data and Advanced Analytics, organisations are faced with increasing number of choices to ensure they are able to exploit their data assets for maximum advantage. Deloitte is able to draw from its vast global experience delivering complex data driven solutions for our clients across the full spectrum of technology and business domains to provide the right strategic advice to help an organisation respond effectively to these changes – as well as partner with our clients to execute on our recommendations.
About the Role
Do you want to be a part of how we help companies utilise their valuable data resources through effective use of the right technology, backed by a clear vision and strong executive sponsorship? Do you want to be part of an award winning team that provides clients with a visionary, yet balanced and pragmatic approach to automating concepts and tools to improve productivity and performance?
This is an opportunity to harness emerging technologies and analytical methodologies to solve real world problems. You will be part of a close, collaborative team that identifies and builds solutions that are practical as well as visionary, and that make an impact that matters.
We are looking for people who love data and want to solve problems with insight. Whether you call yourself a data scientist, analytics nerd or builder of predictive models. We want to hear from you if you are genuinely passionate about this area and have some applied experience.
You will be responsible for delivering insights through a range of corporate data sources through the application of analytics, data mining, Big Data and real-time decision making techniques and applications using various data management, analytics & data visualization tools.
About You
You’ll bring experience in one or more of the following competencies and enabling technologies
A strong background in applying mathematical and analytics approaches and methodologies to identifying complex relationships in data
Ability to communicate technical requirements and outputs in a clear and concise manner
A structured, logical and solution-oriented design mindset
Ability to work autonomously and with minimal oversight
Ability to demonstrate initiative and ownership in the completion of tasks
A demonstrable interest and passion for exploring new data/analytics concepts, applications and innovations (e.g. Cognitive, Robotics & Automate, AI, IoT etc.)
Some experience using a range of scripting languages – (e.g. Python, R, SQL etc.)
About Us: Deloitte Culture
Join a high performing culture of talented people, who are highly motivated and passionate about delivering impactful analytics solutions and insight. We are innovative and different because YOU are… we pride ourselves on our team of diverse, high performing Deloitte Professionals who are talented, supportive, inclusive and social – and who are at the heart of our success. Our aim is to ensure that all our people feel comfortable to bring their whole selves to work, and as a result, build a workplace that encourages the true spirit of 'And different'.
From day one at our firm you’ll be considered part of the Deloitte community and our development and career progression framework will help you develop the skills and capabilities that will set you up to succeed – in every sense of the word. At Deloitte, we assume that you perform other roles within your life…you could be a student, a teacher, a passionate hobbyist and a caring family member. We recognise the importance of balance and embrace agility, understanding that this means different things to each and every one of our employees.
If you have questions regarding this role, the Talent Acquisition Team is available to have a confidential discussion. Please contact Aditi Aggarwal via the Our Recruiters section on our careers website."	 - Sydney NSW	EXPRESSION OF INTEREST - Data & Analytics - NationalDeloitte7,167 reviews - Sydney NSW	EXPRESSION OF INTEREST - Data & Analytics - National
245	"Data Scientist
Greenfield Data Science roles in this fast growing team
Pride yourself in delivering customer insights that drive strategic change for Australia’s leading brands
Permanent roles based at our Mascot Campus

Working in Qantas Loyalty is exciting and fast moving. Our agile way of working enables us to be responsive to business requirements and helps us to deliver exceptional outcomes.

Our rapidly growing data science function supports a range of key strategic initiatives focused on helping us optimise customer communications; experience and product development. As such, we are hiring candidates ideally with varied experience levels in customer analytics and insights, but are open to speaking to candidates with business forecasting and/or revenue management background.

The scope of the data scientist role consists of leveraging our large customer data asset and build data science processes to enable the development of enhanced understanding of customers’ behaviours and needs, and using this to identify and pursue opportunities for growing customer engagement and profitability.

What you’ll bring to the role:
Preferably post-graduate qualifications in statistics, mathematics, or a related discipline
Proven experience of applying data science techniques within a commercial environment to consistently drive towards delivery of strategic goals
A deep understanding of and experience in statistics modelling using R and/or Python
Significant experience working with large and complex customer databases and applying machine learning to solve business problems
Strong SQL skills, and an ability to extract, manipulate and extract insights from large volumes of data
The ability to think pragmatically, critically and commercially and apply your strong technical skillset to real world problems
Working closely with colleagues across marketing, commercial and IT to drive successful outcomes
Proactive and passionate about identifying opportunities and driving change
The ability to work in a fast and agile manner

We are looking for someone who has a start-up mindset, enjoys a high degree of autonomy, and most of all a bias for getting things done.

Qantas is an equal opportunity employer, so by coming to work for us, you’ll be part of an organisation that encourages diversity, supports charities and environmental initiatives. We encourage Aboriginal and Torres Strait Islander, and people of all backgrounds to apply. If you have any support or access requirements, we encourage you to advise us at time of application.

If you’re ready to step into a culture that will challenge and excite you, submit an application and let’s explore how we go places together.

Applications close 24th October"	 - Sydney NSW	Data ScientistQantas Airways Limited296 reviews - Sydney NSW	Data Scientist
246	We are seeking a data scientist/machine learning engineer who has experience in machine learning and/or statistical modelling, optimisation and programming for an opportunity to make an impact in a leading startup.About IntellifyIntellify is a data science, machine learning and artificial intelligence consulting company who helps our customers to increase growth, operate more efficiently and build competitive advantage. Our team consists of leading data scientists, machine learning engineers and product developers that extensively use advanced (statistical) machine learning and optimisation techniques to create state-of-the-art solutions for business needs.About the OpportunityAs we are growing at rapid speed, we are seeking a full-time data scientist/machine learning engineer who has extensive experience in data science, machine learning and/or statistical modelling and programming. As part of this role, you will be mentored by senior data scientists and help develop and build data science solutions using a combination of the latest technologies and business strategies.With a startup culture and applying cutting-edge technology to real-world business problems, you have the opportunity to drive impact at some of Australia’s leading startups and enterprises as well as to learn and grow within a team. Our client problems have ranged from pricing, inventory and workforce optimisation to computer vision applied to radar data for predictive maintenance. The work is varied and challenging, and will require someone who is dynamic in their thinking as well as willing to explore and try new ideas. We want to see you thrive professionally and personally as we create a leading data science, machine learning and AI company of the future.Required Skills: A computer science, robotics, maths, statistics, physics or related degree (Graduated Bachelors, MSc, PhD or last year MSc/PhD student)Applied machine learning/statistics experienceStrong Python or R programming experience and related data science libraries (such as scikit-learn, Pandas, Tensorflow/Keras)Have experience or are comfortable extracting data from SQL databases and using code versioning (e.g., Git)Basic software engineering principlesExperience with data visualisation tools or frameworks i.e. tableau, D3.js, ggplot2 etcDesirable Skills: Knowledge or experience of software engineering practicesKnowledge or experience on time series/product forecasting/recommender systemsKnowledge of deep learning/neural networksExperience working with web development technologiesExperience working with cloud technologies i.e. AWS / Microsoft / Google Cloud*Portfolio evidence of your previous work is appreciated (i.e. blog, github repository, conference presentations etc.)Job DetailsThis is a full-time permanent role. This role will provide a unique opportunity to work in a collaborative team and learn from experienced data scientists, so you can advance your knowledge and get hands-on experience with state-of-the-art machine learning methods. Our salaries are competitive, and we offer flexible working hours.We also believe great data science comes from great teams, so invest continuously in upskilling and cross-training our data scientists, with lunch & learn sessions, training courses and certifications, and an opportunity to be a core part of our data science and machine learning communities.To Apply: If you wish to take the next step in your career working and learning with the best, in an innovative data science company, please apply with:Your CVCover letter detailing:Your portfolio of projects (eg GitHub, blog site etc)Desired salaryBrief details (3-4 sentences) ofa machine learning or data science project you have developed or delivered previously.We are looking forward to hearing from you.The Intellify team.Job Type: Full-timeSalary: $80,000.00 to $100,000.00 /yearExperience:Machine Learning: 1 year (Preferred)Location:Sydney NSW (Required)	 - Sydney NSW	Junior data scientist/machine learning engineerIntellify - Sydney NSW$80,000 - $100,000 a year	Junior data scientist/machine learning engineer
247	"Data Scientist
Melbourne, VIC
Job code: FWG16005

A Data Scientist is required for a wholesale electricity retailer that connects its customers to the wholesale market and provides an alternate way for businesses to buy electricity.

This role will be responsible for creating forecasting tools / algorithms that utilise data such as spot market, dispatch load, weather etc. to attempt to estimate electricity price movements to enable their customers to make more informed purchasing decisions.

The Data Scientist will:

Work with predictive models;
Implement time-series forecasting;
Manage data sets.
Strong data analysis and algorithm development skills are necessary for this role, with expertise in R and Python. An understanding of the electricity market would be beneficial.

* * *

Freshwater Group is a renewable energy recruitment business that focuses on all renewable and low carbon emission, energy efficiency and disruptive clean technology businesses as well as energy infrastructure, storage and management.

Great People Better Outcomes www.freshwater-group.com.au

Follow us on LinkedIn: www.linkedin.com/company/freshwater-group

Freshwater Group is committed to the principles of Equal Employment Opportunity. We encourage applications from candidates with culturally diverse backgrounds, including Indigenous Australians. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, gender, sexual orientation, age, disability, or religion."	 - Sydney NSW	Data ScientistFreshwater Group - Sydney NSW	Data Scientist
248	Opportunity to start your career in Data Science Permanent role in Sydney CBD Be part of the brightest team I am currently looking for a few Junior Data Scientists for a few of startups and large Australian enterprise who are currently looking to expand their team. If you are looking to get into the industry or Data Science space, NOW is the time to start the conversation: Essential Skills: Degree/Master/PhD in Data Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Physics, or equivalent Min 1 year work experience is an advantage but not essential Proficient in .NET, R, SQL. Other scripting language will be an added advantage Strong coding/scripting background Understanding or exposure to Machine Learning algorithms will be highly regarded Strong analytical skillset Proactive & eager to learn Good communications - both verbal & written If you are keen & ready to get started in Data Science, click APPLY now. You can also send through your CV and Academic Transcript to my email: fwong@siriustechnology.com.au OR call me on 02 9270 5292 for a confidential chat.	 - Sydney Central Business District NSW	Junior Data Scientist - Sydney Central Business District NSWPermanent	Junior Data Scientist
249	"Eleven-time Webby award-winning Freelancer.com is the world's largest freelancing and crowdsourcing marketplace. We connect millions of employers to freelancers across the globe, and every day thousands of jobs are described, bid on, negotiated, and managed through our site.
We think it is pretty cool that our dataset details a real life economy, where work is undertaken in every area you can think of. From design, writing, data entry and software development; through to sales, marketing, accounting and legal services - even NASA uses us!
Freelancer's data science team is world class. We have a team of data scientists across three offices, with backgrounds in mathematics, physics, neuroscience, computer science, and more. We have data science infrastructure that runs a sophisticated dashboard and multi-variate testing framework.
You have a strong maths and/or stats background. You know how to take your code to O(log(n)), and when not to bother. You love to reach deep into a SQL dataset and pull out an interesting story. You dream in probability densities, not expectation values. You can smell a badly-designed experiment from a mile away.
If this sounds like you, you will love life as a data scientist at Freelancer. We are a data-driven company- data trumps opinions. Every new feature gets A/B tested and analysed with our bayesian methods. We use machine learning in many places across the company, from improving funnels with sophisticated predictors to fraud and spam detection.
You will work in a product team and sit at the core of the decision making process. You will scour our well-organised dataset for trends and potential opportunities, and be responsible for designing and analysing A/B tests. And from time to time, you will invent new and awesome ways to use our dataset to make the site better.
Responsibilities
Identify valuable data sources and automate collection processes
Undertake preprocessing of structured and unstructured data
Analyze large amounts of information to discover trends and patterns
Build predictive models and machine-learning algorithms
Combine models through ensemble modeling
Present information using data visualization techniques
Propose solutions and strategies to business challenges
Collaborate with engineering and product development teams
Requirements
Tertiary Degree in Maths, Stats, Physics, Computer Science, or other quantitative discipline. 1st class Honors are preferred, and MS or PhD a plus.
Excellent python, pandas, R, SQL and scripting.
Ability to process complex datasets and transform them into business decisions.
Understanding of Internet-scale systems (scalability into tens of millions of users).
Extensive knowledge and experience in statistics, machine learning and big data analytics a plus.
Proven experience as a data scientist or analyst
Experience in data mining
Understanding of machine-learning and operations research
Analytical mind and business acumen
Strong math skills (e.g. statistics, algebra)
Problem-solving aptitude
Excellent communication and presentation skills
Benefits
This won't be a cog-in-the-machine job; you will be joining a global technology company that is a meritocracy, so if you are looking to make a difference and be rewarded for your efforts, this is the place for you.
We also offer a fun atmosphere working with smart people in an awesome office with fully-stocked kitchens, social events, hackathons, and more.
For more information see www.freelancer.com/careers"	 - Sydney NSW	Data ScientistFreelancer.com141 reviews - Sydney NSW$65,000 - $110,000 a year	Data Scientist
250	"Overview of job
Are you a data or programming wizard looking to kick-start your career? Ikon is the perfect place to explore your passion for turning marketing data into insight and unlocking data-driven growth opportunities. We are a top-tier marketing communications agency with a client-base of data-rich, blue-chip organisations that includes Commonwealth Bank, Bankwest, nib insurance, Pfizer, Ladbrokes and many others.
If you’re a recent graduate with a relevant qualification (or if you are finishing off your degree this year) and are interested in forging your career in the media/ marketing industry, then this may be the role for you. We are seeking a motivated and passionate candidate with degree-level training in either:
A strong quantitative discipline (e.g. Mathematics, Statistics, Actuarial Studies, Econometrics or Data Science)
Programming (Specifically SQL and Python Programming).
Although this role is a full time position we are open to candidates that are currently finishing their university studies and may need to start in a part time capacity to transition into full time employment once university is completed. We are also open to candidates who have up to one year’s industry experience.

Reporting of the role
This role reports to Matthew Cranley (Data Science Manager, Ikon Sydney).

3 best things about the job:
You’ll work in a dynamic media environment and learn your craft on a broad range of blue-chip, data-rich clients.
You’ll be given a high degree of responsibility early-on for constructing and maintaining SQL-based information systems and Tableau dashboards.
You’ll be given opportunities to transform and automate data systems, unlock business growth opportunities for clients, and provide invaluable insight.

Measures of success
In three months:
Develop an understanding of the Ikon business and our key differentiators in market
Develop an understanding of our clients engaging with the Data Science team
Develop relationships with your team and peers in the Ikon family
Develop an understanding of key data systems and ETL processes.
In six months:
Update (including data ETL), validate and publish Tableau dashboards consistent with firm deadlines.
Provide tangible support to Senior Data Scientists and the Data Science Manager in the preparation, analysis and visualization of data.
In 12 months:
Design, build and maintain marketing dashboards through Tableau for clients and internal Ikon stakeholders.
Manage the extraction, transformation and loading of data into SQL and other information systems.
Amend and evolve existing data management systems and dashboards to meet the changing needs of clients.
Complete ad-hoc analysis and data mining as required.

What you will need:
Strong academic background in either a quantitative field (e.g. Maths/ Stats) or Programming (SQL and Python).
Excellent attention to detail and a passion for excellence.
A keen interest to learn, develop and grow professionally.
Open to honest feedback – both good and bad.
Challenge how it’s always been done. Be different in every interaction
Mindset of making work fun. If it’s starting to feel like a job, then change something. Surprise us. Surprise yourself.

Nice to have:
Whilst not essential, experience with one or more of the following technologies would be advantageous:
Tableau
Google Analytics
Google BigQuery
Adobe Analytics
Hadoop/ Hive
R-Studio

About Ikon Communications
Ikon is a full service communications agency with over $450m in billings across offices in Sydney, Melbourne, Brisbane, Adelaide and Auckland.
We have the breadth and depth of experience to create bespoke solutions for each and every client. For some, that might be a full suite of services from strategy, data analytics, creative and media. For others, it could simply be amplifying a marketing spend across search and social.
You can learn more about what it means to be an Ikonoclast by visiting our website below:
http://www.ikoncommunications.com.au/"	 - Sydney NSW	Ikon | Data ScientistIkon754 reviews - Sydney NSW	Ikon | Data Scientist
251	*The Company*This Australian SaaS business is a major player in its industry and counts financial services/banking companies and public departments as its clients. They build market leading products through Data Science and advanced analytics.Join a growing team of Data Scientists, Software Engineers and domain experts who are innovative and are truly passionate about making an impact on the Australian tech, health & medical and financial services sectors.The RoleThis Data Scientist position is a fixed term contract (or contract) up to July 2019 with the likelihood of extension or becoming permanent.The responsibilities will include:Perform exploration of datasets in the terabyte level and identify patterns, trends and provide insightsBuilding data products using Machine Learning and Statistics to identify and detect fraudulent activity, anomalies, abnormal behavioural patterns in transactionsUtilise Machine Learning to build products that automate insight discoveryPartner with stakeholders and departments to analyse the data as well as apply and integrate the tools and products developedConsult with advisers, domain experts, investigators regarding your findings and walking through solutionsUnderstand the domain in order to understand implications of your findings and make commercially viable decisions.Your ProfileDegree qualified in a STEM disciplinePostgraduate qualifications in STEM/numerically oriented disciplines an advantageExtensive experience as a Data Scientist or Data Analyst in a commercial analytics environmentExtensive experience in R, SQL and big data platforms such as SparkExperience working with large and complex data setsAbility to partner with stakeholders at all levels in a businessConfidence and conviction in presenting your findingsCuriosity to delve deeper into problems and find a solutionApplyIf this opportunity sounds like you, please click the Apply button quoting DS062.We specialise in the Data Science & Analytics, Software Engineering and Big Data space and we’ll be able to assist you. If this opportunity isn’t the right one, you can also contact us on www.datasii.com and we’ll be happy to help.Job Types: Full-time, ContractSalary: $125,000.00 to $145,000.00 /yearExperience:commercial data science: 3 years (Preferred)practical and commercial Machine Learning: 3 years (Preferred)R and SQL: 2 years (Preferred)	 - Sydney NSW	Data Scientist - Contract to July 2019Datasii - Sydney NSW$125,000 - $145,000 a year - Full-time, Contract	Data Scientist - Contract to July 2019
252	"Data Scientist

CPT Global provides IT/digital consulting and delivery services to our clients around the world. We’ve helped customers improve their IT delivery, speed and capability in industries such as finance, telecommunications, utilities, health, government, and logistics and achieve profitable growth. CPT began operation in Melbourne in 1993 and has grown to offices on five continents by providing value and constant focus on client delivery.

Join CPT Global and help us to transform our business into the digital world. Choose CPT and start to work for top tier clients. For more information, please visit http://www.cptglobal.com/

Role:

CPT Global is looking for an experienced Data Scientist as we are growing our capabilities across the Artificial Intelligence (AI), Machine Learning (ML), and Advanced Analytics (AA) space. You will be responsible for analysing and presenting data that brings behaviour change from key decision makers within the organisation.


Duration: 6 months contract
Location: Sydney CBD

Skills:
Strong experience working as a Data Scientist. Good to have experience in banking industry.
Experience of working with large data sets, statistical techniques and analysis – data mining, cleansing, regression, segmentation and clustering.
Significant experience in working with R/SAS/SQL/Python/any modelling tool. Good to be from statistics background.
Knowledge of customer journey, campaign life-cycle, marketing concepts like response rates, experimental design and optimisation.
Knowledge of model development, assessment and methodologies.
Excellent analytical and conceptual thinking, planning and organisational skills.

If you like getting your hands dirty with data & solving interesting problems, APPLY NOW! You can apply directly or send your CV with subject ‘Data Scientist’ to hradmin@cptglobal.com.


CPT Global is an equal opportunities employer and welcomes applications from all sections of society and does not discriminate on grounds of race, religion or belief, ethnic or national origin, disability, age, citizenship, marital, domestic or civil partnership status, sexual orientation, gender identity, or any other basis as protected by applicable law."	 - Sydney NSW	Data ScientistCPT Global - Sydney NSW	Data Scientist
253	SparkBeyond has built an AI-powered research engine, capable of finding complex patterns in data by understanding their meaning. Operating at the intersection of Data Science and Artificial Intelligence fields, our Machine Learning technology is so ground-breaking that it’s been referred to as science fiction on multiple occasions. SparkBeyond Discovery Platform is being used by Fortune 500 companies across industries.What will you do?Solve various problems and make a true impact across unlimited domains and industries (Financial Risk, Health, Ecommerce, Marketing, Oil & Gas Exploration and more.).Deliver business value by translating complex data into meaningful insights.Be the face of the company and the product directly interfacing with our partners around the globe.Partner with our customers’ Data Science teams, helping them optimize their use of SparkBeyond’s Discovery Platform.Work directly with our in-house team comprised of the brightest minds in technology, research and mathematics as well as senior interfaces from leading companies across the globe (fortune 500 companies and many others).Use your analytical skills and deep product understanding to consult our partners and provide them with advice and input of the highest quality.What will you need?Significant relevant work experience - Professional work experience on data science and analytics issuesA very strong academic background - PhDs are very welcome, as are quantitative degrees - Math, Physics, Computer Science and the like.Proven experience in handling large scale end to end data science projects and presenting the findings and insights. Building models is great - creating impact is greaterProven experience in translating business challenges into data pipelines & model frameworkExperience with Machine Learning techniques. Supervised, unsupervised, traditional or deep learning - either is great, but you need to know your stuff, both in theory and in practice (e.g., MICE, scikit-learn, keras or weka)Programming skills that allow you to be self-sufficient in handling data. Python and R are our daily companions, and a solid grasp of SQL is always needed. Big bonus points if you know ScalaAlso welcome: Experience with large datasets and distributed computing (Hive/Hadoop, Spark)Willingness to travel. We understand the need for a work-life balance and family time, but the ability to be on location at our clients is regularly required.Why SparkBeyond?Sense of Purpose: We’re building something bigger than ourselves. Our team is building a machine that can help solve the world’s most critical problems. We do this through our Partner engagements and the pro-bono work we are passionate about.Exposure: Help insurers process claims faster. Or pharmaceutical companies improve their quality control. Or, on a pro bono basis, an NGO to upskill underprivileged teenagers. Choose what you will work on and where you will leave your mark.People: We are proud of the brilliant, passionate and engaged team at SparkBeyond, including our very own Gödel and Wolf Prize winner. Our people are our greatest asset and we believe in empowerment, ownership and constant growth.Platform: Our Data Scientists are passionate about our cutting-edge platform and can’t imagine returning to traditional data science.Credibility: We have established ourselves as an industry leader, partnering and making impact for our Fortune 500 clients. See what the market is saying about us:https://venturebeat.com/2016/04/02/deep-learning-will-be-huge-and-heres-who-will-dominate-it/https://www.gartner.com/doc/3311218/cool-vendors-data-science-Job Type: Full-timeSalary: $100,000.00 to $180,000.00 /year	 - Melbourne VIC	Data ScientistSparkBeyond - Melbourne VIC$100,000 - $180,000 a year	Data Scientist
254	"C3 meets an urgent and fast-growing demand for enterprise scale Big Data, AI, and IoT applications to enable Digital Transformation. The C3 Platform utilizes real-time performance monitoring and predictive analytics to optimize business processes, differentiate products and services, and create new revenue streams. Through the innovative C3 Type System and an open, extensible platform, C3 has become the world's leader in delivering Digital Transformation initiatives.

In this capacity, you will participate in the definition of new analytics capabilities able to provide our customers with the information they need to make proper decisions to support our customers in operating IoT. In addition, you will help find the appropriate machine learning, AI, and specifically deep learning algorithms to answer these questions. Finally, you will be responsible for implementing this into the product and making it available to our customers.

Qualified candidates will have an in-depth knowledge of most common machine learning techniques and their application. You will also understand the limitations of these algorithms and how to tweak them or derive from them to achieve similar results at large-scale.

Your Responsibilities:

Driving adoption of Deep Learning systems into next-generation of C3 products.
Designing and deploying deep learning algorithms on industrial IoT applications such as fraud detection and predictive maintenance.
Collaborating with data and subject matter experts from C3 and its customer teams to seek, understand, validate, interpret, and correctly use new data elements.

Requirements:

MS or PhD in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, Statistics, or equivalent fields. Specialization in machine learning preferred.
Applied Machine Learning experience (regression analysis, time series, probabilistic models, supervised classification and unsupervised learning).
Strong mathematical background (linear algebra, calculus, probability and statistics).
Excellent programming skills in JavaScript and prototyping languages such as Python and R.
Ability to drive a project and work both independently and in a team.
Smart, motivated, can do attitude, and seeks to make a difference.
Excellent verbal and written communication.

Preferred


Experience with Java and Scala is a plus.
A portfolio of projects (GitHub, papers, etc.) is a plus.

C3 is proud to be an Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action Employer. We do not discriminate on the basis of any legally protected characteristics, including disabled and veteran status."	 - Sydney NSW	Data ScientistC3770 reviews - Sydney NSW	Data Scientist
255	Job DescriptionThe candidate is a skilled data scientist who will be building deep learning models for medical image diagnosis applications such as segmentation, localisation and classification of abnormalities.ResponsibilitiesThe candidate will write high quality model with high performance and good memory management, together with state-of-the-art accuracies and embed into our proprietary software. Our aim is to align you with the activities which truly interest you; will stretch you technically; help you grow and impact on billions of patients.RequirementsBachelor / Master / PhD in engineering or computer science or mathematics or physicsKnows computer vision / image segmentation, localization, classificationKnows tensorflow or theano or torchStrong python, C++ or java coderGood knowledge of numpy, pandas, sklearn, scipy, seabornKnows how to build deep learning models like RNN and CNN and other neural network models.May require to relocate to China, Beijing.What We OfferMaster, Teach, Learn – The opportunity to work with, learn from and share knowledge with ultra-smart colleagues in a culture of collaboration and technical excellence. We groom our employees and make sure that they stay at the cutting edge of the technology stack.Impact – Huge potential to make a positive contribution across our business, people and partnersRemuneration – Competitive pay with share award for top performers.We are willing to groom engineers and fresh graduates who don’t have a background in deep learning but are interested to learn. You will also have the opportunity to attend top machine learning conferences like NIPS and ICML.Job Types: Full-time, Permanent	 - Sydney NSW	BioMind Data Scientist/Engineer (Relocate to Beijing)biomind.ai - Sydney NSWFull-time, Permanent	BioMind Data Scientist/Engineer (Relocate to Beijing)
256	"There has never been a more exciting time to be part of Domain Group, a dynamic digital media and technology services business and one of Australia's leading property destinations. We provide property advertising and media online, via mobile, social media and in magazines, and technology services to the real estate industry. The business is experiencing rapid growth in digital revenues and investing in all areas to drive future earnings growth. Domain offers a dynamic and innovative culture at the leading edge of digital media in Australia.
We are looking for a lead data scientist to help sales, product and business leadership make decisions with data, give consumers certainty and control when selling their home with a broad mission and build data science and machine learning products to power the next stage of Domain's growth
As part of the Domain Group, you'll have the opportunity to work across all aspects of our property ecosystem, from listing and agent, to consumer behavior, email, and sales data.
What you'll do:
Build scalable models that analyse and extract information from disparate public sources
Develop and improve machine learning algorithms that drive our data pipeline operation
Leverage advanced statistical modeling to improve domain products
Research and implement the latest advances in the world of data
Proven ability to collaboratively and maturely work on a team
Curious with an aptitude to quickly learn
Experience:
At least 3-5 years of industry experience in data science
2+ years of professional experience with Natural Language Processing and/or Image Processing
Thorough knowledge of machine learning modeling processes
Thorough knowledge of supervised and unsupervised learning algorithms
Thorough knowledge of Natural Language Processing
Experience with implementation of Data Systems
Fluency in UNIX, SQL, Python and/or R
Good software engineering principles
Education/Qualifications:
MS or PhD degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Quantitative Psychology or related field.
Portfolio evidence of previous work is appreciated (i.e. blog, GitHub repository, journal/conference publications etc).
So...what happens next?
Once we've received your application we'll give it the attention it deserves and you'll hear from us either way. If you have the right experience, one of our Recruitment Consultants will give you a call (so make sure you keep your phone handy!) and from there we'll support you through the interview process.

Interested?
Go on then, click apply, we'd love to see your application!

A little note to recruitment agencies: We have a superstar recruitment team who are pretty good at filling our own roles, we know you're great at what you do to, but there's no need to get in touch! :)"	 - Sydney NSW	Lead Data ScientistDomain Group6 reviews - Sydney NSWFull-time, Permanent	Lead Data Scientist
259	"There has never been a more exciting time to be part of Domain Group, a dynamic digital media and technology services business and one of Australia's leading property destinations. We provide property advertising and media online, via mobile, social media and in magazines, and technology services to the real estate industry. The business is experiencing rapid growth in digital revenues and investing in all areas to drive future earnings growth. Domain offers a dynamic and innovative culture at the leading edge of digital media in Australia.
We are looking for a lead data scientist to help sales, product and business leadership make decisions with data, give consumers certainty and control when selling their home with a broad mission and build data science and machine learning products to power the next stage of Domain's growth
As part of the Domain Group, you'll have the opportunity to work across all aspects of our property ecosystem, from listing and agent, to consumer behavior, email, and sales data.
What you'll do:
Build scalable models that analyse and extract information from disparate public sources
Develop and improve machine learning algorithms that drive our data pipeline operation
Leverage advanced statistical modeling to improve domain products
Research and implement the latest advances in the world of data
Proven ability to collaboratively and maturely work on a team
Curious with an aptitude to quickly learn
Experience:
At least 3-5 years of industry experience in data science
2+ years of professional experience with Natural Language Processing and/or Image Processing
Thorough knowledge of machine learning modeling processes
Thorough knowledge of supervised and unsupervised learning algorithms
Thorough knowledge of Natural Language Processing
Experience with implementation of Data Systems
Fluency in UNIX, SQL, Python and/or R
Good software engineering principles
Education/Qualifications:
MS or PhD degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Quantitative Psychology or related field.
Portfolio evidence of previous work is appreciated (i.e. blog, GitHub repository, journal/conference publications etc).
So...what happens next?
Once we've received your application we'll give it the attention it deserves and you'll hear from us either way. If you have the right experience, one of our Recruitment Consultants will give you a call (so make sure you keep your phone handy!) and from there we'll support you through the interview process.

Interested?
Go on then, click apply, we'd love to see your application!

A little note to recruitment agencies: We have a superstar recruitment team who are pretty good at filling our own roles, we know you're great at what you do to, but there's no need to get in touch! :)"	 - Sydney NSW	Lead Data ScientistDomain Group6 reviews - Sydney NSWFull-time, Permanent	Lead Data Scientist
260	"The role will be focused on stitching together disparate data sources from across the business to enable machine learning and automated reporting and campaigns. Generically, provide a view on business issues/opportunities that cannot be revealed through standard reporting
What’s the role?
Analytics lead on internal strategic marketing projects designed to understand key customer behaviours that drive consumer revenue
Identify new opportunities to improve capability and optimise the business through analytics and modelling
Undertake proactive analysis of customer data processes that produce data driven analysis, reporting, insights and models
Provide data and analytical thought leadership that can be leveraged across the marketing teams
Consistent delivery of data programs that lead to more effective and improved customer experiences
Who are you?
The ability to interpret and convert complex data requests into prescriptive and actionable insights for a non-analytical audience.
Proactivity delivering data driven insights and recommendations
Senior stakeholder engagement and strong presentation skills
Must be advanced multi-lingual across various software languages (SQL, Python, R, SAS)
What’s in it for you?
Supportive and friendly environment. We encourage innovation, collaboration and creative thinking. Fun, fast-paced and excellent opportunities for growth and development.
Lucrative salary
Flexible working arrangements
Discounted health care
Employee discount with multiple brands including BMW, Qantas, Apple, Samsung etc
Work with some of Australia's most recognised and prestigious brands
On-site gym and wellbeing centre

Who are we?
We are Australia’s number one and most influential media organisation with more than 150 prestige brands across news, sport and lifestyle. Each month more than 17 million Australians choose to consume news and information from our digital and print products – more than any other media group in Australia.
Where do I sign?
Apply now or for more information on careers at News Corp Australia visit www.newscorpaustralia.com/careers"	 - Sydney Central Business District NSW	Data ScientistNews Corp Australia66 reviews - Sydney Central Business District NSWPermanent	Data Scientist
261	SparkBeyond has built an AI-powered research engine, capable of finding complex patterns in data by understanding their meaning. Operating at the intersection of Data Science and Artificial Intelligence fields, our Machine Learning technology is so ground-breaking that it’s been referred to as science fiction on multiple occasions. SparkBeyond Discovery Platform is being used by Fortune 500 companies across industries.What will you do?Solve various problems and make a true impact across unlimited domains and industries (Financial Risk, Health, Ecommerce, Marketing, Oil & Gas Exploration and more.).Deliver business value by translating complex data into meaningful insights.Be the face of the company and the product directly interfacing with our partners around the globe.Partner with our customers’ Data Science teams, helping them optimize their use of SparkBeyond’s Discovery Platform.Work directly with our in-house team comprised of the brightest minds in technology, research and mathematics as well as senior interfaces from leading companies across the globe (fortune 500 companies and many others).Use your analytical skills and deep product understanding to consult our partners and provide them with advice and input of the highest quality.What will you need?Significant relevant work experience - Professional work experience on data science and analytics issuesA very strong academic background - PhDs are very welcome, as are quantitative degrees - Math, Physics, Computer Science and the like.Proven experience in handling large scale end to end data science projects and presenting the findings and insights. Building models is great - creating impact is greaterProven experience in translating business challenges into data pipelines & model frameworkExperience with Machine Learning techniques. Supervised, unsupervised, traditional or deep learning - either is great, but you need to know your stuff, both in theory and in practice (e.g., MICE, scikit-learn, keras or weka)Programming skills that allow you to be self-sufficient in handling data. Python and R are our daily companions, and a solid grasp of SQL is always needed. Big bonus points if you know ScalaAlso welcome: Experience with large datasets and distributed computing (Hive/Hadoop, Spark)Willingness to travel. We understand the need for a work-life balance and family time, but the ability to be on location at our clients is regularly required.Why SparkBeyond?Sense of Purpose: We’re building something bigger than ourselves. Our team is building a machine that can help solve the world’s most critical problems. We do this through our Partner engagements and the pro-bono work we are passionate about.Exposure: Help insurers process claims faster. Or pharmaceutical companies improve their quality control. Or, on a pro bono basis, an NGO to upskill underprivileged teenagers. Choose what you will work on and where you will leave your mark.People: We are proud of the brilliant, passionate and engaged team at SparkBeyond, including our very own Gödel and Wolf Prize winner. Our people are our greatest asset and we believe in empowerment, ownership and constant growth.Platform: Our Data Scientists are passionate about our cutting-edge platform and can’t imagine returning to traditional data science.Credibility: We have established ourselves as an industry leader, partnering and making impact for our Fortune 500 clients. See what the market is saying about us:https://venturebeat.com/2016/04/02/deep-learning-will-be-huge-and-heres-who-will-dominate-it/https://www.gartner.com/doc/3311218/cool-vendors-data-science-Job Type: Full-timeSalary: $100,000.00 to $180,000.00 /year	 - Melbourne VIC	Data ScientistSparkBeyond - Melbourne VIC$100,000 - $180,000 a year	Data Scientist
262	"NATURALLY
DIFFERENT

We are re-imagining mining to improve people’s lives

ANGLO AMERICAN’s METALLURGICAL COAL BUSINESS, MIDDLEMOUNT, QLD

Anglo American is a global diversified mining business and our products are the essential ingredients in almost every aspect of modern life. Our portfolio of world-class competitive mining operations and undeveloped resources provides the metals and minerals to meet the growing consumer-driven demands of the world’s developed and maturing economies. With our people at the heart of our business, we use innovative practices and the latest technologies to discover new resources and mine, process, move and market our products to our customers around the world.

As a responsible miner – of diamonds (through De Beers), copper, platinum and other precious metals, iron ore, coal and nickel – we are the custodians of what are precious natural resources. We work together with our key partners and stakeholders to unlock the sustainable value that those resources represent for our shareholders, the communities and countries in which we operate and for society at large. Anglo American is re-imagining mining to improve people’s lives.

We strive to create an inclusive environment for all employees. Women, Aboriginal and Torres Strait Islanders are encouraged to apply for all vacant positions.

Production Data Scientist / Insights Analyst – Capcoal Opencut Operations

Capcoal Surface Operations is currently seeking a Data Scientist / Insights Analyst to join the Capcoal Team. Reporting to the Mining Manager, the Data Scientist / Insights Analyst will use Artificial Intelligence / Machine Learning and data processing algorithms to solve technical challenges and assist the mining operations team to improve their processes. This position will use skills in Data Science/Big Data to develop models, uncover insights and solutions to provide support to the mining function in the delivery of key improvement initiatives.

The Data Scientist / Insights Analyst will have experience in quantitative research of large, complex data sets and development of predictive models and optimization algorithms that create business value.

Key responsibilities include;

Liaise with OEMs, IT/IM and maintenance team members to assure data collection systems are in place and meet minimum requirements to get useful data for technical challenge been worked.
Processing, cleansing and verifying the integrity of data used for analysis.
Collaborate with matter experts to develop AI/ML prototypes/Proof-of-Concept/Proof-of-Value to derive actionable insights from data.
Discover trends, patterns and stories told by the data and present them to stakeholders.
Produce creative data visualizations and intuitive graphics to present complex analytics.
Building predictive models using state-of-the-art methods and use appropriate diagnostics to assess the performance of the models.
Collaborate with team members to ensure projects and outcomes meet business requirements.
Manage the execution of data science projects in an Agile methodology.
The ideal candidate will have:

A background and working experience as a data scientist
Experience across cloud technology is essential (Azure highly desirable)
Knowledge and understanding of machine learning techniques and algorithm.
Experience with common data science analytical/programming tool, such as R, Python.
Experience with data visualization tools such as PowerBI, etc.
Strong relationship skills and demonstrate the ability to execute continuous improvement.
This is a Monday-Friday role. As well as a very competitive salary package, Anglo American offers exceptional training and development opportunities to all employees. Subsidised accommodation is available with this role. If you have the ambition to work for a leader in the mining and resources area, and the drive to deliver results on consistent basis, apply now.
To apply online visit www.angloamerican.com.au and quote the relevant reference number

Ref No: 725265

Applications close 4 November 2018

Please note, screening and interviews may take place prior to closing date – applications may also close before this date.

Anglo American’s Metallurgical Coal Business does not accept applications from Recruitment Agencies"	 - Middlemount QLD	Production Data Scientist / Insights Analyst – Capcoal Opencut OperationsAnglo American919 reviews - Middlemount QLDFull-time, Permanent	Production Data Scientist / Insights Analyst – Capcoal Opencut Operations
263	"There has never been a more exciting time to be part of Domain Group, a dynamic digital media and technology services business and one of Australia's leading property destinations. We provide property advertising and media online, via mobile, social media and in magazines, and technology services to the real estate industry. The business is experiencing rapid growth in digital revenues and investing in all areas to drive future earnings growth. Domain offers a dynamic and innovative culture at the leading edge of digital media in Australia.
We are looking for a lead data scientist to help sales, product and business leadership make decisions with data, give consumers certainty and control when selling their home with a broad mission and build data science and machine learning products to power the next stage of Domain's growth
As part of the Domain Group, you'll have the opportunity to work across all aspects of our property ecosystem, from listing and agent, to consumer behavior, email, and sales data.
What you'll do:
Build scalable models that analyse and extract information from disparate public sources
Develop and improve machine learning algorithms that drive our data pipeline operation
Leverage advanced statistical modeling to improve domain products
Research and implement the latest advances in the world of data
Proven ability to collaboratively and maturely work on a team
Curious with an aptitude to quickly learn
Experience:
At least 3-5 years of industry experience in data science
2+ years of professional experience with Natural Language Processing and/or Image Processing
Thorough knowledge of machine learning modeling processes
Thorough knowledge of supervised and unsupervised learning algorithms
Thorough knowledge of Natural Language Processing
Experience with implementation of Data Systems
Fluency in UNIX, SQL, Python and/or R
Good software engineering principles
Education/Qualifications:
MS or PhD degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Quantitative Psychology or related field.
Portfolio evidence of previous work is appreciated (i.e. blog, GitHub repository, journal/conference publications etc).
So...what happens next?
Once we've received your application we'll give it the attention it deserves and you'll hear from us either way. If you have the right experience, one of our Recruitment Consultants will give you a call (so make sure you keep your phone handy!) and from there we'll support you through the interview process.

Interested?
Go on then, click apply, we'd love to see your application!

A little note to recruitment agencies: We have a superstar recruitment team who are pretty good at filling our own roles, we know you're great at what you do to, but there's no need to get in touch! :)"	 - Sydney NSW	Lead Data ScientistDomain Group6 reviews - Sydney NSWFull-time, Permanent	Lead Data Scientist
264	"This role will be based in our QuantumBlack hub in Sydney, Melbourne or Perth and you will work as part of McKinsey & Company, joining a highly collaborative team of exceptionally talented Data Scientists, Data Architects, and Engineers.
QuantumBlack help companies use their data to drive decisions. We combine business experience, expertise in large-scale data analysis and visualization, and advanced software engineering know- how to deliver results. From aerospace to finance to Formula One, we help companies prototype, develop, and deploy bespoke data science and data visualisation solutions to make better decisions.
Your Experience
You will bring an exceptional academic background in a technical field combined with experience in developing and applying data science methods in an commercial context. You share our curiosity for new methods and technologies, and our enthusiasm for data science challenges. As such, you will support our client services lead to identify business hypotheses and metrics, and you'll have the opportunity to define and drive the analytical scope and method for projects, including formulating and shaping the models.
What You'll Do
Use Maths, Stats and Machine learning to derive key insights across various industry sectors including formula 1, pharma, automotive and high-tech.
Write highly optimised code to advance our internal Data Science toolbox
Develop world-class data science products for clients as well as for our data science team
Help to drive the analytical scope and method for projects, including formulating and shaping the models
Work on complex data sets from some of the world’s largest organisations
Work in a multi-disciplinary environment mixing highly skilled people in data science, data engineering and design
Perhaps most importantly, you will work in one of the largest and most talented data science teams in London
Build strong links with the academic world and constantly share ideas and stay ahead of the curve on the latest methods
Requirements
Experience in statistical modelling and machine learning
Experience in applying data science methods to business problems
Programming experience in at least 2 of the following language: R, Python, Scala, SQL
Educated to an MSc or PhD level in the field of Computer Science, Machine Learning, Applied Statistics, Mathematics
Strong presentation and communication skills, with a knack for explaining complex analytical concepts to people from other fields
Team leadership, mentoring and project management skills
Knowledge of distributed computing or NoSQL technologies is a bonus
Proven application of advanced analytical and statistical methods in the commercial world
Experience in statistical modelling and machine learning
Experience in applying data science methods to business problems
Programming experience in at least 2 of the following language: R, Python, Scala, SQL
Educated to an MSc or PhD level in the field of Computer Science, Machine Learning, Applied Statistics, Mathematics
Strong presentation and communication skills, with a knack for explaining complex analytical concepts to people from other fields
Team leadership, mentoring and project management skills
Knowledge of distributed computing or NoSQL technologies is a bonus
Proven application of advanced analytical and statistical methods in the commercial world
Benefits
Competitive salary and benefits"	 - Sydney NSW	Data Scientist (Sydney)QuantumBlack - Sydney NSW	Data Scientist (Sydney)
265	"Data Scientist

CPT Global provides IT/digital consulting and delivery services to our clients around the world. We’ve helped customers improve their IT delivery, speed and capability in industries such as finance, telecommunications, utilities, health, government, and logistics and achieve profitable growth. CPT began operation in Melbourne in 1993 and has grown to offices on five continents by providing value and constant focus on client delivery.

Join CPT Global and help us to transform our business into the digital world. Choose CPT and start to work for top tier clients. For more information, please visit http://www.cptglobal.com/

Role:

CPT Global is looking for an experienced Data Scientist as we are growing our capabilities across the Artificial Intelligence (AI), Machine Learning (ML), and Advanced Analytics (AA) space. You will be responsible for analysing and presenting data that brings behaviour change from key decision makers within the organisation.


Duration: 6 months contract
Location: Sydney CBD

Skills:
Strong experience working as a Data Scientist. Good to have experience in banking industry.
Experience of working with large data sets, statistical techniques and analysis – data mining, cleansing, regression, segmentation and clustering.
Significant experience in working with R/SAS/SQL/Python/any modelling tool. Good to be from statistics background.
Knowledge of customer journey, campaign life-cycle, marketing concepts like response rates, experimental design and optimisation.
Knowledge of model development, assessment and methodologies.
Excellent analytical and conceptual thinking, planning and organisational skills.

If you like getting your hands dirty with data & solving interesting problems, APPLY NOW! You can apply directly or send your CV with subject ‘Data Scientist’ to hradmin@cptglobal.com.


CPT Global is an equal opportunities employer and welcomes applications from all sections of society and does not discriminate on grounds of race, religion or belief, ethnic or national origin, disability, age, citizenship, marital, domestic or civil partnership status, sexual orientation, gender identity, or any other basis as protected by applicable law."	 - Sydney NSW	Data ScientistCPT Global - Sydney NSW	Data Scientist
266	"Mature ASX to be a leader in applying advanced analytics, machine learning and AI models to solve real
problems within the financial markets industry.
 Own the full flow of challenging data problems starting with data discovery, curation and modelling
through to production implementation and monitoring.
 Bring a combination of mathematical, statistical rigor and innovative algorithm design to lead the
development of machine learning models, prescriptive analytics and predictive analytics techniques across
both structured and unstructured data to build solutions both external and internal customers.
 Remain up-to-date on advanced analytics research and trends, challenge current best thinking, test
theories and evaluate feature concepts.
 Develop and model data visualisation components to showcase findings and insights using open-source
and commercially available visualisation tools.
 Support the productisation process of data products developed by ASX’s third-party partners.
 Develop validation test cases, detect quality issues, identify their root causes, implement fixes and
automate the model development pipeline.
 Provide operational support for the products created through the data platform.

ASX Position Description 1/2


What you’ve done:
 At least 3 years’ experience working as a Data Scientist in a big data environment with expertise in
information retrieval, AI, machine learning, natural language processing, data mining and large scale
distributed computation.
 Extensive experience in coding using SQL and Python or R.
 Significant demonstrated experience with big data and data analytics technologies such as Hadoop,
MapReduce, Hive, Spark, Python, Kafka etc. with a good understanding of Cloudera Big Data Platform.
 Prior experience in statistical and predictive modelling with exposure to supervised and unsupervised
machine learning models (e.g. Tensor Flow, clustering, neural networks, decision trees etc.).
 Accredited tertiary qualifications in statistics, maths, computer science or a relevant field.


And if you’ve got some of this, even better:
 Experience in using Spyder IDE, RStudio, Jupyter, and Cloudera Data Science Workbench.
 Exposure to capital markets datasets and data use cases.
 Operated in a customer-led and commercially-focussed environment.
 Experience in data analysis, modelling and metadata management as well as with model ethics and
governance.
 Experience working in a lean agile environment or within a startup.

What you need to enjoy and be good at for this role:
 Solving problems through innovative use of data and technologies with a commitment to quality.
 Working in a fast-paced and iterative environment where outcomes are often unknown at the outset.
 Communicating effectively with technical teams and other stakeholders.
 Being open to taking on new responsibilities which will arise when working in a startup environment.

ASX Position Description 2/2"	 - Sydney NSW	Data ScientistAustralian Securities Exchange (ASX) - Sydney NSWPermanent	Data Scientist
267	"Tech focused Data Scientist – R&D Platforms and Technology Lead

For over 15 years Quantium have combined the best of human and artificial intelligence to power possibilities for individuals, organisations and society. Our solutions make sense of what has happened and what will, could or should be done to re-shape industries and societies around the needs of the people they serve.

Times and technology have changed, but this remains our goal. Instead of wrangling single, SQL-based databases, our MapR Hadoop platform runs across 300 nodes with multiple clusters using the latest big data technology.

We’re looking for that rarity to lead our future technology and approach. You’ll be testing out any data orientated tech you want – you think we can take that 4 hour processing time down to 10 mins using Kafka? Give it a go! Prove it. Think that Scala has had its’ day and we need to move to something more useable? Show us a model.

Whatever you can prove, we’ll go for, just bear in mind, you’re the subject matter expert so you’re going to have to field the questions and teach people how to use it.

FAQ:

So I have a Sandbox to play in?

Kinda… you’ll be given a huge amount of free rein to try a range of technologies and apply them to our problem sets. You will also have to prove to professional sceptics that this is the right path, and then support your initiatives with hard data.

How does this team work?

You’ll be joining the Data and Platforms Team as their Lead Analyst. The team is responsible for investigating, testing and implementing the technology solutions that power our insight. There are 8 engineers and 6 analysts in this team. You’ll have a team of 4 Analysts under you and work closely with the engineering team to implement your ideas.
What are you looking for in the ideal candidate?

You’ll be a career Analyst or Data Scientist. Data scale is something you’re very used to; machine learning, decision trees, neural networks (insert more buzzwords) will all be areas you’re familiar with, along with the code to use them. You’ll be at a time in your career where you’re a bit bored of working on client problems, to client timelines and are fascinated by technology. You’ll love tinkering, experimenting with new tech, and most importantly, be used to following through on your recommendations.
Do you have a bullet point checklist for me to check off my suitability?

We know people are not bullet points but sure thing!

You have:

5+ years Analytics experience including carrying out data analytics or data science work
Previous experience working with large complex datasets and associated Big Data technologies e.g. Scala, Spark, Hadoop, Zeppelin or similar
Demonstrable ability to work with and influence senior stakeholders
Performance management of more junior analysts
Product management experience desirable
Experience writing and delivering technical training that convey complex analysis and ideas in simple messages
Experience updating and managing content on Confluence or other knowledge share sites
Tertiary qualifications in engineering, mathematics, actuarial studies, statistics, physics, or a related discipline"	 - Sydney NSW	Analytics Lead, Data & PlatformsQuantium13 reviews - Sydney NSW	Analytics Lead, Data & Platforms
268	"Want to join one of Australia's largest and most forward thinking Data, Tech and Analytics agencies?

We are Annalect. We're a part of global marketing company OMG (Omnicom Media Group), and we're looking for a Senior Data Scientist to join our team. We use data, analytics and technology to drive digital strategy and achieve outstanding results for our rapidly expanding clients.

This is a great opportunity to work on market-leading brands and develop your career!

Why you'll love us

Through our people philosophy “Because I am, we are”, we believe that happy people with a great work/life balance are able to bring the #WOW factor to work.They're also much more fun to share an office with. Join us and surround yourself with like-minded, high achieving individuals. Together, we can change the way digital works.

We can offer:
Unbeatable career development opportunities and mentoring

Flexible working arrangements centered on work / life balance

State of the art tools – we have a dedicated internal tools team

A social culture with a well-being focus - yoga, nutrition, meditation + more

Why we'll love you

You have a passion for Data, Tech and Analytics and you're ready to make a real impact. As the Senior Data Scientist, you'll play a critical role in helping clients across multiple industries make data driven marketing decisions. Specifically, you will analyse large amounts of data to determine how customers interact with our clients' advertising across different channels and devices.

Here's what you'll need:
3-5 years' experience of building models and deriving insights in a position as an Analyst or a Data Scientist

A degree in a quantitative discipline e.g. Math/Statistics, Engineering, Computer Science, Econometrics, Actuarial etc. is required

Proficiency and experience in statistical modelling and machine learning techniques (feature engineering, regression, classification, segmentation, cross validation, bootstrapping, Bayesian techniques etc.)

A high level of proficiency with at least one programming languages used in data science (R/Python/SAS/Scala/MATLAB).

Understanding of media technology (ad-servers, DMPs)

Proficiency with SQL

Experience with visualisation and dashboarding software (Tableau, Power BI)

Proficiency in dealing with large datasets (data mining etc.)

Proficiency with AWS, Hadoop, Spark, Redshift or other big data platforms

Why our love will last

Not just anyone can fill this role. We want someone who can take it and make it their own. To do this, we want to see you:

Provide business solutions and optimisation through various statistical and quantitative methods. Provide statistical models to support predictive analytics and deliver non-technical presentations to all levels of the business as well as technical documentation to the wider team

Build bespoke Digital Attribution models and improve our digital attribution product offering

Build direct response and econometric models. Maintain and improve our processes and methodology

Become an expert in marketing science, this includes understanding how data is collected and processed across different platforms and channels

Derive insights from data and communicate those insights to a non-technical audience through presentations and documentation

Work effectively as part of a team to deliver client outcomes

Deliver analytical consulting services to Omnicom clients. These include ad-hoc modelling and analysis projects as well as providing recommendations on data and analytics processes and projects

Possess excellent communication skills - being able to both interpret and convey information in a clear, concise way

Does this sound like a you? Bring your passion and drive to a company who want you to thrive. Get in touch with us today. We can't wait to meet you."	 - Sydney NSW	Senior Data ScientistOmnicom Media Group171 reviews - Sydney NSWFull-time, Permanent	Senior Data Scientist
270	"Job Description:About IntellifyIntellify is a data science and machine learning consultancy who helps our customers to increase their growth, operate more efficiently and build competitive advantage. Our team consists of leading data scientists, machine learning engineers and consultants that extensively use advanced (statistical) machine learning and optimisation techniques to create state-of-the-art solutions for business. As an emerging AWS consulting partner, we have the ability to scale our solution to any needs through their cloud platform.About the OpportunityAs we are growing at a rapid speed, we are seeking a senior full-time data scientist/machine learning engineer who has extensive experience in data science, machine learning and/or statistical modelling as well as programming. As part of this role, you will supervise and manage junior data scientists, and work on development to build data science solutions using a combination of the latest technologies and business strategies.With a startup culture and applying cutting-edge technology to real-world business problems, you have the opportunity to drive impact at some of Australia’s leading startups and enterprises as well as to learn and grow within a team of like-minded data scientists. Our client problems have ranged from pricing, inventory and workforce optimisation to computer vision applied to radar data for predictive maintenance. The work is varied and challenging, and will require someone who is dynamic in their thinking as well as willing to explore and try new ideas.Being a senior data scientist at Intellify you are charged with both being a mentor and learning from fellow specialist data scientists in an ever evolving and improving atmosphere. We want to see you thrive professionally and personally as we create a leading data science, machine learning and AI company of the future.What we offerThis is a full-time permanent role. This role will provide a unique opportunity to work in a collaborative team and learn from experienced data scientists, so you can advance your knowledge and get hands-on experience with state-of-the-art machine learning methods. Our salaries are competitive, and we offer flexible working hours. We also believe great data science comes from great teams, so invest continuously in upskilling and cross-training our data scientists, with lunch & learn sessions, training courses and certifications, and an opportunity to be a core part of our data science and machine learning communities. Furthermore, we offer the following:1) 10 x paid days of professional development per year (attend/ speak @ conferences, undertake courses and certifications)2) $2,200 Toolkit allowance to go out and buy your own tech3) Profit sharing4) Work with high-profile clients5) A defined career path with your 1-1 mentor6) Great team culture7) Have an impact in a small team where there is no politics8) Flexible & inclusive work-environment9) Work closely with AWS using cutting edge cloud technologiesRequired Skills: A computer science, robotics, maths, statistics, physics or related degree (graduated Bachelors, MSc, PhD or last year MSc/PhD student)5+ years of applied industry machine learning, optimisation and/or statistics experienceStrong Python or R programming experience and related data science libraries (such as scikit-learn, Pandas, Tensorflow/Keras)Strong SQL database and code versioning (e.g., Git) skillsGood software engineering principlesProject management / team management experienceExperience with data visualisation tools or frameworks i.e. tableau, D3.js, ggplot2 etc.Desirable skills: Knowledge or experience of software engineering practicesKnowledge or experience on time series/product forecasting/recommender systemsKnowledge of deep learning/neural networksExperience working with web development technologiesExperience working with cloud technologies i.e. AWS / Microsoft / Google Cloud.Portfolio evidence of your previous work is appreciated (i.e. blog, github repository, conference presentations etc).How to ApplyIf you wish to take the next step in your career working and learning with the best in an innovative data science company, please click on ""Apply now"" and include:Your CVYour portfolio of projects (eg GitHub, blog site etc)Desired salaryYour availabilityBrief details (3-4 sentences) of either:A machine learning or data science project you have developed or delivered previously; orPrevious team leadership experience, where you worked with a team to deliver a project.We are looking forward to hearing from you.*** STRICTLY NO AGENCIES ***Please note that our Company Policy dictates direct recruitment only.Job Types: Full-time, Part-timeSalary: $120,000.00 to $160,000.00 /yearExperience:machine learning, optimisation and/or statistics: 3 years (Required)"	 - Sydney NSW	Senior Data Scientist/ Machine learning engineerIntellify - Sydney NSW$120,000 - $160,000 a year - Full-time, Part-time	Senior Data Scientist/ Machine learning engineer
271	"Deloitte is the world’s largest professional service firm, with one of the largest and most experienced Analytics, Information Management (AIM) & Data Automation practices. We have 400+ specialised consultants in Australia and more than 6,000 practitioners in the Deloitte global network.
With the ever increasing complexity and volume of data, the rise of in-memory, high performance computing, data discovery and visualisation solutions and the convergence of Big Data and Advanced Analytics, organisations are faced with increasing number of choices to ensure they are able to exploit their data assets for maximum advantage. Deloitte is able to draw from its vast global experience delivering complex data driven solutions for our clients across the full spectrum of technology and business domains to provide the right strategic advice to help an organisation respond effectively to these changes – as well as partner with our clients to execute on our recommendations.
About the Role
Do you want to be a part of how we help companies utilise their valuable data resources through effective use of the right technology, backed by a clear vision and strong executive sponsorship? Do you want to be part of an award winning team that provides clients with a visionary, yet balanced and pragmatic approach to automating concepts and tools to improve productivity and performance?
This is an opportunity to harness emerging technologies and analytical methodologies to solve real world problems. You will be part of a close, collaborative team that identifies and builds solutions that are practical as well as visionary, and that make an impact that matters.
We are looking for people who love data and want to solve problems with insight. Whether you call yourself a data scientist, analytics nerd or builder of predictive models. We want to hear from you if you are genuinely passionate about this area and have some applied experience.
You will be responsible for delivering insights through a range of corporate data sources through the application of analytics, data mining, Big Data and real-time decision making techniques and applications using various data management, analytics & data visualization tools.
About You
You’ll bring experience in one or more of the following competencies and enabling technologies
A strong background in applying mathematical and analytics approaches and methodologies to identifying complex relationships in data
Ability to communicate technical requirements and outputs in a clear and concise manner
A structured, logical and solution-oriented design mindset
Ability to work autonomously and with minimal oversight
Ability to demonstrate initiative and ownership in the completion of tasks
A demonstrable interest and passion for exploring new data/analytics concepts, applications and innovations (e.g. Cognitive, Robotics & Automate, AI, IoT etc.)
Some experience using a range of scripting languages – (e.g. Python, R, SQL etc.)
About Us: Deloitte Culture
Join a high performing culture of talented people, who are highly motivated and passionate about delivering impactful analytics solutions and insight. We are innovative and different because YOU are… we pride ourselves on our team of diverse, high performing Deloitte Professionals who are talented, supportive, inclusive and social – and who are at the heart of our success. Our aim is to ensure that all our people feel comfortable to bring their whole selves to work, and as a result, build a workplace that encourages the true spirit of 'And different'.
From day one at our firm you’ll be considered part of the Deloitte community and our development and career progression framework will help you develop the skills and capabilities that will set you up to succeed – in every sense of the word. At Deloitte, we assume that you perform other roles within your life…you could be a student, a teacher, a passionate hobbyist and a caring family member. We recognise the importance of balance and embrace agility, understanding that this means different things to each and every one of our employees.
If you have questions regarding this role, the Talent Acquisition Team is available to have a confidential discussion. Please contact Aditi Aggarwal via the Our Recruiters section on our careers website."	 - Sydney NSW	EXPRESSION OF INTEREST - Data & Analytics - NationalDeloitte7,167 reviews - Sydney NSW	EXPRESSION OF INTEREST - Data & Analytics - National
272	You remember how to roll up your sleeves and craft data joins in SQL, but you've invested time in learning R, and Python is your friend. You know Hadoop isn't the only approach and you're happiest getting behind the GUI into the real data to uncover the stories.Isn't it about time you took advantage of the benefits from all that knowledge?Our client is looking for data polyglots who enjoy solving complex problems; not the kind you can come to with a canned response, the ones where you really need to use your skills.With some of the biggest names in Australia and around the world throwing their most pressing problems at our client they need curious guides - but they only take the best.Getting in isn't easy, but if it was, it wouldn't be the right place for you.Prove yourself and you can build a team behind you to grow your own patch. The opportunities truly are what you make them.With Udemy on tap, and weekly internal led training sessions, you'll be joining a group of like-minded people who are capable of understanding you when you get on your high horse about relevance over recency (or the other way around).Currently our client has four areas of practice, you can join one these and then explain to them what they need to build another:Data & Analytics - BI/DW, Big Data Analytics, Data Engineering, Data Science and Advanced AnalyticsCustomer Engagement - Marketing Campaigns, Campaign Analysis, Customer InsightsDigital - Full stack Development, UI/UX Design, Mobile DevelopmentCloud & Technology - Cloud Services (AWS, Azure, Google Cloud Platform), Managed ServicesWe're not worried about levels at the moment, if you've got the skills there's a place for you.SEO stuff because you know we need to have it in here;Data engineerData scientistData ConsultantJava, Scala, Python, HadoopApache Spark, Kafka, Hive, Airflow, NiFiAWS, Google Cloud Platform or Azure is helpful but not mandatoryJob Types: Full-time, PermanentExperience:data consulting: 3 years (Preferred)	 - Sydney NSW	Software Architect / Tech LeadKloudPPL - Sydney NSWFull-time, Permanent	Software Architect / Tech Lead
273	"The Company

Robert Half Technology are working alongside a well reputable and established Insurance organisation in the CBD and we are currently looking for a talented Data Scientist to join our team on a permanent basis. Our client continue to grow across all areas of the business and this role has been created due to the expansion of the division. This role represents an exciting challenge and career opportunity for a Data Scientist to join our forward thinking client.

The Role

The Role of the Data Scientist will have the opportunity to make their mark using data led decision making and modelling to catalyse industry disuption. Aspects of the role include:

Proportion your role with Modelling, Research, Analysism Data Manipulation and Collaboration.

Work as a data expert and a quantitative researcher.

Translate unstructured, complex business problems into practical, powerful algorithmic solutions.

Be part of a highly innovative team working on interesting and difficult problems, leveraging cutting edge technology to build key data products.

Uncover fresh insights from disparate data sources and data mining

Spearheading machine learning projects on data that has never been touched by the organization.

About You

This is a hands-on position where you will be empowered to be very ambitious and bold, to solve challenging problems and have the potential to directly impact the future of the business. The role requires that you have experience in machine learning and data mining.

Your experience and skills should include most, if not all:
Ability to communicate complex quantitative analysis in a clear, precise and actionable manner

Practical experience using contemporary machine learning frameworks such as, scikit-learn, pytorch and tensorflow.

A proven track record in developing, innovating, and applying advanced algorithms to address practical problems and in building new analytical products of commercial value.

Experience in Python and/or R.

Experience in relational databases and SQL

Apply Today

Please send your resume by clicking on the apply button or for further information, contact our Melbourne office."	 - Melbourne VIC	Data Scientist - Market Leader - CBDRobert Half Australia6,897 reviews - Melbourne VIC$110,000 a year - Permanent	Data Scientist - Market Leader - CBD
274	"Data Science in Sydney, Australia
@Metigy we are creating the next generation of AI-driven Marketing Technology (Martech) for business by helping them discover and unlock the secrets hidden in their data. Our AI is built on state-of-the-art data mining and delivered using the art of storytelling delivered through statistics and gamification. We aim to delight and reward our customers by improving their marketing performance and delivering best in class tools.

As a lead data scientist @Metigy, you will lead the team in creating and defining data-driven stories that help our customers understand and grow their marketing. We believe data should drive insights, trigger actions and reward our customers.

Our Mission is to help users succeed with our marketing assistant technology.

What You’ll be working on
You will be instrumental in conception and delivery of our product using AI to tailor and deliver marketing recommendations to customers
Using analytical methods and visualization techniques to surface marketing insights that lead to recommendations to drive key marketing decisions for customers
Selecting features, building and optimizing data collection, processing and classifiers using machine learning techniques
Develop company A/B testing framework and test model quality continually
Provide leadership and mentorship to the data team
Leading the Big Data Engineers to build highly available, scalable, and secure systems tacking technical ownership and managing resources
Coordinate with different parts of the business to help design and implement models to solve marketing challenges and monitor outcomes
From a vague question, you can come up with a thorough data-driven answer, doing ad-hoc research and analysis, presenting results in a clear manner and occasionally publishing research
What Data Scientist are you?
Firstly, what we have just described is something you are already passionate about.

You are product focused and see everything, theoretical or actual through to delivery
Strong problem-solving skills and a gift for telling beautiful stories with the data. You dream of working with large, multi-source, multi-faceted, complex, exciting datasets built from the Social Graph (can you tell we love our datasets?)
User Experience is part of the art of how a data scientist tells a data-driven story and you are passionate about building clear interfaces that give users the best experience possible
Experience working with and creating data architectures
Knowledge of a variety of machine learning techniques (clustering, decision tree learning, artificial neural networks, etc.) and their real-world advantages/drawbacks.
You love communicating with small, nimble teams in a high visibility role where you can really own the solution
Excellent written and verbal communication skills for communicating across teams
You’ve worked for over 5-7 years in a data related role and become a generalist because you love solving problems in creative ways and developing end to end solutions
Above all, you have the drive to learn and master new technologies and techniques continually. We live in a beautiful, ever-changing world that happens in real time, all the time. And our goal is to help our customers conquer that new frontier, one great recommendation at a time!

You will need to be Sydney based."	 - Sydney NSW	Lead Data Scientist in SydneyMetigy - Sydney NSW	Lead Data Scientist in Sydney
275	"Who we are

Tyro is Australia’s largest fintech and newest bank. We’re giving the business banking world a good shake up, with smart technology that save Australian businesses time and money.
We’re born different.
We don’t follow the easy path, we blaze our own unique trail.
And we want like-minded people who understand where we’re coming from and where we’re going.
When it comes to banks, lots of them say they’re different.
But Tyro really is different. We don’t do mortgages, personal loans, or investments. We’re all about business.
We may be new, but what we lack in heritage, we make up for with relentless determination and a focus on the future.
Our singular goal is to make life better for business owners with superior products and services that are simple and seamless so our customers, and our people, can keep blazing our own unique trail.

As Senior Data Scientist, you will lead Tyro’s Data Science team and collaborate with our talented data engineers and business partners to deliver insights, predictive modelling, and machine learning capability projects. In addition, you will own Tyro’s advanced analytics strategy and support Tyro in our mission to help make life better for our business customers across Australia.
Our success depends on your ability to apply both traditional and innovative machine learning based approaches to massive structured and unstructured datasets to uncover actionable outcomes that improve customer experience and business outcomes. You are someone that is passionate about data, has applied expertise in manipulating historical and real-time data for tangible customer benefits, as well as possess excellent interpersonal and communication skills.
Main Activities
Developing and executing on the advanced analytics strategy and roadmap
Collaborate alongside our data engineering team to lead analytical projects from beginning to end, including understanding business needs, negotiating key project deliverables, mapping out appropriate methodologies, aggregating data, exploring data, building & validating predictive models, deploying completed models, and presenting solutions to deliver business impact
Leveraging analytical techniques to deliver quality insights and support recommendations to business leaders across Product, Sales, Marketing, Finance, and Risk, encompassing use cases such as product portfolio optimisation, customer segmentation, acquisition and retention, marketing campaign optimisation, business operations improvements, etc.
Leading and nurturing Tyro’s Data Science function by providing thought leadership, work flow management, solution trouble shooting, and team coaching
Championing a data and insights-driven decision-making culture across the group and proactively engaging in the broader analytical community
Experience
5+ years of industry experience in predictive modelling, data science and analysis
Commercial experience driving real world benefits from advanced analytics and machine learning techniques relating to product and customer strategies
Experience collaborating with software teams to deliver results using agile methodologies
Data modelling background with experience across one or more of the following tools: SQL, R, Python, Matlab
Understanding of data engineering and ingestion process with experience across a range of datastores that could include AWS Redshift, Snowflake, Kafka, Hadoop, Spark
Warm interpersonal skills with the ability to consult around analytical project requirements, mapping out appropriate methodologies, negotiating key project deliverables, presenting solutions and proving business value
Excellent oral and written communications; ability to present and discuss technical information in layperson terms that establishes rapport, persuades others and gains understanding
Intensely curious and innovative in approach to problem solving
Masters or PHD in an analytical or technical field - Mathematics, Statistics, Computer Science, Physics or Engineering
Why work for us

We're not just like every other bank. Tyro has always been a tech company at heart, but fostering a diverse and inclusive environment, and a passion for continuous learning has always been one of the most important parts of our company's culture.

Tyros are a highly collaborative mix of people. You will work closely with our awesome teams and individuals in engineering, product management, customer support, sales and other functions within the business. Everyone is committed to delivering great outcomes for our customers, and you will have the chance to change the face of banking for Australia businesses.

Our 400 strong team of Tyros, just like our customers, are the lifeblood of our business. We go to great lengths to ensure a positive and enjoyable employee experience for all. We offer some amazing employee benefits such as a generous training budget, regular training for professional and personal development, 16 weeks paid primary carers leave, 3 weeks paid secondary carers leave, annual team based volunteer day, 17.5% leave loading and not to mention our multiple craft beer kegs (selection of beers carefully selected by our beer connoisseurs), wide selection of wine, variety of snacks and a ping pong table, selection of board and video games and an awesome rooftop area for socialising, all available to be enjoyed.

Privacy and Submitting your Application
By proceeding to submit your application, you acknowledge that you have read and understood Tyro’s Privacy Policy (www.tyro.com/privacy-policy/) and Privacy Statement & Consent for Job Applicants (www.tyro.com/privacy-statement-job-applicants/) and consent to Tyro collecting, using, holding and disclosing your personal information in accordance with these policies."	 - Sydney NSW	Senior Data ScientistTyro - Sydney NSW	Senior Data Scientist
276	"Work with a globally recognised name. On trend working environment on the Harbour. Client facing skills a must as you work with tier one companies. This role is less of a scientist, more of a Data Artist!

The role: This is a client facing role for a Data Scientist with a flair for creative interpretation. We want to attract Data experts who are ready to take a step up into a full Data Scientist position. A role for a Data Scientist with a flair for the creative and excellent client facing skills. In this role you will be supported by the development team and Business Analysts.

So, if you are looking to move away from a conventional data scientist role, this could be for you. Your work across various domains will assist greatly as you contribute to solutions that combine data, technology, and customer experience. Responsibilities: Collaborate across internal and external teams to understand complex data Conduct statistical data analysis with client's data Ability to provide commercial solutions & insights to solve problems using data to key stakeholders Assist in driving marketing strategy for the clients ability to develop machine learning and AI capabilities for the business Constantly learning and driving success in the team through developing of new skills, methodologies & algorithms in predictive modelling, data science and visualization Essential skills: Minimum 3 years of experience working as a data scientist/data analyst with proven results through projects undertaken Exposure to Data analysis tools ie. R, Python, SAS, SQL Visualisation tools ie.

SSRS, Power BI, Tableau, Shiny Commercial exposure in machine learning & AI technologies Excellent communication & presentation skills Stakeholder engagement ie. Non-technical end users, internal & external clients Self-starter and enjoy working on complex dataset to solve problem If you like getting your hands dirty with data & solving interesting problems, APPLY TODAY! Please upload your CV through the link or call Fei Wong on 02 9270 5292 / email to fwong@siriustechnology.com.au for a confidential chat."	 - Sydney Central Business District NSW	Data Science Consultant (Read...Data Artist), Sydney perm - Sydney Central Business District NSWPermanent	Data Science Consultant (Read...Data Artist), Sydney perm
277	"About Us
We’re one of Australia’s fastest growing companies and a leading world mobile advertising, user acquisition and monetisation platform. Delivering billions of ads a month, across thousands of apps in over 165 countries.

We’re growing our Data/Analytics team and with that we are looking for a highly skilled, analytically minded individual to join our cross functional teams based in Bondi Junction.

Reporting to out CTO and working in our dynamic teams the Data Scientist will focus on our existing and up and coming product suit.


About the Role:
Provide performance-based product recommendations including data driven improvements, product features, system optimizations or data usage for Leadbolt’s Fraud and Attribution products;
Undertake data analysis including data modelling, competitor or 3rd party product and market reviews to ensure best in class performance outcomes for Leadbolt’s products;
Produce and maintain documentation for product and data analysis including reports, specifications, implementation plans, testing/QA regimes and summarize any results as needed or requested;
Liaise within broader cross functional teams where required according to requirements of the business.
What you will bring:
Minimum of 3+ years’ professional experience
Minimum Master’s Degree in data science related discipline
Excellent written and verbal communication skills;
Action/outcome and performance-based mindset;
It would be awesome if you also brought:
Minimum 2+ years’ relevant experience in:
o online digital media/agency
o desktop or mobile ad serving
o performance/data science-based role
Collaborative mindset and enjoys consultation with others;
Ability to adapt multiple approaches and with a passion for problem solving;
Ability to work within a cross functional team environment;

What makes us different?
As we continue to expand globally and find the best talent out there, we are looking for innovative, ingenious, driven and revolutionary people to join us.
Working at Leadbolt gives the opportunity to work with industry experts and for you to grow your skillset and gain valuable experiences that will build and shape your career for the future.

If you can see yourself at Leadbolt and want to be part of all of this, apply now by sending us a video cover letter (tell us about yourself) and attaching your resume."	 - Bondi Junction NSW	Data ScientistLeadbolt - Bondi Junction NSW	Data Scientist
278	"About the Team
Our Insight and Data team helps our clients make a better business decision-making by transforming an ocean of data into streams of insight. Our clients are among Australia's top performing companies and they choose to partner with Capgemini for a very good reason - our exceptional people.
About the role
We are looking for a Data Scientist to analyse large amounts of raw information to find patterns and build data products to extract valuable business insights. Your responsibilities include: Interacting with clients to gather requirements, design solution frameworks, program, develop and present analysis, tools or solutions.


Identify datasets that contain both structured and unstructured data. Determine features that can be derived from available data.
Experience using statistical techniques to manipulate data and draw insights from large data sets.
Knowledge of a variety of machine learning techniques (clustering, decision tree learning, artificial neural networks, etc.) and their real-world advantages/drawbacks.
Knowledge of advanced statistical techniques and concepts (regression, properties of distributions, statistical tests and proper usage, etc.) and experience with applications.
Perform activities like data extract, transform and load, data quality assessment, data cleansing and enhancing, complex data transformation, relationship profiling, sampling and extrapolation, segmentation.
Test and evaluate multiple unsupervised or supervised machine learning methods and develop custom algorithms, if necessary.
Develop solutions that heavily utilize tools and technologies such as R, Python, SAS, Tensor flow, Azure Machine learning, Spark, Hive.
Build functional solutions that incorporate and perform Real time analytics, Predictive analytics, Big data analytics, Statistical modelling, Machine Learning, Deep Learning, Natural Language Processing and Artificial Intelligence.
Provide end user documentation to assist clients in running the analysis/tools on a regular basis.
Consult stakeholders on how to improve decision making using data driven insights that can lead to better customer outcomes.

Most importantly about you
You will have the ability to help clients execute end-to-end data science projects using proven methodologies and enable them to analyse trends, find patterns, predict next best action, use artificial intelligence for automating processes, making accurate predictions and better business decisions. You will ideally have experience in most of the following:


Proven experience as a Data Scientist
Experience in data mining, statistical methods, machine-learning and operations research
Strong Knowledge of and experience R, SQL and Python; experience with Spark, Scala, Java or C++ is an asset
Experience using Data Science tools (e.g. Cloudera Data Science Workbench, SAS, SAP HANA PAL etc.) and
Experience using business intelligence tools (e.g. Zoomdata, QlikView, Tableau etc.) and data frameworks (e.g. Hadoop)
Excellent communication and presentation skills

What we can offer you?
Capgemini is a world leader in technology enabled change. We can offer our consultants;


Formal training with industry recognized certifications
The ability to interact with peers in a sharing and inclusive community
Exciting and challenging projects
A well-structured and tailored career framework
A culture of collaboration and recognition
Excellent remuneration

About Capgemini
Capgemini is one of the world's foremost providers of consulting, technology, outsourcing services and local professional services. Present in over 40 countries with more than 180,000 people, the Capgemini Group helps its clients transform in order to improve their performance and competitive positioning.
Ranked among Ethisphere's 2018 Most Ethical Companies in the Word. Our seven values are at the heart of everything we do - Honesty, Boldness, Trust, Team Spirit, Freedom, Fun and Modesty.
If you believe you have “La Niaque” to go the extra mile, then apply by submitting your resume and cover letter.
Want to know more? To learn more about Capgemini and find out about what makes our people unique, log ontowww.capgemini.com.au"	 - Canberra ACT	Data ScientistCapgemini Australia5,914 reviews - Canberra ACTPermanent	Data Scientist
279	"Our Consumer Data Analytics & Science team are looking for an innovative Senior Data Scientist to help them work on key projects to predict consumer behaviour, and conduct advanced analytics across the carsales consumer business. Data is a key decision making tool at carsales, and better understanding our customers’ behaviours is an important piece of the puzzle.

You’ll work with a highly motivated and exceptionally talented team of data analysts and scientists to build reporting and predictive solutions, and deliver data-rich products, insights and analytics to both external clients and internal stakeholders across our sales, marketing, technology and product management teams.

What you’ll do

Development of end to end analytics including customer profiling, segmentation, lifetime value and loyalty.
Work with stakeholders across the business to generate insights that will lead to the optimisation of product & marketing activities.
Analyse website performance to identify and recommend new ways to connect with customers and enhance their online journey.
Develop new ways of analysis through statistics and modelling that assists in understanding and predicting customer behaviour.
Act as a subject matter expert, yet collaborate effectively across-channels and different teams
Support growth, marketing, product, UX support and multiple other teams with data analytics and reporting expertise
Work across all business units and international branches to ensure measurement and transparency of all activity.

What we’re looking for

Strong SQL skills, with working knowledge of Python and/or R. Experience with large-scale column-oriented databases is advantageous.
At least a bachelor degree in an analytical field (e.g. Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Engineering or a similar discipline), preferably with knowledge of hypothesis testing and statistical/machine learning.
Someone who will work collaboratively with various teams to collect, collate and interpret data, and then communicate the insights effectively to both technical and non-technical stakeholders.
Customer-centric mindset, with proven ability to recommend opportunities that drive greater advocacy.
Experience in a commercial environment is essential and exposure to digital data is highly sought after.
Exposure to leadership, coaching or mentoring juniors would be a bonus but isn’t a requirement.

Why Apply?

carsales offers extensive opportunities to learn and evolve in a diverse, fast-paced and dynamic environment. We are committed to our people through many ongoing initiatives associated with culture and benefits, career development, health and well-being, community, work-life balance, reward and recognition. We continually strive to attract and retain the most talented people through a number of programs designed to support learning and development. When you work at carsales you don't just have a job, but you have a rewarding career.

carsales is an equal opportunity employer who prides themselves on providing a diverse workplace that brings out the best in its people. We encourage women and men of all ages and background to apply.
-"	 - Melbourne VIC	Senior Data Scientistcarsales.com.au3 reviews - Melbourne VICFull-time, Permanent	Senior Data Scientist
280	"QBE is one of the top 20 global general insurers and is recognised as Australia's largest international insurance and Reinsurance Company, with operations in 37 countries around the world.

Working at QBE, we recognise the value of diversity and inclusion in the workplace and support a range of flexible work arrangements to promote a better family/life/work balance.

We offer you a dynamic workplace culture, one that values and leverages the unique ideas, capabilities and experiences you bring irrespective of where you are in the world. We believe this strengthens our ability to deliver on our business goals, particularly as it relates to innovation, growth and our focus on customers.

The opportunity

QBE is about to embark on a journey of growth in Data and Analytics and we will be looking for a number of experienced Data professionals to help us in this next phase of our growth.

The Data Scientist serves as a modelling and data science partner for assigned business areas responsible for the scientific integrity of work products, including study design, research methodology, and the deployment of statistical approaches and modelling.

Key Responsibilities
Leading analytical conversation with business centred on “The art of the possible using data science”, exploring data from a modelling perspective, and performing initial exploratory data analysis to assess business value
Working in close partnership with analytics managers to size analytical opportunities and execute plans that ensure a positive commercial return
Developing, implementing and maintaining analytical models to identify fraud, drive recoveries and renewals, drive profitable growth, and improve underwriting, pricing and claims performance
Building analytical application designs and prototyping to test ideas and drive innovation in an agile fashion
Working with information management specialists to identify and classify new feature sets, explore machine learning algorithms, and extract new feature sets
Working with analytics partners to build and operationalise models, quantifying and analysing model performance, and overseeing model refreshing requirements
Managing analytical projects and coordinating activities with other shared services partners by prioritising relevant activities and providing subject matter expertise
Assisting in the development of commercial propositions involving the use of analytics within insurance core functions through own analysis, prior experience, and research & development
Implementing fit-for-purpose analytics tools and infrastructure that will be adopted by end users (e.g. claims handlers)
Contributing to a positive environment by demonstrating cultural expectations and guiding leaders to reward performance, and valuing “can do” people, accountability, diversity and inclusion, flexibility, continuous improvement, collaboration, creativity and fun

What does success look like?
Degree qualified in econometrics, mathematics, statistics or related discipline
Strong knowledge of statistical/data mining methods and application in a business environment
Experience in working in Big data technology (Hadoop, NoSQL DB)
Track record of implementing models that deliver significant sustained business impact
Good understanding of Data Science domain, statistical and analytical model development and implementation
Proficient in machine learning techniques and related disciplines
Significant data management experience, gained from within the financial services sector, ideally within general insurance
Good understanding of data modelling techniques, tools/language - R, Python
Good knowledge of visualisation tools such as PowerBI, Tableau, etc.
Strong project management, collaboration and communication skills
Ability to apply logic and reasoning to identify solutions to complex business problems and implement solutions
Business and financial acumen
Curiosity to learn and keep up with market trends and innovations
Flexibility to adapt in a complex changing environment
Ability to lead, manage and motivate a team, engage and influence stakeholders at all levels
Strong written and verbal communication skills

Benefits?

At QBE, you will be provided with a competitive remuneration structure and benefits, in an environment that offers support, and encourages career development and learning.

We offer a range of benefits and discounts including:
Paid Parental leave (inclusive of paid superannuation during this time)
Secondment opportunities
Employee assistance programme
Paid volunteer leave
Purchased leave
Product discounts
Superannuation matching

Applicants will be required to provide evidence of their eligibility to work in Australia, and at a minimum be required to undertake police and basic credit checks as a condition of employment.

For more information, click the APPLY button to submit your details.

Number of Openings:
1

How to Apply:
To submit your application, click ""Apply"" and follow the step by step process.

Equal Employment Opportunity:
QBE is an equal opportunity employer and is required to comply with equal employment opportunity legislation in each jurisdiction it operates."	 - New South Wales	Data ScientistQBE109 reviews - New South Wales	Data Scientist
281	"Requisition ID: 16575
Job Category: Consulting; Engineering; Information Technology; Technology

With over six decades of business and technical experience in the mining, energy, and infrastructure sectors, we understand that challenges are changing rapidly in every industry. We respond quickly with solutions that are smarter, more efficient, and innovative. We draw upon our 9,000 staff with experience in over 150 countries to challenge the status quo and create positive change for our clients, our employees, and the communities we serve.
Unique opportunity to be exposed to complex & diverse data science problems across various industries
Access to global expertise, technologies and career advancement opportunities
Enthusiastic team with fresh ideas, where you can contribute to the future growth of the practice
Hatch is seeking applications from Data Scientists in Perth; individuals who can develop and use AI/ML tools and data processing pipelines to solve technical challenges for our clients in the mining & resource industries.
Under the guidance of Senior Data Scientists you will import, clean and wrangle data, carry out exploratory data analyses and build and evaluate various predictive models. Working with subject matter experts, you will interrogate data and use models to uncover insights into the processes under investigation.
You will be working with the Project Manager, utilising effective project planning techniques to break down moderately complex projects into tasks and ensure deadlines and deliverables are kept.
This is an opportunity to join a professional, progressive organisation and become part of an inclusive, supportive team. You will be able to network with colleagues locally, regionally and globally to achieve career success. We strive to maintain a culture that welcomes diversity of thought, individual contribution and team collaboration.
We are an entrepreneurial business in which opportunities abound, so we may ask you to travel domestically and internationally for business, as well as potentially undertake extended assignments away from time to time.
Core Functional Tasks & Key Responsibilities of this role include:
Processing, cleansing and verifying the integrity of data used for analysis
Utilize exploratory data analysis techniques to understand the data and multivariate analysis to generate new features
Building predictive models using state-of-the-art methods and use appropriate diagnostics to access the performance of the models
Undertaking ad-hoc analysis and presenting results in a clear manner
Identifying opportunities to improve and enhance data collection and management procedures to include information that is relevant for building analytics systems
Creating and maintaining automated anomaly detection systems
Identifying meaningful insights from large data and metadata sources and interpret and communicate insights and findings from analysis to clients and internal interdisciplinary teams
Collaborating with clients to ensure projects and outcomes meet their business requirements
Communicating and coordinating effectively with the data science team, systems team, and customer-facing teams to ensure models and results are well understood and incorporated into their business processes
We are ideally looking for individuals who possess the following qualifications and skills:
Bachelor's in Mathematics, Applied Mathematics, Statistics, Physics, Computer Science or related area
Experience in quantitative analysis / research of large, complex data sets
Understanding of and experience with predictive analytics techniques and inductive statistical analysis to predict outcomes and behaviours
Knowledge and understanding of machine learning techniques and algorithms such as GLM, Neural Network, Naïve Bayes, SVM, Decision Trees, Random Forrest, Boosting methods, etc.
Experience with common data science analytical/programming tool, such as R, Python, Matlab, SAS, IBM SPSS, IBM DSX/IBM PMQ, RapidMiner
Experience with data visualization tools such as Tableau, Spotfire, PowerBI, etc.
Understanding of big data techniques & open source platforms and their application to data capture/integration
Possess confidence, creativity, critical thinking ability, a willingness to learn and take feedback, a proactive attitude when faced with challenges, a meticulous attention to unexpected details
Good written, verbal, analytical, organisational, problem-solving and presentation skills
Exposure with delivering using Agile
An employee owned organisation, by joining Hatch you will have the opportunity to be recognised and rewarded for your efforts. You will be provided with many benefits including: competitive remuneration and above statutory superannuation payments; optional salary sacrifice for additional annual leave, and participation in various employee reward and recognition and health and wellbeing programs.
To submit your application please click the ""Apply"" button below.
Unsolicited resumes from recruitment agencies will not be accepted for this position.
As an Equal Opportunity Employer, we are committed to fostering a workforce in each of our locations that reflects the diversity of the communities in which we operate. If you have any special needs requirements, please let us know and we will do our utmost to accommodate. Hatch also supports and encourages a flexible workplace. We offer our employees comprehensive benefits, including up to 12 weeks annual leave per year as part of our Purchased Leave Program."	 - Perth WA	Intermediate Data ScientistHatch279 reviews - Perth WA	Intermediate Data Scientist
282	"Job Description

As an experienced Data Scientist you will apply data mining techniques, perform statistical analysis, and develop machine learning algorithms to help us make smarter decisions to deliver even better solutions to Leidos and its customers. You will help us discover the information hidden in vast amounts of data and be comfortable communicating with a variety of stakeholders and importantly using language that is targeted to your audience.
You will work across a variety of projects at one time and your day may include:
Design and develop methods, processes, and systems to consolidate and analyse structured and unstructured, diverse sources including “big data” sources.
Develop and use advanced software programs, algorithms, querying and automated processes to cleanse, integrate and evaluate datasets and model complex business problems.
Supporting our business development and pre-sales activities by identifying advanced analytics opportunities that benefit current and potential customers
Research, design, implement and validate cutting-edge algorithms to analyse diverse sources of data to achieve targeted outcomes

Qualifications

Coupled with your Masters you will have previous experience delivering world-class data science outcomes, you solve complex analytical problems using quantitative approaches with your unique blend of analytical, mathematical and technical skills.
You will have a passion for discovering solutions hidden in large data sets and working with stakeholders to improve business outcomes.
Your confident and clear communications skills will see you effectively communicate to a variety of stakeholders and present information to senior leaders and executives.
You will also
Bring your in-depth understanding of statistical and predictive modelling concepts, machine-learning approaches, clustering and classification techniques, and recommendation and optimisation algorithms.
Have experience with common data science toolkits, such as R, Python, NumPy, MatLab, etc. (Excellence in at least one of these is highly desirable)
Be highly effective in managing multiple, concurrent activities, while understanding and managing priorities, dependencies and risk
Have strong conceptual, analytical and interpretive skills with high level of attention to detail
Be comfortable working in a fast-paced, test-driven, collaborative and iterative technology environment.
Additional Information

At Leidos you’ll enjoy 12 weeks’ paid parental leave as a primary carer, flexible work practices, discounted health insurance, novated leasing and more. Foster your career through complete access to learning and development and mentoring opportunities, we have a strong track record of internal promotion and career transitions. Join a company who acknowledges “People First”.
As a business we are focusing on setting people up for success and ensuring there is exposure to a variety of projects, so individuals can develop not only specialist skills, but broaden their experience within the defence field. If this sounds like you and you have the right attitude coupled with the willingness to learn and wanting to be part of a team of professional engineers that are leading the field – apply today
Redefine Possible for your career at Leidos.
This role does requires the successful applicant to be an Australian Citizen and hold at a minimum a Baseline Clearance."	 - Canberra ACT	Senior Data ScientistLeidos590 reviews - Canberra ACT	Senior Data Scientist
283	The CompanyOptimum Patient Care (OPC) has over 13 years of experience supporting primary care within the United Kingdom (UK) and is now expanding into Australia. OPC provides clinical review and reporting services, research support services (observational, database, clinical trials), data services and educational activities in practical disease management to health care professionals across the world.General practices collaborating with OPC contribute anonymised data to the OPC Research Database (OPCRD), enabling scientific research to better understand chronic diseases and improve health outcomes. Through analysis of extracts from OPCRD over 50 research publications have been supported to date.OPC offers general practices opportunities to participate within ethically-approved research studies and provides a range of paid services for specialised audits, targeted research and educational activities. OPC also collaborates with pharmaceutical companies and academic institutions to facilitate, ethically approved, non-interventional clinical studies.Following the success of OPC UK, OPC Australia was inspired and founded in 2017 with similar objectives.The RoleWe are looking for a Data Scientist to work alongside our research, statistical and database teams in the UK (Cambridge or Norfolk), Singapore and Australia (Brisbane). In this position you will gain invaluable experience within an internationally recognised research organisation involved in analysis and dissemination of data from large-scale observational studies and pragmatic randomised controlled trials.The successful candidate will have experience working with health research data, have a high attention to detail, strong time management skills, and most importantly an interest in clinical research.Your responsibilitiesRunning feasibility queries to assist in client proposal developmentGenerate datasets as per the study requirements and assist with query resolution.Providing advice to internal team members and external clients on study database(s) and their respective capabilities.Developing data collection systems which allow the integration of primary and secondary data sources in Australia.Provide support on database querying and reporting, using a data warehouse design, structured query language (SQL) and data visualization techniques.Develop and maintain data dictionaries for databases.Undertake quality checks to assure high standards of data quality.Contribute to data analyses as required for research projects.Maintain data standards, including compliance with the relevant Data Protection Acts, Information Governance and company policies.QualificationsBachelor degree in Biotechnology, Computer Science, Engineering, Maths, Epidemiology or equivalent qualificationRequired ExperienceStrong working knowledge of SQL (Essential)Experience working with large databasesAdvanced MS Excel skillsPreferred ExperienceExperience working with relational databasesDemonstrable experience working on clinical research studiesExperience of developing and maintaining data dictionaries for databasesKnowledge of statistical analysis tools (e.g. R, STATA, SPSS, SAS)Interest and knowledge of epidemiology, public health and clinical researchThe role is for a permanent full-time position. Salary is dependent on qualifications and experience. Immediate start is available.If you are interested, please send your CV with a Cover Letter summarising your suitability for the role. We look forward to hearing from you.Job Type: Full-time	 - Brisbane QLD	Data ScientistOptimum Patient Care Australia Ltd. - Brisbane QLD	Data Scientist
284	Job DescriptionThe candidate is a skilled data scientist who will be building deep learning models for medical image diagnosis applications such as segmentation, localisation and classification of abnormalities.ResponsibilitiesThe candidate will write high quality model with high performance and good memory management, together with state-of-the-art accuracies and embed into our proprietary software. Our aim is to align you with the activities which truly interest you; will stretch you technically; help you grow and impact on billions of patients.RequirementsBachelor / Master / PhD in engineering or computer science or mathematics or physicsKnows computer vision / image segmentation, localization, classificationKnows tensorflow or theano or torchStrong python, C++ or java coderGood knowledge of numpy, pandas, sklearn, scipy, seabornKnows how to build deep learning models like RNN and CNN and other neural network models.May require to relocate to China, Beijing.What We OfferMaster, Teach, Learn – The opportunity to work with, learn from and share knowledge with ultra-smart colleagues in a culture of collaboration and technical excellence. We groom our employees and make sure that they stay at the cutting edge of the technology stack.Impact – Huge potential to make a positive contribution across our business, people and partnersRemuneration – Competitive pay with share award for top performers.We are willing to groom engineers and fresh graduates who don’t have a background in deep learning but are interested to learn. You will also have the opportunity to attend top machine learning conferences like NIPS and ICML.Job Types: Full-time, Permanent	 - Sydney NSW	BioMind Data Scientist/Engineer (Relocate to Beijing)biomind.ai - Sydney NSWFull-time, Permanent	BioMind Data Scientist/Engineer (Relocate to Beijing)
285	"The role will be focused on stitching together disparate data sources from across the business to enable machine learning and automated reporting and campaigns. Generically, provide a view on business issues/opportunities that cannot be revealed through standard reporting
What’s the role?
Analytics lead on internal strategic marketing projects designed to understand key customer behaviours that drive consumer revenue
Identify new opportunities to improve capability and optimise the business through analytics and modelling
Undertake proactive analysis of customer data processes that produce data driven analysis, reporting, insights and models
Provide data and analytical thought leadership that can be leveraged across the marketing teams
Consistent delivery of data programs that lead to more effective and improved customer experiences
Who are you?
The ability to interpret and convert complex data requests into prescriptive and actionable insights for a non-analytical audience.
Proactivity delivering data driven insights and recommendations
Senior stakeholder engagement and strong presentation skills
Must be advanced multi-lingual across various software languages (SQL, Python, R, SAS)
What’s in it for you?
Supportive and friendly environment. We encourage innovation, collaboration and creative thinking. Fun, fast-paced and excellent opportunities for growth and development.
Lucrative salary
Flexible working arrangements
Discounted health care
Employee discount with multiple brands including BMW, Qantas, Apple, Samsung etc
Work with some of Australia's most recognised and prestigious brands
On-site gym and wellbeing centre

Who are we?
We are Australia’s number one and most influential media organisation with more than 150 prestige brands across news, sport and lifestyle. Each month more than 17 million Australians choose to consume news and information from our digital and print products – more than any other media group in Australia.
Where do I sign?
Apply now or for more information on careers at News Corp Australia visit www.newscorpaustralia.com/careers"	 - Sydney Central Business District NSW	Data ScientistNews Corp Australia66 reviews - Sydney Central Business District NSWPermanent	Data Scientist
286	"There has never been a more exciting time to be part of Domain Group, a dynamic digital media and technology services business and one of Australia's leading property destinations. We provide property advertising and media online, via mobile, social media and in magazines, and technology services to the real estate industry. The business is experiencing rapid growth in digital revenues and investing in all areas to drive future earnings growth. Domain offers a dynamic and innovative culture at the leading edge of digital media in Australia.
We are looking for a lead data scientist to help sales, product and business leadership make decisions with data, give consumers certainty and control when selling their home with a broad mission and build data science and machine learning products to power the next stage of Domain's growth
As part of the Domain Group, you'll have the opportunity to work across all aspects of our property ecosystem, from listing and agent, to consumer behavior, email, and sales data.
What you'll do:
Build scalable models that analyse and extract information from disparate public sources
Develop and improve machine learning algorithms that drive our data pipeline operation
Leverage advanced statistical modeling to improve domain products
Research and implement the latest advances in the world of data
Proven ability to collaboratively and maturely work on a team
Curious with an aptitude to quickly learn
Experience:
At least 3-5 years of industry experience in data science
2+ years of professional experience with Natural Language Processing and/or Image Processing
Thorough knowledge of machine learning modeling processes
Thorough knowledge of supervised and unsupervised learning algorithms
Thorough knowledge of Natural Language Processing
Experience with implementation of Data Systems
Fluency in UNIX, SQL, Python and/or R
Good software engineering principles
Education/Qualifications:
MS or PhD degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Quantitative Psychology or related field.
Portfolio evidence of previous work is appreciated (i.e. blog, GitHub repository, journal/conference publications etc).
So...what happens next?
Once we've received your application we'll give it the attention it deserves and you'll hear from us either way. If you have the right experience, one of our Recruitment Consultants will give you a call (so make sure you keep your phone handy!) and from there we'll support you through the interview process.

Interested?
Go on then, click apply, we'd love to see your application!

A little note to recruitment agencies: We have a superstar recruitment team who are pretty good at filling our own roles, we know you're great at what you do to, but there's no need to get in touch! :)"	 - Sydney NSW	Lead Data ScientistDomain Group6 reviews - Sydney NSWFull-time, Permanent	Lead Data Scientist
288	You remember how to roll up your sleeves and craft data joins in SQL, but you've invested time in learning R, and Python is your friend. You know Hadoop isn't the only approach and you're happiest getting behind the GUI into the real data to uncover the stories.Isn't it about time you took advantage of the benefits from all that knowledge?Our client is looking for data polyglots who enjoy solving complex problems; not the kind you can come to with a canned response, the ones where you really need to use your skills.With some of the biggest names in Australia and around the world throwing their most pressing problems at our client they need curious guides - but they only take the best.Getting in isn't easy, but if it was, it wouldn't be the right place for you.Prove yourself and you can build a team behind you to grow your own patch. The opportunities truly are what you make them.With Udemy on tap, and weekly internal led training sessions, you'll be joining a group of like-minded people who are capable of understanding you when you get on your high horse about relevance over recency (or the other way around).Currently our client has four areas of practice, you can join one these and then explain to them what they need to build another:Data & Analytics - BI/DW, Big Data Analytics, Data Engineering, Data Science and Advanced AnalyticsCustomer Engagement - Marketing Campaigns, Campaign Analysis, Customer InsightsDigital - Full stack Development, UI/UX Design, Mobile DevelopmentCloud & Technology - Cloud Services (AWS, Azure, Google Cloud Platform), Managed ServicesWe're not worried about levels at the moment, if you've got the skills there's a place for you.SEO stuff because you know we need to have it in here;Data engineerData scientistData ConsultantJava, Scala, Python, HadoopApache Spark, Kafka, Hive, Airflow, NiFiAWS, Google Cloud Platform or Azure is helpful but not mandatoryJob Types: Full-time, PermanentExperience:data consulting: 3 years (Preferred)	 - Sydney NSW	Software Architect / Tech LeadKloudPPL - Sydney NSWFull-time, Permanent	Software Architect / Tech Lead
289	"Job Description:About IntellifyIntellify is a data science and machine learning consultancy who helps our customers to increase their growth, operate more efficiently and build competitive advantage. Our team consists of leading data scientists, machine learning engineers and consultants that extensively use advanced (statistical) machine learning and optimisation techniques to create state-of-the-art solutions for business. As an emerging AWS consulting partner, we have the ability to scale our solution to any needs through their cloud platform.About the OpportunityAs we are growing at a rapid speed, we are seeking a senior full-time data scientist/machine learning engineer who has extensive experience in data science, machine learning and/or statistical modelling as well as programming. As part of this role, you will supervise and manage junior data scientists, and work on development to build data science solutions using a combination of the latest technologies and business strategies.With a startup culture and applying cutting-edge technology to real-world business problems, you have the opportunity to drive impact at some of Australia’s leading startups and enterprises as well as to learn and grow within a team of like-minded data scientists. Our client problems have ranged from pricing, inventory and workforce optimisation to computer vision applied to radar data for predictive maintenance. The work is varied and challenging, and will require someone who is dynamic in their thinking as well as willing to explore and try new ideas.Being a senior data scientist at Intellify you are charged with both being a mentor and learning from fellow specialist data scientists in an ever evolving and improving atmosphere. We want to see you thrive professionally and personally as we create a leading data science, machine learning and AI company of the future.What we offerThis is a full-time permanent role. This role will provide a unique opportunity to work in a collaborative team and learn from experienced data scientists, so you can advance your knowledge and get hands-on experience with state-of-the-art machine learning methods. Our salaries are competitive, and we offer flexible working hours. We also believe great data science comes from great teams, so invest continuously in upskilling and cross-training our data scientists, with lunch & learn sessions, training courses and certifications, and an opportunity to be a core part of our data science and machine learning communities. Furthermore, we offer the following:1) 10 x paid days of professional development per year (attend/ speak @ conferences, undertake courses and certifications)2) $2,200 Toolkit allowance to go out and buy your own tech3) Profit sharing4) Work with high-profile clients5) A defined career path with your 1-1 mentor6) Great team culture7) Have an impact in a small team where there is no politics8) Flexible & inclusive work-environment9) Work closely with AWS using cutting edge cloud technologiesRequired Skills: A computer science, robotics, maths, statistics, physics or related degree (graduated Bachelors, MSc, PhD or last year MSc/PhD student)5+ years of applied industry machine learning, optimisation and/or statistics experienceStrong Python or R programming experience and related data science libraries (such as scikit-learn, Pandas, Tensorflow/Keras)Strong SQL database and code versioning (e.g., Git) skillsGood software engineering principlesProject management / team management experienceExperience with data visualisation tools or frameworks i.e. tableau, D3.js, ggplot2 etc.Desirable skills: Knowledge or experience of software engineering practicesKnowledge or experience on time series/product forecasting/recommender systemsKnowledge of deep learning/neural networksExperience working with web development technologiesExperience working with cloud technologies i.e. AWS / Microsoft / Google Cloud.Portfolio evidence of your previous work is appreciated (i.e. blog, github repository, conference presentations etc).How to ApplyIf you wish to take the next step in your career working and learning with the best in an innovative data science company, please click on ""Apply now"" and include:Your CVYour portfolio of projects (eg GitHub, blog site etc)Desired salaryYour availabilityBrief details (3-4 sentences) of either:A machine learning or data science project you have developed or delivered previously; orPrevious team leadership experience, where you worked with a team to deliver a project.We are looking forward to hearing from you.*** STRICTLY NO AGENCIES ***Please note that our Company Policy dictates direct recruitment only.Job Types: Full-time, Part-timeSalary: $120,000.00 to $160,000.00 /yearExperience:machine learning, optimisation and/or statistics: 3 years (Required)"	 - Sydney NSW	Senior Data Scientist/ Machine learning engineerIntellify - Sydney NSW$120,000 - $160,000 a year - Full-time, Part-time	Senior Data Scientist/ Machine learning engineer
290	"Deloitte is the world’s largest professional service firm, with one of the largest and most experienced Analytics, Information Management (AIM) & Data Automation practices. We have 400+ specialised consultants in Australia and more than 6,000 practitioners in the Deloitte global network.
With the ever increasing complexity and volume of data, the rise of in-memory, high performance computing, data discovery and visualisation solutions and the convergence of Big Data and Advanced Analytics, organisations are faced with increasing number of choices to ensure they are able to exploit their data assets for maximum advantage. Deloitte is able to draw from its vast global experience delivering complex data driven solutions for our clients across the full spectrum of technology and business domains to provide the right strategic advice to help an organisation respond effectively to these changes – as well as partner with our clients to execute on our recommendations.
About the Role
Do you want to be a part of how we help companies utilise their valuable data resources through effective use of the right technology, backed by a clear vision and strong executive sponsorship? Do you want to be part of an award winning team that provides clients with a visionary, yet balanced and pragmatic approach to automating concepts and tools to improve productivity and performance?
This is an opportunity to harness emerging technologies and analytical methodologies to solve real world problems. You will be part of a close, collaborative team that identifies and builds solutions that are practical as well as visionary, and that make an impact that matters.
We are looking for people who love data and want to solve problems with insight. Whether you call yourself a data scientist, analytics nerd or builder of predictive models. We want to hear from you if you are genuinely passionate about this area and have some applied experience.
You will be responsible for delivering insights through a range of corporate data sources through the application of analytics, data mining, Big Data and real-time decision making techniques and applications using various data management, analytics & data visualization tools.
About You
You’ll bring experience in one or more of the following competencies and enabling technologies
A strong background in applying mathematical and analytics approaches and methodologies to identifying complex relationships in data
Ability to communicate technical requirements and outputs in a clear and concise manner
A structured, logical and solution-oriented design mindset
Ability to work autonomously and with minimal oversight
Ability to demonstrate initiative and ownership in the completion of tasks
A demonstrable interest and passion for exploring new data/analytics concepts, applications and innovations (e.g. Cognitive, Robotics & Automate, AI, IoT etc.)
Some experience using a range of scripting languages – (e.g. Python, R, SQL etc.)
About Us: Deloitte Culture
Join a high performing culture of talented people, who are highly motivated and passionate about delivering impactful analytics solutions and insight. We are innovative and different because YOU are… we pride ourselves on our team of diverse, high performing Deloitte Professionals who are talented, supportive, inclusive and social – and who are at the heart of our success. Our aim is to ensure that all our people feel comfortable to bring their whole selves to work, and as a result, build a workplace that encourages the true spirit of 'And different'.
From day one at our firm you’ll be considered part of the Deloitte community and our development and career progression framework will help you develop the skills and capabilities that will set you up to succeed – in every sense of the word. At Deloitte, we assume that you perform other roles within your life…you could be a student, a teacher, a passionate hobbyist and a caring family member. We recognise the importance of balance and embrace agility, understanding that this means different things to each and every one of our employees.
If you have questions regarding this role, the Talent Acquisition Team is available to have a confidential discussion. Please contact Aditi Aggarwal via the Our Recruiters section on our careers website."	 - Sydney NSW	EXPRESSION OF INTEREST - Data & Analytics - NationalDeloitte7,167 reviews - Sydney NSW	EXPRESSION OF INTEREST - Data & Analytics - National
291	"Our Consumer Data Analytics & Science team are looking for an innovative Senior Data Scientist to help them work on key projects to predict consumer behaviour, and conduct advanced analytics across the carsales consumer business. Data is a key decision making tool at carsales, and better understanding our customers’ behaviours is an important piece of the puzzle.

You’ll work with a highly motivated and exceptionally talented team of data analysts and scientists to build reporting and predictive solutions, and deliver data-rich products, insights and analytics to both external clients and internal stakeholders across our sales, marketing, technology and product management teams.

What you’ll do

Development of end to end analytics including customer profiling, segmentation, lifetime value and loyalty.
Work with stakeholders across the business to generate insights that will lead to the optimisation of product & marketing activities.
Analyse website performance to identify and recommend new ways to connect with customers and enhance their online journey.
Develop new ways of analysis through statistics and modelling that assists in understanding and predicting customer behaviour.
Act as a subject matter expert, yet collaborate effectively across-channels and different teams
Support growth, marketing, product, UX support and multiple other teams with data analytics and reporting expertise
Work across all business units and international branches to ensure measurement and transparency of all activity.

What we’re looking for

Strong SQL skills, with working knowledge of Python and/or R. Experience with large-scale column-oriented databases is advantageous.
At least a bachelor degree in an analytical field (e.g. Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Engineering or a similar discipline), preferably with knowledge of hypothesis testing and statistical/machine learning.
Someone who will work collaboratively with various teams to collect, collate and interpret data, and then communicate the insights effectively to both technical and non-technical stakeholders.
Customer-centric mindset, with proven ability to recommend opportunities that drive greater advocacy.
Experience in a commercial environment is essential and exposure to digital data is highly sought after.
Exposure to leadership, coaching or mentoring juniors would be a bonus but isn’t a requirement.

Why Apply?

carsales offers extensive opportunities to learn and evolve in a diverse, fast-paced and dynamic environment. We are committed to our people through many ongoing initiatives associated with culture and benefits, career development, health and well-being, community, work-life balance, reward and recognition. We continually strive to attract and retain the most talented people through a number of programs designed to support learning and development. When you work at carsales you don't just have a job, but you have a rewarding career.

carsales is an equal opportunity employer who prides themselves on providing a diverse workplace that brings out the best in its people. We encourage women and men of all ages and background to apply.
-"	 - Melbourne VIC	Senior Data Scientistcarsales.com.au3 reviews - Melbourne VICFull-time, Permanent	Senior Data Scientist
292	"This role is within the data science team at CHE Proximity, a key pillar in this full-service agency's strategic offering.
The requirement is to work hands on with some of Australia's largest business' databases, manipulating a variety of data, analysing to identify insights & opportunities, and interpreting the findings in a clear and meaningful format that can then deliver business advantage.

Responsibilities include


Designing and building complex and often large data sets from a variety of sources
Thinking strategically about uses of data and the interaction with customer experience
Designing and implementing statistical data quality procedures around new data sources
Performing data studies and data discovery around new data sources or new uses for existing data sources
Implementing any software required for accessing and handling data appropriately
Implementing and handing over data checking and updating procedures
Performing statistical analysis (from basic significance testing to complex data modelling) with existing data sets
Being a leading voice in the development and advocate of machine learning and AI
Visualising and reporting data findings creatively in a variety of formats
Researching software and hardware related to new technology, for example mobile, and the data opportunity
Day to day liaison with clients, internal departments and 3rd party suppliers to enhance the work

Required Skills and Attributes


Degree in Statistics, Computer Science or related technical field
Utilisation of multiple diverse data sources (i.e. transactional databases, social media data and web analytics) to formulate insight-driven strategy across multiple channels, including direct and digital
Practical ability to visualize data, communicate the data, and utilize it effectively
Strong problem solving and logical skills
Ability to think creatively
Ability to work well both as part of a team and as an individual contributor
Proficiency in specific data analysis and data manipulation tools (e.g. R, Python, SAS, SQL)
Proficiency in data visualisation tools (e.g. Tableau, PowerBI)
Competent ability in MS PowerPoint and able to communicate the output
Strong mathematics and statistics skills

A Bit About Us
At CHE Proximity we solve business problems by starting with the value of customers.
By combining data, technology, customer experience (in both paid and owned channels) and disruptive content, we engineer communications that change customer behaviour and motivate greater commercial return.
When it comes to staff, we look for individuals who are passionate and dedicated to delivering world-class solutions. People who radiate and bring energy into every conversation and project. People who know who they are and where they are going."	 - Sydney NSW	Senior Data ScientistClemenger Group3 reviews - Sydney NSW	Senior Data Scientist
293	"QBE is one of the top 20 global general insurers and is recognised as Australia's largest international insurance and Reinsurance Company, with operations in 37 countries around the world.

Working at QBE, we recognise the value of diversity and inclusion in the workplace and support a range of flexible work arrangements to promote a better family/life/work balance.

We offer you a dynamic workplace culture, one that values and leverages the unique ideas, capabilities and experiences you bring irrespective of where you are in the world. We believe this strengthens our ability to deliver on our business goals, particularly as it relates to innovation, growth and our focus on customers.

The opportunity

QBE is about to embark on a journey of growth in Data and Analytics and we will be looking for a number of experienced Data professionals to help us in this next phase of our growth.

The Data Scientist serves as a modelling and data science partner for assigned business areas responsible for the scientific integrity of work products, including study design, research methodology, and the deployment of statistical approaches and modelling.

Key Responsibilities
Leading analytical conversation with business centred on “The art of the possible using data science”, exploring data from a modelling perspective, and performing initial exploratory data analysis to assess business value
Working in close partnership with analytics managers to size analytical opportunities and execute plans that ensure a positive commercial return
Developing, implementing and maintaining analytical models to identify fraud, drive recoveries and renewals, drive profitable growth, and improve underwriting, pricing and claims performance
Building analytical application designs and prototyping to test ideas and drive innovation in an agile fashion
Working with information management specialists to identify and classify new feature sets, explore machine learning algorithms, and extract new feature sets
Working with analytics partners to build and operationalise models, quantifying and analysing model performance, and overseeing model refreshing requirements
Managing analytical projects and coordinating activities with other shared services partners by prioritising relevant activities and providing subject matter expertise
Assisting in the development of commercial propositions involving the use of analytics within insurance core functions through own analysis, prior experience, and research & development
Implementing fit-for-purpose analytics tools and infrastructure that will be adopted by end users (e.g. claims handlers)
Contributing to a positive environment by demonstrating cultural expectations and guiding leaders to reward performance, and valuing “can do” people, accountability, diversity and inclusion, flexibility, continuous improvement, collaboration, creativity and fun

What does success look like?
Degree qualified in econometrics, mathematics, statistics or related discipline
Strong knowledge of statistical/data mining methods and application in a business environment
Experience in working in Big data technology (Hadoop, NoSQL DB)
Track record of implementing models that deliver significant sustained business impact
Good understanding of Data Science domain, statistical and analytical model development and implementation
Proficient in machine learning techniques and related disciplines
Significant data management experience, gained from within the financial services sector, ideally within general insurance
Good understanding of data modelling techniques, tools/language - R, Python
Good knowledge of visualisation tools such as PowerBI, Tableau, etc.
Strong project management, collaboration and communication skills
Ability to apply logic and reasoning to identify solutions to complex business problems and implement solutions
Business and financial acumen
Curiosity to learn and keep up with market trends and innovations
Flexibility to adapt in a complex changing environment
Ability to lead, manage and motivate a team, engage and influence stakeholders at all levels
Strong written and verbal communication skills

Benefits?

At QBE, you will be provided with a competitive remuneration structure and benefits, in an environment that offers support, and encourages career development and learning.

We offer a range of benefits and discounts including:
Paid Parental leave (inclusive of paid superannuation during this time)
Secondment opportunities
Employee assistance programme
Paid volunteer leave
Purchased leave
Product discounts
Superannuation matching

Applicants will be required to provide evidence of their eligibility to work in Australia, and at a minimum be required to undertake police and basic credit checks as a condition of employment.

For more information, click the APPLY button to submit your details.

Number of Openings:
1

How to Apply:
To submit your application, click ""Apply"" and follow the step by step process.

Equal Employment Opportunity:
QBE is an equal opportunity employer and is required to comply with equal employment opportunity legislation in each jurisdiction it operates."	 - New South Wales	Data ScientistQBE109 reviews - New South Wales	Data Scientist
294	"We’re BCG Digital Ventures. Welcome.

A wholly owned subsidiary of the Boston Consulting Group, we invent, launch, scale, and invest in game changing start-ups with the world's most influential companies. We know that we have the greatest impact when people with different perspectives from different backgrounds work together inclusively and with relentless dedication to the customer. BCGDV brings together multidisciplined teams to create extraordinary ventures that have a profound impact on the way the world thinks, works, interacts and behaves every day. If you have the passion, tenacity, and curiosity to build innovative businesses from the ground up, adventure awaits you…

Introducing our Engineering Team.

Our Engineers design, develop and maintain the technology which is at the core of our ventures, solving challenging problems with radically simple solutions that disrupt markets, generate value and positively impact millions of lives. Working in multidisciplinary teams of Product, Business, and Design professionals, Engineers at BCGDV build products from scratch and create testable software which delivers maximum value for our ventures. You are given the opportunity to learn technologies which are outside of your core specialism due to shifting projects and the opportunity to rotate from one venture to the next.

As a Lead Data Scientist, you will:
Use data-driven insights to craft new software products. You will be involved from the early stages of defining data needs and sourcing data, all-the-way through to productionising predictive models as part of working systems. As a data scientist, you have a solid grounding in scientific work and are able to define and communicate key metrics to stakeholders, as you progress through delivery.
Work as part of the engineering team to develop deployable and scalable software.
Rapidly plan, design, implement and test solutions to data-science problems.
Perform analysis on large sets of data to extract actionable insights and help drive decisions.
Work on end-to-end projects to ensure your findings are executed and tested in a desired way.
Work closely with cross-functional teams of data scientists, product managers, designers and engineers across the company who are passionate about building creative ventures.
Be a collaborating partner to product development teams, making and giving recommendations
As a Lead Data Scientist, you will need:
Solid experience as a data scientist, with a degree in Mathematics, Computer Science or a related quantitative discipline.
Experience developing software in a contemporary programming language (such as Python, Java, C++, R).
Practical experience using contemporary machine learning frameworks, such as caret, scikit-learn, tensorflow or similar.
Familiarity with current approaches and methodologies in solving core machine learning tasks, such as supervised and unsupervised learning.
Experience driving real world product or feature decisions based on your analysis.
Deep understanding of numbers, as well as a strong business sense.
Ability to understand and solve loosely defined problems, find answers and actionable insights to inform product development decisions.
Ability to query, manipulate and analyse large datasets.
Additional valued capabilities include:
PhD or similar research degree in Computer Science, Statistics, Applied Mathematics, or related areas.
Expertise in recommender systems, personalization, collaborative filtering and content based filtering.
Experience working with deep-learning models to solve visual and language problems.
Open-source contributions to contemporary and relevant machine-learning libraries.
Ability to work with dashboard and visualization software (such as Tableau, D3, Mixpanel, Flurry or Google Analytics).
Experience collaborating closely with research to design novel analytical approaches.
Experience with distributed systems such as Hadoop/MapReduce, Spark, streaming data processing, cloud architecture."	 - Sydney NSW	Lead Data ScientistBCG Digital Ventures4 reviews - Sydney NSW	Lead Data Scientist
295	The CompanyOptimum Patient Care (OPC) has over 13 years of experience supporting primary care within the United Kingdom (UK) and is now expanding into Australia. OPC provides clinical review and reporting services, research support services (observational, database, clinical trials), data services and educational activities in practical disease management to health care professionals across the world.General practices collaborating with OPC contribute anonymised data to the OPC Research Database (OPCRD), enabling scientific research to better understand chronic diseases and improve health outcomes. Through analysis of extracts from OPCRD over 50 research publications have been supported to date.OPC offers general practices opportunities to participate within ethically-approved research studies and provides a range of paid services for specialised audits, targeted research and educational activities. OPC also collaborates with pharmaceutical companies and academic institutions to facilitate, ethically approved, non-interventional clinical studies.Following the success of OPC UK, OPC Australia was inspired and founded in 2017 with similar objectives.The RoleWe are looking for a Data Scientist to work alongside our research, statistical and database teams in the UK (Cambridge or Norfolk), Singapore and Australia (Brisbane). In this position you will gain invaluable experience within an internationally recognised research organisation involved in analysis and dissemination of data from large-scale observational studies and pragmatic randomised controlled trials.The successful candidate will have experience working with health research data, have a high attention to detail, strong time management skills, and most importantly an interest in clinical research.Your responsibilitiesRunning feasibility queries to assist in client proposal developmentGenerate datasets as per the study requirements and assist with query resolution.Providing advice to internal team members and external clients on study database(s) and their respective capabilities.Developing data collection systems which allow the integration of primary and secondary data sources in Australia.Provide support on database querying and reporting, using a data warehouse design, structured query language (SQL) and data visualization techniques.Develop and maintain data dictionaries for databases.Undertake quality checks to assure high standards of data quality.Contribute to data analyses as required for research projects.Maintain data standards, including compliance with the relevant Data Protection Acts, Information Governance and company policies.QualificationsBachelor degree in Biotechnology, Computer Science, Engineering, Maths, Epidemiology or equivalent qualificationRequired ExperienceStrong working knowledge of SQL (Essential)Experience working with large databasesAdvanced MS Excel skillsPreferred ExperienceExperience working with relational databasesDemonstrable experience working on clinical research studiesExperience of developing and maintaining data dictionaries for databasesKnowledge of statistical analysis tools (e.g. R, STATA, SPSS, SAS)Interest and knowledge of epidemiology, public health and clinical researchThe role is for a permanent full-time position. Salary is dependent on qualifications and experience. Immediate start is available.If you are interested, please send your CV with a Cover Letter summarising your suitability for the role. We look forward to hearing from you.Job Type: Full-time	 - Brisbane QLD	Data ScientistOptimum Patient Care Australia Ltd. - Brisbane QLD	Data Scientist
296	"Requisition ID: 16576
Job Category: Consulting; Engineering; Information Technology; Technology

With over six decades of business and technical experience in the mining, energy, and infrastructure sectors, we understand that challenges are changing rapidly in every industry. We respond quickly with solutions that are smarter, more efficient, and innovative. We draw upon our 9,000 staff with experience in over 150 countries to challenge the status quo and create positive change for our clients, our employees, and the communities we serve.
Unique opportunity to be exposed to complex & diverse data science problems across various industries
Access to global expertise, technologies and career advancement opportunities
Enthusiastic team with fresh ideas, where you can contribute to the future growth of the practice

Hatch is seeking applications from Experienced Data Scientists in Brisbane, who can develop and use AI/ML tools and data processing pipelines to solve technical challenges for our clients in the mining & resource industries.

Working with other Data Scientists, you will independently import, clean and wrangle data, carry out exploratory data analyses, build and evaluate various predictive models and productionise models. Working with subject matter experts, you will understand the context of the problem, transform the data to answer the business question and use and evaluate models to uncover insights into the processes under investigation, and communicate results in a clear and consumable way. You will be able to assess the quality of the results, contribute to safely deploy the models into processes and control systems and implement the monitoring and maintenance requirements for the deployed solution.

You will be working with the project manager, utilising effective project planning techniques like Agile to break down moderately complex projects into tasks and ensure deadlines and deliverables are kept.

This is an opportunity to join a professional, progressive organisation and become part of an inclusive, supportive team. You will be able to network with colleagues locally, regionally and globally to achieve career success. We strive to maintain a culture that welcomes diversity of thought, individual contribution and team collaboration.

We are an entrepreneurial business in which opportunities abound, so we may ask you to travel domestically and internationally for business, as well as potentially undertake extended assignments away from time to time.

Core Functional Tasks & Key Responsibilities of this role include:

Processing, cleansing and verifying the integrity of data used for analysis
Utilize exploratory data analysis techniques to understand the data and multivariate analysis to generate new features
Building predictive models using state-of-the-art methods and use appropriate diagnostics to access the performance of the models
Drive the safe deployment of the solution in the client’s processes or control systems and develop the monitoring and support and maintenance plans.
Identifying meaningful insights from large data and metadata sources and interpret and communicate insights and findings from analysis to clients and internal interdisciplinary teams
Identifying and drive implementation of opportunities to improve and enhance data collection and management procedures to include information that is relevant for building analytics systems
Collaborate with clients to ensure projects and outcomes meet their business requirements and manage the execution of a data science project.
Communicating and coordinating effectively with the data science team, systems team, and customer-facing teams to ensure models and results are well understood and incorporated into their business processes

We are ideally looking for individuals who possess the following qualifications and skills:

Bachelor's in Mathematics, Applied Mathematics, Statistics, Physics, Computer Science or related area
Experience in quantitative analysis / research of large, complex data sets
Understanding of and experience with predictive analytics techniques and inductive statistical analysis to predict outcomes and behaviours
Knowledge and understanding of machine learning techniques and algorithms such as GLM, Neural Network, Naïve Bayes, SVM, Decision Trees, Random Forrest, Boosting methods, etc.
Experience with common data science analytical/programming tool, such as R, Python, Matlab,,SAS, IBM SPSS, IBM DSX/IBM PMQ, RapidMiner.
Experience with data visualization tools such as Tableau, Spotfire, PowerBI, etc.
Understanding of big data techniques & open source platforms and their application to data capture/integration
Possess confidence, creativity, critical thinking ability, a willingness to learn and take feedback, a proactive attitude when faced with challenges, a meticulous attention to unexpected details
Good written, verbal, analytical, organisational, problem-solving and presentation skills
Ability to lead junior staff on smaller projects and report progress back to Senior Data Scientist
Exposure with delivering using Agile.

Experience in at least R, Python or Matlab is also highly desirable.

An employee owned organisation, by joining Hatch you will have the opportunity to be recognised and rewarded for your efforts. You will be provided with many benefits including: competitive remuneration and above statutory superannuation payments; optional salary sacrifice for additional annual leave, and participation in various employee reward and recognition and health and wellbeing programs.

To submit your application please click the ""Apply"" button below.

Unsolicited resumes from recruitment agencies will not be accepted for this position.
As an Equal Opportunity Employer, we are committed to fostering a workforce in each of our locations that reflects the diversity of the communities in which we operate. If you have any special needs requirements, please let us know and we will do our utmost to accommodate. Hatch also supports and encourages a flexible workplace. We offer our employees comprehensive benefits, including up to 12 weeks annual leave per year as part of our Purchased Leave Program."	 - Brisbane QLD	Data ScientistHatch279 reviews - Brisbane QLD	Data Scientist
297	"Job Description

As an experienced Data Scientist you will apply data mining techniques, perform statistical analysis, and develop machine learning algorithms to help us make smarter decisions to deliver even better solutions to Leidos and its customers. You will help us discover the information hidden in vast amounts of data and be comfortable communicating with a variety of stakeholders and importantly using language that is targeted to your audience.
You will work across a variety of projects at one time and your day may include:
Design and develop methods, processes, and systems to consolidate and analyse structured and unstructured, diverse sources including “big data” sources.
Develop and use advanced software programs, algorithms, querying and automated processes to cleanse, integrate and evaluate datasets and model complex business problems.
Supporting our business development and pre-sales activities by identifying advanced analytics opportunities that benefit current and potential customers
Research, design, implement and validate cutting-edge algorithms to analyse diverse sources of data to achieve targeted outcomes

Qualifications

Coupled with your Masters you will have previous experience delivering world-class data science outcomes, you solve complex analytical problems using quantitative approaches with your unique blend of analytical, mathematical and technical skills.
You will have a passion for discovering solutions hidden in large data sets and working with stakeholders to improve business outcomes.
Your confident and clear communications skills will see you effectively communicate to a variety of stakeholders and present information to senior leaders and executives.
You will also
Bring your in-depth understanding of statistical and predictive modelling concepts, machine-learning approaches, clustering and classification techniques, and recommendation and optimisation algorithms.
Have experience with common data science toolkits, such as R, Python, NumPy, MatLab, etc. (Excellence in at least one of these is highly desirable)
Be highly effective in managing multiple, concurrent activities, while understanding and managing priorities, dependencies and risk
Have strong conceptual, analytical and interpretive skills with high level of attention to detail
Be comfortable working in a fast-paced, test-driven, collaborative and iterative technology environment.
Additional Information

At Leidos you’ll enjoy 12 weeks’ paid parental leave as a primary carer, flexible work practices, discounted health insurance, novated leasing and more. Foster your career through complete access to learning and development and mentoring opportunities, we have a strong track record of internal promotion and career transitions. Join a company who acknowledges “People First”.
As a business we are focusing on setting people up for success and ensuring there is exposure to a variety of projects, so individuals can develop not only specialist skills, but broaden their experience within the defence field. If this sounds like you and you have the right attitude coupled with the willingness to learn and wanting to be part of a team of professional engineers that are leading the field – apply today
Redefine Possible for your career at Leidos.
This role does requires the successful applicant to be an Australian Citizen and hold at a minimum a Baseline Clearance."	 - Canberra ACT	Senior Data ScientistLeidos590 reviews - Canberra ACT	Senior Data Scientist
298	"Cover Genius was nominated in the global Fintech 100 by KPMG in 2017 and was recognised as the fastest growing company in Australia by Smart Company in 2017. This is an opportunity to become part of the next product that disrupts the World's largest industry. And you get to do it where the model is proven and growth is accelerating!
We distribute insurance products to the largest e-commerce sites globally via a B2B platform. Our first product to market, RentalCover.com, has been an outstanding B2B and B2C success within the travel vertical. Behind this success, we have Brightwrite, the engine powers all the analytics and intelligence.
We’re seeking a senior data scientist to support the product and marketing with insights gained from analysing company data. The ideal candidate should adept at using data sets to identify opportunities for increase revenue and using models to test the effectiveness of different actions.
Given Cover Genius’ global recognition, excellent track record, and hockey stick growth, this role presents significant opportunities for the right candidate. We are looking for self-starters that are passionate about new technology and innovation. People that have a “can do” attitude and who work well within startup environments where needs and roles can change quickly. Needless to say, we are not your average insurance company!
Requirements
Mandatory
Proficiency with a variety of Machine Learning and statistical testing techniques
Master's or Ph.D. in Statistics, Mathematics, Computer Science or other Quantitative fields
5+ years of experience in manipulating data sets using Python/SQL and building statistical models
Strong problem-solving skills with an emphasis on product development
Functional knowledge of relational databases and data warehousing
A drive to learn and master new technologies/techniques, good communications and be able to work in Australia
Nice to have
Experience in analysing data from Google Analytics, Adwords, Facebook and other customer experience platforms.
Experience with distributed data manipulations (Map/Reduce)
Experience with data engineering, ETL processes etc..
Our Culture
Our team thrives on the challenges that the hockey stick style of growth brings. We've enjoyed wide recognition within the startup and insurance industries, including Smart Company who recognised Cover Genius as the Fastest Growing Company in Australia in 2017.
Our Vision is to enable the all world's global eCommerce businesses to distribute insurance to their global customers.
Benefits
Salary Negotiable
A generous Employee Options Package applies for permanent roles at Cover Genius.
Opportunity to travel extensively including to UK, EU and US
High energy, fast paced and inclusive working environment
Sydney CBD location
Flat organisation structure
Fun, inclusive work environment
Health and wellness benefits
Peer bonus program
Stock-based incentives
Generous bonuses for employee referrals
New office fitout
Free office snacks and drinks
Job-related training
Global network which offers opportunity to transfer to other markets"	 - Sydney NSW	Senior Data ScientistCover Genius - Sydney NSW	Senior Data Scientist
299	"Your Benefits:
Great Package;
Generous Bonuses;
Fun & Positive Environment;
Training Budgets + Work-Life Balance Options;
Brand-New and High-Profile Projects;
Organic Growth Opportunities;

You are joining a Data Science and Machine learning thought leader organization based in the CBD area with established best practices in data science and insight analytics and further investments to enhancement of their insight functions.

You will come from a strong data analytics / data science background with technical experience across data mining & filtration, statistical data modeling and provision of insight.

In return they offer a range of perks, generous bonuses and training budgets, opportunity to speak at important functions and work-life balance options.

To be successful for this role, your CV will need to reflect on following skill-set:
Commercial Experience as a Data Scientist / Insight Analytics Consultant;
Education background in Applied Statistics, Mathematics, Actuarial, Econometrics or a similar Data Stat Modeling field;
Data development experience with Python or R or SQL;
Demonstrated experience in data mining, data filtering and building predictive / regression models using different methodologies such as decision trees, time series and/or Bayesian statistics;
Experience working on a cloud based data platform such as AWS, Google Cloud, Microsoft Azure or a similar platform is advantageous but not essential;


You can either apply here or send your application directly to Sonia at Sonia@infinitypro.com.au quoting 0010IDataScientist. We can be contacted on (02) 9687 1025 for a confidential discussion but please ensure the resume has been sent.

Please ensure all documents are sent in Microsoft word format."	 - Sydney NSW	Data Scientist, Analytics, Machine Learning - Data Scientist, Data StatisticianInfinity Pro - Sydney NSW	Data Scientist, Analytics, Machine Learning - Data Scientist, Data Statistician
300	"Description
We're looking for an experienced Data Scientist to join our flagship data quality and targeting business, think big data marketing solutions. This is a pinnacle role in the wider product management team, they're innovative, passionate, high performing and fun to work with. Utilise your programming skills to help Experian develop new products and take advantage of the latest technologies. Successful candidates will enjoy working with large volumes of data in an innovative and fast paced environment.

We are looking for someone who;
Has an inquiring mind and a passion for dataInterest in innovation and the use of technology to find solutionsIntermediate to Advanced programming skills especially in either R or PythonKnowledge of modelling and statisticsMachine learning experienceExperience with data visualisation tools including but not limited to TableauStrong geo-spatial background with knowledge of tools such as Alteryx and ArcGISDatabase programming including SQL and other data technologiesAnalytical and problem-solving capabilitiesGeneral understanding of industry techniques, including digital advertising platform, search engine optimisation, conversion optimisation and social networking and marketingStrong oral and written communication skillsTertiary level - could be maths, science, computer science, engineering

Essential Duties and Responsibilities
Develop ConsumerView modelsEnsure all models are updated regularlyBe across the methodology to create Mosaic and custom MosaicCreate custom audiences for DAS and other advertising platformsAssist with the ongoing development of ConsumerView
Knowledge, Experience & Qualifications
Knowledge, experience and qualifications

Knowledge
Intermediate to Advanced programming skills especially in either R or PythonUnderstanding of predictive modelling/machine learningDatabase programming and design
Experience
Analytical and problem-solving capabilitiesStrong oral and written communication skills
Qualifications
Tertiary level - could be maths, science, computer science, engineeringThese and other degrees with analytical/technical components"	 - Melbourne VIC	Data ScientistEXPERIAN329 reviews - Melbourne VIC	Data Scientist
301	"The Company

Robert Half Technology are working alongside a well reputable and established Insurance organisation in the CBD and we are currently looking for a talented Data Scientist to join our team on a permanent basis. Our client continue to grow across all areas of the business and this role has been created due to the expansion of the division. This role represents an exciting challenge and career opportunity for a Data Scientist to join our forward thinking client.

The Role

The Role of the Data Scientist will have the opportunity to make their mark using data led decision making and modelling to catalyse industry disuption. Aspects of the role include:

Proportion your role with Modelling, Research, Analysism Data Manipulation and Collaboration.

Work as a data expert and a quantitative researcher.

Translate unstructured, complex business problems into practical, powerful algorithmic solutions.

Be part of a highly innovative team working on interesting and difficult problems, leveraging cutting edge technology to build key data products.

Uncover fresh insights from disparate data sources and data mining

Spearheading machine learning projects on data that has never been touched by the organization.

About You

This is a hands-on position where you will be empowered to be very ambitious and bold, to solve challenging problems and have the potential to directly impact the future of the business. The role requires that you have experience in machine learning and data mining.

Your experience and skills should include most, if not all:
Ability to communicate complex quantitative analysis in a clear, precise and actionable manner

Practical experience using contemporary machine learning frameworks such as, scikit-learn, pytorch and tensorflow.

A proven track record in developing, innovating, and applying advanced algorithms to address practical problems and in building new analytical products of commercial value.

Experience in Python and/or R.

Experience in relational databases and SQL

Apply Today

Please send your resume by clicking on the apply button or for further information, contact our Melbourne office."	 - Melbourne VIC	Data Scientist - Market Leader - CBDRobert Half Australia6,897 reviews - Melbourne VIC$110,000 a year - Permanent	Data Scientist - Market Leader - CBD
302	"There has never been a more exciting time to be part of Domain Group, a dynamic digital media and technology services business and one of Australia's leading property destinations. We provide property advertising and media online, via mobile, social media and in magazines, and technology services to the real estate industry. The business is experiencing rapid growth in digital revenues and investing in all areas to drive future earnings growth. Domain offers a dynamic and innovative culture at the leading edge of digital media in Australia.
We are looking for a lead data scientist to help sales, product and business leadership make decisions with data, give consumers certainty and control when selling their home with a broad mission and build data science and machine learning products to power the next stage of Domain's growth
As part of the Domain Group, you'll have the opportunity to work across all aspects of our property ecosystem, from listing and agent, to consumer behavior, email, and sales data.
What you'll do:
Build scalable models that analyse and extract information from disparate public sources
Develop and improve machine learning algorithms that drive our data pipeline operation
Leverage advanced statistical modeling to improve domain products
Research and implement the latest advances in the world of data
Proven ability to collaboratively and maturely work on a team
Curious with an aptitude to quickly learn
Experience:
At least 3-5 years of industry experience in data science
2+ years of professional experience with Natural Language Processing and/or Image Processing
Thorough knowledge of machine learning modeling processes
Thorough knowledge of supervised and unsupervised learning algorithms
Thorough knowledge of Natural Language Processing
Experience with implementation of Data Systems
Fluency in UNIX, SQL, Python and/or R
Good software engineering principles
Education/Qualifications:
MS or PhD degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Quantitative Psychology or related field.
Portfolio evidence of previous work is appreciated (i.e. blog, GitHub repository, journal/conference publications etc).
So...what happens next?
Once we've received your application we'll give it the attention it deserves and you'll hear from us either way. If you have the right experience, one of our Recruitment Consultants will give you a call (so make sure you keep your phone handy!) and from there we'll support you through the interview process.

Interested?
Go on then, click apply, we'd love to see your application!

A little note to recruitment agencies: We have a superstar recruitment team who are pretty good at filling our own roles, we know you're great at what you do to, but there's no need to get in touch! :)"	 - Sydney NSW	Lead Data ScientistDomain Group6 reviews - Sydney NSWFull-time, Permanent	Lead Data Scientist
303	Job DescriptionThe candidate is a skilled data scientist who will be building deep learning models for medical image diagnosis applications such as segmentation, localisation and classification of abnormalities.ResponsibilitiesThe candidate will write high quality model with high performance and good memory management, together with state-of-the-art accuracies and embed into our proprietary software. Our aim is to align you with the activities which truly interest you; will stretch you technically; help you grow and impact on billions of patients.RequirementsBachelor / Master / PhD in engineering or computer science or mathematics or physicsKnows computer vision / image segmentation, localization, classificationKnows tensorflow or theano or torchStrong python, C++ or java coderGood knowledge of numpy, pandas, sklearn, scipy, seabornKnows how to build deep learning models like RNN and CNN and other neural network models.May require to relocate to China, Beijing.What We OfferMaster, Teach, Learn – The opportunity to work with, learn from and share knowledge with ultra-smart colleagues in a culture of collaboration and technical excellence. We groom our employees and make sure that they stay at the cutting edge of the technology stack.Impact – Huge potential to make a positive contribution across our business, people and partnersRemuneration – Competitive pay with share award for top performers.We are willing to groom engineers and fresh graduates who don’t have a background in deep learning but are interested to learn. You will also have the opportunity to attend top machine learning conferences like NIPS and ICML.Job Types: Full-time, Permanent	 - Sydney NSW	BioMind Data Scientist/Engineer (Relocate to Beijing)biomind.ai - Sydney NSWFull-time, Permanent	BioMind Data Scientist/Engineer (Relocate to Beijing)
305	"There has never been a more exciting time to be part of Domain Group, a dynamic digital media and technology services business and one of Australia's leading property destinations. We provide property advertising and media online, via mobile, social media and in magazines, and technology services to the real estate industry. The business is experiencing rapid growth in digital revenues and investing in all areas to drive future earnings growth. Domain offers a dynamic and innovative culture at the leading edge of digital media in Australia.
We are looking for a lead data scientist to help sales, product and business leadership make decisions with data, give consumers certainty and control when selling their home with a broad mission and build data science and machine learning products to power the next stage of Domain's growth
As part of the Domain Group, you'll have the opportunity to work across all aspects of our property ecosystem, from listing and agent, to consumer behavior, email, and sales data.
What you'll do:
Build scalable models that analyse and extract information from disparate public sources
Develop and improve machine learning algorithms that drive our data pipeline operation
Leverage advanced statistical modeling to improve domain products
Research and implement the latest advances in the world of data
Proven ability to collaboratively and maturely work on a team
Curious with an aptitude to quickly learn
Experience:
At least 3-5 years of industry experience in data science
2+ years of professional experience with Natural Language Processing and/or Image Processing
Thorough knowledge of machine learning modeling processes
Thorough knowledge of supervised and unsupervised learning algorithms
Thorough knowledge of Natural Language Processing
Experience with implementation of Data Systems
Fluency in UNIX, SQL, Python and/or R
Good software engineering principles
Education/Qualifications:
MS or PhD degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Quantitative Psychology or related field.
Portfolio evidence of previous work is appreciated (i.e. blog, GitHub repository, journal/conference publications etc).
So...what happens next?
Once we've received your application we'll give it the attention it deserves and you'll hear from us either way. If you have the right experience, one of our Recruitment Consultants will give you a call (so make sure you keep your phone handy!) and from there we'll support you through the interview process.

Interested?
Go on then, click apply, we'd love to see your application!

A little note to recruitment agencies: We have a superstar recruitment team who are pretty good at filling our own roles, we know you're great at what you do to, but there's no need to get in touch! :)"	 - Sydney NSW	Lead Data ScientistDomain Group6 reviews - Sydney NSWFull-time, Permanent	Lead Data Scientist
306	SparkBeyond has built an AI-powered research engine, capable of finding complex patterns in data by understanding their meaning. Operating at the intersection of Data Science and Artificial Intelligence fields, our Machine Learning technology is so ground-breaking that it’s been referred to as science fiction on multiple occasions. SparkBeyond Discovery Platform is being used by Fortune 500 companies across industries.What will you do?Solve various problems and make a true impact across unlimited domains and industries (Financial Risk, Health, Ecommerce, Marketing, Oil & Gas Exploration and more.).Deliver business value by translating complex data into meaningful insights.Be the face of the company and the product directly interfacing with our partners around the globe.Partner with our customers’ Data Science teams, helping them optimize their use of SparkBeyond’s Discovery Platform.Work directly with our in-house team comprised of the brightest minds in technology, research and mathematics as well as senior interfaces from leading companies across the globe (fortune 500 companies and many others).Use your analytical skills and deep product understanding to consult our partners and provide them with advice and input of the highest quality.What will you need?Significant relevant work experience - Professional work experience on data science and analytics issuesA very strong academic background - PhDs are very welcome, as are quantitative degrees - Math, Physics, Computer Science and the like.Proven experience in handling large scale end to end data science projects and presenting the findings and insights. Building models is great - creating impact is greaterProven experience in translating business challenges into data pipelines & model frameworkExperience with Machine Learning techniques. Supervised, unsupervised, traditional or deep learning - either is great, but you need to know your stuff, both in theory and in practice (e.g., MICE, scikit-learn, keras or weka)Programming skills that allow you to be self-sufficient in handling data. Python and R are our daily companions, and a solid grasp of SQL is always needed. Big bonus points if you know ScalaAlso welcome: Experience with large datasets and distributed computing (Hive/Hadoop, Spark)Willingness to travel. We understand the need for a work-life balance and family time, but the ability to be on location at our clients is regularly required.Why SparkBeyond?Sense of Purpose: We’re building something bigger than ourselves. Our team is building a machine that can help solve the world’s most critical problems. We do this through our Partner engagements and the pro-bono work we are passionate about.Exposure: Help insurers process claims faster. Or pharmaceutical companies improve their quality control. Or, on a pro bono basis, an NGO to upskill underprivileged teenagers. Choose what you will work on and where you will leave your mark.People: We are proud of the brilliant, passionate and engaged team at SparkBeyond, including our very own Gödel and Wolf Prize winner. Our people are our greatest asset and we believe in empowerment, ownership and constant growth.Platform: Our Data Scientists are passionate about our cutting-edge platform and can’t imagine returning to traditional data science.Credibility: We have established ourselves as an industry leader, partnering and making impact for our Fortune 500 clients. See what the market is saying about us:https://venturebeat.com/2016/04/02/deep-learning-will-be-huge-and-heres-who-will-dominate-it/https://www.gartner.com/doc/3311218/cool-vendors-data-science-Job Type: Full-timeSalary: $100,000.00 to $180,000.00 /year	 - Melbourne VIC	Data ScientistSparkBeyond - Melbourne VIC$100,000 - $180,000 a year	Data Scientist
307	"The role will be focused on stitching together disparate data sources from across the business to enable machine learning and automated reporting and campaigns. Generically, provide a view on business issues/opportunities that cannot be revealed through standard reporting
What’s the role?
Analytics lead on internal strategic marketing projects designed to understand key customer behaviours that drive consumer revenue
Identify new opportunities to improve capability and optimise the business through analytics and modelling
Undertake proactive analysis of customer data processes that produce data driven analysis, reporting, insights and models
Provide data and analytical thought leadership that can be leveraged across the marketing teams
Consistent delivery of data programs that lead to more effective and improved customer experiences
Who are you?
The ability to interpret and convert complex data requests into prescriptive and actionable insights for a non-analytical audience.
Proactivity delivering data driven insights and recommendations
Senior stakeholder engagement and strong presentation skills
Must be advanced multi-lingual across various software languages (SQL, Python, R, SAS)
What’s in it for you?
Supportive and friendly environment. We encourage innovation, collaboration and creative thinking. Fun, fast-paced and excellent opportunities for growth and development.
Lucrative salary
Flexible working arrangements
Discounted health care
Employee discount with multiple brands including BMW, Qantas, Apple, Samsung etc
Work with some of Australia's most recognised and prestigious brands
On-site gym and wellbeing centre

Who are we?
We are Australia’s number one and most influential media organisation with more than 150 prestige brands across news, sport and lifestyle. Each month more than 17 million Australians choose to consume news and information from our digital and print products – more than any other media group in Australia.
Where do I sign?
Apply now or for more information on careers at News Corp Australia visit www.newscorpaustralia.com/careers"	 - Sydney Central Business District NSW	Data ScientistNews Corp Australia66 reviews - Sydney Central Business District NSWPermanent	Data Scientist
308	"The Role:
The Data & Analytics team at SAI Global are embarking on a series of strategic initiatives to deliver growth and add value to the business through enhanced capabilities in Data, Analytics and Reporting. To facilitate this growth, we are looking for a Data Scientist to join our Data & Analytics team in order to develop new data-driven and analytically enabled solutions, products and services.

In this role you will report to the Head of Data Science, and your focus will be on the development and acceleration of analytical modelling.

About you:
You will need to work successfully with data scientists, business stakeholders, product teams and potentially customers to understand their problems and challenges, and provide solutions to their data requirements. It is therefore critical that you have professional experience working in a commercial environment with multiple business units.

You will need to be able to:Facilitate and contribute to meetingsUnderstand commercial value and viability of solutionsDemonstrate examples of models that you have designed, developed,
 evaluated, optimised and deployedCommunicate the commercial value delivered from these models

Must have Technical Capabilities:Proficiency in developing statistical and predictive models in R,
 Python or ScalaProficiency in linear and non-linear regression modelling techniquesProficiency in classification models using a variety of modelling
 techniques such as Logistic Regression, Decision Trees, Random
 Forest, SVM and Neural Networks or similarProficiency in data reduction techniques such as Principle Components,
 dimensionality reductionProficiency in unsupervised modelling techniques including clustering,
 association analysisProficiency in Experimental Design including analysis of experimentsProficiency with Data Visualisation and Data Story tellingExperience in Time-Series modelling such as ARIMA, ETS, BSTS
 modellingUnderstanding of distributed computing principles including high
 performance compute and parallelisation of models

Experience:3-5 years of data science experience, working within an advanced
 analytics or data science team in a commercial organisationA Bachelor's degree in the relevant discipline; Data Science,
 Computer Science, Statistics, Mathematics, PhysicsMasters or PhD in these domains is highly desirableA proven track record of working collaboratively with different
 business units in a commercial organisation


To apply for this position click ‘Apply’ below.
At SAI Global, we help organizations proactively manage risk to achieve business excellence, growth, sustainability and ultimately, create trust.

Our integrated risk management solutions are a combination of world-class tech platforms, learning tools, and advisory services that operate across the entire lifecycle allowing businesses to focus on opportunities presented by uncertainty. Together, these tools and content services enable customers to develop a holistic, integrated view of risk.
SAI Global head office is located in Chicago. We employ more than 2,000 people across 29 countries and 51 locations across Europe, the Middle East, Africa, the Americas, Asia and the Pacific."	 - Sydney NSW	Data ScientistSAI Global38 reviews - Sydney NSW	Data Scientist
309	"Data Lead (SYD0000FY)
Primary Location: Australia-New South Wales-Sydney
Discipline: Visualisation
Job Posting: 25-Jul-18
A career at Arup offers you the chance to make a positive difference in the world. Independently owned and independently minded, we attract a diverse mix of people to work on ground breaking projects around the world.

Arup’s Digital Advisory business provides strategy, design, and innovation for the future of the built environment. Working as a regional team with specialist skills in strategic design, data analytics & visualisation, and software engineering we help clients create and realise the future of cities, transport, and commercial property.

We are looking an experienced data scientist to take the role of Data Lead. You will lead our regional Data Analytics & Visualisation practice as a key discipline within the regional Digital Business working out of Sydney, Melbourne and Singapore.

The Data Analytics & Visualisation practice uses advanced techniques and emerging technologies to apply data strategy, science, engineering, and visualisation to real world problems across the built environment in areas where Arup has deep technical domain knowledge. This typically involves providing analytics and insight on building systems performance, transport and urban mobility challenges, and integrated transport and land use planning for the future.

Your primary responsibilities will be positioning for and winning work across the region in your field and guiding the technical delivery of data strategy/science/engineering/visualisation projects.

This is a critical role for the regional business, helping with technical and business leadership of this growing unit. You will report into the regional Digital Business Leader and will be responsible for a diverse portfolio of data-led consulting projects throughout their life-cycle from initiation to strategy, and from design into operation. You will form part of the regional Digital Leadership Team, along with the local team leaders and other regional practice leaders (Strategic Design and Software Engineering).

You will be a highly experienced practitioner in one or more of data science and/or engineering disciplines. Our task is to deploy these skills within the context of Arup’s diverse client-base, which has not yet tended to benefit from such data-led approaches — so the ability to translate and connect your skills into these areas, and their corresponding clients, will be key.

Excellent communication skills are required, as well as significant experience of working with clients and managing successful projects, as well as leading project teams. You’ll be comfortable when working in and managing teams and projects, and participating in creative, technical and commercial reviews, you will be capable of handling a complex, challenging but ultimately highly rewarding workload.

Responsibilities
We are looking for someone who:

Will lead Arup’s market facing Data Analytics & Visualisation practice regionally
Can develop a compelling vision for Data Analytics in the built environment at Arup
Will be responsible for business development and winning work
-Can lead projects (PD/PM) - leading data practitioners and other members of cross-functional teams
Can function, adapt and succeed in a constantly changing, fast paced environment
Can respond positively and calmly to shifting priorities, demands and timelines-Will develop and maintain relationships with key clients and across Arup
Will mentor and coach data practitioners across the business
Can design and implement data-led solutions for fixed budget/time projects

Requirements

7+ years Data Science and/or Engineering experience in a commercial or academic context
5+ years in leading teams/business units
Formal education in the field of Computer Science, Machine Learning, Applied Statistics, Mathematics
Experience in applied statistics skills and experience in statistical modelling
Experience in machine learning / artificial intelligence techniques and algorithms
Experience in data engineering including the handling and processing of large data sets in the cloud
Experience with data visualisation tools
Understands the different approaches of data science and the ability to dig into a problem and extract the best solution for the business problem
Experience in driving the analytical scope and methodology for projects
Experience prioritising competing demands from stakeholders with ability to get buy-in, resolve conflicts and establish priorities
Has strong presentation and communication skills to help explain complex analytical concepts to people from other fields

“It is not the wish to expand, but the quest for quality which has brought us to this position… to do work of quality, we must have people of quality. There are many kinds of quality, and there are many kinds of job to do, so we must have many kinds of people, each of which can do their own job well.” Ove Arup, 1970."	 - Sydney NSW	Data LeadArup78 reviews - Sydney NSW	Data Lead
310	"Data and Analytics Team | Perth
-------------------------------

About VGW

VGW is a cutting-edge tech company focusing on online gaming. We own and operate several market-leading brands in the largest markets in the world and have about 300 team members globally, all committed to building something amazing, pushing our boundaries and having fun in the process. We've been disrupting online social casino and poker gaming since 2010 and bringing fun and excitement to millions of customers. VGW has a dynamic and happy workplace and we all have huge amounts of energy and a real passion for our products and our players. We couple that with the best of Aussie culture; a laid-back approach, flexible working hours, Work From Home Fridays, casual dress and enjoying the beach whenever possible.

About the Role

We now need a talented and enthusiastic data scientist to join our Data and Analytics team. You'll get to work on hard problems with other smart and motivated people, building things that really matter to the business.

On a day to day basis you can expect to be:

Working closely with a variety of teams (Product, Marketing, Customer Service and Technology) across multiple product lines (Casino, Poker, etc)
Gathering and documenting requirements from stakeholders
Participating in DnA standups, sprint planning sessions and others as required

About You

We're not too hung up on how long you've been doing this for you've got but we expect you to have some experience with the following:


Data munging and modelling in R, Python, Julia, Apache Spark
SQL skills
Distributed data systems on Amazon Web Services
Working in Git, GitHub and JIRA
Presenting information in Tableau, Spotfire Shiny, etc

We're looking for people with a real passion for data science - if you've been studying on Coursera or competing on Kaggle, tell us about it in your application!

What's Next?

Does this sound like your kind of challenge?

Apply now and we'll be in touch soon."	 - Perth WA	Data ScientistVGW - Perth WA	Data Scientist
311	"Description
We're looking for an experienced Data Scientist to join our flagship data quality and targeting business, think big data marketing solutions. This is a pinnacle role in the wider product management team, they're innovative, passionate, high performing and fun to work with. Utilise your programming skills to help Experian develop new products and take advantage of the latest technologies. Successful candidates will enjoy working with large volumes of data in an innovative and fast paced environment.

We are looking for someone who;
Has an inquiring mind and a passion for dataInterest in innovation and the use of technology to find solutionsIntermediate to Advanced programming skills especially in either R or PythonKnowledge of modelling and statisticsMachine learning experienceExperience with data visualisation tools including but not limited to TableauStrong geo-spatial background with knowledge of tools such as Alteryx and ArcGISDatabase programming including SQL and other data technologiesAnalytical and problem-solving capabilitiesGeneral understanding of industry techniques, including digital advertising platform, search engine optimisation, conversion optimisation and social networking and marketingStrong oral and written communication skillsTertiary level - could be maths, science, computer science, engineering

Essential Duties and Responsibilities
Develop ConsumerView modelsEnsure all models are updated regularlyBe across the methodology to create Mosaic and custom MosaicCreate custom audiences for DAS and other advertising platformsAssist with the ongoing development of ConsumerView
Knowledge, Experience & Qualifications
Knowledge, experience and qualifications

Knowledge
Intermediate to Advanced programming skills especially in either R or PythonUnderstanding of predictive modelling/machine learningDatabase programming and design
Experience
Analytical and problem-solving capabilitiesStrong oral and written communication skills
Qualifications
Tertiary level - could be maths, science, computer science, engineeringThese and other degrees with analytical/technical components"	 - Melbourne VIC	Data ScientistEXPERIAN329 reviews - Melbourne VIC	Data Scientist
312	"Requisition ID: 16888
Job Category: Consulting; Engineering; Information Technology; Technology

With over six decades of business and technical experience in the mining, energy, and infrastructure sectors, we understand that challenges are changing rapidly in every industry. We respond quickly with solutions that are smarter, more efficient, and innovative. We draw upon our 9,000 staff with experience in over 150 countries to challenge the status quo and create positive change for our clients, our employees, and the communities we serve.
Unique opportunity to be exposed to complex & diverse data science problems across various industries
Access to global expertise, technologies and career advancement opportunities
Enthusiastic team with fresh ideas, where you can contribute and shape to the future growth of the practice
Hatch is seeking applications from Senior Data Scientists in Brisbane, who can develop and use AI/ML tools innovatively and manage data science projects to solve technical challenges for our clients in the mining & resource industries.
You will define and manage data science work scopes to import, clean and wrangle data, carry out exploratory data analyses, build and evaluate various predictive models and productionise models. Working with subject matter experts, you will understand the context of the problem, transform the data to answer the business question and use and evaluate models to uncover insights into the processes under investigation, and communicate results in a clear and consumable way. You will be able to assess the appropriateness of the results, know how to safely deploy the models into processes and control systems and advise on the monitoring and maintenance requirements for the deployed solution.
You will be working with the project manager, utilising effective project planning techniques like Agile to break down moderately complex projects into tasks and ensure deadlines and deliverables are kept.
This is an opportunity to join a professional, progressive organisation and become part of an inclusive, supportive team. You will be able to network with colleagues locally, regionally and globally to achieve career success. We strive to maintain a culture that welcomes diversity of thought, individual contribution and team collaboration.
We are an entrepreneurial business in which opportunities abound, so we may ask you to travel domestically and internationally for business, as well as potentially undertake extended assignments away from time to time.

Core Functional Tasks & Key Responsibilities of this role include:

As a data science SME you will manage and perform data science work scopes for
Processing, cleansing and verifying the integrity of data used for analysis
Utilizing exploratory data analysis techniques to understand the data and multivariate analysis to generate new features
Building predictive models using state-of-the-art methods and use appropriate diagnostics to access the performance of the models
Drive the safe deployment of the solution in the client’s processes or control systems and develop the monitoring and support and maintenance plans.
Identifying meaningful insights from large data and metadata sources and interpret and communicate insights and findings from analysis to clients and internal interdisciplinary teams
Identifying and drive implementation of opportunities to improve and enhance data collection and management procedures to include information that is relevant for building analytics systems
Collaborate with clients to ensure projects and outcomes meet their business requirements and manage the execution of a data science project.
Communicating and coordinating effectively with the data science team, systems team, and customer-facing teams to ensure models and results are well understood and incorporated into their business processes
Develop data science opportunities internally and externally, and write data science scopes of work.
Coach and mentor junior data scientists through projects and training sessions.

We are ideally looking for individuals who possess the following qualifications and skills:

Bachelor's or higher degree in Mathematics, Applied Mathematics, Statistics, Physics, Computer Science or related area
Experience in quantitative analysis / research of large, complex data sets
Deep understanding of and extensive experience with predictive analytics techniques and inductive statistical analysis to predict outcomes and behaviours
Expert knowledge and understanding of machine learning techniques and algorithms such as GLM, Neural Network, Naïve Bayes, SVM, Decision Trees, Random Forrest, Boosting methods, etc.
Experience with common data science analytical/programming tool, such as R, Python, Matlab,,SAS, IBM SPSS, IBM DSX/IBM PMQ, RapidMiner.
Experience with data visualization tools such as Tableau, Spotfire, PowerBI, etc.
Understanding of big data techniques & open source platforms and their application to data capture/integration
Possess confidence, creativity, critical thinking ability, a willingness to learn and take feedback, a proactive attitude when faced with challenges, a meticulous attention to unexpected details
Good written, verbal, analytical, organisational, problem-solving and presentation skills
Ability to lead smaller teams on data science projects
Exposure with delivering using Agile.
Experience in at least R, Python or Matlab is also highly desirable.

An employee owned organisation, by joining Hatch you will have the opportunity to be recognised and rewarded for your efforts. You will be provided with many benefits including: competitive remuneration and above statutory superannuation payments; optional salary sacrifice for additional annual leave, and participation in various employee reward and recognition and health and wellbeing programs.
To submit your application please click the ""Apply"" button below.
Unsolicited resumes from recruitment agencies will not be accepted for this position.
As an Equal Opportunity Employer, we are committed to fostering a workforce in each of our locations that reflects the diversity of the communities in which we operate. If you have any special needs requirements, please let us know and we will do our utmost to accommodate. Hatch also supports and encourages a flexible workplace. We offer our employees comprehensive benefits, including up to 12 weeks annual leave per year as part of our Purchased Leave Program."	 - Brisbane QLD	Senior Data ScientistHatch279 reviews - Brisbane QLD	Senior Data Scientist
313	"Cognizant is hiring Data Scientist position in Perth
Job Title: Data Scientist
Experience: 9+ years
Location: Perth
Job Description:
The successful candidate will be part of our advanced analytics / predictive modeling / Data Science team in Perth. They will be involved end-to-end with advanced analytics consulting projects. The successful candidate will be hands-on in advanced analytics projects as well as leading and directing the project team. We’re looking for smart, hard-working individuals with experience in using Data Science / predictive modeling to help drive meaningful change at our clients. Previous practical experience in implementing the results of “advanced analytics” will be a key success factor. Experience in mining or industrial related fields is highly desired but not required.
Mandatory Skills:
Master’s degree or a PhD in Statistics, Mathematics, Operations Research, Data Science, Engineering, Econometrics or any other heavily analytical field.
At least three (3) years hands on experience in delivering advanced analytics / predictive modeling solutions.
At least three (3) years client facing experience e.g. in project scoping, presenting results, designing solutions, implementation.
At least five (5) years total work experience in advanced analytics and / or related fields.
Experience in using R, particularly for data pre-processing and running statistical / machine learning models.
Experience in at least one programming language (C#, C++, Java preferred but Python also acceptable.)
Experience in working with offshore teams preferable, but not required.
Experience managing teams of analysts desirable but not required.
Python and MS Office skills desirable but not required.
Experience in Big Data is a plus but not required.
Experience with visualisation tools preferable but not required.
Experience in supply chain analytics or network optimisation highly desirable but not required.
Technical Skills
SNoPrimary SkillProficiency Level *Rqrd./Dsrd.

1R Statistical PackagePL4Required

2TableauPL3Required

3PythonPL3Required

4ANSI SQLPL3Required

5SASPL4Desired
Proficiency Legends
Proficiency LevelGeneric Reference

PL1The associate has basic awareness and comprehension of the skill and is in the process of acquiring this skill through various channels.

PL2The associate possesses working knowledge of the skill, and can actively and independently apply this skill in engagements and projects.

PL3The associate has comprehensive, in-depth and specialized knowledge of the skill. She / he has extensively demonstrated successful application of the skill in engagements or projects.

PL4The associate can function as a subject matter expert for this skill. The associate is capable of analyzing, evaluating and synthesizing solutions using the skill.

Job Location : Perth, Western Australia, Australia
Employee Status : Full Time Employee
Shift : Day Job
Travel : No
Job Posting : Sep 20 2018

About Cognizant
Cognizant (NASDAQ-100: CTSH) is one of the world's leading professional services companies, transforming clients' business, operating and technology models for the digital era. Our unique industry-based, consultative approach helps clients envision, build and run more innovative and efficient businesses. Headquartered in the U.S., Cognizant is ranked 195 on the Fortune 500 and is consistently listed among the most admired companies in the world. Learn how Cognizant helps clients lead with digital at www.cognizant.com or follow us on Twitter: Cognizant."	 - Perth WA	Data ScientistCognizant10,458 reviews - Perth WA	Data Scientist
314	"Big Data Engineer (Data Scientist)
Reference:
BBBH1409
Location:
Sydney CBD, New South Wales
Job Type:
Contract
Date Posted:
18/10/2018
Surry Hills location
Multiple Contract roles available - Competitive daily rates
Be a part of an exciting and cutting-edge project
12 Month contract (up to 36-months' worth of work)
Big Data Engineers wanted
About the Company:

One of Australia's leading retail organisations, based in Surry Hills is undergoing a huge BI transformation project and are looking for driven data engineers to become a key member of their Data Science team.

About the Role:

The purpose of this role is to support the Data Science team to develop, implement and optimize analytical and predictive models to deliver better products. It will be your job to:

Work closely with key stakeholders to understand business questions and execute data science projects that deliver business solutions.
Data discovery, acquisition, extraction, ingest, transformation and modelling of a variety of data sources. Preparing data models for analytical modelling and/or reporting
Managing the quality and timely execution of data related components of projects
Responsible for complete and accurate documentation of all development
Engage with business partners and delivery teams to ensure algorithms are delivered and implemented into production systems
Interpret analysis and modelling results in a business context and provide commercially focused recommendations to support business decisions.
Provide support to the business in the preparation and provision of data sets to support ad-hoc/be-spoke strategic and tactical decision making
Internal satisfaction benchmark from key stakeholders.
What you need to succeed:

3+ Years of data engineering experience
3+ Years of SQL, Spark, Scala & Python experience
Experience working with Data Science teams in the preparation of data sets for machine learning and advanced analytic modelling
Significant knowledge of data modelling techniques and understanding of different data structures and their benefits and limitations under particular use cases
Experience with acquisition of external data sources through API, web scraping or similar
A minimum of Bachelor's degree in computer science, computer engineering, or similar technical discipline, with Masters or PhD qualifications in these domains considered highly desirable
If you meet the criteria, please apply below!
To your next career step…."	 - Sydney Central Business District NSW	Big Data Engineer (Data Scientist)Firesoft Consulting - Sydney Central Business District NSWContract	Big Data Engineer (Data Scientist)
315	"Job Description

About Hyper Anna and our team:
We’re a rapidly scaling startup in the AI and data analytics space – we’re well funded, have a growing customer base and we’re all set for an amazing journey ahead. As a part of this, we're looking for great people to help us overachieve on our goal to delight our customers and build a sustainable and sticky product. Our team is super switched on, passionate, and we pride ourselves on our diverse, inclusive environment.
About the opportunity:
We’re looking for a Data Science and Analytics Manager who will be responsible for delivering solutions that continue to innovate and grow our AI product. As well as managing a high-performing team of Data Science Engineers, you’ll report to the CTO and be working alongside our product managers as we evolve Anna, an automated data scientist who is already beginning to transform how businesses use data.
What you'll do:
Lead and coach a team of data science engineers
Work across multiple squads to ensure data scientists are adding value effectively
Directly influence the direction of the product and the data analysis we can provide
Contribute to the company’s overall technology strategy
About you:
You’re passionate, up to date on new technologies, and have really strong data science and engineering fundamentals. You're a real problem solver who can find solutions that can take both technology ambition and business needs into account.
You love coaching a team and helping others to grow with you. You’re someone who's laid-back, adaptable and wants to have an impact on the product you’re working on.
To be successful in this role you’ll have:
10+ years experience in data science and analytics within a commercial environment
4+ years of team management experience
Demonstrated ability in product development and understanding user needs
The technical know-how to be a sounding board for your team and provide technical direction when needed
Experience in coaching good engineering behaviours and practice into your team
A real passion for making an impact in the World of AI and machine learning
You’ll have the opportunity to join our team at a pivotal stage of our growth! This means you’ll have access to real career opportunities, be in a role that makes a difference, receive a competitive salary and work in our beautiful, centrally located office.
We have big plans, come and join us.

Qualifications

null

Additional Information

null"	 - Pyrmont NSW	Data Science and Analytics ManagerHyper Anna - Pyrmont NSW	Data Science and Analytics Manager
316	"Requisition ID: 16113
Job Category: New Graduate

With over six decades of business and technical experience in the mining, energy, and infrastructure sectors, we understand that challenges are changing rapidly in every industry. We respond quickly with solutions that are smarter, more efficient, and innovative. We draw upon our 9,000 staff with experience in over 150 countries to challenge the status quo and create positive change for our clients, our employees, and the communities we serve.

Achieve career success as a Graduate Data Scientist at Hatch
Gain the opportunity to work on various Projects for reputable, well-known Clients
Collaborative, inclusive work environment

Hatch is currently seeking a Graduate Data Scientist to join our friendly and professional Perth office.

As a Graduate Data Scientist, you will develop and use AI/ML tools and data processing pipelines to solve challenges for our clients in our data-driven engagements. Under the supervision of Senior Data Scientists you will develop and carry out analytical experiments and evaluate alternate models. Working with subject matter experts, you will interrogate models to uncover insights into the processes under investigation.

This is an opportunity to join a professional, progressive organisation and become part of an inclusive, supportive team. You will be able to network with colleagues locally, regionally and globally to achieve career success.

Key responsibilities of this role will include (but are not limited to):
Processing, cleansing, and verifying the integrity of data used for analysis
Utilize exploratory data analysis techniques to understand the data and multivariate analysis to generate new features
Build predictive models using state-of-the-art methods and use appropriate diagnostics to access the performance of the models
Doing ad-hoc analysis and presenting results in a clear manner
Enhancing data collection procedures to include information that is relevant for building analytics systems
Creating & maintaining automated anomaly detection systems
Assist in identifying meaningful insights from large data and metadata sources and interpret and communicate insights and findings from analysis and experiments
Communicate and coordinate effectively with the data science team, systems team, and customer-facing teams
Develop knowledge of current and emerging technologies in AI/ML

 Individuals are encouraged to apply if they possess the following skills, attributes and experience:
Possess high levels of confidence, critical thinking ability, a willingness to learn and take feedback, a proactive attitude when faced with challenges, and a meticulous attention to detail
Knowledge of at least one analytical/programming tool, such as R, Python, SAS, SPSS, RapidMiner, IBM DSX/IBM PMQ, Matlab or SQL
Demonstrated ability to achieve results
Understanding of and experience with predictive analytics techniques and statistical analysis to predict outcomes
Understanding of big data techniques & open source platforms and their application to data capture/integration
Bachelor's in Mathematics, Applied Mathematics, Statistics, Physics, Computer Science or related area

An employee owned organisation, by joining Hatch you will have the opportunity to be recognised and rewarded for your efforts. You will be provided with many benefits including: competitive remuneration and above statutory superannuation payments; optional salary sacrifice for additional annual leave, and participation in various employee reward and recognition and health and wellbeing programs.

To submit your application please click the ""Apply"" button.

As an Equal Opportunity Employer, we are committed to fostering a workforce in each of our locations that reflects the diversity of the communities in which we operate. If you have any special needs requirements, please let us know and we will do our utmost to accommodate. Hatch also supports and encourages a flexible workplace. We offer our employees comprehensive benefits, including up to 12 weeks annual leave per year as part of our Purchased Leave Program."	 - Perth WA	Graduate Data ScientistHatch279 reviews - Perth WA	Graduate Data Scientist
317	"Junior Data Scientist :: FinTech Start-up :: Sydney CBD :: $90K + Super + Bonus

Our client is an exciting start up in the FinTech / Property sector are looking to hire a Junior Data Scientist to join their expanding analytics team. Based in a FinTech incubator in the heart of the CBD, this organisation has a truly collaborative working environment. Reporting to the Head of Analytics this opportunity is paying up to $90K + Super + Bonus.

As a Junior Data Scientist, the responsibilities of this role will involve but not be limited to:

Develop creative and intuitive, insights driven dashboards leveraging cutting edge data visualisation tools such as Tableau, QlikView, PowerBI, etc.
Work within a supportive team of industry pioneers on Blue Chip clients to map out complex customer strategies to be optimised through Data Science and Machine Learning techniques.
Leverage strong programming skills in Python, R, SQL or SAS to manage and manipulate and supplement large volumes of customer data in preparation for modelling and analysis assignments.
Support delivery of a range of bespoke Data Science, Machine Learning, Statistical Modelling led projects leveraging techniques that may include; Linear/Logistic Regression, Confidence Interval, Test of Hypotheses, Clustering - Unsupervised & Supervised Learning, Time Series, Decision Trees , Monte-Carlo Simulation, Bayesian Statistics, Principal Component Analysis, Neural Networks, Gradient Boosting, Nearest Neighbors, (Geo-) Spatial Modeling, Recommendation Engines, Attribution Modeling, Segmentation, Predictive Modeling, Scoring Engine, Survival Analysis, Lift Modeling, Yield Optimization, Cross-Validation, Model Fitting, Experimental Design, etc.

The successful applicant will come from a strong academic and commercial background working in a data driven analytics and insights environment and be able to demonstrate:



Experience using R, Python, SQL or SAS to extract, manipulate and merge large customer behaviour or transactional data sets from a variety of source systems (SQL Teradata, Oracle SQL, SQL Server, AWS, SAS Base or R).
At least 1yr of commercial experience extracting 'Customer Insights' from large and complex datasets relating to; customer strategy (acquisition, retention & growth), statistical modelling, marketing campaigns or credit risk analysis, etc.
Educated to a minimum of degree level in an analytical discipline such as - Mathematics, Statistics, Econometrics, Actuarial Studies, Data Science, Computer Science etc.
A genuine passion to build a career in Data Analytics / Data Science, implementing analytical techniques and concepts such as; Linear/Logistic Regression, Confidence Interval, Test of Hypotheses, Clustering - Unsupervised & Supervised Learning, Time Series, Decision Trees, Monte-Carlo Simulation, Bayesian Statistics, Principal Component Analysis, Neural Networks, Gradient Boosting, Nearest Neighbors, (Geo-) Spatial Modeling, Recommendation Engines, Attribution Modeling, Segmentation, Predictive Modeling, Scoring Engine, Survival Analysis, Lift Modeling, Yield Optimization, Cross-Validation, Model Fitting, Experimental Design, etc

If this opportunity is of interest, please send your resume without delay to iain@correlateresources.com"	 - Sydney NSW	Junior Data ScientistCorrelate Resources - Sydney NSW$70,000 - $90,000 a year	Junior Data Scientist
318	You remember how to roll up your sleeves and craft data joins in SQL, but you've invested time in learning R, and Python is your friend. You know Hadoop isn't the only approach and you're happiest getting behind the GUI into the real data to uncover the stories.Isn't it about time you took advantage of the benefits from all that knowledge?Our client is looking for data polyglots who enjoy solving complex problems; not the kind you can come to with a canned response, the ones where you really need to use your skills.With some of the biggest names in Australia and around the world throwing their most pressing problems at our client they need curious guides - but they only take the best.Getting in isn't easy, but if it was, it wouldn't be the right place for you.Prove yourself and you can build a team behind you to grow your own patch. The opportunities truly are what you make them.With Udemy on tap, and weekly internal led training sessions, you'll be joining a group of like-minded people who are capable of understanding you when you get on your high horse about relevance over recency (or the other way around).Currently our client has four areas of practice, you can join one these and then explain to them what they need to build another:Data & Analytics - BI/DW, Big Data Analytics, Data Engineering, Data Science and Advanced AnalyticsCustomer Engagement - Marketing Campaigns, Campaign Analysis, Customer InsightsDigital - Full stack Development, UI/UX Design, Mobile DevelopmentCloud & Technology - Cloud Services (AWS, Azure, Google Cloud Platform), Managed ServicesWe're not worried about levels at the moment, if you've got the skills there's a place for you.SEO stuff because you know we need to have it in here;Data engineerData scientistData ConsultantJava, Scala, Python, HadoopApache Spark, Kafka, Hive, Airflow, NiFiAWS, Google Cloud Platform or Azure is helpful but not mandatoryJob Types: Full-time, PermanentExperience:data consulting: 3 years (Preferred)	 - Sydney NSW	Software Architect / Tech LeadKloudPPL - Sydney NSWFull-time, Permanent	Software Architect / Tech Lead
319	"Job Description:About IntellifyIntellify is a data science and machine learning consultancy who helps our customers to increase their growth, operate more efficiently and build competitive advantage. Our team consists of leading data scientists, machine learning engineers and consultants that extensively use advanced (statistical) machine learning and optimisation techniques to create state-of-the-art solutions for business. As an emerging AWS consulting partner, we have the ability to scale our solution to any needs through their cloud platform.About the OpportunityAs we are growing at a rapid speed, we are seeking a senior full-time data scientist/machine learning engineer who has extensive experience in data science, machine learning and/or statistical modelling as well as programming. As part of this role, you will supervise and manage junior data scientists, and work on development to build data science solutions using a combination of the latest technologies and business strategies.With a startup culture and applying cutting-edge technology to real-world business problems, you have the opportunity to drive impact at some of Australia’s leading startups and enterprises as well as to learn and grow within a team of like-minded data scientists. Our client problems have ranged from pricing, inventory and workforce optimisation to computer vision applied to radar data for predictive maintenance. The work is varied and challenging, and will require someone who is dynamic in their thinking as well as willing to explore and try new ideas.Being a senior data scientist at Intellify you are charged with both being a mentor and learning from fellow specialist data scientists in an ever evolving and improving atmosphere. We want to see you thrive professionally and personally as we create a leading data science, machine learning and AI company of the future.What we offerThis is a full-time permanent role. This role will provide a unique opportunity to work in a collaborative team and learn from experienced data scientists, so you can advance your knowledge and get hands-on experience with state-of-the-art machine learning methods. Our salaries are competitive, and we offer flexible working hours. We also believe great data science comes from great teams, so invest continuously in upskilling and cross-training our data scientists, with lunch & learn sessions, training courses and certifications, and an opportunity to be a core part of our data science and machine learning communities. Furthermore, we offer the following:1) 10 x paid days of professional development per year (attend/ speak @ conferences, undertake courses and certifications)2) $2,200 Toolkit allowance to go out and buy your own tech3) Profit sharing4) Work with high-profile clients5) A defined career path with your 1-1 mentor6) Great team culture7) Have an impact in a small team where there is no politics8) Flexible & inclusive work-environment9) Work closely with AWS using cutting edge cloud technologiesRequired Skills: A computer science, robotics, maths, statistics, physics or related degree (graduated Bachelors, MSc, PhD or last year MSc/PhD student)5+ years of applied industry machine learning, optimisation and/or statistics experienceStrong Python or R programming experience and related data science libraries (such as scikit-learn, Pandas, Tensorflow/Keras)Strong SQL database and code versioning (e.g., Git) skillsGood software engineering principlesProject management / team management experienceExperience with data visualisation tools or frameworks i.e. tableau, D3.js, ggplot2 etc.Desirable skills: Knowledge or experience of software engineering practicesKnowledge or experience on time series/product forecasting/recommender systemsKnowledge of deep learning/neural networksExperience working with web development technologiesExperience working with cloud technologies i.e. AWS / Microsoft / Google Cloud.Portfolio evidence of your previous work is appreciated (i.e. blog, github repository, conference presentations etc).How to ApplyIf you wish to take the next step in your career working and learning with the best in an innovative data science company, please click on ""Apply now"" and include:Your CVYour portfolio of projects (eg GitHub, blog site etc)Desired salaryYour availabilityBrief details (3-4 sentences) of either:A machine learning or data science project you have developed or delivered previously; orPrevious team leadership experience, where you worked with a team to deliver a project.We are looking forward to hearing from you.*** STRICTLY NO AGENCIES ***Please note that our Company Policy dictates direct recruitment only.Job Types: Full-time, Part-timeSalary: $120,000.00 to $160,000.00 /yearExperience:machine learning, optimisation and/or statistics: 3 years (Required)"	 - Sydney NSW	Senior Data Scientist/ Machine learning engineerIntellify - Sydney NSW$120,000 - $160,000 a year - Full-time, Part-time	Senior Data Scientist/ Machine learning engineer
320	Job DescriptionThe candidate is a skilled data scientist who will be building deep learning models for medical image diagnosis applications such as segmentation, localisation and classification of abnormalities.ResponsibilitiesThe candidate will write high quality model with high performance and good memory management, together with state-of-the-art accuracies and embed into our proprietary software. Our aim is to align you with the activities which truly interest you; will stretch you technically; help you grow and impact on billions of patients.RequirementsBachelor / Master / PhD in engineering or computer science or mathematics or physicsKnows computer vision / image segmentation, localization, classificationKnows tensorflow or theano or torchStrong python, C++ or java coderGood knowledge of numpy, pandas, sklearn, scipy, seabornKnows how to build deep learning models like RNN and CNN and other neural network models.May require to relocate to China, Beijing.What We OfferMaster, Teach, Learn – The opportunity to work with, learn from and share knowledge with ultra-smart colleagues in a culture of collaboration and technical excellence. We groom our employees and make sure that they stay at the cutting edge of the technology stack.Impact – Huge potential to make a positive contribution across our business, people and partnersRemuneration – Competitive pay with share award for top performers.We are willing to groom engineers and fresh graduates who don’t have a background in deep learning but are interested to learn. You will also have the opportunity to attend top machine learning conferences like NIPS and ICML.Job Types: Full-time, Permanent	 - Sydney NSW	BioMind Data Scientist/Engineer (Relocate to Beijing)biomind.ai - Sydney NSWFull-time, Permanent	BioMind Data Scientist/Engineer (Relocate to Beijing)
322	Job DescriptionThe candidate is a skilled data scientist who will be building deep learning models for medical image diagnosis applications such as segmentation, localisation and classification of abnormalities.ResponsibilitiesThe candidate will write high quality model with high performance and good memory management, together with state-of-the-art accuracies and embed into our proprietary software. Our aim is to align you with the activities which truly interest you; will stretch you technically; help you grow and impact on billions of patients.RequirementsBachelor / Master / PhD in engineering or computer science or mathematics or physicsKnows computer vision / image segmentation, localization, classificationKnows tensorflow or theano or torchStrong python, C++ or java coderGood knowledge of numpy, pandas, sklearn, scipy, seabornKnows how to build deep learning models like RNN and CNN and other neural network models.May require to relocate to China, Beijing.What We OfferMaster, Teach, Learn – The opportunity to work with, learn from and share knowledge with ultra-smart colleagues in a culture of collaboration and technical excellence. We groom our employees and make sure that they stay at the cutting edge of the technology stack.Impact – Huge potential to make a positive contribution across our business, people and partnersRemuneration – Competitive pay with share award for top performers.We are willing to groom engineers and fresh graduates who don’t have a background in deep learning but are interested to learn. You will also have the opportunity to attend top machine learning conferences like NIPS and ICML.Job Types: Full-time, Permanent	 - Sydney NSW	BioMind Data Scientist/Engineer (Relocate to Beijing)biomind.ai - Sydney NSWFull-time, Permanent	BioMind Data Scientist/Engineer (Relocate to Beijing)
323	You remember how to roll up your sleeves and craft data joins in SQL, but you've invested time in learning R, and Python is your friend. You know Hadoop isn't the only approach and you're happiest getting behind the GUI into the real data to uncover the stories.Isn't it about time you took advantage of the benefits from all that knowledge?Our client is looking for data polyglots who enjoy solving complex problems; not the kind you can come to with a canned response, the ones where you really need to use your skills.With some of the biggest names in Australia and around the world throwing their most pressing problems at our client they need curious guides - but they only take the best.Getting in isn't easy, but if it was, it wouldn't be the right place for you.Prove yourself and you can build a team behind you to grow your own patch. The opportunities truly are what you make them.With Udemy on tap, and weekly internal led training sessions, you'll be joining a group of like-minded people who are capable of understanding you when you get on your high horse about relevance over recency (or the other way around).Currently our client has four areas of practice, you can join one these and then explain to them what they need to build another:Data & Analytics - BI/DW, Big Data Analytics, Data Engineering, Data Science and Advanced AnalyticsCustomer Engagement - Marketing Campaigns, Campaign Analysis, Customer InsightsDigital - Full stack Development, UI/UX Design, Mobile DevelopmentCloud & Technology - Cloud Services (AWS, Azure, Google Cloud Platform), Managed ServicesWe're not worried about levels at the moment, if you've got the skills there's a place for you.SEO stuff because you know we need to have it in here;Data engineerData scientistData ConsultantJava, Scala, Python, HadoopApache Spark, Kafka, Hive, Airflow, NiFiAWS, Google Cloud Platform or Azure is helpful but not mandatoryJob Types: Full-time, PermanentExperience:data consulting: 3 years (Preferred)	 - Sydney NSW	Software Architect / Tech LeadKloudPPL - Sydney NSWFull-time, Permanent	Software Architect / Tech Lead
324	"The Company

Robert Half Technology are working alongside a well reputable and established Insurance organisation in the CBD and we are currently looking for a talented Data Scientist to join our team on a permanent basis. Our client continue to grow across all areas of the business and this role has been created due to the expansion of the division. This role represents an exciting challenge and career opportunity for a Data Scientist to join our forward thinking client.

The Role

The Role of the Data Scientist will have the opportunity to make their mark using data led decision making and modelling to catalyse industry disuption. Aspects of the role include:

Proportion your role with Modelling, Research, Analysism Data Manipulation and Collaboration.

Work as a data expert and a quantitative researcher.

Translate unstructured, complex business problems into practical, powerful algorithmic solutions.

Be part of a highly innovative team working on interesting and difficult problems, leveraging cutting edge technology to build key data products.

Uncover fresh insights from disparate data sources and data mining

Spearheading machine learning projects on data that has never been touched by the organization.

About You

This is a hands-on position where you will be empowered to be very ambitious and bold, to solve challenging problems and have the potential to directly impact the future of the business. The role requires that you have experience in machine learning and data mining.

Your experience and skills should include most, if not all:
Ability to communicate complex quantitative analysis in a clear, precise and actionable manner

Practical experience using contemporary machine learning frameworks such as, scikit-learn, pytorch and tensorflow.

A proven track record in developing, innovating, and applying advanced algorithms to address practical problems and in building new analytical products of commercial value.

Experience in Python and/or R.

Experience in relational databases and SQL

Apply Today

Please send your resume by clicking on the apply button or for further information, contact our Melbourne office."	 - Melbourne VIC	Data Scientist - Market Leader - CBDRobert Half Australia6,897 reviews - Melbourne VIC$110,000 a year - Permanent	Data Scientist - Market Leader - CBD
325	"Job Description:About IntellifyIntellify is a data science and machine learning consultancy who helps our customers to increase their growth, operate more efficiently and build competitive advantage. Our team consists of leading data scientists, machine learning engineers and consultants that extensively use advanced (statistical) machine learning and optimisation techniques to create state-of-the-art solutions for business. As an emerging AWS consulting partner, we have the ability to scale our solution to any needs through their cloud platform.About the OpportunityAs we are growing at a rapid speed, we are seeking a senior full-time data scientist/machine learning engineer who has extensive experience in data science, machine learning and/or statistical modelling as well as programming. As part of this role, you will supervise and manage junior data scientists, and work on development to build data science solutions using a combination of the latest technologies and business strategies.With a startup culture and applying cutting-edge technology to real-world business problems, you have the opportunity to drive impact at some of Australia’s leading startups and enterprises as well as to learn and grow within a team of like-minded data scientists. Our client problems have ranged from pricing, inventory and workforce optimisation to computer vision applied to radar data for predictive maintenance. The work is varied and challenging, and will require someone who is dynamic in their thinking as well as willing to explore and try new ideas.Being a senior data scientist at Intellify you are charged with both being a mentor and learning from fellow specialist data scientists in an ever evolving and improving atmosphere. We want to see you thrive professionally and personally as we create a leading data science, machine learning and AI company of the future.What we offerThis is a full-time permanent role. This role will provide a unique opportunity to work in a collaborative team and learn from experienced data scientists, so you can advance your knowledge and get hands-on experience with state-of-the-art machine learning methods. Our salaries are competitive, and we offer flexible working hours. We also believe great data science comes from great teams, so invest continuously in upskilling and cross-training our data scientists, with lunch & learn sessions, training courses and certifications, and an opportunity to be a core part of our data science and machine learning communities. Furthermore, we offer the following:1) 10 x paid days of professional development per year (attend/ speak @ conferences, undertake courses and certifications)2) $2,200 Toolkit allowance to go out and buy your own tech3) Profit sharing4) Work with high-profile clients5) A defined career path with your 1-1 mentor6) Great team culture7) Have an impact in a small team where there is no politics8) Flexible & inclusive work-environment9) Work closely with AWS using cutting edge cloud technologiesRequired Skills: A computer science, robotics, maths, statistics, physics or related degree (graduated Bachelors, MSc, PhD or last year MSc/PhD student)5+ years of applied industry machine learning, optimisation and/or statistics experienceStrong Python or R programming experience and related data science libraries (such as scikit-learn, Pandas, Tensorflow/Keras)Strong SQL database and code versioning (e.g., Git) skillsGood software engineering principlesProject management / team management experienceExperience with data visualisation tools or frameworks i.e. tableau, D3.js, ggplot2 etc.Desirable skills: Knowledge or experience of software engineering practicesKnowledge or experience on time series/product forecasting/recommender systemsKnowledge of deep learning/neural networksExperience working with web development technologiesExperience working with cloud technologies i.e. AWS / Microsoft / Google Cloud.Portfolio evidence of your previous work is appreciated (i.e. blog, github repository, conference presentations etc).How to ApplyIf you wish to take the next step in your career working and learning with the best in an innovative data science company, please click on ""Apply now"" and include:Your CVYour portfolio of projects (eg GitHub, blog site etc)Desired salaryYour availabilityBrief details (3-4 sentences) of either:A machine learning or data science project you have developed or delivered previously; orPrevious team leadership experience, where you worked with a team to deliver a project.We are looking forward to hearing from you.*** STRICTLY NO AGENCIES ***Please note that our Company Policy dictates direct recruitment only.Job Types: Full-time, Part-timeSalary: $120,000.00 to $160,000.00 /yearExperience:machine learning, optimisation and/or statistics: 3 years (Required)"	 - Sydney NSW	Senior Data Scientist/ Machine learning engineerIntellify - Sydney NSW$120,000 - $160,000 a year - Full-time, Part-time	Senior Data Scientist/ Machine learning engineer
326	"Our Client seeks a Data Scientist with Pre Sales or Consulting experience to join their Enterprise Information Management team and work with the Pre Sales division to develop custom built Data models for a range of EIM top tier Clients.

You will be a core member of the customer solution team, analyzing complex customer requirements to provide unique solutions for their Enterprise Information Data.

You will be hands on in developing predictive modeling concepts and optimisation algorithms within complex environments. Provide technical know how to deliver successful solutions to large corporations and government agencies.

Create and build solutions to meet unique customer focused business requirements and insights.

Help develop best practices for implementation projects.

You will possess at least 2 years experience within either an Analytics or Data Science working environment.

Experience in Spark with PySpark, Scala, SparkR specifically and ample experience in Python and R.
Experience working with large, multi-dimensional datasets.
Experience or an interest in Deep Learning, AI and Neural Networks.
Experience creating meaningful data visualisations and exposure to analysing unstructured content.
If this sounds like a role that fits your profile or would like to know more please click APPLY NOW below or email james@counterpointgroup.com.au for more details."	 - Sydney NSW	Data Scientist - Sydney, Spark, Scala, Python, develop custom Machine LearningCounterpoint - Sydney NSW$160,000 a year	Data Scientist - Sydney, Spark, Scala, Python, develop custom Machine Learning
327	"Job Description

As an experienced Data Scientist you will apply data mining techniques, perform statistical analysis, and develop machine learning algorithms to help us make smarter decisions to deliver even better solutions to Leidos and its customers. You will help us discover the information hidden in vast amounts of data and be comfortable communicating with a variety of stakeholders and importantly using language that is targeted to your audience.
You will work across a variety of projects at one time and your day may include:
Design and develop methods, processes, and systems to consolidate and analyse structured and unstructured, diverse sources including “big data” sources.
Develop and use advanced software programs, algorithms, querying and automated processes to cleanse, integrate and evaluate datasets and model complex business problems.
Supporting our business development and pre-sales activities by identifying advanced analytics opportunities that benefit current and potential customers
Research, design, implement and validate cutting-edge algorithms to analyse diverse sources of data to achieve targeted outcomes

Qualifications

Coupled with your Masters you will have previous experience delivering world-class data science outcomes, you solve complex analytical problems using quantitative approaches with your unique blend of analytical, mathematical and technical skills.
You will have a passion for discovering solutions hidden in large data sets and working with stakeholders to improve business outcomes.
Your confident and clear communications skills will see you effectively communicate to a variety of stakeholders and present information to senior leaders and executives.
You will also
Bring your in-depth understanding of statistical and predictive modelling concepts, machine-learning approaches, clustering and classification techniques, and recommendation and optimisation algorithms.
Have experience with common data science toolkits, such as R, Python, NumPy, MatLab, etc. (Excellence in at least one of these is highly desirable)
Be highly effective in managing multiple, concurrent activities, while understanding and managing priorities, dependencies and risk
Have strong conceptual, analytical and interpretive skills with high level of attention to detail
Be comfortable working in a fast-paced, test-driven, collaborative and iterative technology environment.
Additional Information

At Leidos you’ll enjoy 12 weeks’ paid parental leave as a primary carer, flexible work practices, discounted health insurance, novated leasing and more. Foster your career through complete access to learning and development and mentoring opportunities, we have a strong track record of internal promotion and career transitions. Join a company who acknowledges “People First”.
As a business we are focusing on setting people up for success and ensuring there is exposure to a variety of projects, so individuals can develop not only specialist skills, but broaden their experience within the defence field. If this sounds like you and you have the right attitude coupled with the willingness to learn and wanting to be part of a team of professional engineers that are leading the field – apply today
Redefine Possible for your career at Leidos.
This role does requires the successful applicant to be an Australian Citizen and hold at a minimum a Baseline Clearance."	 - Canberra ACT	Senior Data ScientistLeidos590 reviews - Canberra ACT	Senior Data Scientist
328	"Data Scientist – Technology & Innovation
Location: Melbourne

Welcome to This Australian Life.

From the millions of Australians we protect, to those that make it happen every day at
TAL, people really are what we’re all about.

TAL needs people who represent our diverse Australian community. People who embrace our spirit and inspire confidence in their colleagues, customers and community. People who are passionate about making the most of the choices and options we provide. People who do what’s right, aim high, and work smart.

About the Opportunity
TAL’s Technology & Innovation team are charged with the exciting remit of exploring innovation in Australian Life Insurance and adjacent industries. This role represents an exciting challenge and career opportunity for a data scientist keen to make their mark using data led decision making and modelling to catalyse industry disruption. You will work as a key member in a cross-functional, multi-disciplinary data project team with responsibility for undertaking a range of research and analytical activities leveraging all available data assets.

To be successful we are looking for the following skills and experience:
Ability to communicate complex quantitative analysis in a clear, precise and actionable manner.
Experience engaging and influencing stakeholders.Conversant in Python and/or R.
Practical experience using contemporary machine learning frameworks, such as scikit-learn, pytorch and/or tensorflow.
Ability to creatively engineer features for machine learning problems.
Conversant in relational databases and SQL.
Ability to query, manipulate and analyse large datasets.
Ability to understand and solve loosely defined problems, find answers and actionable insights to inform product development decisions.
Relevant qualification in Mathematics, Computer Science or a related quantitative discipline.
Additional valued capabilities include:
Previous experience solving real world NLP problems.
Experience developing Machine Learning pipelines and implementing them in production.
Familiarity with cloud computing platforms such as AWS or Azure.
Comfortable with Docker, airflow, SSH, Ubuntu and bash.

Work is a big part of this Australian life, and we work hard to make it one of the best parts. We want our employees to work in ways that suits their life and the nature of their role, so they feel able to meet their work life commitments and support their wellbeing. Everyone’s welcome to work for us – regardless of their age, ethnicity, religion, sexual orientation, gender identity, intersex status or any disabilities they might be living with.

We know it’s the people we work with and experiences we share that make work meaningful and fulfilling, and we’d love for you to be part of it."	 - Melbourne VIC	Data Scientist - Customer & InnovationTAL - Melbourne VIC	Data Scientist - Customer & Innovation
329	"Melbourne,Victoria,Australia BEH7X3
Boeing is the world's largest aerospace company and leading manufacturer of commercial airplanes and defense, space and security systems. We are engineers and technicians. Skilled scientists and thinkers. Bold innovators and dreamers. Join us, and you can build something better for yourself, for our customers and for the world.
We are looking for a Data Scientist to support the Australian region, Information Technology and Data Analytics (IT&DA) organisation. The organisational scope supports Boeing businesses in Australia and associated enterprise functions: Commercial and Government Aftermarket Services; Engineering, Manufacturing, Quality, Safety, Supply Chain, HR, Finance, and Corporate functions.
At Boeing, we are already making a difference across the industry using data analytics to deliver strong, rich and safer product experience to our commercial and government customers. We are expanding and growing in all areas in the frontier of aerospace industry. We are working on projects that utilize the latest techniques in Machine Learning (including Deep Learning, Neural network), Natural Language Processing and deep infrastructure. We’ve already been joined by some of the best minds, and we’re looking for talented Data Scientists that have applied experience in the field to join our team.
Data scientists will have opportunities to work on projects with highest priority to the business. Paramount to success in this role is the ability to determine, define and deploy predictive/prescriptive analytic solutions to identify and perform root cause analysis on adverse trends, by choosing best fit methods, defining algorithms, and validating and deploying models to achieve results.
Requirements
This role will lead the businesses to strategic outcomes, partner with all functions across the business, applying their strong data analytics skills to drive decision making for better outcomes.
This role requires a close cross functional collaboration across multiple teams including analytics, product management, and operations to drive product development.
Assesses current reporting for best fit, combine best practices and business expertise to deliver efficient and scalable business analytics to improve business productivity and business to desired outcomes.
Passionate about working with large and complex unstructured and structured data sets. Utilizing that large amounts of data to identify information that can be used for predictive analytics to drive business outcomes.
Discover insights that enable senior management to make strategic decisions and address business challenges and lead the business to deliver to these.
Strong communication and interpersonal skills. You should be able to work across functions and effectively present, recommend and communicate a position by demonstrating its value and tradeoffs.
Able to self-direct and succeed with minimal guidance.
Comfortable conducting design, algorithm, and code reviews.
Ability and passion to train and educate others on the skill of data analytics
Bachelor’s degree in a computer, engineering or quantitative discipline (e.g., statistics, operations research, bioinformatics, economics, computational biology, computer science, mathematics, physics, electrical engineering, industrial engineering).
3+ years of relevant work experience in data analysis or related field. (e.g., statistician, data analyst, data scientist, computational biologist, physicist, bioinformatician)
Experience with statistical software (e.g., R, Octave, Julia, MATLAB, pandas) and database languages (e.g., SQL).
Experience in Natural Language Understanding, Computer Vision, Machine Learning, Algorithmic Foundations of Optimization, Data Mining or Machine Intelligence (Artificial Intelligence).
Experience in working with large, complex and disparate data sources.
Excellent verbal and written communication skills, with the ability to explain analytical methodologies simply and thoroughly.
Excellent collaboration & influencing skills and a proven ability to work with stakeholders to deliver on outcomes
High attention to detail for data integrity and the ability to track down data inconsistencies.
Excellent critical thinking and problem-solving skills
Experience with and having the ability to quickly understand complex data sources and logic.
Proven track record of success working in dynamic environments with frequently changing business environments.
Finance background or previous experience working closely with a finance team is a requirement. Knowledge of SAP Record to Report and Procure to Pay (MM / WM / PP / FICO) an advantage.
Great interpersonal skills to create strong relationships and trust with senior stakeholders and the wider business.
Background of trend analysis and qualitative or statistical analysis & modeling
Boeing, we are committed to creating an inclusive and incident and injury free workplace, where employees can realise their career goals and make a positive contribution to Boeing's success. If this role is you and you're excited by the opportunity to be part of building something amazing, we welcome your application.
Yes, 10 % of the Time CIO, Information & Analytics Individual Contributor No No Standard Australia; Boeing Australia Holdings Proprietary Limited"	 - Melbourne VIC	Data ScientistBOEING5,850 reviews - Melbourne VIC	Data Scientist
330	"Data Lead (SYD0000FY)
Primary Location: Australia-New South Wales-Sydney
Discipline: Visualisation
Job Posting: 25-Jul-18
A career at Arup offers you the chance to make a positive difference in the world. Independently owned and independently minded, we attract a diverse mix of people to work on ground breaking projects around the world.

Arup’s Digital Advisory business provides strategy, design, and innovation for the future of the built environment. Working as a regional team with specialist skills in strategic design, data analytics & visualisation, and software engineering we help clients create and realise the future of cities, transport, and commercial property.

We are looking an experienced data scientist to take the role of Data Lead. You will lead our regional Data Analytics & Visualisation practice as a key discipline within the regional Digital Business working out of Sydney, Melbourne and Singapore.

The Data Analytics & Visualisation practice uses advanced techniques and emerging technologies to apply data strategy, science, engineering, and visualisation to real world problems across the built environment in areas where Arup has deep technical domain knowledge. This typically involves providing analytics and insight on building systems performance, transport and urban mobility challenges, and integrated transport and land use planning for the future.

Your primary responsibilities will be positioning for and winning work across the region in your field and guiding the technical delivery of data strategy/science/engineering/visualisation projects.

This is a critical role for the regional business, helping with technical and business leadership of this growing unit. You will report into the regional Digital Business Leader and will be responsible for a diverse portfolio of data-led consulting projects throughout their life-cycle from initiation to strategy, and from design into operation. You will form part of the regional Digital Leadership Team, along with the local team leaders and other regional practice leaders (Strategic Design and Software Engineering).

You will be a highly experienced practitioner in one or more of data science and/or engineering disciplines. Our task is to deploy these skills within the context of Arup’s diverse client-base, which has not yet tended to benefit from such data-led approaches — so the ability to translate and connect your skills into these areas, and their corresponding clients, will be key.

Excellent communication skills are required, as well as significant experience of working with clients and managing successful projects, as well as leading project teams. You’ll be comfortable when working in and managing teams and projects, and participating in creative, technical and commercial reviews, you will be capable of handling a complex, challenging but ultimately highly rewarding workload.

Responsibilities
We are looking for someone who:

Will lead Arup’s market facing Data Analytics & Visualisation practice regionally
Can develop a compelling vision for Data Analytics in the built environment at Arup
Will be responsible for business development and winning work
-Can lead projects (PD/PM) - leading data practitioners and other members of cross-functional teams
Can function, adapt and succeed in a constantly changing, fast paced environment
Can respond positively and calmly to shifting priorities, demands and timelines-Will develop and maintain relationships with key clients and across Arup
Will mentor and coach data practitioners across the business
Can design and implement data-led solutions for fixed budget/time projects

Requirements

7+ years Data Science and/or Engineering experience in a commercial or academic context
5+ years in leading teams/business units
Formal education in the field of Computer Science, Machine Learning, Applied Statistics, Mathematics
Experience in applied statistics skills and experience in statistical modelling
Experience in machine learning / artificial intelligence techniques and algorithms
Experience in data engineering including the handling and processing of large data sets in the cloud
Experience with data visualisation tools
Understands the different approaches of data science and the ability to dig into a problem and extract the best solution for the business problem
Experience in driving the analytical scope and methodology for projects
Experience prioritising competing demands from stakeholders with ability to get buy-in, resolve conflicts and establish priorities
Has strong presentation and communication skills to help explain complex analytical concepts to people from other fields

“It is not the wish to expand, but the quest for quality which has brought us to this position… to do work of quality, we must have people of quality. There are many kinds of quality, and there are many kinds of job to do, so we must have many kinds of people, each of which can do their own job well.” Ove Arup, 1970."	 - Sydney NSW	Data LeadArup78 reviews - Sydney NSW	Data Lead
331	"You will be the first Big Data Engineer, working with the Head of Data Science. Right now, this organisation have an assorted data pipeline, you get a chance to build the pipeline from scratch which will scale as the company grows.
THE ROLE
You will be responsible for expanding and optimizing their data and data pipeline architecture, as well as optimizing data flow and collection for cross functional teams.
YOU
Are an experienced data pipeline builder and data wrangler who enjoys optimizing data systems and building them from the ground up. As an experienced Data Engineer you will support software developers, database architects, data analysts and data scientists on data initiatives and will ensure optimal data delivery architecture is consistent throughout ongoing projects. You must be self-directed and comfortable supporting the data needs of multiple teams, systems and products. You will be excited by the prospect of optimizing or even re-designing our company’s data architecture to support our next generation of products and data initiatives.
RESPONSIBILITIES
Create and maintain optimal data pipeline architecture, sssemble large, complex data sets that meet functional / non-functional business requirements.Identify, design, and implement internal process improvements: automating manual processes, optimizing data delivery, re-designing infrastructure for greater scalability, etc.Build the infrastructure required for optimal extraction, transformation, and loading of data from a wide variety of data sources using SQL and AWS ‘big data’ technologies.Build analytics tools that utilize the data pipeline to provide actionable insights into customer acquisition, operational efficiency and other key business performance metrics.Work with stakeholders including the Engineering, Product, Data and Design teams to assist with data-related technical issues and support their data infrastructure needs.Keep data separated and secure across national boundaries through multiple data centers and AWS regions.Create data tools for analytics and data scientist team members that assist them in building and optimizing our product into an innovative industry leader.Work with data and analytics experts to strive for greater functionality in data systems.
QUALIFICATIONS
Advanced working SQL knowledge and experience working with relational databases, query authoring (SQL) as well as working familiarity with a variety of databases.Experience building and optimizing ‘big data’ data pipelines, architectures and data sets.Experience performing root cause analysis on internal and external data and processes to answer specific business questions and identify opportunities for improvement.Strong analytic skills related to working with unstructured datasets.Build processes supporting data transformation, data structures, metadata, dependency and workload management.A successful history of manipulating, processing and extracting value from large disconnected datasets.Working knowledge of message queuing, stream processing, and highly scalable ‘big data’ data stores.Strong project management and organizational supporting and working with cross-functional teams in a dynamic environment.We are looking for a candidate with 5+ years of experience in a Data Engineer role, who has attained a Graduate degree in Computer Science, Statistics, Informatics, Information Systems or another quantitative field.You should also have experience using the following software/tools:Experience with big data tools: Hadoop, Spark, Kafka, etc.Experience with relational SQL and NoSQL databases, including Postgres and Cassandra.Experience with data pipeline and workflow management tools: Azkaban, Luigi, Airflow, etc.Experience with AWS cloud services: EC2, EMR, RDS, RedshiftExperience with stream-processing systems: Storm, Spark-Streaming, etc.Experience with object-oriented/object function scripting languages: Python, Java, C++, Scala, etc."	 - Sydney NSW	Big Data Engineer – SaaSJessica Haines - Independent Contractor - Sydney NSW	Big Data Engineer – SaaS
332	"Data Scientist with Big Data skills
Banking - Visa Provided
Singapore Based
We are looking for a Data Scientist to join the Big Data Analytics Centre for one of our banking clients based in Singapore.

You do not need to have working rights for Singapore. A working visa will be provided and is likely to take only one or two weeks to turn around.
The hiring manager wants a Data Scientist with Big Data skills and strong technical analytics skills with tools like SQL, R, Spark, Python, Hive and other Hadoop based languages.
The right person for this role needs to be passionate about data science, have strong data modeling skills and able to work on large data sets. You will be building predictive models and will have the freedom and flexibility to access large amounts of data.

This person will need to articulate insights to non-technical business people about the value of data in relation to their role. You will have regular stakeholder engagement and interaction with people across different business units.

An attractive salary package is on offer for this role and this is a collaborative, knowledge sharing working environment.
The ideal candidate will be passionate about analytics and data science. If you regularly attend meet-ups, work on kaggle competitions and / or continue to develop your skills in data science outside of working hours, then we want to hear from you.

SKILLS & EXPERIENCE

Strong programming skills
Statistics skills
Data modeling skills
Data query skills
Able to visualise data and present
Desirable to have skills in Machine Learning and / or Artificial Intelligence
Worked with SQL, R, Python, SAS, AWS Redshift, Tableau or other similar tools
Desirable to have Big Data skills in tools like Hadoop and Spark
Strong written and verbal communication skills
Strong stakeholder management skills
Passionate about data science
If the above sounds like you, please get in touch. We can wait for a notice period to be served and we are interviewing immediately.
For further information on this role or to confidentially apply, please contact Rik English on 02 8227 9200 or apply directly via the Apply for this job button. Only WORD FORMAT resumes will be accepted."	 - Sydney NSW	Data Scientist - Big Data Skills - SingaporeEthos BeathChapman - Sydney NSW	Data Scientist - Big Data Skills - Singapore
333	"Talenza have been engaged to source a Junior Data Engineer for a disruptive Fintech that are leading the race in building the next generation of digital wallets. This is the hottest fintech in APAC right now.

This is a newly created role where by the CEO and CTO have scaled things to a point with a junior product/ marketing team and via there own self drive and smarts but its time to bring an experienced Product Manager, who is also looking for a step in there career to help shape and drive the future growth.

My client is 18 months in and 30+ staff with a small team of junior PO's and marketers. The tech is proven and the uptake has been great but they need exceptional! The ideal candidate will need a bachelor degree or higher in advanced mathematics.

The ideal candidate should have a strong foundation in the following:
SQL and Oracle.
SAS
Python and R preferred but not essential.
demonstrable experience in data modelling (commercial experience a plus)

We are only looking for the very top talent! A deep passion and curiosity for data modelling has been outlined as equally important as the technical skills required, with an itch for problem solving a big differentiator.

Please send your CV/ Number to Josh van der Vliet to discuss further."	 - Sydney NSW	Data Scientist/ Data EngineerTalenza - Sydney NSWPermanent	Data Scientist/ Data Engineer
334	"Giving you the platform to succeed:
Velrada are an award winning, best-in-class Microsoft Partner offering Business Advisory, Transformation and Microsoft Platform implementation services. Founded in 2010, Velrada has grown in just eight years to a global business, recognised by Microsoft as a leader in the Modern Workplace, Dynamics365, Azure and Data, IoT and AI solution sets.
Velrada maintains the flexibility and innovative culture of a start-up, combined with the scale, depth of capability and market credibility of an established player to attract both the best talent in the industry, and the leading adopters of Microsoft technology.

What we are looking for:
With a postgraduate degree in an analytical field and a background in the application of data science techniques to business problems, you will be a solutions focused Data Scientist. Reporting into our Practice Lead, you will be a major part of the practice going forward in a delivery and deployment role where you will work closely with, and be supported by, a team of Data Engineers and Business Intelligence specialists.
As well as your excellent technical and analytical skills, you will also display strong consulting skills with the ability to communicate complex concepts and describe their business value to non-technical business stakeholders.

This opportunity will suit those willing to be part of a very successful growth story and understand that being part of that story will require hard work and dedication.

Your experience and what you will do:
Work with clients to deliver Analytics solutions that support their strategic business objectives across a variety of Data Science, and Big Data technologies.
Primary accountability for ensuring Velradadelivers exceptional work on all Data Science engagements.
Development using Hadoop/Spark, Pythonand/or R and SQL both in the MS Azure cloud and on-premise.
The ability to visualize the results in Power BI
Work withan exceptional team to deliver high quality Analytics and BI consulting and solution engagements under the guidance of our National Data Science Lead.
Contribute to the development of IPand best practices within Velrada and ensure it remains current with regard to predictive analytics, machine learning and other emerging/maturing tools and approaches, with a specific focus on how these can be applied in our clients’ organizational context to deliver business value.
Provide expertise to clientsand mentoring for more junior resources who are aligned to the Insights and Analytics capability.
Contribute to Velradainternal business planning and organizational development activities as requested.
Preferred Skills:
Recent track record of delivering solutions as a Data Scientist across a variety of industries and projects.
Ability to translate Data Science principles and findings to non-technical client stakeholders.
Experience documenting and defining the non-technical elements of Information Architectures.
Experience working with git.and bash/Linux.
An understanding of statistical theory, frequentistand/or Bayesian paradigms.
Salary is negotiable with a defined career path in place.

Next steps
You can apply via this advert or by contacting the recruitment team on the details provided.
Check out our website for more information and details on our organization then please do have a look at our website – www.velrada.com

Velrada do not accept unsolicited CV’s from recruitment agents."	 - Melbourne VIC	Data ScientistVelrada - Melbourne VIC	Data Scientist
335	"Job Description:About IntellifyIntellify is a data science and machine learning consultancy who helps our customers to increase their growth, operate more efficiently and build competitive advantage. Our team consists of leading data scientists, machine learning engineers and consultants that extensively use advanced (statistical) machine learning and optimisation techniques to create state-of-the-art solutions for business. As an emerging AWS consulting partner, we have the ability to scale our solution to any needs through their cloud platform.About the OpportunityAs we are growing at a rapid speed, we are seeking a senior full-time data scientist/machine learning engineer who has extensive experience in data science, machine learning and/or statistical modelling as well as programming. As part of this role, you will supervise and manage junior data scientists, and work on development to build data science solutions using a combination of the latest technologies and business strategies.With a startup culture and applying cutting-edge technology to real-world business problems, you have the opportunity to drive impact at some of Australia’s leading startups and enterprises as well as to learn and grow within a team of like-minded data scientists. Our client problems have ranged from pricing, inventory and workforce optimisation to computer vision applied to radar data for predictive maintenance. The work is varied and challenging, and will require someone who is dynamic in their thinking as well as willing to explore and try new ideas.Being a senior data scientist at Intellify you are charged with both being a mentor and learning from fellow specialist data scientists in an ever evolving and improving atmosphere. We want to see you thrive professionally and personally as we create a leading data science, machine learning and AI company of the future.What we offerThis is a full-time permanent role. This role will provide a unique opportunity to work in a collaborative team and learn from experienced data scientists, so you can advance your knowledge and get hands-on experience with state-of-the-art machine learning methods. Our salaries are competitive, and we offer flexible working hours. We also believe great data science comes from great teams, so invest continuously in upskilling and cross-training our data scientists, with lunch & learn sessions, training courses and certifications, and an opportunity to be a core part of our data science and machine learning communities. Furthermore, we offer the following:1) 10 x paid days of professional development per year (attend/ speak @ conferences, undertake courses and certifications)2) $2,200 Toolkit allowance to go out and buy your own tech3) Profit sharing4) Work with high-profile clients5) A defined career path with your 1-1 mentor6) Great team culture7) Have an impact in a small team where there is no politics8) Flexible & inclusive work-environment9) Work closely with AWS using cutting edge cloud technologiesRequired Skills: A computer science, robotics, maths, statistics, physics or related degree (graduated Bachelors, MSc, PhD or last year MSc/PhD student)5+ years of applied industry machine learning, optimisation and/or statistics experienceStrong Python or R programming experience and related data science libraries (such as scikit-learn, Pandas, Tensorflow/Keras)Strong SQL database and code versioning (e.g., Git) skillsGood software engineering principlesProject management / team management experienceExperience with data visualisation tools or frameworks i.e. tableau, D3.js, ggplot2 etc.Desirable skills: Knowledge or experience of software engineering practicesKnowledge or experience on time series/product forecasting/recommender systemsKnowledge of deep learning/neural networksExperience working with web development technologiesExperience working with cloud technologies i.e. AWS / Microsoft / Google Cloud.Portfolio evidence of your previous work is appreciated (i.e. blog, github repository, conference presentations etc).How to ApplyIf you wish to take the next step in your career working and learning with the best in an innovative data science company, please click on ""Apply now"" and include:Your CVYour portfolio of projects (eg GitHub, blog site etc)Desired salaryYour availabilityBrief details (3-4 sentences) of either:A machine learning or data science project you have developed or delivered previously; orPrevious team leadership experience, where you worked with a team to deliver a project.We are looking forward to hearing from you.*** STRICTLY NO AGENCIES ***Please note that our Company Policy dictates direct recruitment only.Job Types: Full-time, Part-timeSalary: $120,000.00 to $160,000.00 /yearExperience:machine learning, optimisation and/or statistics: 3 years (Required)"	 - Sydney NSW	Senior Data Scientist/ Machine learning engineerIntellify - Sydney NSW$120,000 - $160,000 a year - Full-time, Part-time	Senior Data Scientist/ Machine learning engineer
336	SparkBeyond has built an AI-powered research engine, capable of finding complex patterns in data by understanding their meaning. Operating at the intersection of Data Science and Artificial Intelligence fields, our Machine Learning technology is so ground-breaking that it’s been referred to as science fiction on multiple occasions. SparkBeyond Discovery Platform is being used by Fortune 500 companies across industries.What will you do?Solve various problems and make a true impact across unlimited domains and industries (Financial Risk, Health, Ecommerce, Marketing, Oil & Gas Exploration and more.).Deliver business value by translating complex data into meaningful insights.Be the face of the company and the product directly interfacing with our partners around the globe.Partner with our customers’ Data Science teams, helping them optimize their use of SparkBeyond’s Discovery Platform.Work directly with our in-house team comprised of the brightest minds in technology, research and mathematics as well as senior interfaces from leading companies across the globe (fortune 500 companies and many others).Use your analytical skills and deep product understanding to consult our partners and provide them with advice and input of the highest quality.What will you need?Significant relevant work experience - Professional work experience on data science and analytics issuesA very strong academic background - PhDs are very welcome, as are quantitative degrees - Math, Physics, Computer Science and the like.Proven experience in handling large scale end to end data science projects and presenting the findings and insights. Building models is great - creating impact is greaterProven experience in translating business challenges into data pipelines & model frameworkExperience with Machine Learning techniques. Supervised, unsupervised, traditional or deep learning - either is great, but you need to know your stuff, both in theory and in practice (e.g., MICE, scikit-learn, keras or weka)Programming skills that allow you to be self-sufficient in handling data. Python and R are our daily companions, and a solid grasp of SQL is always needed. Big bonus points if you know ScalaAlso welcome: Experience with large datasets and distributed computing (Hive/Hadoop, Spark)Willingness to travel. We understand the need for a work-life balance and family time, but the ability to be on location at our clients is regularly required.Why SparkBeyond?Sense of Purpose: We’re building something bigger than ourselves. Our team is building a machine that can help solve the world’s most critical problems. We do this through our Partner engagements and the pro-bono work we are passionate about.Exposure: Help insurers process claims faster. Or pharmaceutical companies improve their quality control. Or, on a pro bono basis, an NGO to upskill underprivileged teenagers. Choose what you will work on and where you will leave your mark.People: We are proud of the brilliant, passionate and engaged team at SparkBeyond, including our very own Gödel and Wolf Prize winner. Our people are our greatest asset and we believe in empowerment, ownership and constant growth.Platform: Our Data Scientists are passionate about our cutting-edge platform and can’t imagine returning to traditional data science.Credibility: We have established ourselves as an industry leader, partnering and making impact for our Fortune 500 clients. See what the market is saying about us:https://venturebeat.com/2016/04/02/deep-learning-will-be-huge-and-heres-who-will-dominate-it/https://www.gartner.com/doc/3311218/cool-vendors-data-science-Job Type: Full-timeSalary: $100,000.00 to $180,000.00 /year	 - Melbourne VIC	Data ScientistSparkBeyond - Melbourne VIC$100,000 - $180,000 a year	Data Scientist
337	"There has never been a more exciting time to be part of Domain Group, a dynamic digital media and technology services business and one of Australia's leading property destinations. We provide property advertising and media online, via mobile, social media and in magazines, and technology services to the real estate industry. The business is experiencing rapid growth in digital revenues and investing in all areas to drive future earnings growth. Domain offers a dynamic and innovative culture at the leading edge of digital media in Australia.
We are looking for a lead data scientist to help sales, product and business leadership make decisions with data, give consumers certainty and control when selling their home with a broad mission and build data science and machine learning products to power the next stage of Domain's growth
As part of the Domain Group, you'll have the opportunity to work across all aspects of our property ecosystem, from listing and agent, to consumer behavior, email, and sales data.
What you'll do:
Build scalable models that analyse and extract information from disparate public sources
Develop and improve machine learning algorithms that drive our data pipeline operation
Leverage advanced statistical modeling to improve domain products
Research and implement the latest advances in the world of data
Proven ability to collaboratively and maturely work on a team
Curious with an aptitude to quickly learn
Experience:
At least 3-5 years of industry experience in data science
2+ years of professional experience with Natural Language Processing and/or Image Processing
Thorough knowledge of machine learning modeling processes
Thorough knowledge of supervised and unsupervised learning algorithms
Thorough knowledge of Natural Language Processing
Experience with implementation of Data Systems
Fluency in UNIX, SQL, Python and/or R
Good software engineering principles
Education/Qualifications:
MS or PhD degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Quantitative Psychology or related field.
Portfolio evidence of previous work is appreciated (i.e. blog, GitHub repository, journal/conference publications etc).
So...what happens next?
Once we've received your application we'll give it the attention it deserves and you'll hear from us either way. If you have the right experience, one of our Recruitment Consultants will give you a call (so make sure you keep your phone handy!) and from there we'll support you through the interview process.

Interested?
Go on then, click apply, we'd love to see your application!

A little note to recruitment agencies: We have a superstar recruitment team who are pretty good at filling our own roles, we know you're great at what you do to, but there's no need to get in touch! :)"	 - Sydney NSW	Lead Data ScientistDomain Group6 reviews - Sydney NSWFull-time, Permanent	Lead Data Scientist
339	"Job Description:About IntellifyIntellify is a data science and machine learning consultancy who helps our customers to increase their growth, operate more efficiently and build competitive advantage. Our team consists of leading data scientists, machine learning engineers and consultants that extensively use advanced (statistical) machine learning and optimisation techniques to create state-of-the-art solutions for business. As an emerging AWS consulting partner, we have the ability to scale our solution to any needs through their cloud platform.About the OpportunityAs we are growing at a rapid speed, we are seeking a senior full-time data scientist/machine learning engineer who has extensive experience in data science, machine learning and/or statistical modelling as well as programming. As part of this role, you will supervise and manage junior data scientists, and work on development to build data science solutions using a combination of the latest technologies and business strategies.With a startup culture and applying cutting-edge technology to real-world business problems, you have the opportunity to drive impact at some of Australia’s leading startups and enterprises as well as to learn and grow within a team of like-minded data scientists. Our client problems have ranged from pricing, inventory and workforce optimisation to computer vision applied to radar data for predictive maintenance. The work is varied and challenging, and will require someone who is dynamic in their thinking as well as willing to explore and try new ideas.Being a senior data scientist at Intellify you are charged with both being a mentor and learning from fellow specialist data scientists in an ever evolving and improving atmosphere. We want to see you thrive professionally and personally as we create a leading data science, machine learning and AI company of the future.What we offerThis is a full-time permanent role. This role will provide a unique opportunity to work in a collaborative team and learn from experienced data scientists, so you can advance your knowledge and get hands-on experience with state-of-the-art machine learning methods. Our salaries are competitive, and we offer flexible working hours. We also believe great data science comes from great teams, so invest continuously in upskilling and cross-training our data scientists, with lunch & learn sessions, training courses and certifications, and an opportunity to be a core part of our data science and machine learning communities. Furthermore, we offer the following:1) 10 x paid days of professional development per year (attend/ speak @ conferences, undertake courses and certifications)2) $2,200 Toolkit allowance to go out and buy your own tech3) Profit sharing4) Work with high-profile clients5) A defined career path with your 1-1 mentor6) Great team culture7) Have an impact in a small team where there is no politics8) Flexible & inclusive work-environment9) Work closely with AWS using cutting edge cloud technologiesRequired Skills: A computer science, robotics, maths, statistics, physics or related degree (graduated Bachelors, MSc, PhD or last year MSc/PhD student)5+ years of applied industry machine learning, optimisation and/or statistics experienceStrong Python or R programming experience and related data science libraries (such as scikit-learn, Pandas, Tensorflow/Keras)Strong SQL database and code versioning (e.g., Git) skillsGood software engineering principlesProject management / team management experienceExperience with data visualisation tools or frameworks i.e. tableau, D3.js, ggplot2 etc.Desirable skills: Knowledge or experience of software engineering practicesKnowledge or experience on time series/product forecasting/recommender systemsKnowledge of deep learning/neural networksExperience working with web development technologiesExperience working with cloud technologies i.e. AWS / Microsoft / Google Cloud.Portfolio evidence of your previous work is appreciated (i.e. blog, github repository, conference presentations etc).How to ApplyIf you wish to take the next step in your career working and learning with the best in an innovative data science company, please click on ""Apply now"" and include:Your CVYour portfolio of projects (eg GitHub, blog site etc)Desired salaryYour availabilityBrief details (3-4 sentences) of either:A machine learning or data science project you have developed or delivered previously; orPrevious team leadership experience, where you worked with a team to deliver a project.We are looking forward to hearing from you.*** STRICTLY NO AGENCIES ***Please note that our Company Policy dictates direct recruitment only.Job Types: Full-time, Part-timeSalary: $120,000.00 to $160,000.00 /yearExperience:machine learning, optimisation and/or statistics: 3 years (Required)"	 - Sydney NSW	Senior Data Scientist/ Machine learning engineerIntellify - Sydney NSW$120,000 - $160,000 a year - Full-time, Part-time	Senior Data Scientist/ Machine learning engineer
340	SparkBeyond has built an AI-powered research engine, capable of finding complex patterns in data by understanding their meaning. Operating at the intersection of Data Science and Artificial Intelligence fields, our Machine Learning technology is so ground-breaking that it’s been referred to as science fiction on multiple occasions. SparkBeyond Discovery Platform is being used by Fortune 500 companies across industries.What will you do?Solve various problems and make a true impact across unlimited domains and industries (Financial Risk, Health, Ecommerce, Marketing, Oil & Gas Exploration and more.).Deliver business value by translating complex data into meaningful insights.Be the face of the company and the product directly interfacing with our partners around the globe.Partner with our customers’ Data Science teams, helping them optimize their use of SparkBeyond’s Discovery Platform.Work directly with our in-house team comprised of the brightest minds in technology, research and mathematics as well as senior interfaces from leading companies across the globe (fortune 500 companies and many others).Use your analytical skills and deep product understanding to consult our partners and provide them with advice and input of the highest quality.What will you need?Significant relevant work experience - Professional work experience on data science and analytics issuesA very strong academic background - PhDs are very welcome, as are quantitative degrees - Math, Physics, Computer Science and the like.Proven experience in handling large scale end to end data science projects and presenting the findings and insights. Building models is great - creating impact is greaterProven experience in translating business challenges into data pipelines & model frameworkExperience with Machine Learning techniques. Supervised, unsupervised, traditional or deep learning - either is great, but you need to know your stuff, both in theory and in practice (e.g., MICE, scikit-learn, keras or weka)Programming skills that allow you to be self-sufficient in handling data. Python and R are our daily companions, and a solid grasp of SQL is always needed. Big bonus points if you know ScalaAlso welcome: Experience with large datasets and distributed computing (Hive/Hadoop, Spark)Willingness to travel. We understand the need for a work-life balance and family time, but the ability to be on location at our clients is regularly required.Why SparkBeyond?Sense of Purpose: We’re building something bigger than ourselves. Our team is building a machine that can help solve the world’s most critical problems. We do this through our Partner engagements and the pro-bono work we are passionate about.Exposure: Help insurers process claims faster. Or pharmaceutical companies improve their quality control. Or, on a pro bono basis, an NGO to upskill underprivileged teenagers. Choose what you will work on and where you will leave your mark.People: We are proud of the brilliant, passionate and engaged team at SparkBeyond, including our very own Gödel and Wolf Prize winner. Our people are our greatest asset and we believe in empowerment, ownership and constant growth.Platform: Our Data Scientists are passionate about our cutting-edge platform and can’t imagine returning to traditional data science.Credibility: We have established ourselves as an industry leader, partnering and making impact for our Fortune 500 clients. See what the market is saying about us:https://venturebeat.com/2016/04/02/deep-learning-will-be-huge-and-heres-who-will-dominate-it/https://www.gartner.com/doc/3311218/cool-vendors-data-science-Job Type: Full-timeSalary: $100,000.00 to $180,000.00 /year	 - Melbourne VIC	Data ScientistSparkBeyond - Melbourne VIC$100,000 - $180,000 a year	Data Scientist
341	Job DescriptionThe candidate is a skilled data scientist who will be building deep learning models for medical image diagnosis applications such as segmentation, localisation and classification of abnormalities.ResponsibilitiesThe candidate will write high quality model with high performance and good memory management, together with state-of-the-art accuracies and embed into our proprietary software. Our aim is to align you with the activities which truly interest you; will stretch you technically; help you grow and impact on billions of patients.RequirementsBachelor / Master / PhD in engineering or computer science or mathematics or physicsKnows computer vision / image segmentation, localization, classificationKnows tensorflow or theano or torchStrong python, C++ or java coderGood knowledge of numpy, pandas, sklearn, scipy, seabornKnows how to build deep learning models like RNN and CNN and other neural network models.May require to relocate to China, Beijing.What We OfferMaster, Teach, Learn – The opportunity to work with, learn from and share knowledge with ultra-smart colleagues in a culture of collaboration and technical excellence. We groom our employees and make sure that they stay at the cutting edge of the technology stack.Impact – Huge potential to make a positive contribution across our business, people and partnersRemuneration – Competitive pay with share award for top performers.We are willing to groom engineers and fresh graduates who don’t have a background in deep learning but are interested to learn. You will also have the opportunity to attend top machine learning conferences like NIPS and ICML.Job Types: Full-time, Permanent	 - Sydney NSW	BioMind Data Scientist/Engineer (Relocate to Beijing)biomind.ai - Sydney NSWFull-time, Permanent	BioMind Data Scientist/Engineer (Relocate to Beijing)
342	"Senior Data Scientist - Northern Suburbs
Big Data Analytics Company

This is an opportunity with the data analytics subsidiary of a large telecommunications organisation. With a deep understanding of telco network data, they have developed innovative advanced data science methods to harvest huge amounts of big data for insights about the population and places they visit. Established in Australia since the beginning of last year, they have access to 1/3 of the population and have used this to monetise the location of people and how they move.

They are now looking for a Senior Data Scientist to perform advanced business and marketing data analytics with the most advanced software tools.

What you'll do
Work with key stakeholders throughout the organisation to identify opportunities for leveraging data to drive business solutions
Develop and/or uses advanced algorithms and statistical predictive models and determines analytical approaches and modelling techniques to evaluate scenarios and potential future outcomes
Use strong programming skills to explore, analyse and interpret large volumes of data in various forms, and solve complex business problems
Demonstrate strong ability to communicate technical concepts and implications to colleagues, managers and stakeholders
What you'll need
5+ years' experience in using mathematics, statistics, modelling, business analysis and technology to transform high volumes of complex data into advanced analytical solutions
Expertise in using R or Python to manipulate large data sets and develop statistical models
Expertise in data management in an Hadoop environment, including use of Hive
Excellent problem solving skills, critical thinking and conceptual thinking abilities
Expert communication skills and stakeholder engagement experience
Please note this role is based in Macquarie Park.

To apply or for further information, please contact Zoe Crouch at Talent International: zoe.crouch@talentinternational.com."	 - New South Wales	Senior Data Scientist - Big Data AnalyticsTalent International6 reviews - New South Wales$145,000 - $155,000 a year	Senior Data Scientist - Big Data Analytics
343	"MediaCom’s Business Science team is seeking an enthusiastic Advanced Analytics & Data Solutions Manager with demonstrated experience in data analysis across a range of industries.
As a data scientist and analyst, you will assist your line manager in the reporting, data manipulation, data collection, aggregation, modelling and overall analysis.

This is an exciting and brand new role within the agency, one that connects data analysis right through to media execution and business operational intelligence and is at the forefront of MediaCom’s offering.
Reporting of the role of Advanced Analytics Director
3 best things about the job:
An enjoyable environment that combines the best of your skills whilst at the same time being part of the largest marketing services group in the world
Working within a network of 100+ analysts worldwide in areas such as statistics, econometrics, optimisation, machine learning, programming, marketing mix modelling, causal analysis, attribution modelling and predictive modelling or forecasting
Work diversity that involves liaising with internal and external stakeholders across a range of disciplines, solving business problems for clients
Measures of success –
In three months, you would have:
You will be up to speed with the Advanced Analytics team value proposition and able to articulate this confidently
You will have started to build relationships with the key decision makers in the team and agency
You will be able to build data sets for modelling related work including data manipulation, data cleansing, and organisation.
In six months, you would have:
You will be providing structured data to your line manager
You will be confident using our available range of tools and software to organise data
You will have started to work on your own allocated projects and ad hoc requests
In 12 months, you would have:
You will have become a key support for your line manager and peers
You will be able to fully work on a project under your line manager’s guidance from start to end including delivery of results
You will become a nominated champion in your area of expertise
Responsibilities of the role:
Using data analysis techniques to identify insights, identify opportunities and solve business problems for clients
Proactively build, clean and manage datasets
Using data analysis techniques to identify insights
Orchestrate automation of tasks to speed up solutions for clients
Keep up to date with advances in marketing analytics
Constantly provide support to your line manager and peers and respond to ad hoc request
Making sure that projects are on track as per deadlines
Engage with other internal MediaCom teams to share knowledge
Build strong relationships with several mid-level clients
What you will need:
3+ years’ experience in data analysis across a range of industries
Exceptional verbal, written, communication skills with an analytical mind set
An excellent work ethic, problem solving and proficient time management skills
Able to work to deadlines in a fast-paced agency environment
Have a passion for learning and work effectively in a team environment
Experience working across either Media, Marketing, Consultancy, Business Analytics
A degree ideally in a STEM related subject
MS Office skills with advance knowledge in Excel and experience with a SQL database
About MediaCom Business Science
With 100+ analysts worldwide, Business Science employs computing and statistical specialists to help clients understand return on marketing investment. With state-of-the-art analytical techniques, we deliver data-driven insights and expose new opportunities for media optimization and growth.
About MediaCom
As the Content + Connections Agency, we believe everything is connected. At MediaCom, our unique approach to planning and buying across Paid, Owned and Earned media optimises our clients’ entire system, not just individual channel silos. ‘Content’ is any form of consumer messaging that connects brands to their consumers, while ‘Connections’ ensures no dead ends or wastage through disconnected content.
We look beyond our own expertise and assess the bigger picture: How do we all play a role within our clients’ broader communications system? Through our uniquely connected eco-system of diverse communications experts working we achieve this - interpreting the bigger picture and fuelling future business success. To learn more, visit us at www.mediacom.com
Australia market overview
As the Content + MediaCom Australia operates in one of the most dynamic and exciting environments in the world. It is one of the biggest domestic media agencies in an industry that is undergoing rapid evolution in the way marketing supports advertisers’ needs. Being in the Asia Pacific market means that aside from the local clients and media owners, we also have a high proportion of multi-national clients and media owners.
As the largest media investment management holding group in Australia with over 31% market share (Recma, 2014) and over 750 employees, GroupM Australia is the premiere organisation to join and develop a career in."	 - Sydney NSW	Mediacom | Advanced Analytics & Data Solutions ManagerMediaCom - Sydney NSW	Mediacom | Advanced Analytics & Data Solutions Manager
344	"My client is an innovative Financial Services giant who are committed to the application of Advanced Analytics and Data Science in order to maintain competitive advantage. As their Data Science function (which is building a reputation for delivering real advantages within the business) continues to grow and I am looking for experienced Data Science & Data Insights hires to join their team.

I am looking for candidates from either a Software Engineering/Machine Learning background or those from either a Data Science or more traditional Statistical/ Predictive Modelling background who have fluent programming skills (Python and R are essential) and typically have strong academics in a relevant discipline (BSc, MSc, PhD Data Science, Statistics, Actuarial, Computer Science et al) and who wish to join a high performing team involved in practically every aspect/business function possible and are regarded as increasingly essential to business improvement.
Alternatively, If you have solid SQL experience and have real expertise on finding, delivering Insights and turning data into meaningful information that can drive real business (strategic or tactical) decisions and genuinely add value then this could be the role for you.
If you are a Data Scientist who could also walk into a high performing Senior Insights role with a Consulting firm (eg, presentation skills, customer engagement, strategy and planning, insights to find opportunities, drive sales etc.) then stop what you are doing and send me your CV !- I need to speak with you immediately : -)
Working with other Data Scientists, specialist 3rd party teams & key stakeholders, your core role will involve the design, development, testing and deployment of analytically focused algorithms designed to solve business problems. Your tool-kit to deliver on this will include methods and techniques such as Data Visualisation, Natural Language Processing, Statistical & Machine Learning Modelling, BigData etc. Working as part of a high performing team you will work as part of a broader cross-functional group of Data Scientists and Engineers, Back-End Engineers, UX experts so the ability to communicate effectively, enjoy the process of having your ideas positively challenged and also looking to improve your peers output is a key component of my clients culture and expectations for you in this role.
This role requires a strong coding focus so it is important that you have fluent programming skills and a strong grasp of computer science/software engineering fundamentals. Working in an Agile environment with a CI philosophy employed you will need to enjoy keeping current with new technologies, tools and methodologies and how they can be practically employed. Alternatively, first class Insights Analyst's will be considered regardless of level of coding although the more the merrier is my clients thoughts on this.
The ability to thrive is an environment where your core focus is complex problem solving on a daily basis is key. Candidates can come from a diverse set of disciplines so what is important is that you can combine Advanced Analytics qualities with software development qualities and have a decent level of commercial and organisational awareness as you apply your Data Science expertise to solve business problems.
This is an exciting time to be joining my client as they continue their growth internationally and continue to innovate in a vast variety of ways (e.g. Self Service Analytics/AI arena. Whilst these roles require first class technical capabilities equally important is the ability to understand business problems, business context, have a grasp of organisational and commercial realities and incorporate effectively all these diverse factors into the analytical features/services and algorithms that you build.
Any candidates with experience in Conversational AI and/or ""Text Analytics and / or Speech Analytics would be at a serious advantage.
My client offers a first class working environment – professional, collegiate and creative all in one. Working alongside some of the finest Data Scientists and Software Engineers anywhere in Australia you can be sure that this role will offer fantastic challenges and opportunities with a real focus on your professional growth. Having a positive attitude towards your own self-development is key.
Ideally I am looking for applications from more Senior candidates (e.g. 5+yrs exp) who can assist with the bigger picture challenges associated with running a high performing product/feature development team although candidates with less experience but who can demonstrate they have the technical and business smarts to succeed in this environment should not hesitate to apply.
In short, this is one of the finest Data Science related opportunities you will see in Sydney in 2018. Strong & innovative leadership, a superb work culture and environment, fabulous opportunities for progression given the company trajectory/ pace of growth & the ability to make a meaningful contribution/have a tangible impact on a day to day basis makes this role seriously not to be missed. Please apply online with an up to date CV/Resume or call Declan on 0452411968 for a confidential discussion."	 - Sydney NSW	Data Scientist, Conversational AI, Western Subs, SydneyinDmand - Sydney NSW$150,000 a year	Data Scientist, Conversational AI, Western Subs, Sydney
345	"Our Client seeks a Data Scientist with Pre Sales or Consulting experience to join their Enterprise Information Management team and work with the Pre Sales division to develop custom built Data models for a range of EIM top tier Clients.

You will be a core member of the customer solution team, analyzing complex customer requirements to provide unique solutions for their Enterprise Information Data.

You will be hands on in developing predictive modeling concepts and optimisation algorithms within complex environments. Provide technical know how to deliver successful solutions to large corporations and government agencies.

Create and build solutions to meet unique customer focused business requirements and insights.

Help develop best practices for implementation projects.

You will possess at least 2 years experience within either an Analytics or Data Science working environment.

Experience in Spark with PySpark, Scala, SparkR specifically and ample experience in Python and R.
Experience working with large, multi-dimensional datasets.
Experience or an interest in Deep Learning, AI and Neural Networks.
Experience creating meaningful data visualisations and exposure to analysing unstructured content.
If this sounds like a role that fits your profile or would like to know more please click APPLY NOW below or email james@counterpointgroup.com.au for more details."	 - Sydney NSW	Data Scientist - Sydney, Spark, Scala, Python, develop custom Machine LearningCounterpoint - Sydney NSW$160,000 a year	Data Scientist - Sydney, Spark, Scala, Python, develop custom Machine Learning
346	"Our Client seeks a Data Scientist with Pre Sales or Consulting experience to join their Enterprise Information Management team and work with the Pre Sales division to develop custom built Data models for a range of EIM top tier Clients.

You will be a core member of the customer solution team, analyzing complex customer requirements to provide unique solutions for their Enterprise Information Data.

You will be hands on in developing predictive modeling concepts and optimisation algorithms within complex environments. Provide technical know how to deliver successful solutions to large corporations and government agencies.

Create and build solutions to meet unique customer focused business requirements and insights.

Help develop best practices for implementation projects.

You will possess at least 2 years experience within either an Analytics or Data Science working environment.

Experience in Spark with PySpark, Scala, SparkR specifically and ample experience in Python and R.
Experience working with large, multi-dimensional datasets.
Experience or an interest in Deep Learning, AI and Neural Networks.
Experience creating meaningful data visualisations and exposure to analysing unstructured content.
If this sounds like a role that fits your profile or would like to know more please click APPLY NOW below or email james@counterpointgroup.com.au for more details."	 - Sydney NSW	Data Scientist - Sydney, permanent, Spark, Scala, Python - pre sales workCounterpoint - Sydney NSW$160,000 a year - Full-time, Permanent	Data Scientist - Sydney, permanent, Spark, Scala, Python - pre sales work
347	"Data Scientist - Machine Learning | Melbourne CBD | Permanent
Exciting opportunity with a leading Australian financial organisation
Chance to work with Machine Learning
Competitive package
About the Company
The client is a leading Australian financial institution based in Melbourne's CBD. They are undergoing an exciting business transformation and are looking for several Data Scientists with Machine Learning experience to join one of their teams.

About the Role
The Data Scientist will be responsible for delivering high-quality analytical solutions as well as data insights, tools and assets.

Required Experience and Knowledge:
Strong experience working with Python, R (C++, Java and Akka) or SAS
Experience in advanced analytic modelling such as supervised/unsupervised machine learning
Experience working with state-of-the-art technology and an in-depth knowledge of machine learning methods
Experience working with SQL and NoSQL data
How to Apply
Click APPLY or contact Zale Stobbs, Big Data, BI & Data Analytics Consultant on (03) 9982 8489 for a confidential discussion."	 - Melbourne VIC	Data Scientist - Machine LearningFourQuarters - Melbourne VIC	Data Scientist - Machine Learning
348	"Technology, Permanent, Sydney
Job Title: Data Scientist

Location: Sydney

Salary: $110,000 - $120,000 plus super

Type: Permanent

Salt have partnered up with one of Australia's fastest growing start-ups and best known brands to hire a Data Scientist for their Sydney team. This is an exciting opportunity to join a global leader and work as part of an extremely talented Data team where you will be able to support their analytics and infrastructure as well as build machine learning solutions.

Responsibilities:
Developing machine learning and other advanced analytical solutions
Mentoring others on best practices regarding data science and machine learning
Researching and scoping out new data science opportunities
Designing and developing machine learning models
Running the data platforms to deliver best in class analysis services

Requirements:
Bachelors degree or higher in the relevant subject area; Data Science, Engineering, Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics or Actuarial (including but not limited to)
3-5 years' of experience working as a Data Scientist commercially
Strong experience in; machine learning, statistical modelling and other advanced analytical methods
Experience interpreting data and extracting insights from predictive and other analytical models
Comfortable using SQL, Python, R etc..

If you are interested in the position and believe yourself to be a good fit based on the description above, please apply and I will be in touch.
Salt is acting as an Employment Agency in relation to this vacancy.

Apply Now
Email your CV to Sam Phillips, or use the application form on this page."	 - Sydney NSW	Data Scientist Sydney, AustraliaSalt Recruitment - Sydney NSW$110,000 - $120,000 a year - Permanent	Data Scientist Sydney, Australia
349	"Company:
The company is a cutting edge cryptocurrency and blockchain technology company and are committed to transforming an entire industry.

They are an excellent team, fun, friendly and are now expanding and are keen to welcome new talent into their company.

This role is based in Sydney.

Responsibilities:
Carry out independent research for forecasting
Own research and experience is desirable, run experiments to explain and evaluate data sets and models and new features.
Collaborate with our programmers to research models and pipeline into a production ready Saas Platform.
You would use your machine learning experience so our own system can learn and clean the data itself. Happy to work with pools of raw data provided by our clients and customers.
Work with other Data Experts and Engineers to develop our in-house data science library and pipeline. API told are essential and you will have a large amount of input from an early stage.

Requirements:
A degree in related discipline e.g. mathematics, economics, computer science etc.
Minimum 2 years commercial experience.
Experience in applying statistical or machine learning approaches to data analysis
Data mining and modelling experience using mainstream methodologies
Outstanding communication skills both written and verbal are essential
Must be able to work autonomously and be self-motivated
Blockchain experience desirable but not necessary

Salary: $100-150k + equity/tokens - dependent on experience and negotiable.


Start date: As soon as possible.


To hear more about this role you can email omar@cryptorecruit.com

Cryptorecruit are the worlds leading specialist recruiter for the blockchain/cryptocurrency industry. We recruit positions from CEO, frontend and backend blockchain developers to marketing and customer service roles. Please browse our website and at www.cryptorecruit.com and make sure to register your details."	 - Melbourne VIC	Data Scientist / Machine Learning (blockchain)Crypto Recruit - Melbourne VIC$100,000 - $150,000 a year	Data Scientist / Machine Learning (blockchain)
350	"Passionate about solving business problems with Data ? Bring that energy here !
Data Science team of 9 embedded in the business
Data Driven Culture
The Business


This Global Bank have a reputation for innovation and excellence, and are down the maturity path in Data, harnessing Big Data & Data Science to solve problems across the organisation and automate Data Science applications within the business.


The Job


Working form state of the Art CBD offices, you will be joining a high performing team of 9 building Data Science Applications.

Solicit Use Cases
Define Business metrics
Feature modelling
Embed solution operationally
In short you will be identifying and solving business problems with predictive analytics.


The person:


Passionate about technology - inspired by exploring and experimenting with the latest innovations to identify cutting edge practices to improve and add capabilities to our ecosystem.
Data expert - experience working in cloud environments. Regular attendee of Data Science or Analytics meet-ups to learn about latest developments from other early adopters and like-minded experts.
Self-starter - Possess initiative to proactively identify and resolve technical issues or opportunities, and relentless and passionate to get an impressive job done.
Mission motivated - knack for finding solutions that reduce team effort and obsessed with streamlining development and operations.



Required technical qualifications:


Master’s Degree in relevant field, such as computer science, applied statistics or mathematics or a related quantitative discipline
Industry experience in large scale data mining and analytics
Experience with data analysis & visualization using tools such as R, Python, Tableau, Alteryx or SAS etc.
Experience implementing supervised and unsupervised machine learning techniques, classification, clustering and collaborative filtering
Ability to track down complex data integration issues, evaluate different algorithmic approaches, and analyse data to solve problems
Comfortable in a fast-paced, agile environment and motivated by complex technical and business challenges
Ability to quickly adapt to new technologies, tools, and techniques


Desired technical qualifications (nice to have):


Financial Services experience
Experience in big data analytics such as Hadoop, Hive, NoSQL etc.
Experience producing and rapidly iterating minimum viable product demonstration/prototype
If you can demonstrate a good capability and passion for data - lets talk.


Apply online to start the conversation"	 - Sydney NSW	Data ScientistHuman Capital Management Australia - Sydney NSWPermanent	Data Scientist
351	"(View All Jobs) ( https://envato.com/careers/ )

( http://www.envato.com/careers/open-jobs )


Work with our friendly and collaborative Data Science team!
Be a vital contributor to the company strategy
Fantastic benefits, flexible hours, Melbourne CBD location

Headquartered in Melbourne, Australia, we're a completely online company with an ecosystem of sites and services to help people get creative. In September 2014, one of our sites, ThemeForest, was the 90th most visited website in the world and it remains among the most visited Australian-owned website on the planet! With more than 350 staff and contractors worldwide, we've helped a community of creative sellers earn more than $500 Million.

JobAdvisor awarded us the title of Australia's Coolest Company for Women and Diversity (2015 and 2016). We were also named as one of the Best Places to Work in Australia in the 2015, 2016, 2017 and 2018 BRW Awards.

On Envato Market thousands of people earn a living selling things like WordPress themes, photos, music tracks and illustrations. With Envato Elements, we oversee one of the world's largest subscription services for digital creatives, providing hundreds of thousands of files for unlimited download for one flat fee. We offer website design and hosting with Envato Sites. On our education platform Tuts+, over 5 million people learn skills including code, illustration, photography, web design, and more, each month. We also run a freelance marketplace called Envato Studio. We've also just acquired Placeit, an awesome logo-building & mockup tool built out of Guadalajara, Mexico!

You might be surprised to know that not only do we run some of the biggest websites in the world, we're also growing really fast!

What you'll be doing

Envato is split into four major business units which support our customers, authors, internal platforms and new ventures. Our data science team is a centralised function sitting within the Platform division, reporting to the Analytics Director. This new and growing area is taking on greenfield work to drive cutting-edge solutions that will make our products more intelligent across everything from customer lifetime value & churn prediction, to personalisation through robust innovations in search & recommendation engines. Data is central to our growth strategy, and as a result, we're scaling quickly in this area.

As a Senior Data Scientist at Envato, you will work closely with senior stakeholders, the Analytics Director, Product Managers, Data Scientists, Engineers and the Business Intelligence unit to analyse data, highlight opportunities for the team. You will play an instrumental role in understanding and predicting customer behaviour through predictive modelling and segmentation, translating outcomes into clear and actionable insights.

You'll be on the hunt to problem solve and identify root causes of positive and negative trends. You will take part in planning and measuring company KPI's, supporting business goals such as churn prevention and optimising customer search. Having the ability to manipulate and analyse large, complex data sets and turning them into actionable business insights will be pivotal to this position. You will also be required to educate and supervise model implementation and adoption, driving our online customer and revenue growth. (YAY!)

What we're looking for


Strong experience working in digital analytics or data science
BA in statistics/math/computer science, or another quantitative field would be an advantage
Experience in building and maintaining customer based models such as LTV, churn and customer segmentation
Experience with search & recommendation engines is highly desirable
Exposure to data mining and machine learning
Extensive knowledge of R and SQL (but we're fairly agnostic so if you love Python or another programming language, we'd still like to hear from you)
Experience with building models from scratch and implementing them across company
Ability to translate problems into definable actions
Experience with big data would be an advantage
Ability to build effective relationships with individuals across all levels of an organisation
Strong demonstrated alignment to Envato's values

What we offer


A fantastic culture of creatively minded, hard working people who are passionate about Envato and being part of its growth and success
Flexible working conditions – we want you to love your work but also your life outside of Envato
We actively work on creating a safe, inclusive environment free from discrimination
A fast paced and progressive environment where everyone has regular interaction with teammates and Envato community members from all over the world!
Read more from our staff about why they love working at Envato by visiting www.jobadvisor.com.au/envato
We're offering a competitive salary package & benefits ($110k-$150k package, but flexible depending on experience)

Who should apply?

We care deeply about diversity and inclusion at Envato, and welcome applicants of all types, and from all backgrounds. If you think you have the skills and experience needed for this role then we'd like to hear from you.

What next?

Submit a cover letter, an up to date copy of your resume and answers to the below questions. Good luck!

( https://envato.com/blog/best-places-work-australia-2016-envatos-17/ ) ( http://inside.envato.com/a-great-place-to-work/ )

( http://www.searchparty.com/blog/coolest-companies-winners-2016/ ) ( http://inside.envato.com/envato-coolest-company-for-women/ ) ( http://blog.jobadvisor.com.au/australia-cool-tech-companies-2015/ ) ( http://www.news.com.au/finance/work/envato-named-australias-coolest-tech-company-in-jobadvisor-competition/story-fnkgbb3b-1227036827879 )

We care about your privacy. By submitting your application you are agreeing to our Privacy Policy. If you're into reading legal documents or you're keen to know more about how we handle your personal information read our Privacy Policy ( http://www.envato.com/privacy ) before you submit your application.
----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------"	 - Melbourne VIC	Senior Data ScientistEnvato6 reviews - Melbourne VIC$110,000 - $150,000 a year	Senior Data Scientist
352	"The Company

Robert Half Technology are working alongside a well reputable and established Insurance organisation in the CBD and we are currently looking for a talented Data Scientist to join our team on a permanent basis. Our client continue to grow across all areas of the business and this role has been created due to the expansion of the division. This role represents an exciting challenge and career opportunity for a Data Scientist to join our forward thinking client.

The Role

The Role of the Data Scientist will have the opportunity to make their mark using data led decision making and modelling to catalyse industry disuption. Aspects of the role include:

Proportion your role with Modelling, Research, Analysism Data Manipulation and Collaboration.

Work as a data expert and a quantitative researcher.

Translate unstructured, complex business problems into practical, powerful algorithmic solutions.

Be part of a highly innovative team working on interesting and difficult problems, leveraging cutting edge technology to build key data products.

Uncover fresh insights from disparate data sources and data mining

Spearheading machine learning projects on data that has never been touched by the organization.

About You

This is a hands-on position where you will be empowered to be very ambitious and bold, to solve challenging problems and have the potential to directly impact the future of the business. The role requires that you have experience in machine learning and data mining.

Your experience and skills should include most, if not all:
Ability to communicate complex quantitative analysis in a clear, precise and actionable manner

Practical experience using contemporary machine learning frameworks such as, scikit-learn, pytorch and tensorflow.

A proven track record in developing, innovating, and applying advanced algorithms to address practical problems and in building new analytical products of commercial value.

Experience in Python and/or R.

Experience in relational databases and SQL

Apply Today

Please send your resume by clicking on the apply button or for further information, contact our Melbourne office."	 - Melbourne VIC	Data Scientist - Market Leader - CBDRobert Half Australia6,897 reviews - Melbourne VIC$110,000 a year - Permanent	Data Scientist - Market Leader - CBD
353	You remember how to roll up your sleeves and craft data joins in SQL, but you've invested time in learning R, and Python is your friend. You know Hadoop isn't the only approach and you're happiest getting behind the GUI into the real data to uncover the stories.Isn't it about time you took advantage of the benefits from all that knowledge?Our client is looking for data polyglots who enjoy solving complex problems; not the kind you can come to with a canned response, the ones where you really need to use your skills.With some of the biggest names in Australia and around the world throwing their most pressing problems at our client they need curious guides - but they only take the best.Getting in isn't easy, but if it was, it wouldn't be the right place for you.Prove yourself and you can build a team behind you to grow your own patch. The opportunities truly are what you make them.With Udemy on tap, and weekly internal led training sessions, you'll be joining a group of like-minded people who are capable of understanding you when you get on your high horse about relevance over recency (or the other way around).Currently our client has four areas of practice, you can join one these and then explain to them what they need to build another:Data & Analytics - BI/DW, Big Data Analytics, Data Engineering, Data Science and Advanced AnalyticsCustomer Engagement - Marketing Campaigns, Campaign Analysis, Customer InsightsDigital - Full stack Development, UI/UX Design, Mobile DevelopmentCloud & Technology - Cloud Services (AWS, Azure, Google Cloud Platform), Managed ServicesWe're not worried about levels at the moment, if you've got the skills there's a place for you.SEO stuff because you know we need to have it in here;Data engineerData scientistData ConsultantJava, Scala, Python, HadoopApache Spark, Kafka, Hive, Airflow, NiFiAWS, Google Cloud Platform or Azure is helpful but not mandatoryJob Types: Full-time, PermanentExperience:data consulting: 3 years (Preferred)	 - Sydney NSW	Software Architect / Tech LeadKloudPPL - Sydney NSWFull-time, Permanent	Software Architect / Tech Lead
354	"There has never been a more exciting time to be part of Domain Group, a dynamic digital media and technology services business and one of Australia's leading property destinations. We provide property advertising and media online, via mobile, social media and in magazines, and technology services to the real estate industry. The business is experiencing rapid growth in digital revenues and investing in all areas to drive future earnings growth. Domain offers a dynamic and innovative culture at the leading edge of digital media in Australia.
We are looking for a lead data scientist to help sales, product and business leadership make decisions with data, give consumers certainty and control when selling their home with a broad mission and build data science and machine learning products to power the next stage of Domain's growth
As part of the Domain Group, you'll have the opportunity to work across all aspects of our property ecosystem, from listing and agent, to consumer behavior, email, and sales data.
What you'll do:
Build scalable models that analyse and extract information from disparate public sources
Develop and improve machine learning algorithms that drive our data pipeline operation
Leverage advanced statistical modeling to improve domain products
Research and implement the latest advances in the world of data
Proven ability to collaboratively and maturely work on a team
Curious with an aptitude to quickly learn
Experience:
At least 3-5 years of industry experience in data science
2+ years of professional experience with Natural Language Processing and/or Image Processing
Thorough knowledge of machine learning modeling processes
Thorough knowledge of supervised and unsupervised learning algorithms
Thorough knowledge of Natural Language Processing
Experience with implementation of Data Systems
Fluency in UNIX, SQL, Python and/or R
Good software engineering principles
Education/Qualifications:
MS or PhD degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Quantitative Psychology or related field.
Portfolio evidence of previous work is appreciated (i.e. blog, GitHub repository, journal/conference publications etc).
So...what happens next?
Once we've received your application we'll give it the attention it deserves and you'll hear from us either way. If you have the right experience, one of our Recruitment Consultants will give you a call (so make sure you keep your phone handy!) and from there we'll support you through the interview process.

Interested?
Go on then, click apply, we'd love to see your application!

A little note to recruitment agencies: We have a superstar recruitment team who are pretty good at filling our own roles, we know you're great at what you do to, but there's no need to get in touch! :)"	 - Sydney NSW	Lead Data ScientistDomain Group6 reviews - Sydney NSWFull-time, Permanent	Lead Data Scientist
356	"There has never been a more exciting time to be part of Domain Group, a dynamic digital media and technology services business and one of Australia's leading property destinations. We provide property advertising and media online, via mobile, social media and in magazines, and technology services to the real estate industry. The business is experiencing rapid growth in digital revenues and investing in all areas to drive future earnings growth. Domain offers a dynamic and innovative culture at the leading edge of digital media in Australia.
We are looking for a lead data scientist to help sales, product and business leadership make decisions with data, give consumers certainty and control when selling their home with a broad mission and build data science and machine learning products to power the next stage of Domain's growth
As part of the Domain Group, you'll have the opportunity to work across all aspects of our property ecosystem, from listing and agent, to consumer behavior, email, and sales data.
What you'll do:
Build scalable models that analyse and extract information from disparate public sources
Develop and improve machine learning algorithms that drive our data pipeline operation
Leverage advanced statistical modeling to improve domain products
Research and implement the latest advances in the world of data
Proven ability to collaboratively and maturely work on a team
Curious with an aptitude to quickly learn
Experience:
At least 3-5 years of industry experience in data science
2+ years of professional experience with Natural Language Processing and/or Image Processing
Thorough knowledge of machine learning modeling processes
Thorough knowledge of supervised and unsupervised learning algorithms
Thorough knowledge of Natural Language Processing
Experience with implementation of Data Systems
Fluency in UNIX, SQL, Python and/or R
Good software engineering principles
Education/Qualifications:
MS or PhD degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Quantitative Psychology or related field.
Portfolio evidence of previous work is appreciated (i.e. blog, GitHub repository, journal/conference publications etc).
So...what happens next?
Once we've received your application we'll give it the attention it deserves and you'll hear from us either way. If you have the right experience, one of our Recruitment Consultants will give you a call (so make sure you keep your phone handy!) and from there we'll support you through the interview process.

Interested?
Go on then, click apply, we'd love to see your application!

A little note to recruitment agencies: We have a superstar recruitment team who are pretty good at filling our own roles, we know you're great at what you do to, but there's no need to get in touch! :)"	 - Sydney NSW	Lead Data ScientistDomain Group6 reviews - Sydney NSWFull-time, Permanent	Lead Data Scientist
357	"Job Description:About IntellifyIntellify is a data science and machine learning consultancy who helps our customers to increase their growth, operate more efficiently and build competitive advantage. Our team consists of leading data scientists, machine learning engineers and consultants that extensively use advanced (statistical) machine learning and optimisation techniques to create state-of-the-art solutions for business. As an emerging AWS consulting partner, we have the ability to scale our solution to any needs through their cloud platform.About the OpportunityAs we are growing at a rapid speed, we are seeking a senior full-time data scientist/machine learning engineer who has extensive experience in data science, machine learning and/or statistical modelling as well as programming. As part of this role, you will supervise and manage junior data scientists, and work on development to build data science solutions using a combination of the latest technologies and business strategies.With a startup culture and applying cutting-edge technology to real-world business problems, you have the opportunity to drive impact at some of Australia’s leading startups and enterprises as well as to learn and grow within a team of like-minded data scientists. Our client problems have ranged from pricing, inventory and workforce optimisation to computer vision applied to radar data for predictive maintenance. The work is varied and challenging, and will require someone who is dynamic in their thinking as well as willing to explore and try new ideas.Being a senior data scientist at Intellify you are charged with both being a mentor and learning from fellow specialist data scientists in an ever evolving and improving atmosphere. We want to see you thrive professionally and personally as we create a leading data science, machine learning and AI company of the future.What we offerThis is a full-time permanent role. This role will provide a unique opportunity to work in a collaborative team and learn from experienced data scientists, so you can advance your knowledge and get hands-on experience with state-of-the-art machine learning methods. Our salaries are competitive, and we offer flexible working hours. We also believe great data science comes from great teams, so invest continuously in upskilling and cross-training our data scientists, with lunch & learn sessions, training courses and certifications, and an opportunity to be a core part of our data science and machine learning communities. Furthermore, we offer the following:1) 10 x paid days of professional development per year (attend/ speak @ conferences, undertake courses and certifications)2) $2,200 Toolkit allowance to go out and buy your own tech3) Profit sharing4) Work with high-profile clients5) A defined career path with your 1-1 mentor6) Great team culture7) Have an impact in a small team where there is no politics8) Flexible & inclusive work-environment9) Work closely with AWS using cutting edge cloud technologiesRequired Skills: A computer science, robotics, maths, statistics, physics or related degree (graduated Bachelors, MSc, PhD or last year MSc/PhD student)5+ years of applied industry machine learning, optimisation and/or statistics experienceStrong Python or R programming experience and related data science libraries (such as scikit-learn, Pandas, Tensorflow/Keras)Strong SQL database and code versioning (e.g., Git) skillsGood software engineering principlesProject management / team management experienceExperience with data visualisation tools or frameworks i.e. tableau, D3.js, ggplot2 etc.Desirable skills: Knowledge or experience of software engineering practicesKnowledge or experience on time series/product forecasting/recommender systemsKnowledge of deep learning/neural networksExperience working with web development technologiesExperience working with cloud technologies i.e. AWS / Microsoft / Google Cloud.Portfolio evidence of your previous work is appreciated (i.e. blog, github repository, conference presentations etc).How to ApplyIf you wish to take the next step in your career working and learning with the best in an innovative data science company, please click on ""Apply now"" and include:Your CVYour portfolio of projects (eg GitHub, blog site etc)Desired salaryYour availabilityBrief details (3-4 sentences) of either:A machine learning or data science project you have developed or delivered previously; orPrevious team leadership experience, where you worked with a team to deliver a project.We are looking forward to hearing from you.*** STRICTLY NO AGENCIES ***Please note that our Company Policy dictates direct recruitment only.Job Types: Full-time, Part-timeSalary: $120,000.00 to $160,000.00 /yearExperience:machine learning, optimisation and/or statistics: 3 years (Required)"	 - Sydney NSW	Senior Data Scientist/ Machine learning engineerIntellify - Sydney NSW$120,000 - $160,000 a year - Full-time, Part-time	Senior Data Scientist/ Machine learning engineer
358	"Deloitte is the world’s largest professional service firm, with one of the largest and most experienced Analytics, Information Management (AIM) & Data Automation practices. We have 400+ specialised consultants in Australia and more than 6,000 practitioners in the Deloitte global network.
With the ever increasing complexity and volume of data, the rise of in-memory, high performance computing, data discovery and visualisation solutions and the convergence of Big Data and Advanced Analytics, organisations are faced with increasing number of choices to ensure they are able to exploit their data assets for maximum advantage. Deloitte is able to draw from its vast global experience delivering complex data driven solutions for our clients across the full spectrum of technology and business domains to provide the right strategic advice to help an organisation respond effectively to these changes – as well as partner with our clients to execute on our recommendations.
About the Role
Do you want to be a part of how we help companies utilise their valuable data resources through effective use of the right technology, backed by a clear vision and strong executive sponsorship? Do you want to be part of an award winning team that provides clients with a visionary, yet balanced and pragmatic approach to automating concepts and tools to improve productivity and performance?
This is an opportunity to harness emerging technologies and analytical methodologies to solve real world problems. You will be part of a close, collaborative team that identifies and builds solutions that are practical as well as visionary, and that make an impact that matters.
We are looking for people who love data and want to solve problems with insight. Whether you call yourself a data scientist, analytics nerd or builder of predictive models. We want to hear from you if you are genuinely passionate about this area and have some applied experience.
You will be responsible for delivering insights through a range of corporate data sources through the application of analytics, data mining, Big Data and real-time decision making techniques and applications using various data management, analytics & data visualization tools.
About You
You’ll bring experience in one or more of the following competencies and enabling technologies
A strong background in applying mathematical and analytics approaches and methodologies to identifying complex relationships in data
Ability to communicate technical requirements and outputs in a clear and concise manner
A structured, logical and solution-oriented design mindset
Ability to work autonomously and with minimal oversight
Ability to demonstrate initiative and ownership in the completion of tasks
A demonstrable interest and passion for exploring new data/analytics concepts, applications and innovations (e.g. Cognitive, Robotics & Automate, AI, IoT etc.)
Some experience using a range of scripting languages – (e.g. Python, R, SQL etc.)
About Us: Deloitte Culture
Join a high performing culture of talented people, who are highly motivated and passionate about delivering impactful analytics solutions and insight. We are innovative and different because YOU are… we pride ourselves on our team of diverse, high performing Deloitte Professionals who are talented, supportive, inclusive and social – and who are at the heart of our success. Our aim is to ensure that all our people feel comfortable to bring their whole selves to work, and as a result, build a workplace that encourages the true spirit of 'And different'.
From day one at our firm you’ll be considered part of the Deloitte community and our development and career progression framework will help you develop the skills and capabilities that will set you up to succeed – in every sense of the word. At Deloitte, we assume that you perform other roles within your life…you could be a student, a teacher, a passionate hobbyist and a caring family member. We recognise the importance of balance and embrace agility, understanding that this means different things to each and every one of our employees.
If you have questions regarding this role, the Talent Acquisition Team is available to have a confidential discussion. Please contact Aditi Aggarwal via the Our Recruiters section on our careers website."	 - Sydney NSW	EXPRESSION OF INTEREST - Data & Analytics - NationalDeloitte7,167 reviews - Sydney NSW	EXPRESSION OF INTEREST - Data & Analytics - National
359	"Joining our team as Digital Utility Data Lead, you will lead the delivery of specialist services and inspire our technical teams to produce products and systems that help us become a vibrant and more progressive utility.

Supporting the Manager Digital Utility to deliver on key digital related projects, you will partner with the business to identify, prioritise and deliver high impact analytical opportunities. Critical in enabling South East Water to leverage big data into tangible improvements, you will maximise benefits to our network and customers through a strategic vision for data analytics and data visualisation.

Your experience in data modelling and analytics, coupled with your understanding of statistical and predictive modelling concepts supported by a relevant tertiary qualification will see you succeed in this role. You will bring a proven ability to be visionary, conceptual and creative, enabling you to have be results focused and deliver. You will enjoy working in a varied role, involving hands on work, business partnering and strategy development.

 Digitial Utility Lead Data Scientist-Data Architect PD.docx

 Appendices to Position Descriptions.pdf

Let your passion flow in a challenging leadership role that contributes to vital community services. Enquires for this position should be directed to Mark McCormack on 03 9552 3600. Applications for this position close on 28 October 2018."	 - Frankston VIC	Digital Utility Lead Data Scientist/Data architectSouth East Water Corporation - Frankston VICFull-time, Permanent	Digital Utility Lead Data Scientist/Data architect
360	"Data Scientist - Machine Learning | Melbourne CBD | Permanent
Exciting opportunity with a leading Australian financial organisation
Chance to work with Machine Learning
Competitive package
About the Company
The client is a leading Australian financial institution based in Melbourne's CBD. They are undergoing an exciting business transformation and are looking for several Data Scientists with Machine Learning experience to join one of their teams.

About the Role
The Data Scientist will be responsible for delivering high-quality analytical solutions as well as data insights, tools and assets.

Required Experience and Knowledge:
Strong experience working with Python, R (C++, Java and Akka) or SAS
Experience in advanced analytic modelling such as supervised/unsupervised machine learning
Experience working with state-of-the-art technology and an in-depth knowledge of machine learning methods
Experience working with SQL and NoSQL data
How to Apply
Click APPLY or contact Zale Stobbs, Big Data, BI & Data Analytics Consultant on (03) 9982 8489 for a confidential discussion."	 - Melbourne VIC	Data Scientist - Machine LearningFourQuarters - Melbourne VIC	Data Scientist - Machine Learning
361	"We are working with an exciting, successful fintech company where machine learning and data science are at the core of their product, growth, profitability and competitive advantage. We are seeking a senior data scientist who has worked in a start-up (or small team) and implemented machine learning algorithms in production environments.

Exposure to building reliable Machine Learning infrastructure/pipelines and optimising models and code working closely alongside machine learning & data engineers is key to this role.

This particular requirement is mandatory as we want someone who has overcome similar challenges and problems and knows how to build products and get things deployed.

From a business acumen and cultural fit perspective, you will be well-acquainted with meeting deadlines under pressure and have the ability to draw the line and ship work that isn’t perfect (then iterate and improve later).


Required skills & experience:

4-5 years of experience in a data science role carrying out modelling and machine learning in a commercial, production environment – preferably a start-up or innovation lab
Strong SQL, R and Python skills – with experience in Linux OS and working to build real products/applications alongside engineers and dev teams
Good stakeholder management skills and pragmatism to identify the correct level of accuracy needed for different priorities and projects.
Insurance or dynamic pricing experience is advantageous but not mandatory
Passion for learning and keeping up to date with both techniques and developments in the fields of Machine Learning and data-related technologies
Spark, Scala, PySpark, Spark-SQL, SparklyR, Java experience would be nice to have.

What makes this role different:

This is an already successful start-up – well beyond the ‘early days’, with large revenue, recognition and already impressive growth in Australia and overseas markets.
Production ready: you have probably been looking for a legitimate, challenging role where your work isn’t shelved or looked at as ‘too hard to implement…’
This is a product-based company and data science is a key competitive advantage for them. Your work is central to their success and this role is due to growth, not catching-up to the market...
They have global scope and you would be working with high calibre peers and founders from Google, Yahoo, etc.
End-to-end work; if successful, you will be involved in the entire lifecycle from conception to build, finetuning, maintenance, productionisation and refinement.

If you are interested in this role, but have not been working on implementing and deploying machine learning models in production yet - please check some of our other openings, which may be more suited to you at this stage of your career.

If you are specifically a machine learning engineer and interested in this company, please email me directly instead of applying for this DS role; patrick@talentinsights.com.au"	 - Sydney NSW	Senior Data Scientist - Production Machine Learning ExperienceTalent Insights Group - Sydney NSW	Senior Data Scientist - Production Machine Learning Experience
362	"Senior Data Scientist
Reference:
BBBH1405
Location:
Surry Hills, New South Wales
Salary:
AU$600.00 - 1000.00
Job Type:
Permanent
Date Posted:
16/10/2018
Senior Data Scientist - Surry Hills, Sydney, Australia

About the company:

One of Australia's leading retail organisations based in Surry Hills is looking for a Data Scientist to lead their huge BI transformation project.

About the Role:

The Purpose of this role is to define and execute the customer data products strategy/road map and deliver projects on time within scope with an in-depth knowledge of big data and cutting-edge data mining techniques as well as the use of predictive, classification and alternate analytic algorithms for modelling and segmentation. It will be your job to:

Lead the design, implementation and testing of customer data products such as personalisation engine, decision engine et.
Ensure quality control and oversight of model outputs within the customer product
Managing both internal and external stakeholders for the successful launch of new product features
Being the single point of contact for all stakeholders to ensure outcomes are delivered and that we deliver value
Develop and maintain state of the art advanced statistical and machine learning models (GLM, Random Forests, GBM, xGBoost, etc) to drive marketing strategies and tactical executions
What you need to succeed:

7 to 10 years' experience developing predictive models in commercial environments, preferably exposure to Sales and Marketing
Proficiency in some of the following statistical techniques: Linear & Logistics Regression, Decision Trees, Random forests, Markov Chains, Support Vector Machines, Neural Networks, Clustering, Principal Component Analysis, Factor Analysis, etc.
Experienced with data analytics products and ideally big data challenges
Experience in developing class-leading algorithms to drive commercial outcomes
Proven commercial experience in statistical and machine learning modelling, with experience manipulating and 'making sense' of big data from disparate systems
Advanced working knowledge of analytical programming: SQL, SAS, R or Python
Experience with SQL essential; exposure to AWS Redshift or Teradata preferred
Exposure to Big Data platforms, such as Hadoop and Spark
Experience in leading and mentoring teams of data scientists
Tertiary qualified in relevant discipline (Statistics, Data Science, Mathematics, Computer Science). PHD Preferred
We have already launched a headhunt drive for this role - if you feel that this is the next step in your career, apply now!!"	 - Surry Hills NSW	Senior Data ScientistFiresoft Consulting - Surry Hills NSW$600 - $1,000 a week - Permanent	Senior Data Scientist
363	"SUMMARY

My client are looking for a Big Data Engineer to work closely with the Head of Data Science. Currently they have an assorted data pipeline where you will the get a chance to build the pipeline from scratch which will scale as the company organically evolves.

RESPONSIBILITIES

Working on optimal data pipeline architecture, assemble large, complex data sets that meet all business requirements.

Build the infrastructure required for optimal extraction, transformation, and loading of data from a wide variety of data sources using SQL and AWS 'big data' technologies.

Build analytics tools that utilize the data pipeline to provide actionable insights into customer acquisition, operational efficiency and other key business performance metrics.

Create data tools for analytics and data scientist team members that assist them in building and optimizing our product into an innovative industry leader.

QUALIFICATIONS
Advanced working SQL knowledge and experience working with relational databases and has a familiarity with a variety of databases.
Experience building and optimizing 'big data' data pipelines, architectures and data sets.
Strong analytic skills related to working with unstructured datasets.
Working knowledge of message queuing, stream processing, and highly scalable 'big data' data stores.
Experience working with cross-functional teams in a collaborative environment.
Experience with big data tools: Hadoop, Spark, Kafka, etc.
Experience with relational SQL and NoSQL databases.
Experience with AWS cloud services
Experience with object-oriented/object function scripting languages: Python, Java, C++, Scala, etc.

To find out more about Progressive Recruitment please visit our website.


Award Winner for:
Best Medium Recruitment Company of the Year by Recruitment International 2018
Training & Development Initiative of the Year by Recruitment International 2018"	 - Sydney Central Business District NSW	Big Data EngineerProgressive Recruitment30 reviews - Sydney Central Business District NSW$140,000 - $150,000 a year - Permanent	Big Data Engineer
364	"Passionate about solving business problems with Data ? Bring that energy here !
Data Science team of 9 embedded in the business
Data Driven Culture
The Business


This Global Bank have a reputation for innovation and excellence, and are down the maturity path in Data, harnessing Big Data & Data Science to solve problems across the organisation and automate Data Science applications within the business.


The Job


Working form state of the Art CBD offices, you will be joining a high performing team of 9 building Data Science Applications.

Solicit Use Cases
Define Business metrics
Feature modelling
Embed solution operationally
In short you will be identifying and solving business problems with predictive analytics.


The person:


Passionate about technology - inspired by exploring and experimenting with the latest innovations to identify cutting edge practices to improve and add capabilities to our ecosystem.
Data expert - experience working in cloud environments. Regular attendee of Data Science or Analytics meet-ups to learn about latest developments from other early adopters and like-minded experts.
Self-starter - Possess initiative to proactively identify and resolve technical issues or opportunities, and relentless and passionate to get an impressive job done.
Mission motivated - knack for finding solutions that reduce team effort and obsessed with streamlining development and operations.



Required technical qualifications:


Master’s Degree in relevant field, such as computer science, applied statistics or mathematics or a related quantitative discipline
Industry experience in large scale data mining and analytics
Experience with data analysis & visualization using tools such as R, Python, Tableau, Alteryx or SAS etc.
Experience implementing supervised and unsupervised machine learning techniques, classification, clustering and collaborative filtering
Ability to track down complex data integration issues, evaluate different algorithmic approaches, and analyse data to solve problems
Comfortable in a fast-paced, agile environment and motivated by complex technical and business challenges
Ability to quickly adapt to new technologies, tools, and techniques


Desired technical qualifications (nice to have):


Financial Services experience
Experience in big data analytics such as Hadoop, Hive, NoSQL etc.
Experience producing and rapidly iterating minimum viable product demonstration/prototype
If you can demonstrate a good capability and passion for data - lets talk.


Apply online to start the conversation"	 - Sydney NSW	Data ScientistHuman Capital Management Australia - Sydney NSWPermanent	Data Scientist
365	"Who is Zip? Join the Zipfam!

Zip is one of Australia’s fastest growing fintechs and the company behind popular products such as zipPay, zipMoney and PocketBook.

We are a dynamic product driven organisation and we like to move fast - we try things, learn, and continually improve our offerings one step at a time.

Over 700,000 customers choose to pay with Zip, and we’re available online and instore at more than 10,000 retailers. Go to www.zip.co to find out more about our products.

We are growing each day, which is why we are currently scaling our award-winning data and analytics team!

What are we looking for?

We are seeking a weaponry Data Scientist who is passionate about numbers, machine learning and the application of analytics to solve real-world business problems.

You will be a hands-on Data Scientist who is not only looking to utilise your analytical skills, but also drive the end-to-end implementation of machine learning algorithms in an operational environment, ingesting data and scoring models through a python programming environment.

What will your day look like at Zip?
Design, development, implementation and continuous improvement of analytical solutions
Customer segmentation models to support greater efficiency of digital marketing activities through advanced personalisation
Next-best-offer testing and experimentation to align consumer demand with partners (merchants) across the Zip ecosystem
Underwriting risk models and application scorecards across the suite of lending products
Behavioral scorecards to manage and mitigate portfolio risk
Risk-based pricing models to profitability assign consumer lines of credit
Natural language processing to improve the accuracy in categorising transaction data
You will use your skills to support a number of functional areas across the Zip and Pocketbook businesses including credit risk analytics, digital marketing and personalisation, fraud detection and operational automation.

It would be ideal if you have:
Tertiary qualifications in a quantitative discipline (E.g. Mathematics, Statistics, Computer Science, Actuarial Studies, Economics)
3-5 years commercial analytics experience from a consumer products environment
Hands-on experience in modelling and the application statistical/machine leaning techniques (E.g. GLMs, XGBOOST, k-means clustering, neural networks, random forests etc.)
Strong exposure to analytical scripting languages, in particular SQL, Python, and R
Good communication and stakeholder management skills
Things we would love to see!
Post-graduate qualification/s (Masters or PhD)
Exposure to Big Data platforms (E.g. AWS) and applications (E.g. Hadoop, Hive, Spark)
Knowledge of credit risk modelling, customer segmentation and/or digital marketing
Previous experience managing/mentoring junior technical staff would be advantageous
A background in retail banking/consumer finance however applicants who have worked in broader consumer product sectors and would like to develop their career working for one of Australia’s fastest growing fintechs, will also be considered.

Why you will want to become a Zipster!
NOW is the best time to join - we are scaling and you will have the chance to really contribute and excel in your career.
We have state of the art offices in the CBD.
Our offices are fitted out with the latest technology and tools, designed with smart spaces to make work more fun!
Flexible working hours and working from home days.
Breakfast is yummy and waiting for you daily.
Loads of social events and Friday drinks.
Staff discounts for Zip products, movie tickets, retail stores and much more.
Chance to win $500 per month.
Friday massages.
Competitive share programme for ALL employees – we ALL share the rewards of working together and building great products.
Regular fundraisers and a a paid leave day every year to undertake voluntary work as Zipcares.
We promote diversity!

And there is so much more, APPLY now and we would love to tell you more about what it's like to become a Zipster at Zip!

We will review all resumes and love to update all candidates about their applications. We appreciate the time it takes to apply for a role and know how it is important it is to stay in touch with top talent!


Recruitment agencies: We would love to get in touch with you, should we require assistance but we do not agree to your engagement terms for any unsolicted resumes sent to the Zip team."	 - Sydney NSW	Data ScientistZip Co Limited - Sydney NSW	Data Scientist
366	"Data Geek Believe and love Big Data Love to think; Love to study; Love to innovate Solid foundation in various data techniques Discover intrinsic natures of users from big data, and analyze user behavior as well as their customized needs. Develop new data attributes of users from existing data source and develop novel applications including data driven products based on that. Develop data models/solutions to solve practical problems based on advanced statistical modeling, data mining, and machine learning methods. Develop innovative approaches to solve problems when classical techniques fail. Collaborate with business partners and apply developed models to business.
Master or PhD degree in Statistics, Computer Science and Mathematics. Solid theoretical foundations in statistics, data mining and machine learning. Affluent practical experience in data modeling (5+ years’ experience preferred). Solid programming skills and proficient in at least one programming language, preferably R Proficient in HiveSQL. Experience with big data and Hadoop is a big plus. Strong business sense with strong data analysis techniques to innovative and practical approaches to complicated business problems. Strong communication and presentation skills. Creative, willing to take on challenges. Team work spirit: honest, diligent, and rigorous."	 - Melbourne VIC	Alibaba Cloud Data Scientist MelbourneAlibaba16 reviews - Melbourne VIC	Alibaba Cloud Data Scientist Melbourne
367	"Technology, Permanent, Sydney
Job Title: Data Scientist

Location: Sydney

Employment Type: Permanent - Full time

Salary: $100,000 - $130,000 package

Additional requirements: Australian Citizens or PR with baseline clearance highly desirable

I am currently working with one of the worlds largest and best branded digital technology consultancies at the moment to help them recruit a handful of Data Scientists into their ranks and help the world's leading brands and governments do more for the people they serve through the power of digital.

You will be part of a passionate team, have a limitless amount of opportunities to grow and learn and have access to a range of career options within the business.

This is a fantastic opportunity for someone that wants to further their career and learn from the best. You will also get the opportunity to work within different industries and experience how different companies use and leverage their data to better serve their customers.

What we're looking for:
People with strong communication skills and the ability to articulate the value of offerings and solutions of advanced analytics
Experience in; Data Modelling, client engagement, statistical modelling
Intermediate to advanced R, SQL, Python, Scala etc..
Strong background in advanced analytics and data science
Hands-on experience using Machine Learning techniques
Experience with predictive analytics and tools
Ability to build strong and lasting business relationships and a reputation in the market

If you are interested in the position and match the skills that I have outlined above, please get in touch with me to discuss after sending your CV in word format.
Salt is acting as an Employment Agency in relation to this vacancy.

Apply Now
Email your CV to Sam Phillips, or use the application form on this page."	 - Sydney NSW	Data Scientist - Consultant Sydney, AustraliaSalt Recruitment - Sydney NSW$100,000 - $130,000 a year - Permanent	Data Scientist - Consultant Sydney, Australia
368	"We are seeking an experienced machine learning engineer / data engineer to join a high performing team in retail – with a focus on building machine learning models into production. This will be your ideal role, if you have previously worked closely with data scientists to bring vital software development, data processing, testing and devops expertise to a data science team or analytics product.

This is a new team, established as the data science and modelling teams are now at the stage where some of their models and solutions require expertise as they start leveraging truly big data available to them. This team have real business use-cases and a track-record of implementing data science to increase customer and sales outcomes.

Requirements:
Assisted modelling/data science teams to transition ML models into production code
Passionate about building maintainable and robust systems, with experience across; data processing, machine learning libraries and big data technologies
Scala / Java, Python, Apache Spark, SQL, Hadoop
Some experience with big/fast data processing systems; Kafka, Flink, Nifi, Kinesis or Spark Streaming
Strong communication skills and fluency with both data scientists and some non-technical stakeholders
Advantageous experience: Spark MLlib, Neo4j, AWS EMR stack, Docker and an interest in functional programming
You will probably have academic background in distributed computing or a mathematical/scientific background.

Why this role is different:

This would be a perfect role for a strong engineer, algorithmic programmer or machine learning specialist who has been working on data platforms in recent years. You will enjoy both being involved in data science and machine learning decisions, alongside the accomplishment with guiding and building production-grade solutions. We are open to people who have hybrid data scientist-data engineering backgrounds.

At this time, we are only able to consider applicants with current Australian work rights.

Please apply via the links or reach out to Patrick Choy at Patrick@TalentInsights.com.au with your CV / Cover Letter."	 - Sydney NSW	Machine Learning Engineer - 6 Month ContractTalent Insights Group - Sydney NSW	Machine Learning Engineer - 6 Month Contract
369	Job DescriptionThe candidate is a skilled data scientist who will be building deep learning models for medical image diagnosis applications such as segmentation, localisation and classification of abnormalities.ResponsibilitiesThe candidate will write high quality model with high performance and good memory management, together with state-of-the-art accuracies and embed into our proprietary software. Our aim is to align you with the activities which truly interest you; will stretch you technically; help you grow and impact on billions of patients.RequirementsBachelor / Master / PhD in engineering or computer science or mathematics or physicsKnows computer vision / image segmentation, localization, classificationKnows tensorflow or theano or torchStrong python, C++ or java coderGood knowledge of numpy, pandas, sklearn, scipy, seabornKnows how to build deep learning models like RNN and CNN and other neural network models.May require to relocate to China, Beijing.What We OfferMaster, Teach, Learn – The opportunity to work with, learn from and share knowledge with ultra-smart colleagues in a culture of collaboration and technical excellence. We groom our employees and make sure that they stay at the cutting edge of the technology stack.Impact – Huge potential to make a positive contribution across our business, people and partnersRemuneration – Competitive pay with share award for top performers.We are willing to groom engineers and fresh graduates who don’t have a background in deep learning but are interested to learn. You will also have the opportunity to attend top machine learning conferences like NIPS and ICML.Job Types: Full-time, Permanent	 - Sydney NSW	BioMind Data Scientist/Engineer (Relocate to Beijing)biomind.ai - Sydney NSWFull-time, Permanent	BioMind Data Scientist/Engineer (Relocate to Beijing)
370	"The role will be focused on stitching together disparate data sources from across the business to enable machine learning and automated reporting and campaigns. Generically, provide a view on business issues/opportunities that cannot be revealed through standard reporting
What’s the role?
Analytics lead on internal strategic marketing projects designed to understand key customer behaviours that drive consumer revenue
Identify new opportunities to improve capability and optimise the business through analytics and modelling
Undertake proactive analysis of customer data processes that produce data driven analysis, reporting, insights and models
Provide data and analytical thought leadership that can be leveraged across the marketing teams
Consistent delivery of data programs that lead to more effective and improved customer experiences
Who are you?
The ability to interpret and convert complex data requests into prescriptive and actionable insights for a non-analytical audience.
Proactivity delivering data driven insights and recommendations
Senior stakeholder engagement and strong presentation skills
Must be advanced multi-lingual across various software languages (SQL, Python, R, SAS)
What’s in it for you?
Supportive and friendly environment. We encourage innovation, collaboration and creative thinking. Fun, fast-paced and excellent opportunities for growth and development.
Lucrative salary
Flexible working arrangements
Discounted health care
Employee discount with multiple brands including BMW, Qantas, Apple, Samsung etc
Work with some of Australia's most recognised and prestigious brands
On-site gym and wellbeing centre

Who are we?
We are Australia’s number one and most influential media organisation with more than 150 prestige brands across news, sport and lifestyle. Each month more than 17 million Australians choose to consume news and information from our digital and print products – more than any other media group in Australia.
Where do I sign?
Apply now or for more information on careers at News Corp Australia visit www.newscorpaustralia.com/careers"	 - Sydney Central Business District NSW	Data ScientistNews Corp Australia66 reviews - Sydney Central Business District NSWPermanent	Data Scientist
371	You remember how to roll up your sleeves and craft data joins in SQL, but you've invested time in learning R, and Python is your friend. You know Hadoop isn't the only approach and you're happiest getting behind the GUI into the real data to uncover the stories.Isn't it about time you took advantage of the benefits from all that knowledge?Our client is looking for data polyglots who enjoy solving complex problems; not the kind you can come to with a canned response, the ones where you really need to use your skills.With some of the biggest names in Australia and around the world throwing their most pressing problems at our client they need curious guides - but they only take the best.Getting in isn't easy, but if it was, it wouldn't be the right place for you.Prove yourself and you can build a team behind you to grow your own patch. The opportunities truly are what you make them.With Udemy on tap, and weekly internal led training sessions, you'll be joining a group of like-minded people who are capable of understanding you when you get on your high horse about relevance over recency (or the other way around).Currently our client has four areas of practice, you can join one these and then explain to them what they need to build another:Data & Analytics - BI/DW, Big Data Analytics, Data Engineering, Data Science and Advanced AnalyticsCustomer Engagement - Marketing Campaigns, Campaign Analysis, Customer InsightsDigital - Full stack Development, UI/UX Design, Mobile DevelopmentCloud & Technology - Cloud Services (AWS, Azure, Google Cloud Platform), Managed ServicesWe're not worried about levels at the moment, if you've got the skills there's a place for you.SEO stuff because you know we need to have it in here;Data engineerData scientistData ConsultantJava, Scala, Python, HadoopApache Spark, Kafka, Hive, Airflow, NiFiAWS, Google Cloud Platform or Azure is helpful but not mandatoryJob Types: Full-time, PermanentExperience:data consulting: 3 years (Preferred)	 - Sydney NSW	Software Architect / Tech LeadKloudPPL - Sydney NSWFull-time, Permanent	Software Architect / Tech Lead
373	"Job Description:About IntellifyIntellify is a data science and machine learning consultancy who helps our customers to increase their growth, operate more efficiently and build competitive advantage. Our team consists of leading data scientists, machine learning engineers and consultants that extensively use advanced (statistical) machine learning and optimisation techniques to create state-of-the-art solutions for business. As an emerging AWS consulting partner, we have the ability to scale our solution to any needs through their cloud platform.About the OpportunityAs we are growing at a rapid speed, we are seeking a senior full-time data scientist/machine learning engineer who has extensive experience in data science, machine learning and/or statistical modelling as well as programming. As part of this role, you will supervise and manage junior data scientists, and work on development to build data science solutions using a combination of the latest technologies and business strategies.With a startup culture and applying cutting-edge technology to real-world business problems, you have the opportunity to drive impact at some of Australia’s leading startups and enterprises as well as to learn and grow within a team of like-minded data scientists. Our client problems have ranged from pricing, inventory and workforce optimisation to computer vision applied to radar data for predictive maintenance. The work is varied and challenging, and will require someone who is dynamic in their thinking as well as willing to explore and try new ideas.Being a senior data scientist at Intellify you are charged with both being a mentor and learning from fellow specialist data scientists in an ever evolving and improving atmosphere. We want to see you thrive professionally and personally as we create a leading data science, machine learning and AI company of the future.What we offerThis is a full-time permanent role. This role will provide a unique opportunity to work in a collaborative team and learn from experienced data scientists, so you can advance your knowledge and get hands-on experience with state-of-the-art machine learning methods. Our salaries are competitive, and we offer flexible working hours. We also believe great data science comes from great teams, so invest continuously in upskilling and cross-training our data scientists, with lunch & learn sessions, training courses and certifications, and an opportunity to be a core part of our data science and machine learning communities. Furthermore, we offer the following:1) 10 x paid days of professional development per year (attend/ speak @ conferences, undertake courses and certifications)2) $2,200 Toolkit allowance to go out and buy your own tech3) Profit sharing4) Work with high-profile clients5) A defined career path with your 1-1 mentor6) Great team culture7) Have an impact in a small team where there is no politics8) Flexible & inclusive work-environment9) Work closely with AWS using cutting edge cloud technologiesRequired Skills: A computer science, robotics, maths, statistics, physics or related degree (graduated Bachelors, MSc, PhD or last year MSc/PhD student)5+ years of applied industry machine learning, optimisation and/or statistics experienceStrong Python or R programming experience and related data science libraries (such as scikit-learn, Pandas, Tensorflow/Keras)Strong SQL database and code versioning (e.g., Git) skillsGood software engineering principlesProject management / team management experienceExperience with data visualisation tools or frameworks i.e. tableau, D3.js, ggplot2 etc.Desirable skills: Knowledge or experience of software engineering practicesKnowledge or experience on time series/product forecasting/recommender systemsKnowledge of deep learning/neural networksExperience working with web development technologiesExperience working with cloud technologies i.e. AWS / Microsoft / Google Cloud.Portfolio evidence of your previous work is appreciated (i.e. blog, github repository, conference presentations etc).How to ApplyIf you wish to take the next step in your career working and learning with the best in an innovative data science company, please click on ""Apply now"" and include:Your CVYour portfolio of projects (eg GitHub, blog site etc)Desired salaryYour availabilityBrief details (3-4 sentences) of either:A machine learning or data science project you have developed or delivered previously; orPrevious team leadership experience, where you worked with a team to deliver a project.We are looking forward to hearing from you.*** STRICTLY NO AGENCIES ***Please note that our Company Policy dictates direct recruitment only.Job Types: Full-time, Part-timeSalary: $120,000.00 to $160,000.00 /yearExperience:machine learning, optimisation and/or statistics: 3 years (Required)"	 - Sydney NSW	Senior Data Scientist/ Machine learning engineerIntellify - Sydney NSW$120,000 - $160,000 a year - Full-time, Part-time	Senior Data Scientist/ Machine learning engineer
374	"Deloitte is the world’s largest professional service firm, with one of the largest and most experienced Analytics, Information Management (AIM) & Data Automation practices. We have 400+ specialised consultants in Australia and more than 6,000 practitioners in the Deloitte global network.
With the ever increasing complexity and volume of data, the rise of in-memory, high performance computing, data discovery and visualisation solutions and the convergence of Big Data and Advanced Analytics, organisations are faced with increasing number of choices to ensure they are able to exploit their data assets for maximum advantage. Deloitte is able to draw from its vast global experience delivering complex data driven solutions for our clients across the full spectrum of technology and business domains to provide the right strategic advice to help an organisation respond effectively to these changes – as well as partner with our clients to execute on our recommendations.
About the Role
Do you want to be a part of how we help companies utilise their valuable data resources through effective use of the right technology, backed by a clear vision and strong executive sponsorship? Do you want to be part of an award winning team that provides clients with a visionary, yet balanced and pragmatic approach to automating concepts and tools to improve productivity and performance?
This is an opportunity to harness emerging technologies and analytical methodologies to solve real world problems. You will be part of a close, collaborative team that identifies and builds solutions that are practical as well as visionary, and that make an impact that matters.
We are looking for people who love data and want to solve problems with insight. Whether you call yourself a data scientist, analytics nerd or builder of predictive models. We want to hear from you if you are genuinely passionate about this area and have some applied experience.
You will be responsible for delivering insights through a range of corporate data sources through the application of analytics, data mining, Big Data and real-time decision making techniques and applications using various data management, analytics & data visualization tools.
About You
You’ll bring experience in one or more of the following competencies and enabling technologies
A strong background in applying mathematical and analytics approaches and methodologies to identifying complex relationships in data
Ability to communicate technical requirements and outputs in a clear and concise manner
A structured, logical and solution-oriented design mindset
Ability to work autonomously and with minimal oversight
Ability to demonstrate initiative and ownership in the completion of tasks
A demonstrable interest and passion for exploring new data/analytics concepts, applications and innovations (e.g. Cognitive, Robotics & Automate, AI, IoT etc.)
Some experience using a range of scripting languages – (e.g. Python, R, SQL etc.)
About Us: Deloitte Culture
Join a high performing culture of talented people, who are highly motivated and passionate about delivering impactful analytics solutions and insight. We are innovative and different because YOU are… we pride ourselves on our team of diverse, high performing Deloitte Professionals who are talented, supportive, inclusive and social – and who are at the heart of our success. Our aim is to ensure that all our people feel comfortable to bring their whole selves to work, and as a result, build a workplace that encourages the true spirit of 'And different'.
From day one at our firm you’ll be considered part of the Deloitte community and our development and career progression framework will help you develop the skills and capabilities that will set you up to succeed – in every sense of the word. At Deloitte, we assume that you perform other roles within your life…you could be a student, a teacher, a passionate hobbyist and a caring family member. We recognise the importance of balance and embrace agility, understanding that this means different things to each and every one of our employees.
If you have questions regarding this role, the Talent Acquisition Team is available to have a confidential discussion. Please contact Aditi Aggarwal via the Our Recruiters section on our careers website."	 - Sydney NSW	EXPRESSION OF INTEREST - Data & Analytics - NationalDeloitte7,167 reviews - Sydney NSW	EXPRESSION OF INTEREST - Data & Analytics - National
375	You remember how to roll up your sleeves and craft data joins in SQL, but you've invested time in learning R, and Python is your friend. You know Hadoop isn't the only approach and you're happiest getting behind the GUI into the real data to uncover the stories.Isn't it about time you took advantage of the benefits from all that knowledge?Our client is looking for data polyglots who enjoy solving complex problems; not the kind you can come to with a canned response, the ones where you really need to use your skills.With some of the biggest names in Australia and around the world throwing their most pressing problems at our client they need curious guides - but they only take the best.Getting in isn't easy, but if it was, it wouldn't be the right place for you.Prove yourself and you can build a team behind you to grow your own patch. The opportunities truly are what you make them.With Udemy on tap, and weekly internal led training sessions, you'll be joining a group of like-minded people who are capable of understanding you when you get on your high horse about relevance over recency (or the other way around).Currently our client has four areas of practice, you can join one these and then explain to them what they need to build another:Data & Analytics - BI/DW, Big Data Analytics, Data Engineering, Data Science and Advanced AnalyticsCustomer Engagement - Marketing Campaigns, Campaign Analysis, Customer InsightsDigital - Full stack Development, UI/UX Design, Mobile DevelopmentCloud & Technology - Cloud Services (AWS, Azure, Google Cloud Platform), Managed ServicesWe're not worried about levels at the moment, if you've got the skills there's a place for you.SEO stuff because you know we need to have it in here;Data engineerData scientistData ConsultantJava, Scala, Python, HadoopApache Spark, Kafka, Hive, Airflow, NiFiAWS, Google Cloud Platform or Azure is helpful but not mandatoryJob Types: Full-time, PermanentExperience:data consulting: 3 years (Preferred)	 - Sydney NSW	Software Architect / Tech LeadKloudPPL - Sydney NSWFull-time, Permanent	Software Architect / Tech Lead
376	"Senior Data Scientist
Reference:
BBBH1405
Location:
Surry Hills, New South Wales
Salary:
AU$600.00 - 1000.00
Job Type:
Permanent
Date Posted:
16/10/2018
Senior Data Scientist - Surry Hills, Sydney, Australia

About the company:

One of Australia's leading retail organisations based in Surry Hills is looking for a Data Scientist to lead their huge BI transformation project.

About the Role:

The Purpose of this role is to define and execute the customer data products strategy/road map and deliver projects on time within scope with an in-depth knowledge of big data and cutting-edge data mining techniques as well as the use of predictive, classification and alternate analytic algorithms for modelling and segmentation. It will be your job to:

Lead the design, implementation and testing of customer data products such as personalisation engine, decision engine et.
Ensure quality control and oversight of model outputs within the customer product
Managing both internal and external stakeholders for the successful launch of new product features
Being the single point of contact for all stakeholders to ensure outcomes are delivered and that we deliver value
Develop and maintain state of the art advanced statistical and machine learning models (GLM, Random Forests, GBM, xGBoost, etc) to drive marketing strategies and tactical executions
What you need to succeed:

7 to 10 years' experience developing predictive models in commercial environments, preferably exposure to Sales and Marketing
Proficiency in some of the following statistical techniques: Linear & Logistics Regression, Decision Trees, Random forests, Markov Chains, Support Vector Machines, Neural Networks, Clustering, Principal Component Analysis, Factor Analysis, etc.
Experienced with data analytics products and ideally big data challenges
Experience in developing class-leading algorithms to drive commercial outcomes
Proven commercial experience in statistical and machine learning modelling, with experience manipulating and 'making sense' of big data from disparate systems
Advanced working knowledge of analytical programming: SQL, SAS, R or Python
Experience with SQL essential; exposure to AWS Redshift or Teradata preferred
Exposure to Big Data platforms, such as Hadoop and Spark
Experience in leading and mentoring teams of data scientists
Tertiary qualified in relevant discipline (Statistics, Data Science, Mathematics, Computer Science). PHD Preferred
We have already launched a headhunt drive for this role - if you feel that this is the next step in your career, apply now!!"	 - Surry Hills NSW	Senior Data ScientistFiresoft Consulting - Surry Hills NSW$600 - $1,000 a week - Permanent	Senior Data Scientist
377	"Who is Zip? Join the Zipfam!

Zip is one of Australia’s fastest growing fintechs and the company behind popular products such as zipPay, zipMoney and PocketBook.

We are a dynamic product driven organisation and we like to move fast - we try things, learn, and continually improve our offerings one step at a time.

Over 700,000 customers choose to pay with Zip, and we’re available online and instore at more than 10,000 retailers. Go to www.zip.co to find out more about our products.

We are growing each day, which is why we are currently scaling our award-winning data and analytics team!

What are we looking for?

We are seeking a weaponry Data Scientist who is passionate about numbers, machine learning and the application of analytics to solve real-world business problems.

You will be a hands-on Data Scientist who is not only looking to utilise your analytical skills, but also drive the end-to-end implementation of machine learning algorithms in an operational environment, ingesting data and scoring models through a python programming environment.

What will your day look like at Zip?
Design, development, implementation and continuous improvement of analytical solutions
Customer segmentation models to support greater efficiency of digital marketing activities through advanced personalisation
Next-best-offer testing and experimentation to align consumer demand with partners (merchants) across the Zip ecosystem
Underwriting risk models and application scorecards across the suite of lending products
Behavioral scorecards to manage and mitigate portfolio risk
Risk-based pricing models to profitability assign consumer lines of credit
Natural language processing to improve the accuracy in categorising transaction data
You will use your skills to support a number of functional areas across the Zip and Pocketbook businesses including credit risk analytics, digital marketing and personalisation, fraud detection and operational automation.

It would be ideal if you have:
Tertiary qualifications in a quantitative discipline (E.g. Mathematics, Statistics, Computer Science, Actuarial Studies, Economics)
3-5 years commercial analytics experience from a consumer products environment
Hands-on experience in modelling and the application statistical/machine leaning techniques (E.g. GLMs, XGBOOST, k-means clustering, neural networks, random forests etc.)
Strong exposure to analytical scripting languages, in particular SQL, Python, and R
Good communication and stakeholder management skills
Things we would love to see!
Post-graduate qualification/s (Masters or PhD)
Exposure to Big Data platforms (E.g. AWS) and applications (E.g. Hadoop, Hive, Spark)
Knowledge of credit risk modelling, customer segmentation and/or digital marketing
Previous experience managing/mentoring junior technical staff would be advantageous
A background in retail banking/consumer finance however applicants who have worked in broader consumer product sectors and would like to develop their career working for one of Australia’s fastest growing fintechs, will also be considered.

Why you will want to become a Zipster!
NOW is the best time to join - we are scaling and you will have the chance to really contribute and excel in your career.
We have state of the art offices in the CBD.
Our offices are fitted out with the latest technology and tools, designed with smart spaces to make work more fun!
Flexible working hours and working from home days.
Breakfast is yummy and waiting for you daily.
Loads of social events and Friday drinks.
Staff discounts for Zip products, movie tickets, retail stores and much more.
Chance to win $500 per month.
Friday massages.
Competitive share programme for ALL employees – we ALL share the rewards of working together and building great products.
Regular fundraisers and a a paid leave day every year to undertake voluntary work as Zipcares.
We promote diversity!

And there is so much more, APPLY now and we would love to tell you more about what it's like to become a Zipster at Zip!

We will review all resumes and love to update all candidates about their applications. We appreciate the time it takes to apply for a role and know how it is important it is to stay in touch with top talent!


Recruitment agencies: We would love to get in touch with you, should we require assistance but we do not agree to your engagement terms for any unsolicted resumes sent to the Zip team."	 - Sydney NSW	Data ScientistZip Co Limited - Sydney NSW	Data Scientist
378	"About our Client:

My client is global leader in technology and Big Data Analytics with operations in over 20 countries. They are looking to grow their Data Science capability with in their Perth Office.

The Role:
A Data Scientist with strong development capability is needed to join a market leading Data Engineering team, building enterprise level market leading Data Solutions.

They are looking for people who are passionate about Data Science and Machine Learning who have hands on experience in Statistical Techniques, Algorithm & Deep Learning such as Decision Tree, Segmentation, Logistic and Multiple Regression.

You will be the master of your own destiny within this organisation. My client is looking for future business leaders and will invest heavily to develop you into a market leading data scientist.

Experience:
Proven experience as a hands-on data scientist, formulating and delivering strategy and data solutions;5-7 years of Data Analytics experience in commercial environments.Strong data modelling skills by utilizing Machine Learning and Data ScienceExperience working with programming language (e.g. R, Python). Desirable to have knowledge of MongoDB and NoSQLDemonstrated experience in the use of data science and analytics capability to enhance business decision making.Experience with data visualization tools, such as Tableau and zoho.Using analytics finding to select key features relevant for building analytic systems/machine learning models.

About You:

With both permanent and contract positions available we encourage candidates with skills in the above area to contact the team at Hydrogen for confidential discussions. We are seeking intellectually capable, personable and change driven individuals who want to be part of a market leading consulting organisation. First class communication skills in both the written and verbal form will be required.

What's on offer?

The opportunity to work with world class thought leaders in the digital transformation, Big data, Data science, RPA and AI space. International and local career progression.

Competitive salaries depending on experience (roles range from $120,000 + super – 150,000 + super and bonus).

 #LI-MP3 #LI-96"	 - Perth WA	Data ScientistHydrogen Group6 reviews - Perth WA$120,000 a year - Permanent	Data Scientist
379	"Work for Financial services employer of choice
Proven skills from Financial Services
Up to $850 a day plus super
6 month role on offer with an attractive rate which can offer you the chance to gain skills in a large scale and complex environment working with some of the best in the business.

In short come join them. Learn and grow!

A well known and market leading organisation has partnered with us to source a skilled Data Scientist / Data Analyst to work directly for the Analytics team that will allow the area to continue developing its data capability.

For this to be a success a number of plans are in the pipeline and will include:

Lead generation incorporating pre and post campaign analysis work and direct interaction with key technical business stakeholders
A new Governance framework to be rolled out
Overall targeted business analytics



To be successful once you feel comfortable assisting and driving the above you r resume will need to clearly illustrate data cleansing and building datasets

Working directly with the business
The usual Data science experience including Machine Learning, Linear and non linear programming, random forest as well as R/Python
As always the ability to illustrate technical terms to non technical stakeholders is a must to ensure success for all
Financial Services experience



This is initially a 6 month role but there is an expectation for this to extend so please only those will full and unrestricted working rights need apply!



Experis ANZ is parent to a portfolio of brands; Greythorn, Safesearch, Marks Sattin, GT-X and Global Attract. These brands make up our core specialisations for Technology & Digital, Accounting & Finance, Engineering and Workplace Health, Safety and Environment. When you apply for this opportunity you will be directed to the parent website www.experis.com.au to lodge your application. Experis is part of the ManpowerGroup, a global leader in offering end to end workforce solutions.

If you're curious and willing to have a conversation about this role, please pick up the phone and speak with our recruitment specialist below. Even if this doesn't sound like the right role for you, we encourage you to join our talent community so your skill set can be the first considered when another opportunity arises. Click register on our website www.experis.com.au.




Rebecca Ward
Technology & Digital
Resource Recruitment Associate
Let's Connect
https://www.linkedin.com/in/rebecca-ward-0b41b6120/
+61 2 9249 8041"	 - Sydney NSW	Data Scientist/AnalystGreythorn6 reviews - Sydney NSW$850 a day - Temporary, Contract	Data Scientist/Analyst
380	"Exciting data-sets
Leading Melbourne data science team
Greenfield projects
Work with one of Melbourne's most renowned Data Science teams to analyse and decipher exciting data-sets
Collaborate with one of Melbournes most respected Data Science teams deciphering huge unstructured Data Sets and creating value organisation-wide!

Due to recent growth within the Data Science team a key player within consulting is looking to add 1 more Data Scientist to their team to begin work on some excitin greenfield projects.

What You'll Do:

Design, develop, and implement creative quality assurance tests that validate source data and production output
Develop efficient, workable production solutions that perform prescribed research methods and business rules
Apply statistical analyses, machine learning, and data visualisation techniques
Partner with developers, statisticians, and product managers to deliver timely, high-quality product data
Support statistical teams that research and evaluate new methods
What's in it for you?

Excellent rates of pay
Work on some of Melbourne's most exciting Data Science projects
Be part of a collaborative and innovative company
Opportunity convert to a permanent role after 6 months.
What You'll Need:

Experience with machine learning algorithms (XG-Boost, Gradient Boosting, Random Forest, Linear Modelling, Neural Networks, K-Means Clustering, Decision Trees)
Big Data Analytics experience - Spark & Scala (predominantly on semi-structured / unstructured data sets - e.g. Adobe)
Proven success managing critical processes and teams in a fast-paced business environment with competing priorities, vague requirements, and rapid iterations
Strong software development skills and expertise designing efficient SQL queries of big data
Excellent verbal and written communication skills
Bachelors degree in a quantitative subject such as Statistics, Operations Research, Engineering or Computer Science
Preferred: Familiarity with JIRA and Git Experience with Hadoop or other comparable distributed file systems Ability to develop advanced analytical solutions in Python or Spark. Knowledge of statistical software (ideally, R) or scientific computation software Experience conducting research and analytics with digital or TV audience data
If you feel the above is the next step you'd like to take in your career, APPLY NOW!

Only successful candidates will be contacted.
Experis ANZ is parent to a portfolio of brands; Greythorn, Safesearch, Marks Sattin, GT-X and Global Attract. These brands make up our core specialisations for Technology & Digital, Accounting & Finance, Engineering and Workplace Health, Safety and Environment. When you apply for this opportunity you will be directed to the parent website www.experis.com.au to lodge your application. Experis is part of the ManpowerGroup, a global leader in offering end to end workforce solutions.

If you're curious and willing to have a conversation about this role, please pick up the phone and speak with our recruitment specialist below. Even if this doesn't sound like the right role for you, we encourage you to join our talent community so your skill set can be the first considered when another opportunity arises. Click register on our website www.experis.com.au.
Tom Bull
Data Science
Recruitment Consultant
+61 3 9604 4209"	 - Melbourne VIC	Data Scientist - 12 month contractGreythorn6 reviews - Melbourne VICTemporary, Contract	Data Scientist - 12 month contract
381	"We are a diverse team of world-leading researchers, doctors, engineers, and enthusiastic professionals in corporate and scientific services (communications, IT, HR and financial experts to name a few!) from all corners of the world with one shared goal - to transform child health worldwide.
We have access to amazing facilities and technologies. We work with “rock stars of medical research” and we collaborate with countries all over the world for one purpose: We want all children to have the opportunity to live a healthy and fulfilled life.
What is it like to work for us?
We are a very diverse and inclusive organisation and we are inspired by people who are resourceful, imaginative, self-motivated, energised by making the world better, and who believe in the benefit of collective effort. Working here is interesting, challenging and rewarding. Our people are our biggest asset and we have a vast range of benefits to support them:
Salary packaging
Yoga, Pilates & Mindfulness sessions
On-site gym
Employee Assistance Program


About the Opportunity?
Biostatistician (Research Assistant)

We currently require a Full Time Biostatistician (Research Assistant) on a 12 month contract (which may extend beyond the initial term, depending on organisational requirements) to join the Clinical Epidemiology & Biostatistics team (CEBU).
We are seeking to recruit a junior biostatistician/data scientist to contribute across a wide range of biostatistical work, providing support in data processing and statistical analysis under supervision to a range of projects across CEBU’s diverse work program. The role will require strong statistical computing skills, including good programming practices, as well as strong communication skills and interest in engaging actively in a range of problems and learning about new statistical methods. There will also be an opportunity for the candidate to gain experience in methodological research into methods for handling missing data. The position reports to two senior CEBU statisticians.
Responsibilities:
Perform data processing and statistical analysis under supervision of more experienced analysts.
Assist in the preparation of material, including graphical and tabular presentations, for peer-review manuscripts, reports, meetings, publications and seminars as appropriate.
Contribute to CEBU’s teaching program, for example by participating in the delivery of computer-based training courses (Stata, R).
Provide advice and assistance where appropriate on questionnaire design, data management, statistical computing including good programming practice, and methods of analysis to researchers.
Learning about statistical methods for life-course epidemiology and for handling missing data.
Other duties as required from time to time, consistent with the skills and abilities of the employee.


Key Selection Criteria
To be successful in this role you will have:
Essential:
A degree, preferably at Masters level or higher, in statistics or biostatistics or closely related field.
Good understanding of the principles of common statistical methods (e.g. regression analysis).
Familiarity with the Stata statistical package (or demonstrable capacity to develop this quickly).
Strong communication skills including the ability to work across diverse multidisciplinary teams.
Ability to read about and learn new statistical methodology.
Working with Children & National Police Clearance (if appointed) in compliance with the Victorian Governments Child Safety Standards.


Desirable:
Familiarity with data analysis in health and medical research.
Experience with applying statistical methods in clinical and health research.
Skills in data management, cleaning and data processing for research studies, with good programming skills in a statistical software package.


Only applicants who address the key selection criteria will be considered. Please place your responses to the key selection criteria at the end of your cover letter. For more information on this position please contact A/Prof Susan Donath: susan.donath@mcri.edu.au
Please note, applications will only be considered when submitted via the MCRI website. Please click apply to proceed with your application.
Salary Range: $80,128 - $90,912 per annum plus super
Closing Date: 5pm Friday 26 October 2018
Position Reference: 15605"	 - Parkville VIC	Biostatistician (Research Assistant)Murdoch Childrens Research Institute - Parkville VIC$80,128 - $90,912 a year	Biostatistician (Research Assistant)
382	"Data Scientist working for a large multinational company on their customer and sales data. This is an opportunity to work with large data sets and guide the data strategy for the business.

Responsibilities:
Scope and develop a customer data platform that combines both third party & in-house data and automates marketing and communication functions
Oversee data management and analytics
Partner with business stakeholders to identify opportunities for process improvement and automation
Generate and present reports to exec level stakeholders
Design data warehouse
Ensure security and risk management of data

Essential:
3-5 Years Data Scientist Experience
VBA & Excel
Large Corporate Environment
Strong stakeholder engagement & communication
Desirable:
Retail Sales
To Apply please email Ashleigh at ashleigh@kennedyreid.com.au or call on 0437 744 509"	 - Sydney NSW	Data ScientistKennedy Reid - Sydney NSW$110,000 - $140,000 a year	Data Scientist
383	"Career Progression and Training
ML & AI environment
Banking & Retail Projects
We are looking for a Data Scientist to join one of our well known and established Australian data and analytics consultancy clients based in Sydney CBD.

Working as a Consultant, the hiring manager wants a Data Scientist with strong technical data query skills with SQL or a similar language, strong data modeling skills and data visualisation skills.

You will be applying your skills in Machine Learning, Artificial Intelligence and Data Visualisation. Two tools you will be working with technically are Alteryx and DataRobot. Any experience working hands on with these tools will be advantageous but if you have experience working with similar tools, you should be able to transfer your skillset quicky and adapt well to working with Alteryx and DataRobot.

The right person for this role needs to be passionate about data science and able to work on large data sets. You will be building predictive models and will have the freedom and flexibility to access large amounts of data, working on client sites for well known banking and retail clients initially.

This person will need to articulate insights to non-technical business people about the value of data in relation to their role. You will have regular stakeholder engagement and interaction with people across different business units.

An attractive salary package is on offer for this role and this is a collaborative, knowledge sharing working environment. Training will be provided as and when needed and there is a clear path for career progression in the organisation.

The ideal candidate will be passionate about analytics and data science. If you regularly attend meet-ups, work on kaggle competitions and / or continue to develop your skills in data science outside of working hours, then we want to hear from you.

SKILLS & EXPERIENCE

Advantageous to have Alteryx and / or DataRobot skills
Strong programming skills
Data modeling skills
Data query skills
Able to visualise data and present
Desirable to have skills in Machine Learning and / or Artificial Intelligence
Worked with SQL, R, Python, SAS, AWS Redshift, Tableau or other similar tools
Advantageous to have Big Data skills in tools like Hadoop and Spark
Strong written and verbal communication skills
Strong stakeholder management skills
Passionate about data science
If the above sounds like you, please get in touch. We can wait for a notice period to be served and we are interviewing immediately.
For further information on this role or to confidentially apply, please contact Rik English on 02 8227 9200 or apply directly via the Apply for this job button. Only WORD FORMAT resumes will be accepted."	 - Sydney NSW	Data Science Consultant - Alteryx & DataRobotEthos BeathChapman - Sydney NSW	Data Science Consultant - Alteryx & DataRobot
384	"Technology, Permanent, Sydney
Job Title: Data Scientist

Location: Sydney

Employment Type: Permanent - Full time

Salary: $100,000 - $130,000 package

Additional requirements: Australian Citizens or PR with baseline clearance highly desirable

I am currently working with one of the worlds largest and best branded digital technology consultancies at the moment to help them recruit a handful of Data Scientists into their ranks and help the world's leading brands and governments do more for the people they serve through the power of digital.

You will be part of a passionate team, have a limitless amount of opportunities to grow and learn and have access to a range of career options within the business.

This is a fantastic opportunity for someone that wants to further their career and learn from the best. You will also get the opportunity to work within different industries and experience how different companies use and leverage their data to better serve their customers.

What we're looking for:
People with strong communication skills and the ability to articulate the value of offerings and solutions of advanced analytics
Experience in; Data Modelling, client engagement, statistical modelling
Intermediate to advanced R, SQL, Python, Scala etc..
Strong background in advanced analytics and data science
Hands-on experience using Machine Learning techniques
Experience with predictive analytics and tools
Ability to build strong and lasting business relationships and a reputation in the market

If you are interested in the position and match the skills that I have outlined above, please get in touch with me to discuss after sending your CV in word format.
Salt is acting as an Employment Agency in relation to this vacancy.

Apply Now
Email your CV to Sam Phillips, or use the application form on this page."	 - Sydney NSW	Data Scientist - Consultant Sydney, AustraliaSalt Recruitment - Sydney NSW$100,000 - $130,000 a year - Permanent	Data Scientist - Consultant Sydney, Australia
385	"About the company:
Our client is an International, reputable and well-known brand in their market. They are currently investing in expanding their existing data analytics capability across the organisation.
Role:
To apply advance quantitative techniques to develop models and methods to maximise service business partnership
To develop and enhance statistical and machine learning predictive models to drive supervised learning
Interpret analysis and modelling results in a business context and provide commercially focussed advice to support business decisions
Key skills:
Minimum 5 years commercial experience in developing analytical models.
Demonstrated proven experience in advanced methodology such as machine learning.
Expert knowledge of R, Python, SQL, SAS
Must possess a blend of both technical skills and stakeholder management experience
Previous experience within an Engineering/ Mining background will see you excel in this role.
Previous experience using big data platforms such as MDM, Hadoop and Spark on a SAP/ CRM platform will be advantageous
Tertiary qualifications in a relevant discipline, Statistics, Data Science, Mathematics, Computer Science, ideally PHD level is preferred
To be considered for this position, please apply now with a Microsoft Word version of your Resume."	 - Brisbane Central Business District QLD	Data ScientistExclaim IT Pty Ltd - Brisbane Central Business District QLDContract	Data Scientist
386	Job DescriptionThe candidate is a skilled data scientist who will be building deep learning models for medical image diagnosis applications such as segmentation, localisation and classification of abnormalities.ResponsibilitiesThe candidate will write high quality model with high performance and good memory management, together with state-of-the-art accuracies and embed into our proprietary software. Our aim is to align you with the activities which truly interest you; will stretch you technically; help you grow and impact on billions of patients.RequirementsBachelor / Master / PhD in engineering or computer science or mathematics or physicsKnows computer vision / image segmentation, localization, classificationKnows tensorflow or theano or torchStrong python, C++ or java coderGood knowledge of numpy, pandas, sklearn, scipy, seabornKnows how to build deep learning models like RNN and CNN and other neural network models.May require to relocate to China, Beijing.What We OfferMaster, Teach, Learn – The opportunity to work with, learn from and share knowledge with ultra-smart colleagues in a culture of collaboration and technical excellence. We groom our employees and make sure that they stay at the cutting edge of the technology stack.Impact – Huge potential to make a positive contribution across our business, people and partnersRemuneration – Competitive pay with share award for top performers.We are willing to groom engineers and fresh graduates who don’t have a background in deep learning but are interested to learn. You will also have the opportunity to attend top machine learning conferences like NIPS and ICML.Job Types: Full-time, Permanent	 - Sydney NSW	BioMind Data Scientist/Engineer (Relocate to Beijing)biomind.ai - Sydney NSWFull-time, Permanent	BioMind Data Scientist/Engineer (Relocate to Beijing)
387	SparkBeyond has built an AI-powered research engine, capable of finding complex patterns in data by understanding their meaning. Operating at the intersection of Data Science and Artificial Intelligence fields, our Machine Learning technology is so ground-breaking that it’s been referred to as science fiction on multiple occasions. SparkBeyond Discovery Platform is being used by Fortune 500 companies across industries.What will you do?Solve various problems and make a true impact across unlimited domains and industries (Financial Risk, Health, Ecommerce, Marketing, Oil & Gas Exploration and more.).Deliver business value by translating complex data into meaningful insights.Be the face of the company and the product directly interfacing with our partners around the globe.Partner with our customers’ Data Science teams, helping them optimize their use of SparkBeyond’s Discovery Platform.Work directly with our in-house team comprised of the brightest minds in technology, research and mathematics as well as senior interfaces from leading companies across the globe (fortune 500 companies and many others).Use your analytical skills and deep product understanding to consult our partners and provide them with advice and input of the highest quality.What will you need?Significant relevant work experience - Professional work experience on data science and analytics issuesA very strong academic background - PhDs are very welcome, as are quantitative degrees - Math, Physics, Computer Science and the like.Proven experience in handling large scale end to end data science projects and presenting the findings and insights. Building models is great - creating impact is greaterProven experience in translating business challenges into data pipelines & model frameworkExperience with Machine Learning techniques. Supervised, unsupervised, traditional or deep learning - either is great, but you need to know your stuff, both in theory and in practice (e.g., MICE, scikit-learn, keras or weka)Programming skills that allow you to be self-sufficient in handling data. Python and R are our daily companions, and a solid grasp of SQL is always needed. Big bonus points if you know ScalaAlso welcome: Experience with large datasets and distributed computing (Hive/Hadoop, Spark)Willingness to travel. We understand the need for a work-life balance and family time, but the ability to be on location at our clients is regularly required.Why SparkBeyond?Sense of Purpose: We’re building something bigger than ourselves. Our team is building a machine that can help solve the world’s most critical problems. We do this through our Partner engagements and the pro-bono work we are passionate about.Exposure: Help insurers process claims faster. Or pharmaceutical companies improve their quality control. Or, on a pro bono basis, an NGO to upskill underprivileged teenagers. Choose what you will work on and where you will leave your mark.People: We are proud of the brilliant, passionate and engaged team at SparkBeyond, including our very own Gödel and Wolf Prize winner. Our people are our greatest asset and we believe in empowerment, ownership and constant growth.Platform: Our Data Scientists are passionate about our cutting-edge platform and can’t imagine returning to traditional data science.Credibility: We have established ourselves as an industry leader, partnering and making impact for our Fortune 500 clients. See what the market is saying about us:https://venturebeat.com/2016/04/02/deep-learning-will-be-huge-and-heres-who-will-dominate-it/https://www.gartner.com/doc/3311218/cool-vendors-data-science-Job Type: Full-timeSalary: $100,000.00 to $180,000.00 /year	 - Melbourne VIC	Data ScientistSparkBeyond - Melbourne VIC$100,000 - $180,000 a year	Data Scientist
388	"There has never been a more exciting time to be part of Domain Group, a dynamic digital media and technology services business and one of Australia's leading property destinations. We provide property advertising and media online, via mobile, social media and in magazines, and technology services to the real estate industry. The business is experiencing rapid growth in digital revenues and investing in all areas to drive future earnings growth. Domain offers a dynamic and innovative culture at the leading edge of digital media in Australia.
We are looking for a lead data scientist to help sales, product and business leadership make decisions with data, give consumers certainty and control when selling their home with a broad mission and build data science and machine learning products to power the next stage of Domain's growth
As part of the Domain Group, you'll have the opportunity to work across all aspects of our property ecosystem, from listing and agent, to consumer behavior, email, and sales data.
What you'll do:
Build scalable models that analyse and extract information from disparate public sources
Develop and improve machine learning algorithms that drive our data pipeline operation
Leverage advanced statistical modeling to improve domain products
Research and implement the latest advances in the world of data
Proven ability to collaboratively and maturely work on a team
Curious with an aptitude to quickly learn
Experience:
At least 3-5 years of industry experience in data science
2+ years of professional experience with Natural Language Processing and/or Image Processing
Thorough knowledge of machine learning modeling processes
Thorough knowledge of supervised and unsupervised learning algorithms
Thorough knowledge of Natural Language Processing
Experience with implementation of Data Systems
Fluency in UNIX, SQL, Python and/or R
Good software engineering principles
Education/Qualifications:
MS or PhD degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Quantitative Psychology or related field.
Portfolio evidence of previous work is appreciated (i.e. blog, GitHub repository, journal/conference publications etc).
So...what happens next?
Once we've received your application we'll give it the attention it deserves and you'll hear from us either way. If you have the right experience, one of our Recruitment Consultants will give you a call (so make sure you keep your phone handy!) and from there we'll support you through the interview process.

Interested?
Go on then, click apply, we'd love to see your application!

A little note to recruitment agencies: We have a superstar recruitment team who are pretty good at filling our own roles, we know you're great at what you do to, but there's no need to get in touch! :)"	 - Sydney NSW	Lead Data ScientistDomain Group6 reviews - Sydney NSWFull-time, Permanent	Lead Data Scientist
390	"Deloitte is the world’s largest professional service firm, with one of the largest and most experienced Analytics, Information Management (AIM) & Data Automation practices. We have 400+ specialised consultants in Australia and more than 6,000 practitioners in the Deloitte global network.
With the ever increasing complexity and volume of data, the rise of in-memory, high performance computing, data discovery and visualisation solutions and the convergence of Big Data and Advanced Analytics, organisations are faced with increasing number of choices to ensure they are able to exploit their data assets for maximum advantage. Deloitte is able to draw from its vast global experience delivering complex data driven solutions for our clients across the full spectrum of technology and business domains to provide the right strategic advice to help an organisation respond effectively to these changes – as well as partner with our clients to execute on our recommendations.
About the Role
Do you want to be a part of how we help companies utilise their valuable data resources through effective use of the right technology, backed by a clear vision and strong executive sponsorship? Do you want to be part of an award winning team that provides clients with a visionary, yet balanced and pragmatic approach to automating concepts and tools to improve productivity and performance?
This is an opportunity to harness emerging technologies and analytical methodologies to solve real world problems. You will be part of a close, collaborative team that identifies and builds solutions that are practical as well as visionary, and that make an impact that matters.
We are looking for people who love data and want to solve problems with insight. Whether you call yourself a data scientist, analytics nerd or builder of predictive models. We want to hear from you if you are genuinely passionate about this area and have some applied experience.
You will be responsible for delivering insights through a range of corporate data sources through the application of analytics, data mining, Big Data and real-time decision making techniques and applications using various data management, analytics & data visualization tools.
About You
You’ll bring experience in one or more of the following competencies and enabling technologies
A strong background in applying mathematical and analytics approaches and methodologies to identifying complex relationships in data
Ability to communicate technical requirements and outputs in a clear and concise manner
A structured, logical and solution-oriented design mindset
Ability to work autonomously and with minimal oversight
Ability to demonstrate initiative and ownership in the completion of tasks
A demonstrable interest and passion for exploring new data/analytics concepts, applications and innovations (e.g. Cognitive, Robotics & Automate, AI, IoT etc.)
Some experience using a range of scripting languages – (e.g. Python, R, SQL etc.)
About Us: Deloitte Culture
Join a high performing culture of talented people, who are highly motivated and passionate about delivering impactful analytics solutions and insight. We are innovative and different because YOU are… we pride ourselves on our team of diverse, high performing Deloitte Professionals who are talented, supportive, inclusive and social – and who are at the heart of our success. Our aim is to ensure that all our people feel comfortable to bring their whole selves to work, and as a result, build a workplace that encourages the true spirit of 'And different'.
From day one at our firm you’ll be considered part of the Deloitte community and our development and career progression framework will help you develop the skills and capabilities that will set you up to succeed – in every sense of the word. At Deloitte, we assume that you perform other roles within your life…you could be a student, a teacher, a passionate hobbyist and a caring family member. We recognise the importance of balance and embrace agility, understanding that this means different things to each and every one of our employees.
If you have questions regarding this role, the Talent Acquisition Team is available to have a confidential discussion. Please contact Aditi Aggarwal via the Our Recruiters section on our careers website."	 - Sydney NSW	EXPRESSION OF INTEREST - Data & Analytics - NationalDeloitte7,167 reviews - Sydney NSW	EXPRESSION OF INTEREST - Data & Analytics - National
391	"The role will be focused on stitching together disparate data sources from across the business to enable machine learning and automated reporting and campaigns. Generically, provide a view on business issues/opportunities that cannot be revealed through standard reporting
What’s the role?
Analytics lead on internal strategic marketing projects designed to understand key customer behaviours that drive consumer revenue
Identify new opportunities to improve capability and optimise the business through analytics and modelling
Undertake proactive analysis of customer data processes that produce data driven analysis, reporting, insights and models
Provide data and analytical thought leadership that can be leveraged across the marketing teams
Consistent delivery of data programs that lead to more effective and improved customer experiences
Who are you?
The ability to interpret and convert complex data requests into prescriptive and actionable insights for a non-analytical audience.
Proactivity delivering data driven insights and recommendations
Senior stakeholder engagement and strong presentation skills
Must be advanced multi-lingual across various software languages (SQL, Python, R, SAS)
What’s in it for you?
Supportive and friendly environment. We encourage innovation, collaboration and creative thinking. Fun, fast-paced and excellent opportunities for growth and development.
Lucrative salary
Flexible working arrangements
Discounted health care
Employee discount with multiple brands including BMW, Qantas, Apple, Samsung etc
Work with some of Australia's most recognised and prestigious brands
On-site gym and wellbeing centre

Who are we?
We are Australia’s number one and most influential media organisation with more than 150 prestige brands across news, sport and lifestyle. Each month more than 17 million Australians choose to consume news and information from our digital and print products – more than any other media group in Australia.
Where do I sign?
Apply now or for more information on careers at News Corp Australia visit www.newscorpaustralia.com/careers"	 - Sydney Central Business District NSW	Data ScientistNews Corp Australia66 reviews - Sydney Central Business District NSWPermanent	Data Scientist
392	"There has never been a more exciting time to be part of Domain Group, a dynamic digital media and technology services business and one of Australia's leading property destinations. We provide property advertising and media online, via mobile, social media and in magazines, and technology services to the real estate industry. The business is experiencing rapid growth in digital revenues and investing in all areas to drive future earnings growth. Domain offers a dynamic and innovative culture at the leading edge of digital media in Australia.
We are looking for a lead data scientist to help sales, product and business leadership make decisions with data, give consumers certainty and control when selling their home with a broad mission and build data science and machine learning products to power the next stage of Domain's growth
As part of the Domain Group, you'll have the opportunity to work across all aspects of our property ecosystem, from listing and agent, to consumer behavior, email, and sales data.
What you'll do:
Build scalable models that analyse and extract information from disparate public sources
Develop and improve machine learning algorithms that drive our data pipeline operation
Leverage advanced statistical modeling to improve domain products
Research and implement the latest advances in the world of data
Proven ability to collaboratively and maturely work on a team
Curious with an aptitude to quickly learn
Experience:
At least 3-5 years of industry experience in data science
2+ years of professional experience with Natural Language Processing and/or Image Processing
Thorough knowledge of machine learning modeling processes
Thorough knowledge of supervised and unsupervised learning algorithms
Thorough knowledge of Natural Language Processing
Experience with implementation of Data Systems
Fluency in UNIX, SQL, Python and/or R
Good software engineering principles
Education/Qualifications:
MS or PhD degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Quantitative Psychology or related field.
Portfolio evidence of previous work is appreciated (i.e. blog, GitHub repository, journal/conference publications etc).
So...what happens next?
Once we've received your application we'll give it the attention it deserves and you'll hear from us either way. If you have the right experience, one of our Recruitment Consultants will give you a call (so make sure you keep your phone handy!) and from there we'll support you through the interview process.

Interested?
Go on then, click apply, we'd love to see your application!

A little note to recruitment agencies: We have a superstar recruitment team who are pretty good at filling our own roles, we know you're great at what you do to, but there's no need to get in touch! :)"	 - Sydney NSW	Lead Data ScientistDomain Group6 reviews - Sydney NSWFull-time, Permanent	Lead Data Scientist
393	"Job Description:About IntellifyIntellify is a data science and machine learning consultancy who helps our customers to increase their growth, operate more efficiently and build competitive advantage. Our team consists of leading data scientists, machine learning engineers and consultants that extensively use advanced (statistical) machine learning and optimisation techniques to create state-of-the-art solutions for business. As an emerging AWS consulting partner, we have the ability to scale our solution to any needs through their cloud platform.About the OpportunityAs we are growing at a rapid speed, we are seeking a senior full-time data scientist/machine learning engineer who has extensive experience in data science, machine learning and/or statistical modelling as well as programming. As part of this role, you will supervise and manage junior data scientists, and work on development to build data science solutions using a combination of the latest technologies and business strategies.With a startup culture and applying cutting-edge technology to real-world business problems, you have the opportunity to drive impact at some of Australia’s leading startups and enterprises as well as to learn and grow within a team of like-minded data scientists. Our client problems have ranged from pricing, inventory and workforce optimisation to computer vision applied to radar data for predictive maintenance. The work is varied and challenging, and will require someone who is dynamic in their thinking as well as willing to explore and try new ideas.Being a senior data scientist at Intellify you are charged with both being a mentor and learning from fellow specialist data scientists in an ever evolving and improving atmosphere. We want to see you thrive professionally and personally as we create a leading data science, machine learning and AI company of the future.What we offerThis is a full-time permanent role. This role will provide a unique opportunity to work in a collaborative team and learn from experienced data scientists, so you can advance your knowledge and get hands-on experience with state-of-the-art machine learning methods. Our salaries are competitive, and we offer flexible working hours. We also believe great data science comes from great teams, so invest continuously in upskilling and cross-training our data scientists, with lunch & learn sessions, training courses and certifications, and an opportunity to be a core part of our data science and machine learning communities. Furthermore, we offer the following:1) 10 x paid days of professional development per year (attend/ speak @ conferences, undertake courses and certifications)2) $2,200 Toolkit allowance to go out and buy your own tech3) Profit sharing4) Work with high-profile clients5) A defined career path with your 1-1 mentor6) Great team culture7) Have an impact in a small team where there is no politics8) Flexible & inclusive work-environment9) Work closely with AWS using cutting edge cloud technologiesRequired Skills: A computer science, robotics, maths, statistics, physics or related degree (graduated Bachelors, MSc, PhD or last year MSc/PhD student)5+ years of applied industry machine learning, optimisation and/or statistics experienceStrong Python or R programming experience and related data science libraries (such as scikit-learn, Pandas, Tensorflow/Keras)Strong SQL database and code versioning (e.g., Git) skillsGood software engineering principlesProject management / team management experienceExperience with data visualisation tools or frameworks i.e. tableau, D3.js, ggplot2 etc.Desirable skills: Knowledge or experience of software engineering practicesKnowledge or experience on time series/product forecasting/recommender systemsKnowledge of deep learning/neural networksExperience working with web development technologiesExperience working with cloud technologies i.e. AWS / Microsoft / Google Cloud.Portfolio evidence of your previous work is appreciated (i.e. blog, github repository, conference presentations etc).How to ApplyIf you wish to take the next step in your career working and learning with the best in an innovative data science company, please click on ""Apply now"" and include:Your CVYour portfolio of projects (eg GitHub, blog site etc)Desired salaryYour availabilityBrief details (3-4 sentences) of either:A machine learning or data science project you have developed or delivered previously; orPrevious team leadership experience, where you worked with a team to deliver a project.We are looking forward to hearing from you.*** STRICTLY NO AGENCIES ***Please note that our Company Policy dictates direct recruitment only.Job Types: Full-time, Part-timeSalary: $120,000.00 to $160,000.00 /yearExperience:machine learning, optimisation and/or statistics: 3 years (Required)"	 - Sydney NSW	Senior Data Scientist/ Machine learning engineerIntellify - Sydney NSW$120,000 - $160,000 a year - Full-time, Part-time	Senior Data Scientist/ Machine learning engineer
394	"This is a new role reporting directly to the Manager of Data Science providing data driven insights, analytics and reporting support.

The key responsibilities include:
Consult and engage with key business stakeholders to scope out business requirements and understand required solutions;
Document scope of work and progress towards delivery of solution;
Building DataMart assets and performing analysis’ to derive actionable insights and results;
Presenting data driven insights in formal reports and presentations to business partners that support decision making

To be successful in this role you will have:
Tertiary Qualifications in Actuarial Science, Data Science, Computer Programming and/or Mathematics
3-5 years experience working in a data analytics capacity, ideally in within insurance
Computer programming experience using SAS, Transact SQL, Qliksense and R
Strong stakeholder management, relationship management and influencing skills
Excellent written and verbal communication skills with the ability to communicate results in formal reports and presentations
Apply now! Nicolle Hann-Dunbavin

#LI-NH1"	 - Sydney NSW	Data ScientistAshdown Consulting - Sydney NSW	Data Scientist
395	"Technology, Permanent, Sydney
Job Title: Data Scientist

Location: Sydney

Employment Type: Permanent - Full time

Salary: $100,000 - $130,000 package

Additional requirements: Australian Citizens or PR with baseline clearance highly desirable

I am currently working with one of the worlds largest and best branded digital technology consultancies at the moment to help them recruit a handful of Data Scientists into their ranks and help the world's leading brands and governments do more for the people they serve through the power of digital.

You will be part of a passionate team, have a limitless amount of opportunities to grow and learn and have access to a range of career options within the business.

This is a fantastic opportunity for someone that wants to further their career and learn from the best. You will also get the opportunity to work within different industries and experience how different companies use and leverage their data to better serve their customers.

What we're looking for:
People with strong communication skills and the ability to articulate the value of offerings and solutions of advanced analytics
Experience in; Data Modelling, client engagement, statistical modelling
Intermediate to advanced R, SQL, Python, Scala etc..
Strong background in advanced analytics and data science
Hands-on experience using Machine Learning techniques
Experience with predictive analytics and tools
Ability to build strong and lasting business relationships and a reputation in the market

If you are interested in the position and match the skills that I have outlined above, please get in touch with me to discuss after sending your CV in word format.
Salt is acting as an Employment Agency in relation to this vacancy.

Apply Now
Email your CV to Sam Phillips, or use the application form on this page."	 - Sydney NSW	Data Scientist - Consultant Sydney, AustraliaSalt Recruitment - Sydney NSW$100,000 - $130,000 a year - Permanent	Data Scientist - Consultant Sydney, Australia
396	"Opportunity to work with one of Australia's largest Insurance firms!

This is a new role reporting directly to the Manager of Data Science providing data driven insights, analytics and reporting support.

The key responsibilities include:
Consult and engage with key business stakeholders to scope out business requirements and understand required solutions;
Document scope of work and progress towards delivery of solution;
Building DataMart assets and performing analysis’ to derive actionable insights and results;
Presenting data driven insights in formal reports and presentations to business partners that support decision making

To be successful in this role you will have:
Tertiary Qualifications in Actuarial Science, Data Science, Computer Programming and/or Mathematics
3-5 years experience working in a data analytics capacity, ideally in within insurance
Computer programming experience using SAS, Transact SQL, Qliksense and R
Strong stakeholder management, relationship management and influencing skills
Excellent written and verbal communication skills with the ability to communicate results in formal reports and presentations Apply now! Nicolle Hann-Dunbavin

#LI-NH1"	 - Sydney NSW	Data ScientistAshdown People - Sydney NSW	Data Scientist
397	"About our Client:

My client is global leader in technology and Big Data Analytics with operations in over 20 countries. They are looking to grow their Data Science capability with in their Perth Office.

The Role:
A Data Scientist with strong development capability is needed to join a market leading Data Engineering team, building enterprise level market leading Data Solutions.

They are looking for people who are passionate about Data Science and Machine Learning who have hands on experience in Statistical Techniques, Algorithm & Deep Learning such as Decision Tree, Segmentation, Logistic and Multiple Regression.

You will be the master of your own destiny within this organisation. My client is looking for future business leaders and will invest heavily to develop you into a market leading data scientist.

Experience:
Proven experience as a hands-on data scientist, formulating and delivering strategy and data solutions;5-7 years of Data Analytics experience in commercial environments.Strong data modelling skills by utilizing Machine Learning and Data ScienceExperience working with programming language (e.g. R, Python). Desirable to have knowledge of MongoDB and NoSQLDemonstrated experience in the use of data science and analytics capability to enhance business decision making.Experience with data visualization tools, such as Tableau and zoho.Using analytics finding to select key features relevant for building analytic systems/machine learning models.

About You:

With both permanent and contract positions available we encourage candidates with skills in the above area to contact the team at Hydrogen for confidential discussions. We are seeking intellectually capable, personable and change driven individuals who want to be part of a market leading consulting organisation. First class communication skills in both the written and verbal form will be required.

What's on offer?

The opportunity to work with world class thought leaders in the digital transformation, Big data, Data science, RPA and AI space. International and local career progression.

Competitive salaries depending on experience (roles range from $120,000 + super – 150,000 + super and bonus).

 #LI-MP3 #LI-96"	 - Perth WA	Data ScientistHydrogen Group6 reviews - Perth WA$120,000 a year - Permanent	Data Scientist
398	"Immediate hiring
Perm with FinXL and contracting options available
NV1 clearance
FinXL IT Professional Services is an established innovative Australian company providing technology enabled business solutions and consulting services across a number of industries including Government, Telecommunications, Commercial and Finance. We currently have more than 850 consultants assisting our clients across Australia and are continuing to grow at a rapid pace. Through the delivery of services and implementation of new systems, processes and technology, we assist our clients to gain competitive advantage and reach new heights.
The Role:
FinXL is looking to engage a Data Scientist to join our client's team and work in a cross disciplined team to deliver project outcomes.
To be successful in this role:
Degree in data science (machine learning, artificial intelligence) or a related field e.g. applied mathematics, statistics, computer science, or equivalent industry experience.
Industry experience in delivering data science solutions to improve business outcomes.
Industry experience in development of big data analytics solutions using Scala and Apache Spark
Industry experience in programming using one or more of R, Python or Scala in creating complex analytic models
Industry experience in breaking down and communicating complex technical information to business users and senior management.
FinXL fosters a high-performing, inclusive workplace built on a foundation of excellence, respect and dignity. We take corporate social responsibility seriously through our ongoing activities with communities and staff involvement in these efforts. We are committed to environmentally friendly practices in both our own operations and our work with clients.
To be considered please send applications to anua@finxl.com.au or contact Anu Ananth on 02 6243 6455 to discuss further.
FinXL does not accept unsolicited resumes or appreciate unsolicited calls from recruitment agencies.
FinXL encourages applications from Aboriginal and Torres Strait Islander people."	 - Canberra ACT	Data ScientistFinite IT - Canberra ACTPermanent	Data Scientist
399	"Are you an eager data / insights analyst or aspiring Data Scientist?

Do you have an agency or consulting background, and are used to working with a range of different clients but are now looking to further your career within a fast growing, digital company providing cutting edge insights to a range of customers across the retail & hospitality sector?

Then this may just be the job for you…!

This company provides cutting edge, real time data insights for a range of national & international clients in the retail & hospitality space

You will be responsible for delivering actionable and in-depth data analysis and recommendations to their clients helping them to better understand and meet the needs of their consumers and grow their revenue.

A perfect role for someone who has been part of a big team and now wants to take more responsibility, more interaction with clients and take a step towards more data consultancy and statistical analysis!

Your skills
Experience in analysing customer sentiment, with a strong pref. of working in the hospitality, retail or similar environment.
Experience in defining data-driven strategies based on analytics and insights with the ability to interpret research and extract and communicate insights
Experience in mining relational databases using SQL, using business intelligence tools like Power BI, Tableau and statistical languages like R & Python
Any experience in statistical techniques (e.g. regression models, clustering, statistical tests etc) a huge benefit, or a desire to move towards this.

Above all, you’ll want to be part of a growing firm! The company is expanding & have an international presence in Aus, UK & the US. It’s a great time to join a great team!

Apply now!"	 - Sydney NSW	Senior Analytics & Insights ConsultantFernway - Sydney NSW$80,000 - $110,000 a year	Senior Analytics & Insights Consultant
400	"6 month role on offer with an attractive rate which can offer you the chance to gain skills in a large scale and complex environment working with some of the best in the business.

In short come join them. Learn and grow!

6 month role on offer with an attractive rate which can offer you the chance to gain skills in a large scale and complex environment working with some of the best in the business.

In short come join them. Learn and grow!

A well known and market leading organisation has partnered with us to source a skilled Data Scientist / Data Analyst to work directly for the Analytics team that will allow the area to continue developing its data capability.

For this to be a success a number of plans are in the pipeline and will include:

Lead generation incorporating pre and post campaign analysis work and direct interaction with key technical business stakeholders

A new Governance framework to be rolled out

Overall targeted business analytics

To be successful once you feel comfortable assisting and driving the above you r resume will need to clearly illustrate data cleansing and building datasets

Working directly with the business

The usual Data science experience including Machine Learning, Linear and non linear programming, random forest as well as R/Python

As always the ability to illustrate technical terms to non technical stakeholders is a must to ensure success for all

Financial Services experience

This is initially a 6 month role but there is an expectation for this to extend so please only those will full and unrestricted working rights need apply!

Experis ANZ is parent to a portfolio of brands; Greythorn, Safesearch, Marks Sattin, GT-X and Global Attract . These brands make up our core specialisations for Technology & Digital, Accounting & Finance, Engineering and Workplace Health, Safety and Environment. When you apply for this opportunity you will be directed to the parent website www.experis.com.au to lodge your application. Experis is part of the ManpowerGroup , a global leader in offering end to end workforce solutions.

If you're curious and willing to have a conversation about this role, please pick up the phone and speak with our recruitment specialist below. Even if this doesn't sound like the right role for you, we encourage you to join our talent community so your skill set can be the first considered when another opportunity arises. Click register on our website www.experis.com.au .

Rebecca Ward
Technology & Digital
Resource Recruitment Associate
Let's Connect
https://www.linkedin.com/in/rebecca-ward-0b41b6120/
+61 2 9249 8041"	 - Sydney NSW	Data Scientist/AnalystGreythorn Specialist Technology Recruitment6 reviews - Sydney NSWTemporary, Contract	Data Scientist/Analyst
401	"Big Data Analytics
Machine Learning/ Artificial Intelligence
Using one or more of R, Python or Scala

Our Federal Government client is seeking the services of an experienced Data Scientist to develop machine learning models and other analytics solutions and help solve problems using data and robust data science techniques.
The Role:
Conduct detailed analysis of data to support the development of risk assessments
Use statistical and data mining techniques to analyse data to provide insights into current and emerging risks and issues
Conduct research and development activities to come up with innovative solutions to problems
Apply advanced data science techniques including machine learning, graph analytics, data visualisation, text analytics plus development of custom algorithms to identify patterns and predict outcomes from large datasets
Develop, implement, deploy, test and evaluate machine learning models to model risk
Perform data wrangling and create data pipelines, integrating diverse disparate datasets
To be considered you'll have the following skills & experience:
Degree in data science (machine learning, artificial intelligence) or a related field e.g. applied mathematics, statistics, computer science, or equivalent industry experience.
Industry experience in delivering data science solutions to improve business outcomes.
Industry experience in development of big data analytics solutions using Scala and Apache Spark.
Industry experience in programming using one or more of R, Python or Scala in creating complex analytic models.
Industry experience in breaking down and communicating complex technical information to business users and senior management
Experience with federal government and financial/banking sector projects. (Desirable)
Please note: For this role our Govt Dept client is only able to engage Australian Citizens with a Negative Level 1 (NV1) Security Clearance or higher.
Contract: Initial 12-month contract with possible 12 month extension
For further information please contact Shar Grieve and the GMT Team on 02 6201 0100."	 - Canberra ACT	Data ScientistGMT People - Canberra ACTContract	Data Scientist
402	Our client is seeking multiple Data Scientists to work on an initial 12 month contract (possibility of another 12 month extension ) in Canberra.  As a Data Scientist, your role involves gaining an understanding of business needs, and developing machine learning models and other analytics solutions to solve problems using data and robust data science techniques.DeliverablesConduct detailed analysis and other data to support the development of risk assessmentsUse statistical and data mining techniques to analyse data to provide insights into current and emerging ML/TF risks and issuesConduct research and development activities to come up with innovative solutions to problemsApply advanced data science techniques including machine learning, graph analytics, data visualisation, text analytics plus development of custom algorithms to identify patterns and predict outcomes from large datasetsDevelop, implement, deploy, test and evaluate machine learning models to model riskPerform data wrangling and create data pipelines, integrating diverse disparate datasetsRequired skills and experience / Selection CriteriaMandatoryDegree in data science (machine learning, artificial intelligence) or a related field e.g. applied mathematics, statistics, computer science, or equivalent industry experienceIndustry experience in delivering data science solutions to improve business outcomes.Industry experience in development of big data analytics solutions using Scala and Apache Spark.Industry experience in programming using one or more of R, Python or Scala in creating complex analytic models.Industry experience in breaking down and communicating complex technical information to business users and senior management.Ability to develop processes and methodologiesDesirablePost-graduate degree in data science (machine learning, artificial intelligence) or a related field e.g. applied mathematics, statistics, computer science, or equivalent industry experience.Experience with federal government and financial/banking sector projects.Australian .Visa Status and Security ClearanceCitizens and Permanent Residents are eligible to apply. Candidate must have current security clearance level of Negative Vetting 1 (NV1) or higher.This is a fantastic contracting opportunity immediate requirement, so don't delay, apply now!! We carefully assess each application based on skill and experience and whilst this may be time consuming we consider it critical in the best interest of the candidate and the projects we undertake. We will endeavor to touch base with you ASAPJob Type: ContractExperience:Data Scientist: 3 years (Preferred)Location:Canberra ACT (Preferred)	 - Canberra ACT	Data ScientistTryam Digital - Canberra ACTContract	Data Scientist
403	"Who we are

Tyro is Australia’s largest fintech and newest bank. We’re giving the business banking world a good shake up, with smart technology that save Australian businesses time and money.
We’re born different.
We don’t follow the easy path, we blaze our own unique trail.
And we want like-minded people who understand where we’re coming from and where we’re going.
When it comes to banks, lots of them say they’re different.
But Tyro really is different. We don’t do mortgages, personal loans, or investments. We’re all about business.
We may be new, but what we lack in heritage, we make up for with relentless determination and a focus on the future.
Our singular goal is to make life better for business owners with superior products and services that are simple and seamless so our customers, and our people, can keep blazing our own unique trail.

Your mission is to become Tyro’s marketing data, analytics and marketing automation subject matter expert (SME).
This role will be pivotal in creating and delivering targeted, end-to-end marketing campaigns, coupled with an extensive understanding of the business’ opportunities and risks, which will ultimately translate into sales, deepened relationships and positive customer experience. This role is responsible for establishing the campaign management and marketing analytics function within the marketing team, working closely with the organisation’s broader team of data scientist and analysts. This includes the effective planning, build, execution, deployment and analysis of marketing and customer campaigns across all channels (online and offline) to ensure the right message is delivered to the right customer at the right time.
You will also have accountability for the management, government, and optimisation of our existing CRM and marketing automation software and assume a pivotal role in the scoping and integration of any projects aligned with automated campaign management solutions and the data and digital product team roadmap.
What you'll be doing
Strategy
Consult with internal and external stakeholders on the best way to meet business objectives

Data & Analytics
Partner with product to understand and analyse large and different data systems and translate these into business opportunities / campaigns
Monitor and analyse campaign performance and create a range of best practices by customer segment
Challenge the way we use or source data for marketing and campaigns
Partner with Marketing and Customer teams to build targeted contact lists for acquisition, partner and customer campaigns in the marketing platform
Ensure data integrity through the establishment of campaign and analytical processes including data governance, contact rules and campaign quality / uploading / testing and tracking
Campaign management
Manage campaigns once they are running
Recommend and embed robust test-and-learn methodologies into campaigns
Work closely with the digital team to create custom-built reports and forecast modelling

Insights & Optimisation
Identify and implement any areas to deliver improved quality, speed, response rates and automation
Guide the team in the move towards multi-touch attribution modelling and end-to-end tracking
Effectively extract and analyse the performance of campaigns and provide key insights and recommendations for future improvements and new opportunities

Marketing CRM & Automation
Act like a pioneer in the field and proactively scope for ways to improve our CRM and Marketing automation systems to ensure the set up and the outcomes are in line with the business requirements
Be the expert in the organisation for recommending and selecting the right marketing technology
Be the central point of contact for our marketing automation software
Consult with 3rd party vendors to ensure best practice and value is achieved through CRM and marketing automation

Other projects and duties as required
What we're looking for:
A good understanding and experience with CRM and marketing automation is key for this role - experience with Salesforce and Pardot is preferred
Good interpersonal, negotiation and relationship building skills with the ability to communicate and engage well with stakeholders at all levels and 3rd party vendors
Efficient project planning and execution for deliverables
Analyse and manage data using SQL, SAS or other language and the ability to build queries and prepare data for further analysis
Advanced experience in end-to-end customer / marketing / campaign / analytics including planning and sizing, lead gen and nurturing, list extraction, tag management, website and campaign reporting methodologies and skills (prospect & existing customers)
Advanced technical and analytical skills to analyse customer and marketing profiles, campaigns and website performance including cohort analysis
Familiar with Google Analytics, Google Tag Manager & Mixpanel or any other relevant reporting software
Familiar with multi-touch attribution modelling and adserving
High analytic, problem solving, lateral thinking and interpretive skills
A keen eye to identify new opportunities that present themselves
Ability to explain complex information in simple terms to different audiences
Ability to translate campaign data into actionable insights
Positive approach to change
Self-driven, ability to set, manage and deliver own goals and deliver business objectives
3+ years’ marketing/campaign/customer analytics experience
Advanced marketing automation experience (preferably Pardot)
Advanced CRM experience (ideally Salesforce)
Advanced Excel skills
What we'd like to see:
B2B marketing experience
Financial Services experience
Tableau experience
Why work for us

We're not just like every other bank. Tyro has always been a tech company at heart, but fostering a diverse and inclusive environment, and a passion for continuous learning has always been one of the most important parts of our company's culture.

Tyros are a highly collaborative mix of people. You will work closely with our awesome teams and individuals in engineering, product management, customer support, sales and other functions within the business. Everyone is committed to delivering great outcomes for our customers, and you will have the chance to change the face of banking for Australia businesses.

Our 400 strong team of Tyros, just like our customers, are the lifeblood of our business. We go to great lengths to ensure a positive and enjoyable employee experience for all. We offer some amazing employee benefits such as a generous training budget, regular training for professional and personal development, 16 weeks paid primary carers leave, 3 weeks paid secondary carers leave, annual team based volunteer day, 17.5% leave loading and not to mention our multiple craft beer kegs (selection of beers carefully selected by our beer connoisseurs), wide selection of wine, variety of snacks and a ping pong table, selection of board and video games and an awesome rooftop area for socialising, all available to be enjoyed.

Privacy and Submitting your Application
By proceeding to submit your application, you acknowledge that you have read and understood Tyro’s Privacy Policy (www.tyro.com/privacy-policy/) and Privacy Statement & Consent for Job Applicants (www.tyro.com/privacy-statement-job-applicants/) and consent to Tyro collecting, using, holding and disclosing your personal information in accordance with these policies."	 - Sydney NSW	Marketing Operations AnalystTyro - Sydney NSW	Marketing Operations Analyst
404	Job DescriptionThe candidate is a skilled data scientist who will be building deep learning models for medical image diagnosis applications such as segmentation, localisation and classification of abnormalities.ResponsibilitiesThe candidate will write high quality model with high performance and good memory management, together with state-of-the-art accuracies and embed into our proprietary software. Our aim is to align you with the activities which truly interest you; will stretch you technically; help you grow and impact on billions of patients.RequirementsBachelor / Master / PhD in engineering or computer science or mathematics or physicsKnows computer vision / image segmentation, localization, classificationKnows tensorflow or theano or torchStrong python, C++ or java coderGood knowledge of numpy, pandas, sklearn, scipy, seabornKnows how to build deep learning models like RNN and CNN and other neural network models.May require to relocate to China, Beijing.What We OfferMaster, Teach, Learn – The opportunity to work with, learn from and share knowledge with ultra-smart colleagues in a culture of collaboration and technical excellence. We groom our employees and make sure that they stay at the cutting edge of the technology stack.Impact – Huge potential to make a positive contribution across our business, people and partnersRemuneration – Competitive pay with share award for top performers.We are willing to groom engineers and fresh graduates who don’t have a background in deep learning but are interested to learn. You will also have the opportunity to attend top machine learning conferences like NIPS and ICML.Job Types: Full-time, Permanent	 - Sydney NSW	BioMind Data Scientist/Engineer (Relocate to Beijing)biomind.ai - Sydney NSWFull-time, Permanent	BioMind Data Scientist/Engineer (Relocate to Beijing)
406	Job DescriptionThe candidate is a skilled data scientist who will be building deep learning models for medical image diagnosis applications such as segmentation, localisation and classification of abnormalities.ResponsibilitiesThe candidate will write high quality model with high performance and good memory management, together with state-of-the-art accuracies and embed into our proprietary software. Our aim is to align you with the activities which truly interest you; will stretch you technically; help you grow and impact on billions of patients.RequirementsBachelor / Master / PhD in engineering or computer science or mathematics or physicsKnows computer vision / image segmentation, localization, classificationKnows tensorflow or theano or torchStrong python, C++ or java coderGood knowledge of numpy, pandas, sklearn, scipy, seabornKnows how to build deep learning models like RNN and CNN and other neural network models.May require to relocate to China, Beijing.What We OfferMaster, Teach, Learn – The opportunity to work with, learn from and share knowledge with ultra-smart colleagues in a culture of collaboration and technical excellence. We groom our employees and make sure that they stay at the cutting edge of the technology stack.Impact – Huge potential to make a positive contribution across our business, people and partnersRemuneration – Competitive pay with share award for top performers.We are willing to groom engineers and fresh graduates who don’t have a background in deep learning but are interested to learn. You will also have the opportunity to attend top machine learning conferences like NIPS and ICML.Job Types: Full-time, Permanent	 - Sydney NSW	BioMind Data Scientist/Engineer (Relocate to Beijing)biomind.ai - Sydney NSWFull-time, Permanent	BioMind Data Scientist/Engineer (Relocate to Beijing)
407	"The Company

Robert Half Technology are working alongside a well reputable and established Insurance organisation in the CBD and we are currently looking for a talented Data Scientist to join our team on a permanent basis. Our client continue to grow across all areas of the business and this role has been created due to the expansion of the division. This role represents an exciting challenge and career opportunity for a Data Scientist to join our forward thinking client.

The Role

The Role of the Data Scientist will have the opportunity to make their mark using data led decision making and modelling to catalyse industry disuption. Aspects of the role include:

Proportion your role with Modelling, Research, Analysism Data Manipulation and Collaboration.

Work as a data expert and a quantitative researcher.

Translate unstructured, complex business problems into practical, powerful algorithmic solutions.

Be part of a highly innovative team working on interesting and difficult problems, leveraging cutting edge technology to build key data products.

Uncover fresh insights from disparate data sources and data mining

Spearheading machine learning projects on data that has never been touched by the organization.

About You

This is a hands-on position where you will be empowered to be very ambitious and bold, to solve challenging problems and have the potential to directly impact the future of the business. The role requires that you have experience in machine learning and data mining.

Your experience and skills should include most, if not all:
Ability to communicate complex quantitative analysis in a clear, precise and actionable manner

Practical experience using contemporary machine learning frameworks such as, scikit-learn, pytorch and tensorflow.

A proven track record in developing, innovating, and applying advanced algorithms to address practical problems and in building new analytical products of commercial value.

Experience in Python and/or R.

Experience in relational databases and SQL

Apply Today

Please send your resume by clicking on the apply button or for further information, contact our Melbourne office."	 - Melbourne VIC	Data Scientist - Market Leader - CBDRobert Half Australia6,897 reviews - Melbourne VIC$110,000 a year - Permanent	Data Scientist - Market Leader - CBD
408	"Deloitte is the world’s largest professional service firm, with one of the largest and most experienced Analytics, Information Management (AIM) & Data Automation practices. We have 400+ specialised consultants in Australia and more than 6,000 practitioners in the Deloitte global network.
With the ever increasing complexity and volume of data, the rise of in-memory, high performance computing, data discovery and visualisation solutions and the convergence of Big Data and Advanced Analytics, organisations are faced with increasing number of choices to ensure they are able to exploit their data assets for maximum advantage. Deloitte is able to draw from its vast global experience delivering complex data driven solutions for our clients across the full spectrum of technology and business domains to provide the right strategic advice to help an organisation respond effectively to these changes – as well as partner with our clients to execute on our recommendations.
About the Role
Do you want to be a part of how we help companies utilise their valuable data resources through effective use of the right technology, backed by a clear vision and strong executive sponsorship? Do you want to be part of an award winning team that provides clients with a visionary, yet balanced and pragmatic approach to automating concepts and tools to improve productivity and performance?
This is an opportunity to harness emerging technologies and analytical methodologies to solve real world problems. You will be part of a close, collaborative team that identifies and builds solutions that are practical as well as visionary, and that make an impact that matters.
We are looking for people who love data and want to solve problems with insight. Whether you call yourself a data scientist, analytics nerd or builder of predictive models. We want to hear from you if you are genuinely passionate about this area and have some applied experience.
You will be responsible for delivering insights through a range of corporate data sources through the application of analytics, data mining, Big Data and real-time decision making techniques and applications using various data management, analytics & data visualization tools.
About You
You’ll bring experience in one or more of the following competencies and enabling technologies
A strong background in applying mathematical and analytics approaches and methodologies to identifying complex relationships in data
Ability to communicate technical requirements and outputs in a clear and concise manner
A structured, logical and solution-oriented design mindset
Ability to work autonomously and with minimal oversight
Ability to demonstrate initiative and ownership in the completion of tasks
A demonstrable interest and passion for exploring new data/analytics concepts, applications and innovations (e.g. Cognitive, Robotics & Automate, AI, IoT etc.)
Some experience using a range of scripting languages – (e.g. Python, R, SQL etc.)
About Us: Deloitte Culture
Join a high performing culture of talented people, who are highly motivated and passionate about delivering impactful analytics solutions and insight. We are innovative and different because YOU are… we pride ourselves on our team of diverse, high performing Deloitte Professionals who are talented, supportive, inclusive and social – and who are at the heart of our success. Our aim is to ensure that all our people feel comfortable to bring their whole selves to work, and as a result, build a workplace that encourages the true spirit of 'And different'.
From day one at our firm you’ll be considered part of the Deloitte community and our development and career progression framework will help you develop the skills and capabilities that will set you up to succeed – in every sense of the word. At Deloitte, we assume that you perform other roles within your life…you could be a student, a teacher, a passionate hobbyist and a caring family member. We recognise the importance of balance and embrace agility, understanding that this means different things to each and every one of our employees.
If you have questions regarding this role, the Talent Acquisition Team is available to have a confidential discussion. Please contact Aditi Aggarwal via the Our Recruiters section on our careers website."	 - Sydney NSW	EXPRESSION OF INTEREST - Data & Analytics - NationalDeloitte7,167 reviews - Sydney NSW	EXPRESSION OF INTEREST - Data & Analytics - National
409	"There has never been a more exciting time to be part of Domain Group, a dynamic digital media and technology services business and one of Australia's leading property destinations. We provide property advertising and media online, via mobile, social media and in magazines, and technology services to the real estate industry. The business is experiencing rapid growth in digital revenues and investing in all areas to drive future earnings growth. Domain offers a dynamic and innovative culture at the leading edge of digital media in Australia.
We are looking for a lead data scientist to help sales, product and business leadership make decisions with data, give consumers certainty and control when selling their home with a broad mission and build data science and machine learning products to power the next stage of Domain's growth
As part of the Domain Group, you'll have the opportunity to work across all aspects of our property ecosystem, from listing and agent, to consumer behavior, email, and sales data.
What you'll do:
Build scalable models that analyse and extract information from disparate public sources
Develop and improve machine learning algorithms that drive our data pipeline operation
Leverage advanced statistical modeling to improve domain products
Research and implement the latest advances in the world of data
Proven ability to collaboratively and maturely work on a team
Curious with an aptitude to quickly learn
Experience:
At least 3-5 years of industry experience in data science
2+ years of professional experience with Natural Language Processing and/or Image Processing
Thorough knowledge of machine learning modeling processes
Thorough knowledge of supervised and unsupervised learning algorithms
Thorough knowledge of Natural Language Processing
Experience with implementation of Data Systems
Fluency in UNIX, SQL, Python and/or R
Good software engineering principles
Education/Qualifications:
MS or PhD degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Quantitative Psychology or related field.
Portfolio evidence of previous work is appreciated (i.e. blog, GitHub repository, journal/conference publications etc).
So...what happens next?
Once we've received your application we'll give it the attention it deserves and you'll hear from us either way. If you have the right experience, one of our Recruitment Consultants will give you a call (so make sure you keep your phone handy!) and from there we'll support you through the interview process.

Interested?
Go on then, click apply, we'd love to see your application!

A little note to recruitment agencies: We have a superstar recruitment team who are pretty good at filling our own roles, we know you're great at what you do to, but there's no need to get in touch! :)"	 - Sydney NSW	Lead Data ScientistDomain Group6 reviews - Sydney NSWFull-time, Permanent	Lead Data Scientist
410	"Sydney, CBD
Global
$ 160,000 + super + benefits
Our client is a rapidly growing innovative technology company. You will have the opportunity to work in a fast paced environment with very smart and talented people. They don't believe in doing things incrementally - they want to change the game.
The client seeks a Senior Data Scientist who has extensive experience in data science, machine learning and/or statistical modelling as well as programming. As part of this role, you will work on development to build data science solutions using a combination of the latest technologies and business strategies.
To make sparks fly you will have:
10-12 years' experience of building models and deriving insights in a position as a Data Scientist
A degree in a quantitative discipline e.g. Math/Statistics, Engineering, Computer Science, Econometrics, Actuarial etc. is required
Proficiency and experience in statistical modelling and machine learning techniques (feature engineering, regression, classification, segmentation, cross validation, bootstrapping, Bayesian techniques etc.)
A high level of proficiency with at least one programming languages used in data science (R/Python/SAS/Scala).
Experience with visualisation and dashboarding software (Tableau)
Proficiency in dealing with large datasets (data mining etc.)
Proficiency with AWS, Hadoop, Spark, Redshift or other big data platforms
What makes this role shine?
Technology Company
Sydney, CBD based
Excellent $$
Spark your interest?

To find out more about this exciting and challenging role please apply by attaching your resume in MS word format or contact Shobie on 02 8090 7785"	 - Sydney Central Business District NSW	Senior Data ScientistSpark Recruitment - Sydney Central Business District NSW$160,000 a year - Permanent	Senior Data Scientist
411	"You will be the first Big Data Engineer, working with the Head of Data Science. Right now, this organisation have an assorted data pipeline, you get a chance to build the pipeline from scratch which will scale as the company grows.
THE ROLE
You will be responsible for expanding and optimizing their data and data pipeline architecture, as well as optimizing data flow and collection for cross functional teams.
YOU
Are an experienced data pipeline builder and data wrangler who enjoys optimizing data systems and building them from the ground up. As an experienced Data Engineer you will support software developers, database architects, data analysts and data scientists on data initiatives and will ensure optimal data delivery architecture is consistent throughout ongoing projects. You must be self-directed and comfortable supporting the data needs of multiple teams, systems and products. You will be excited by the prospect of optimizing or even re-designing our company’s data architecture to support our next generation of products and data initiatives.
RESPONSIBILITIES
Create and maintain optimal data pipeline architecture, sssemble large, complex data sets that meet functional / non-functional business requirements.Identify, design, and implement internal process improvements: automating manual processes, optimizing data delivery, re-designing infrastructure for greater scalability, etc.Build the infrastructure required for optimal extraction, transformation, and loading of data from a wide variety of data sources using SQL and AWS ‘big data’ technologies.Build analytics tools that utilize the data pipeline to provide actionable insights into customer acquisition, operational efficiency and other key business performance metrics.Work with stakeholders including the Engineering, Product, Data and Design teams to assist with data-related technical issues and support their data infrastructure needs.Keep data separated and secure across national boundaries through multiple data centers and AWS regions.Create data tools for analytics and data scientist team members that assist them in building and optimizing our product into an innovative industry leader.Work with data and analytics experts to strive for greater functionality in data systems.
QUALIFICATIONS
Advanced working SQL knowledge and experience working with relational databases, query authoring (SQL) as well as working familiarity with a variety of databases.Experience building and optimizing ‘big data’ data pipelines, architectures and data sets.Experience performing root cause analysis on internal and external data and processes to answer specific business questions and identify opportunities for improvement.Strong analytic skills related to working with unstructured datasets.Build processes supporting data transformation, data structures, metadata, dependency and workload management.A successful history of manipulating, processing and extracting value from large disconnected datasets.Working knowledge of message queuing, stream processing, and highly scalable ‘big data’ data stores.Strong project management and organizational supporting and working with cross-functional teams in a dynamic environment.We are looking for a candidate with 5+ years of experience in a Data Engineer role, who has attained a Graduate degree in Computer Science, Statistics, Informatics, Information Systems or another quantitative field.You should also have experience using the following software/tools:Experience with big data tools: Hadoop, Spark, Kafka, etc.Experience with relational SQL and NoSQL databases, including Postgres and Cassandra.Experience with data pipeline and workflow management tools: Azkaban, Luigi, Airflow, etc.Experience with AWS cloud services: EC2, EMR, RDS, RedshiftExperience with stream-processing systems: Storm, Spark-Streaming, etc.Experience with object-oriented/object function scripting languages: Python, Java, C++, Scala, etc."	 - Sydney NSW	Big Data Engineer – SaaSJessica Haines - Independent Contractor - Sydney NSW	Big Data Engineer – SaaS
412	"Researcher / Data Scientist AI Machine Learning

Working alongside PhD's in state of the art machine learning you will implement deep learning, AI and enhance statistic results for a big data Fintech that is profitable and at scale.

Experience in Statistics, AI Algorithms and Finance highly desirable please email tom@hrnational.com.au with your resume/expectations for a full JD.

Please highlight your expertise in ""Machine Learning"" and any implementations or tools used.

APPLY TODAY"	 - Melbourne VIC	Senior Data Scientist / Researcher AI Machine LearningHR national - Melbourne VIC	Senior Data Scientist / Researcher AI Machine Learning
413	Our client is seeking multiple Data Scientists to work on an initial 12 month contract (possibility of another 12 month extension ) in Canberra.  As a Data Scientist, your role involves gaining an understanding of business needs, and developing machine learning models and other analytics solutions to solve problems using data and robust data science techniques.DeliverablesConduct detailed analysis and other data to support the development of risk assessmentsUse statistical and data mining techniques to analyse data to provide insights into current and emerging ML/TF risks and issuesConduct research and development activities to come up with innovative solutions to problemsApply advanced data science techniques including machine learning, graph analytics, data visualisation, text analytics plus development of custom algorithms to identify patterns and predict outcomes from large datasetsDevelop, implement, deploy, test and evaluate machine learning models to model riskPerform data wrangling and create data pipelines, integrating diverse disparate datasetsRequired skills and experience / Selection CriteriaMandatoryDegree in data science (machine learning, artificial intelligence) or a related field e.g. applied mathematics, statistics, computer science, or equivalent industry experienceIndustry experience in delivering data science solutions to improve business outcomes.Industry experience in development of big data analytics solutions using Scala and Apache Spark.Industry experience in programming using one or more of R, Python or Scala in creating complex analytic models.Industry experience in breaking down and communicating complex technical information to business users and senior management.Ability to develop processes and methodologiesDesirablePost-graduate degree in data science (machine learning, artificial intelligence) or a related field e.g. applied mathematics, statistics, computer science, or equivalent industry experience.Experience with federal government and financial/banking sector projects.Australian .Visa Status and Security ClearanceCitizens and Permanent Residents are eligible to apply. Candidate must have current security clearance level of Negative Vetting 1 (NV1) or higher.This is a fantastic contracting opportunity immediate requirement, so don't delay, apply now!! We carefully assess each application based on skill and experience and whilst this may be time consuming we consider it critical in the best interest of the candidate and the projects we undertake. We will endeavor to touch base with you ASAPJob Type: ContractExperience:Data Scientist: 3 years (Preferred)Location:Canberra ACT (Preferred)	 - Canberra ACT	Data ScientistTryam Digital - Canberra ACTContract	Data Scientist
414	"Work for Financial services employer of choice
Proven skills from Financial Services
Up to $850 a day plus super
6 month role on offer with an attractive rate which can offer you the chance to gain skills in a large scale and complex environment working with some of the best in the business.

In short come join them. Learn and grow!

A well known and market leading organisation has partnered with us to source a skilled Data Scientist / Data Analyst to work directly for the Analytics team that will allow the area to continue developing its data capability.

For this to be a success a number of plans are in the pipeline and will include:

Lead generation incorporating pre and post campaign analysis work and direct interaction with key technical business stakeholders
A new Governance framework to be rolled out
Overall targeted business analytics



To be successful once you feel comfortable assisting and driving the above you r resume will need to clearly illustrate data cleansing and building datasets

Working directly with the business
The usual Data science experience including Machine Learning, Linear and non linear programming, random forest as well as R/Python
As always the ability to illustrate technical terms to non technical stakeholders is a must to ensure success for all
Financial Services experience



This is initially a 6 month role but there is an expectation for this to extend so please only those will full and unrestricted working rights need apply!



Experis ANZ is parent to a portfolio of brands; Greythorn, Safesearch, Marks Sattin, GT-X and Global Attract. These brands make up our core specialisations for Technology & Digital, Accounting & Finance, Engineering and Workplace Health, Safety and Environment. When you apply for this opportunity you will be directed to the parent website www.experis.com.au to lodge your application. Experis is part of the ManpowerGroup, a global leader in offering end to end workforce solutions.

If you're curious and willing to have a conversation about this role, please pick up the phone and speak with our recruitment specialist below. Even if this doesn't sound like the right role for you, we encourage you to join our talent community so your skill set can be the first considered when another opportunity arises. Click register on our website www.experis.com.au.




Rebecca Ward
Technology & Digital
Resource Recruitment Associate
Let's Connect
https://www.linkedin.com/in/rebecca-ward-0b41b6120/
+61 2 9249 8041"	 - Sydney NSW	Data Scientist/AnalystExperis563 reviews - Sydney NSW$850 a day - Temporary, Contract	Data Scientist/Analyst
415	"Senior Data Scientist - Fraud and Attribution

This role will be liaise with both technical and product teams and provide support to them as required. This role has plenty of scope as it works across all aspects of the clients products and identify possible fraud.

What you would be doing in this role:
Identify human / cyber frauds on online and digital media, example: fake app installations, etc.
Provide performance based recommendations for clients fraud and attribution products
Maintain proper documentation for work implemented on product
Demonstrate relevant industry knowledge and display skills required for the job
Data Scientist - Ad serving | Digital advertising

In this role, you will apply machine learning, statistics and advanced analytics concepts and models and relate them to ad-serving / marketing strategy to ensure best performance outcomes. You will be part of a growing team focusing more on the research aspects. Your performance is not gauged based on KPI's.

What you would be doing in this role:
Explore large datasets, discover trends and patterns and extract insights.
Apply Statistical / Machine Learning techniques to build data product and features.
Develop scripts to extract and analyse large datasets and build statistical models
Build predictive models using concepts like click prediction, etc.
Leverage your knowledge of the mobile advertising landscape in operational best practice;
Have interest with researching on real-time data sets to provide solutions
Common for both roles:
At least 3 years of experience in a commercial Advanced Analytics and insights environment as a Data Scientist / Statistician - This is fairly a senior position but we are open to listen to you if you have done really interesting work in the mobile advertising space.
Relevant experience in online digital media/agency and desktop/mobile ad serving.
Solid skills in R and Python for data extraction and manipulation and to create reports and dashboards - Yes, they use these tools every day so you need to love them too :)
Qualification - We prefer a Ph.D.or Masters in statistics, mathematics, machine learning, data science or a similar field - But don't hold back, if you trust your experience and can prove it to us that you are awesome, we really don't care!
If you have experience in Big Data technologies, that's a big advantage
Please share with us you Kaggle/GitHub account if you like, we would love to see you in action!

Both the roles are permanent opportunities and please specify clearly which role you would like to apply for. only candidates with full working rights and no restrictions will be considered for the opportunity.

Click the ""Apply"" button below or contact Sowmya on 02 8227 4519 for a confidential discussion. We look forward to hearing from you!"	 - Sydney NSW	Senior Data Scientist & Data Scientist - Perm RolesInfopeople - Sydney NSWFull-time, Permanent	Senior Data Scientist & Data Scientist - Perm Roles
416	"In this 10-week, students learn the basis of Data Science with Python, and explore the power of applying data science algorithms and machine learning to big data sets.

We are looking for an experienced data scientist to lead this transformative experience as instructor for General Assembly's part-time Data Science course ( https://generalassemb.ly/education/data-science ).

Skills and Qualifications
-------------------------


You are eager to shape the skills, minds, and trajectories of the newest generation of data scientists.
You are the person that your colleagues naturally gravitate to when they are trying to figure something out.
You have at least 3 years of industry experience with data science (prior teaching experience a plus).
You are fluent in Python.
You have fluency with Probability, Statistics; Python (other scripting languages such as R a plus); AWS, EMR, MapReduce and/or Hadoop; Manipulation of large data sets; Data visualization techniques; Databases; Algorithms; Machine learning.

Essential Responsibilities and Duties
-------------------------------------


Teach 3 hours per evening, 2 days a week, for 10 weeks.
Prepare lessons and materials, leveraging existing GA curriculum content for several hours per week.
Work alongside GA staff and teaching team to best meet the needs and learning styles of your students
Guide students through development of a stellar final project that will showcase their abilities to hiring managers.
Facilitate a dynamic and collaborative classroom community.
Inspire students to persevere through the challenges of learning a new suite of skills

Who are we?
-----------

Since 2011, General Assembly has transformed tens of thousands of careers through pioneering, experiential education in today's most in-demand skills. As featured in The Economist, Wired, and The New York Times, GA offers training in web development, data, design, business, and more, both online and at campuses around the world.

Our global professional community boasts 40,000 full- and part-time alumni — and counting.In addition to fostering career growth for individuals, GA helps employers cultivate top tech talent and spur innovation by transforming their teams through strategic learning.

More than 21,000 employees at elite companies worldwide have honed their digital fluency with our corporate training programs. GA has also been recognised as one of Deloitte's Technology Fast 500, and Fast Company has dubbed us leaders in World-Changing Ideas as well as the #1 Most Innovative Company in Education."	 - Sydney NSW	Instructor - Part Time Data ScienceGeneral Assembly158 reviews - Sydney NSWPart-time	Instructor - Part Time Data Science
417	"Emanate Technology has been exclusively engaged with this global organisation who are looking to build their data capability from scratch. With revenues fast approaching half a billion dollars, this business has grown considerably in recent times with well-known organisations now partnering with them.

Your role will be responsible for building the future data and analytics capability for this company. Working closely with the business and technology teams, you will be responsible for data strategy, determining the required architecture and building the team that will enable future analytics and insights capability for this organisation.

You will be degree qualified, ideally in mathematics/statistics or similar field. Coupled with your significant technical and data visualisation capability, you will have a consultative style, having dealt directly with business and technology leaders up to and including C-level. You will have the ability to convey highly technical elements in your field to layman terms and have leadership experience.

For more information on this role, please call Heath Adcock on 0410 650673 or email your CV to heath.adcock@emanatetechnology.com.au"	 - Brisbane QLD	Data ScientistEmanate Technology - Brisbane QLD	Data Scientist
418	"Immediate hiring
Perm with FinXL and contracting options available
NV1 clearance
FinXL IT Professional Services is an established innovative Australian company providing technology enabled business solutions and consulting services across a number of industries including Government, Telecommunications, Commercial and Finance. We currently have more than 850 consultants assisting our clients across Australia and are continuing to grow at a rapid pace. Through the delivery of services and implementation of new systems, processes and technology, we assist our clients to gain competitive advantage and reach new heights.
The Role:
FinXL is looking to engage a Data Scientist to join our client's team and work in a cross disciplined team to deliver project outcomes.
To be successful in this role:
Degree in data science (machine learning, artificial intelligence) or a related field e.g. applied mathematics, statistics, computer science, or equivalent industry experience.
Industry experience in delivering data science solutions to improve business outcomes.
Industry experience in development of big data analytics solutions using Scala and Apache Spark
Industry experience in programming using one or more of R, Python or Scala in creating complex analytic models
Industry experience in breaking down and communicating complex technical information to business users and senior management.
FinXL fosters a high-performing, inclusive workplace built on a foundation of excellence, respect and dignity. We take corporate social responsibility seriously through our ongoing activities with communities and staff involvement in these efforts. We are committed to environmentally friendly practices in both our own operations and our work with clients.
To be considered please send applications to anua@finxl.com.au or contact Anu Ananth on 02 6243 6455 to discuss further.
FinXL does not accept unsolicited resumes or appreciate unsolicited calls from recruitment agencies.
FinXL encourages applications from Aboriginal and Torres Strait Islander people."	 - Canberra ACT	Data ScientistFinite IT - Canberra ACTPermanent	Data Scientist
419	"Desirable qualities:
Enthusiastic to learn and grow
Able to structure data for qualitative and quantitative insights.
Inquisitive about emerging and best-of-breed patterns and technologies for effective data handling and exploration.
Possess relevant industry certifications, tertiary qualifications or evidence of ongoing self-initiated learning.
Significant experience in a Data Science or Data focused role (5+ years)
Demonstrated experience with:
Enterprise architecture or solution architecture frameworks, methodologies, templates and tools.
Enterprise service bus (ESB) and service-oriented architecture (SOA).
Developing and maintaining data integration solutions
Proficient with one or more programming language (e.g. JavaScript, Python, R, .Net, PowerShell, Power BI).
Data Modelling / Simulation
Industry standard Enterprise Architecture Frameworks, (e.g. Zachman, TOGAF).
Working knowledge of:
MS Azure PaaS integration
Big data processing technologies such as Spark or ADLA.
IoT intelligent endpoint configuration and management.
Business Intelligence, Cloud Computing and Analytics/Machine Learning
To Apply, click 'Apply Now'.
You must have current permanent working rights within Australia to be considered for this position."	 - Perth WA	Data ScientistBeacham Group Pty Ltd - Perth WA	Data Scientist
420	"Job Description:About IntellifyIntellify is a data science and machine learning consultancy who helps our customers to increase their growth, operate more efficiently and build competitive advantage. Our team consists of leading data scientists, machine learning engineers and consultants that extensively use advanced (statistical) machine learning and optimisation techniques to create state-of-the-art solutions for business. As an emerging AWS consulting partner, we have the ability to scale our solution to any needs through their cloud platform.About the OpportunityAs we are growing at a rapid speed, we are seeking a senior full-time data scientist/machine learning engineer who has extensive experience in data science, machine learning and/or statistical modelling as well as programming. As part of this role, you will supervise and manage junior data scientists, and work on development to build data science solutions using a combination of the latest technologies and business strategies.With a startup culture and applying cutting-edge technology to real-world business problems, you have the opportunity to drive impact at some of Australia’s leading startups and enterprises as well as to learn and grow within a team of like-minded data scientists. Our client problems have ranged from pricing, inventory and workforce optimisation to computer vision applied to radar data for predictive maintenance. The work is varied and challenging, and will require someone who is dynamic in their thinking as well as willing to explore and try new ideas.Being a senior data scientist at Intellify you are charged with both being a mentor and learning from fellow specialist data scientists in an ever evolving and improving atmosphere. We want to see you thrive professionally and personally as we create a leading data science, machine learning and AI company of the future.What we offerThis is a full-time permanent role. This role will provide a unique opportunity to work in a collaborative team and learn from experienced data scientists, so you can advance your knowledge and get hands-on experience with state-of-the-art machine learning methods. Our salaries are competitive, and we offer flexible working hours. We also believe great data science comes from great teams, so invest continuously in upskilling and cross-training our data scientists, with lunch & learn sessions, training courses and certifications, and an opportunity to be a core part of our data science and machine learning communities. Furthermore, we offer the following:1) 10 x paid days of professional development per year (attend/ speak @ conferences, undertake courses and certifications)2) $2,200 Toolkit allowance to go out and buy your own tech3) Profit sharing4) Work with high-profile clients5) A defined career path with your 1-1 mentor6) Great team culture7) Have an impact in a small team where there is no politics8) Flexible & inclusive work-environment9) Work closely with AWS using cutting edge cloud technologiesRequired Skills: A computer science, robotics, maths, statistics, physics or related degree (graduated Bachelors, MSc, PhD or last year MSc/PhD student)5+ years of applied industry machine learning, optimisation and/or statistics experienceStrong Python or R programming experience and related data science libraries (such as scikit-learn, Pandas, Tensorflow/Keras)Strong SQL database and code versioning (e.g., Git) skillsGood software engineering principlesProject management / team management experienceExperience with data visualisation tools or frameworks i.e. tableau, D3.js, ggplot2 etc.Desirable skills: Knowledge or experience of software engineering practicesKnowledge or experience on time series/product forecasting/recommender systemsKnowledge of deep learning/neural networksExperience working with web development technologiesExperience working with cloud technologies i.e. AWS / Microsoft / Google Cloud.Portfolio evidence of your previous work is appreciated (i.e. blog, github repository, conference presentations etc).How to ApplyIf you wish to take the next step in your career working and learning with the best in an innovative data science company, please click on ""Apply now"" and include:Your CVYour portfolio of projects (eg GitHub, blog site etc)Desired salaryYour availabilityBrief details (3-4 sentences) of either:A machine learning or data science project you have developed or delivered previously; orPrevious team leadership experience, where you worked with a team to deliver a project.We are looking forward to hearing from you.*** STRICTLY NO AGENCIES ***Please note that our Company Policy dictates direct recruitment only.Job Types: Full-time, Part-timeSalary: $120,000.00 to $160,000.00 /yearExperience:machine learning, optimisation and/or statistics: 3 years (Required)"	 - Sydney NSW	Senior Data Scientist/ Machine learning engineerIntellify - Sydney NSW$120,000 - $160,000 a year - Full-time, Part-time	Senior Data Scientist/ Machine learning engineer
422	"There has never been a more exciting time to be part of Domain Group, a dynamic digital media and technology services business and one of Australia's leading property destinations. We provide property advertising and media online, via mobile, social media and in magazines, and technology services to the real estate industry. The business is experiencing rapid growth in digital revenues and investing in all areas to drive future earnings growth. Domain offers a dynamic and innovative culture at the leading edge of digital media in Australia.
We are looking for a lead data scientist to help sales, product and business leadership make decisions with data, give consumers certainty and control when selling their home with a broad mission and build data science and machine learning products to power the next stage of Domain's growth
As part of the Domain Group, you'll have the opportunity to work across all aspects of our property ecosystem, from listing and agent, to consumer behavior, email, and sales data.
What you'll do:
Build scalable models that analyse and extract information from disparate public sources
Develop and improve machine learning algorithms that drive our data pipeline operation
Leverage advanced statistical modeling to improve domain products
Research and implement the latest advances in the world of data
Proven ability to collaboratively and maturely work on a team
Curious with an aptitude to quickly learn
Experience:
At least 3-5 years of industry experience in data science
2+ years of professional experience with Natural Language Processing and/or Image Processing
Thorough knowledge of machine learning modeling processes
Thorough knowledge of supervised and unsupervised learning algorithms
Thorough knowledge of Natural Language Processing
Experience with implementation of Data Systems
Fluency in UNIX, SQL, Python and/or R
Good software engineering principles
Education/Qualifications:
MS or PhD degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Quantitative Psychology or related field.
Portfolio evidence of previous work is appreciated (i.e. blog, GitHub repository, journal/conference publications etc).
So...what happens next?
Once we've received your application we'll give it the attention it deserves and you'll hear from us either way. If you have the right experience, one of our Recruitment Consultants will give you a call (so make sure you keep your phone handy!) and from there we'll support you through the interview process.

Interested?
Go on then, click apply, we'd love to see your application!

A little note to recruitment agencies: We have a superstar recruitment team who are pretty good at filling our own roles, we know you're great at what you do to, but there's no need to get in touch! :)"	 - Sydney NSW	Lead Data ScientistDomain Group6 reviews - Sydney NSWFull-time, Permanent	Lead Data Scientist
423	You remember how to roll up your sleeves and craft data joins in SQL, but you've invested time in learning R, and Python is your friend. You know Hadoop isn't the only approach and you're happiest getting behind the GUI into the real data to uncover the stories.Isn't it about time you took advantage of the benefits from all that knowledge?Our client is looking for data polyglots who enjoy solving complex problems; not the kind you can come to with a canned response, the ones where you really need to use your skills.With some of the biggest names in Australia and around the world throwing their most pressing problems at our client they need curious guides - but they only take the best.Getting in isn't easy, but if it was, it wouldn't be the right place for you.Prove yourself and you can build a team behind you to grow your own patch. The opportunities truly are what you make them.With Udemy on tap, and weekly internal led training sessions, you'll be joining a group of like-minded people who are capable of understanding you when you get on your high horse about relevance over recency (or the other way around).Currently our client has four areas of practice, you can join one these and then explain to them what they need to build another:Data & Analytics - BI/DW, Big Data Analytics, Data Engineering, Data Science and Advanced AnalyticsCustomer Engagement - Marketing Campaigns, Campaign Analysis, Customer InsightsDigital - Full stack Development, UI/UX Design, Mobile DevelopmentCloud & Technology - Cloud Services (AWS, Azure, Google Cloud Platform), Managed ServicesWe're not worried about levels at the moment, if you've got the skills there's a place for you.SEO stuff because you know we need to have it in here;Data engineerData scientistData ConsultantJava, Scala, Python, HadoopApache Spark, Kafka, Hive, Airflow, NiFiAWS, Google Cloud Platform or Azure is helpful but not mandatoryJob Types: Full-time, PermanentExperience:data consulting: 3 years (Preferred)	 - Sydney NSW	Software Architect / Tech LeadKloudPPL - Sydney NSWFull-time, Permanent	Software Architect / Tech Lead
424	"Desirable qualities:
Enthusiastic to learn and grow
Able to structure data for qualitative and quantitative insights.
Inquisitive about emerging and best-of-breed patterns and technologies for effective data handling and exploration.
Possess relevant industry certifications, tertiary qualifications or evidence of ongoing self-initiated learning.
Significant experience in a Data Science or Data focused role (5+ years)
Demonstrated experience with:
Enterprise architecture or solution architecture frameworks, methodologies, templates and tools.
Enterprise service bus (ESB) and service-oriented architecture (SOA).
Developing and maintaining data integration solutions
Proficient with one or more programming language (e.g. JavaScript, Python, R, .Net, PowerShell, Power BI).
Data Modelling / Simulation
Industry standard Enterprise Architecture Frameworks, (e.g. Zachman, TOGAF).
Working knowledge of:
MS Azure PaaS integration
Big data processing technologies such as Spark or ADLA.
IoT intelligent endpoint configuration and management.
Business Intelligence, Cloud Computing and Analytics/Machine Learning
To Apply, click 'Apply Now'.
You must have current permanent working rights within Australia to be considered for this position."	 - Perth WA	Data ScientistBeacham Group Pty Ltd - Perth WA	Data Scientist
425	"Sydney, CBD
Global
$ 160,000 + super + benefits
Our client is a rapidly growing innovative technology company. You will have the opportunity to work in a fast paced environment with very smart and talented people. They don't believe in doing things incrementally - they want to change the game.
The client seeks a Senior Data Scientist who has extensive experience in data science, machine learning and/or statistical modelling as well as programming. As part of this role, you will work on development to build data science solutions using a combination of the latest technologies and business strategies.
To make sparks fly you will have:
10-12 years' experience of building models and deriving insights in a position as a Data Scientist
A degree in a quantitative discipline e.g. Math/Statistics, Engineering, Computer Science, Econometrics, Actuarial etc. is required
Proficiency and experience in statistical modelling and machine learning techniques (feature engineering, regression, classification, segmentation, cross validation, bootstrapping, Bayesian techniques etc.)
A high level of proficiency with at least one programming languages used in data science (R/Python/SAS/Scala).
Experience with visualisation and dashboarding software (Tableau)
Proficiency in dealing with large datasets (data mining etc.)
Proficiency with AWS, Hadoop, Spark, Redshift or other big data platforms
What makes this role shine?
Technology Company
Sydney, CBD based
Excellent $$
Spark your interest?

To find out more about this exciting and challenging role please apply by attaching your resume in MS word format or contact Shobie on 02 8090 7785"	 - Sydney Central Business District NSW	Senior Data ScientistSpark Recruitment - Sydney Central Business District NSW$160,000 a year - Permanent	Senior Data Scientist
426	"Immediate hiring
Perm with FinXL and contracting options available
NV1 clearance
FinXL IT Professional Services is an established innovative Australian company providing technology enabled business solutions and consulting services across a number of industries including Government, Telecommunications, Commercial and Finance. We currently have more than 850 consultants assisting our clients across Australia and are continuing to grow at a rapid pace. Through the delivery of services and implementation of new systems, processes and technology, we assist our clients to gain competitive advantage and reach new heights.
The Role:
FinXL is looking to engage a Data Scientist to join our client's team and work in a cross disciplined team to deliver project outcomes.
To be successful in this role:
Degree in data science (machine learning, artificial intelligence) or a related field e.g. applied mathematics, statistics, computer science, or equivalent industry experience.
Industry experience in delivering data science solutions to improve business outcomes.
Industry experience in development of big data analytics solutions using Scala and Apache Spark
Industry experience in programming using one or more of R, Python or Scala in creating complex analytic models
Industry experience in breaking down and communicating complex technical information to business users and senior management.
FinXL fosters a high-performing, inclusive workplace built on a foundation of excellence, respect and dignity. We take corporate social responsibility seriously through our ongoing activities with communities and staff involvement in these efforts. We are committed to environmentally friendly practices in both our own operations and our work with clients.
To be considered please send applications to anua@finxl.com.au or contact Anu Ananth on 02 6243 6455 to discuss further.
FinXL does not accept unsolicited resumes or appreciate unsolicited calls from recruitment agencies.
FinXL encourages applications from Aboriginal and Torres Strait Islander people."	 - Canberra ACT	Data ScientistFinite IT - Canberra ACTPermanent	Data Scientist
427	"Are you an eager data / insights analyst or aspiring Data Scientist?

Do you have an agency or consulting background, and are used to working with a range of different clients but are now looking to further your career within a fast growing, digital company providing cutting edge insights to a range of customers across the retail & hospitality sector?

Then this may just be the job for you…!

This company provides cutting edge, real time data insights for a range of national & international clients in the retail & hospitality space

You will be responsible for delivering actionable and in-depth data analysis and recommendations to their clients helping them to better understand and meet the needs of their consumers and grow their revenue.

A perfect role for someone who has been part of a big team and now wants to take more responsibility, more interaction with clients and take a step towards more data consultancy and statistical analysis!

Your skills
Experience in analysing customer sentiment, with a strong pref. of working in the hospitality, retail or similar environment.
Experience in defining data-driven strategies based on analytics and insights with the ability to interpret research and extract and communicate insights
Experience in mining relational databases using SQL, using business intelligence tools like Power BI, Tableau and statistical languages like R & Python
Any experience in statistical techniques (e.g. regression models, clustering, statistical tests etc) a huge benefit, or a desire to move towards this.

Above all, you’ll want to be part of a growing firm! The company is expanding & have an international presence in Aus, UK & the US. It’s a great time to join a great team!

Apply now!"	 - Sydney NSW	Senior Analytics & Insights ConsultantFernway - Sydney NSW$80,000 - $110,000 a year	Senior Analytics & Insights Consultant
428	"Data Architect

About our Client:

My client is global leader in technology and Big Data Architecture with operations in over 20 countries. They are looking to grow their Big Data Engineering capability with in their Melbourne Office.

The Role:
A Data Architect with strong development capability is needed to join a market leading Big Data team, building enterprise level market leading Data Solutions.
Experience:
Proven experience as a hands-on data scientist, formulating and delivering strategy and data solutions8-10 years of experience working with Java, J2EE Technologies.At least 5 + years of hands-on development in Big data systems using Spark, Pig, Hive, MapReduce, SparkSQL, Apache Nifi, Kakfa etcExperience working with Shell, Python, Hadoop Cluster configurationHands on data modelling experience, specifically operational and dimensional modelling for data warehousesAt least 5 years of experience in Design and warehouse architecture.Demonstrated experience in the use of data science and analytics capability to enhance business decision making.Using analytics finding to select key features relevant for building analytic systems/machine learning models (Feature engineering)

About You:

With both permanent and contract positions available we encourage candidates with skills in the above area to contact the team at Hydrogen for confidential discussions. We are seeking intellectually capable, personable and change driven individuals who want to be part of a market leading consulting organisation. First class communication skills in both the written and verbal form will be required.

What's on offer?

The opportunity to work with world class thought leaders in the digital transformation, Big data, Data science, RPA and AI space. International and local career progression.

Competitive salaries depending on experience (roles range from $150,000 + super – 160,000 + super and bonus).
 #LI-MP3 #LI-96"	 - Melbourne VIC	Big Data ArchitectHydrogen Group6 reviews - Melbourne VIC$150,000 a year - Permanent	Big Data Architect
429	"We are a diverse team of world-leading researchers, doctors, engineers, and enthusiastic professionals in corporate and scientific services (communications, IT, HR and financial experts to name a few!) from all corners of the world with one shared goal - to transform child health worldwide.
We have access to amazing facilities and technologies. We work with “rock stars of medical research” and we collaborate with countries all over the world for one purpose: We want all children to have the opportunity to live a healthy and fulfilled life.
What is it like to work for us?
We are a very diverse and inclusive organisation and we are inspired by people who are resourceful, imaginative, self-motivated, energised by making the world better, and who believe in the benefit of collective effort. Working here is interesting, challenging and rewarding. Our people are our biggest asset and we have a vast range of benefits to support them:
Salary packaging
Yoga, Pilates & Mindfulness sessions
On-site gym
Employee Assistance Program


About the Opportunity?
Biostatistician (Research Assistant)

We currently require a Full Time Biostatistician (Research Assistant) on a 12 month contract (which may extend beyond the initial term, depending on organisational requirements) to join the Clinical Epidemiology & Biostatistics team (CEBU).
We are seeking to recruit a junior biostatistician/data scientist to contribute across a wide range of biostatistical work, providing support in data processing and statistical analysis under supervision to a range of projects across CEBU’s diverse work program. The role will require strong statistical computing skills, including good programming practices, as well as strong communication skills and interest in engaging actively in a range of problems and learning about new statistical methods. There will also be an opportunity for the candidate to gain experience in methodological research into methods for handling missing data. The position reports to two senior CEBU statisticians.
Responsibilities:
Perform data processing and statistical analysis under supervision of more experienced analysts.
Assist in the preparation of material, including graphical and tabular presentations, for peer-review manuscripts, reports, meetings, publications and seminars as appropriate.
Contribute to CEBU’s teaching program, for example by participating in the delivery of computer-based training courses (Stata, R).
Provide advice and assistance where appropriate on questionnaire design, data management, statistical computing including good programming practice, and methods of analysis to researchers.
Learning about statistical methods for life-course epidemiology and for handling missing data.
Other duties as required from time to time, consistent with the skills and abilities of the employee.


Key Selection Criteria
To be successful in this role you will have:
Essential:
A degree, preferably at Masters level or higher, in statistics or biostatistics or closely related field.
Good understanding of the principles of common statistical methods (e.g. regression analysis).
Familiarity with the Stata statistical package (or demonstrable capacity to develop this quickly).
Strong communication skills including the ability to work across diverse multidisciplinary teams.
Ability to read about and learn new statistical methodology.
Working with Children & National Police Clearance (if appointed) in compliance with the Victorian Governments Child Safety Standards.


Desirable:
Familiarity with data analysis in health and medical research.
Experience with applying statistical methods in clinical and health research.
Skills in data management, cleaning and data processing for research studies, with good programming skills in a statistical software package.


Only applicants who address the key selection criteria will be considered. Please place your responses to the key selection criteria at the end of your cover letter. For more information on this position please contact A/Prof Susan Donath: susan.donath@mcri.edu.au
Please note, applications will only be considered when submitted via the MCRI website. Please click apply to proceed with your application.
Salary Range: $80,128 - $90,912 per annum plus super
Closing Date: 5pm Friday 26 October 2018
Position Reference: 15605"	 - Parkville VIC	Biostatistician (Research Assistant)Murdoch Childrens Research Institute - Parkville VIC$80,128 - $90,912 a year	Biostatistician (Research Assistant)
430	"Our Client seeks a Data Scientist with Pre Sales or Consulting experience to join their Enterprise Information Management team and work with the Pre Sales division to develop custom built Data models for a range of EIM top tier Clients.

You will be a core member of the customer solution team, analyzing complex customer requirements to provide unique solutions for their Enterprise Information Data.

You will be hands on in developing predictive modeling concepts and optimisation algorithms within complex environments. Provide technical know how to deliver successful solutions to large corporations and government agencies.

Create and build solutions to meet unique customer focused business requirements and insights.

Help develop best practices for implementation projects.

You will possess at least 2 years experience within either an Analytics or Data Science working environment.

Experience in Spark with PySpark, Scala, SparkR specifically and ample experience in Python and R.
Experience working with large, multi-dimensional datasets.
Experience or an interest in Deep Learning, AI and Neural Networks.
Experience creating meaningful data visualisations and exposure to analysing unstructured content.
If this sounds like a role that fits your profile or would like to know more please click APPLY NOW below or email james@counterpointgroup.com.au for more details."	 - Sydney NSW	Data Scientist - Sydney, permanent, Spark, Scala, Python - build custom modelsCounterpoint - Sydney NSW$160,000 a year - Full-time, Permanent	Data Scientist - Sydney, permanent, Spark, Scala, Python - build custom models
431	"Progressive Government Department
Initial 12 Month Contract + long term Extension
Rewarding Hourly Rates $$
A highly regarded Federal Government Departments is looking to engage an experienced Data Scientist to join a highly skilled team involved in understanding business needs. You will be responsible for developing machine learning models and other analytical solutions to solve problems using data science techniques. The successful Data Scientist will be offered an Initial 12 month contract + Extension at a premium hourly rate.

The successful Data Scientist will be responsible for, but not limited to ;
Using statistical and data mining techniques to analyse data to provide insights into current and emerging ML/TF risks and issues
Developing, implementing, deploying, testing and evaluating machine learning models to model risk
Conducting detailed analysis and other data to support the development of risk assessments
Performing data wrangling and creating data pipelines, integrating diverse disparate datasets
Appling advanced data science techniques i.e. machine learning, graph analytics, data visualisation, text analytics plus development of custom algorithms

The successful Data Scientist must have experience in the following
Industry experience in development of big data analytics solutions using Scala and Apache Spark
Demonstrated Industry experience in programming using one or more of R, Python or Scala in creating complex analytic models
Knowledge and experience in delivering data science solutions to improve business outcomes
Degree in data science (machine learning, artificial intelligence) or a related field e.g. applied mathematics, statistics, computer science is a bonus
This is a rare opportunity for an experienced Data Scientist to join a reputable organisation. The successful Data Scientist will be offered an initial 12 Month Contract + extension at a competitive hourly rate. If you have the required skills, DON'T DELAY, APPLY NOW please forward your resume to jobs@hitechaust.com quoting reference number LS0485 for further information."	 - Canberra ACT	Data ScientistHiTech Personnel - Canberra ACTContract	Data Scientist
432	"Must be Australian Citizen

We are looking for an experienced Data Scientist to work in a cross disciplined team to deliver project outcomes. The role involves gaining an understanding of business needs, and developing machine learning models and other analytics solutions to solve problems using data and robust data science techniques.

Essential skills and experience

Degree in data science (machine learning, artificial intelligence) or a related field e.g. applied mathematics, statistics, computer science, or equivalent industry experience.
Industry experience in delivering data science solutions to improve business outcomes.
Industry experience in development of big data analytics solutions using Scala and Apache Spark.
Industry experience in programming using one or more of R, Python or Scala in creating complex analytic models.
Industry experience in breaking down and communicating complex technical information to business users and senior management.
Nice-to-have skills and experience

Post-graduate degree in data science (machine learning, artificial intelligence) or a related field e.g. applied mathematics, statistics, computer science, or equivalent industry experience.
Experience with federal government and financial/banking sector projects."	 - Canberra ACT	Data scientistPowerdata Group Consulting - Canberra ACT	Data scientist
433	"Our client is seeking a Data Scientist for a 12 month contract + extension

Citizenship requirements: Australian citizens with NV1 clearance

Location: Canberra

You will have:
Degree in Data Science or related field
Experience in development of Big Data analytics
Proficiency in using one or more of R, Python or Scala
If this role is of interest to you, please APPLY NOW, or contact Sumedha Bohra on 02 6113 7521 or via email on sumedha.bohra @igniteservices .com"	 - Canberra ACT	Data ScientistIgnite Specialist Recruitment Services - Canberra ACTContract	Data Scientist
434	"Job Description:About IntellifyIntellify is a data science and machine learning consultancy who helps our customers to increase their growth, operate more efficiently and build competitive advantage. Our team consists of leading data scientists, machine learning engineers and consultants that extensively use advanced (statistical) machine learning and optimisation techniques to create state-of-the-art solutions for business. As an emerging AWS consulting partner, we have the ability to scale our solution to any needs through their cloud platform.About the OpportunityAs we are growing at a rapid speed, we are seeking a senior full-time data scientist/machine learning engineer who has extensive experience in data science, machine learning and/or statistical modelling as well as programming. As part of this role, you will supervise and manage junior data scientists, and work on development to build data science solutions using a combination of the latest technologies and business strategies.With a startup culture and applying cutting-edge technology to real-world business problems, you have the opportunity to drive impact at some of Australia’s leading startups and enterprises as well as to learn and grow within a team of like-minded data scientists. Our client problems have ranged from pricing, inventory and workforce optimisation to computer vision applied to radar data for predictive maintenance. The work is varied and challenging, and will require someone who is dynamic in their thinking as well as willing to explore and try new ideas.Being a senior data scientist at Intellify you are charged with both being a mentor and learning from fellow specialist data scientists in an ever evolving and improving atmosphere. We want to see you thrive professionally and personally as we create a leading data science, machine learning and AI company of the future.What we offerThis is a full-time permanent role. This role will provide a unique opportunity to work in a collaborative team and learn from experienced data scientists, so you can advance your knowledge and get hands-on experience with state-of-the-art machine learning methods. Our salaries are competitive, and we offer flexible working hours. We also believe great data science comes from great teams, so invest continuously in upskilling and cross-training our data scientists, with lunch & learn sessions, training courses and certifications, and an opportunity to be a core part of our data science and machine learning communities. Furthermore, we offer the following:1) 10 x paid days of professional development per year (attend/ speak @ conferences, undertake courses and certifications)2) $2,200 Toolkit allowance to go out and buy your own tech3) Profit sharing4) Work with high-profile clients5) A defined career path with your 1-1 mentor6) Great team culture7) Have an impact in a small team where there is no politics8) Flexible & inclusive work-environment9) Work closely with AWS using cutting edge cloud technologiesRequired Skills: A computer science, robotics, maths, statistics, physics or related degree (graduated Bachelors, MSc, PhD or last year MSc/PhD student)5+ years of applied industry machine learning, optimisation and/or statistics experienceStrong Python or R programming experience and related data science libraries (such as scikit-learn, Pandas, Tensorflow/Keras)Strong SQL database and code versioning (e.g., Git) skillsGood software engineering principlesProject management / team management experienceExperience with data visualisation tools or frameworks i.e. tableau, D3.js, ggplot2 etc.Desirable skills: Knowledge or experience of software engineering practicesKnowledge or experience on time series/product forecasting/recommender systemsKnowledge of deep learning/neural networksExperience working with web development technologiesExperience working with cloud technologies i.e. AWS / Microsoft / Google Cloud.Portfolio evidence of your previous work is appreciated (i.e. blog, github repository, conference presentations etc).How to ApplyIf you wish to take the next step in your career working and learning with the best in an innovative data science company, please click on ""Apply now"" and include:Your CVYour portfolio of projects (eg GitHub, blog site etc)Desired salaryYour availabilityBrief details (3-4 sentences) of either:A machine learning or data science project you have developed or delivered previously; orPrevious team leadership experience, where you worked with a team to deliver a project.We are looking forward to hearing from you.*** STRICTLY NO AGENCIES ***Please note that our Company Policy dictates direct recruitment only.Job Types: Full-time, Part-timeSalary: $120,000.00 to $160,000.00 /yearExperience:machine learning, optimisation and/or statistics: 3 years (Required)"	 - Sydney NSW	Senior Data Scientist/ Machine learning engineerIntellify - Sydney NSW$120,000 - $160,000 a year - Full-time, Part-time	Senior Data Scientist/ Machine learning engineer
435	Job DescriptionThe candidate is a skilled data scientist who will be building deep learning models for medical image diagnosis applications such as segmentation, localisation and classification of abnormalities.ResponsibilitiesThe candidate will write high quality model with high performance and good memory management, together with state-of-the-art accuracies and embed into our proprietary software. Our aim is to align you with the activities which truly interest you; will stretch you technically; help you grow and impact on billions of patients.RequirementsBachelor / Master / PhD in engineering or computer science or mathematics or physicsKnows computer vision / image segmentation, localization, classificationKnows tensorflow or theano or torchStrong python, C++ or java coderGood knowledge of numpy, pandas, sklearn, scipy, seabornKnows how to build deep learning models like RNN and CNN and other neural network models.May require to relocate to China, Beijing.What We OfferMaster, Teach, Learn – The opportunity to work with, learn from and share knowledge with ultra-smart colleagues in a culture of collaboration and technical excellence. We groom our employees and make sure that they stay at the cutting edge of the technology stack.Impact – Huge potential to make a positive contribution across our business, people and partnersRemuneration – Competitive pay with share award for top performers.We are willing to groom engineers and fresh graduates who don’t have a background in deep learning but are interested to learn. You will also have the opportunity to attend top machine learning conferences like NIPS and ICML.Job Types: Full-time, Permanent	 - Sydney NSW	BioMind Data Scientist/Engineer (Relocate to Beijing)biomind.ai - Sydney NSWFull-time, Permanent	BioMind Data Scientist/Engineer (Relocate to Beijing)
436	"Deloitte is the world’s largest professional service firm, with one of the largest and most experienced Analytics, Information Management (AIM) & Data Automation practices. We have 400+ specialised consultants in Australia and more than 6,000 practitioners in the Deloitte global network.
With the ever increasing complexity and volume of data, the rise of in-memory, high performance computing, data discovery and visualisation solutions and the convergence of Big Data and Advanced Analytics, organisations are faced with increasing number of choices to ensure they are able to exploit their data assets for maximum advantage. Deloitte is able to draw from its vast global experience delivering complex data driven solutions for our clients across the full spectrum of technology and business domains to provide the right strategic advice to help an organisation respond effectively to these changes – as well as partner with our clients to execute on our recommendations.
About the Role
Do you want to be a part of how we help companies utilise their valuable data resources through effective use of the right technology, backed by a clear vision and strong executive sponsorship? Do you want to be part of an award winning team that provides clients with a visionary, yet balanced and pragmatic approach to automating concepts and tools to improve productivity and performance?
This is an opportunity to harness emerging technologies and analytical methodologies to solve real world problems. You will be part of a close, collaborative team that identifies and builds solutions that are practical as well as visionary, and that make an impact that matters.
We are looking for people who love data and want to solve problems with insight. Whether you call yourself a data scientist, analytics nerd or builder of predictive models. We want to hear from you if you are genuinely passionate about this area and have some applied experience.
You will be responsible for delivering insights through a range of corporate data sources through the application of analytics, data mining, Big Data and real-time decision making techniques and applications using various data management, analytics & data visualization tools.
About You
You’ll bring experience in one or more of the following competencies and enabling technologies
A strong background in applying mathematical and analytics approaches and methodologies to identifying complex relationships in data
Ability to communicate technical requirements and outputs in a clear and concise manner
A structured, logical and solution-oriented design mindset
Ability to work autonomously and with minimal oversight
Ability to demonstrate initiative and ownership in the completion of tasks
A demonstrable interest and passion for exploring new data/analytics concepts, applications and innovations (e.g. Cognitive, Robotics & Automate, AI, IoT etc.)
Some experience using a range of scripting languages – (e.g. Python, R, SQL etc.)
About Us: Deloitte Culture
Join a high performing culture of talented people, who are highly motivated and passionate about delivering impactful analytics solutions and insight. We are innovative and different because YOU are… we pride ourselves on our team of diverse, high performing Deloitte Professionals who are talented, supportive, inclusive and social – and who are at the heart of our success. Our aim is to ensure that all our people feel comfortable to bring their whole selves to work, and as a result, build a workplace that encourages the true spirit of 'And different'.
From day one at our firm you’ll be considered part of the Deloitte community and our development and career progression framework will help you develop the skills and capabilities that will set you up to succeed – in every sense of the word. At Deloitte, we assume that you perform other roles within your life…you could be a student, a teacher, a passionate hobbyist and a caring family member. We recognise the importance of balance and embrace agility, understanding that this means different things to each and every one of our employees.
If you have questions regarding this role, the Talent Acquisition Team is available to have a confidential discussion. Please contact Aditi Aggarwal via the Our Recruiters section on our careers website."	 - Sydney NSW	EXPRESSION OF INTEREST - Data & Analytics - NationalDeloitte7,167 reviews - Sydney NSW	EXPRESSION OF INTEREST - Data & Analytics - National
438	"Job Description:About IntellifyIntellify is a data science and machine learning consultancy who helps our customers to increase their growth, operate more efficiently and build competitive advantage. Our team consists of leading data scientists, machine learning engineers and consultants that extensively use advanced (statistical) machine learning and optimisation techniques to create state-of-the-art solutions for business. As an emerging AWS consulting partner, we have the ability to scale our solution to any needs through their cloud platform.About the OpportunityAs we are growing at a rapid speed, we are seeking a senior full-time data scientist/machine learning engineer who has extensive experience in data science, machine learning and/or statistical modelling as well as programming. As part of this role, you will supervise and manage junior data scientists, and work on development to build data science solutions using a combination of the latest technologies and business strategies.With a startup culture and applying cutting-edge technology to real-world business problems, you have the opportunity to drive impact at some of Australia’s leading startups and enterprises as well as to learn and grow within a team of like-minded data scientists. Our client problems have ranged from pricing, inventory and workforce optimisation to computer vision applied to radar data for predictive maintenance. The work is varied and challenging, and will require someone who is dynamic in their thinking as well as willing to explore and try new ideas.Being a senior data scientist at Intellify you are charged with both being a mentor and learning from fellow specialist data scientists in an ever evolving and improving atmosphere. We want to see you thrive professionally and personally as we create a leading data science, machine learning and AI company of the future.What we offerThis is a full-time permanent role. This role will provide a unique opportunity to work in a collaborative team and learn from experienced data scientists, so you can advance your knowledge and get hands-on experience with state-of-the-art machine learning methods. Our salaries are competitive, and we offer flexible working hours. We also believe great data science comes from great teams, so invest continuously in upskilling and cross-training our data scientists, with lunch & learn sessions, training courses and certifications, and an opportunity to be a core part of our data science and machine learning communities. Furthermore, we offer the following:1) 10 x paid days of professional development per year (attend/ speak @ conferences, undertake courses and certifications)2) $2,200 Toolkit allowance to go out and buy your own tech3) Profit sharing4) Work with high-profile clients5) A defined career path with your 1-1 mentor6) Great team culture7) Have an impact in a small team where there is no politics8) Flexible & inclusive work-environment9) Work closely with AWS using cutting edge cloud technologiesRequired Skills: A computer science, robotics, maths, statistics, physics or related degree (graduated Bachelors, MSc, PhD or last year MSc/PhD student)5+ years of applied industry machine learning, optimisation and/or statistics experienceStrong Python or R programming experience and related data science libraries (such as scikit-learn, Pandas, Tensorflow/Keras)Strong SQL database and code versioning (e.g., Git) skillsGood software engineering principlesProject management / team management experienceExperience with data visualisation tools or frameworks i.e. tableau, D3.js, ggplot2 etc.Desirable skills: Knowledge or experience of software engineering practicesKnowledge or experience on time series/product forecasting/recommender systemsKnowledge of deep learning/neural networksExperience working with web development technologiesExperience working with cloud technologies i.e. AWS / Microsoft / Google Cloud.Portfolio evidence of your previous work is appreciated (i.e. blog, github repository, conference presentations etc).How to ApplyIf you wish to take the next step in your career working and learning with the best in an innovative data science company, please click on ""Apply now"" and include:Your CVYour portfolio of projects (eg GitHub, blog site etc)Desired salaryYour availabilityBrief details (3-4 sentences) of either:A machine learning or data science project you have developed or delivered previously; orPrevious team leadership experience, where you worked with a team to deliver a project.We are looking forward to hearing from you.*** STRICTLY NO AGENCIES ***Please note that our Company Policy dictates direct recruitment only.Job Types: Full-time, Part-timeSalary: $120,000.00 to $160,000.00 /yearExperience:machine learning, optimisation and/or statistics: 3 years (Required)"	 - Sydney NSW	Senior Data Scientist/ Machine learning engineerIntellify - Sydney NSW$120,000 - $160,000 a year - Full-time, Part-time	Senior Data Scientist/ Machine learning engineer
439	"Deloitte is the world’s largest professional service firm, with one of the largest and most experienced Analytics, Information Management (AIM) & Data Automation practices. We have 400+ specialised consultants in Australia and more than 6,000 practitioners in the Deloitte global network.
With the ever increasing complexity and volume of data, the rise of in-memory, high performance computing, data discovery and visualisation solutions and the convergence of Big Data and Advanced Analytics, organisations are faced with increasing number of choices to ensure they are able to exploit their data assets for maximum advantage. Deloitte is able to draw from its vast global experience delivering complex data driven solutions for our clients across the full spectrum of technology and business domains to provide the right strategic advice to help an organisation respond effectively to these changes – as well as partner with our clients to execute on our recommendations.
About the Role
Do you want to be a part of how we help companies utilise their valuable data resources through effective use of the right technology, backed by a clear vision and strong executive sponsorship? Do you want to be part of an award winning team that provides clients with a visionary, yet balanced and pragmatic approach to automating concepts and tools to improve productivity and performance?
This is an opportunity to harness emerging technologies and analytical methodologies to solve real world problems. You will be part of a close, collaborative team that identifies and builds solutions that are practical as well as visionary, and that make an impact that matters.
We are looking for people who love data and want to solve problems with insight. Whether you call yourself a data scientist, analytics nerd or builder of predictive models. We want to hear from you if you are genuinely passionate about this area and have some applied experience.
You will be responsible for delivering insights through a range of corporate data sources through the application of analytics, data mining, Big Data and real-time decision making techniques and applications using various data management, analytics & data visualization tools.
About You
You’ll bring experience in one or more of the following competencies and enabling technologies
A strong background in applying mathematical and analytics approaches and methodologies to identifying complex relationships in data
Ability to communicate technical requirements and outputs in a clear and concise manner
A structured, logical and solution-oriented design mindset
Ability to work autonomously and with minimal oversight
Ability to demonstrate initiative and ownership in the completion of tasks
A demonstrable interest and passion for exploring new data/analytics concepts, applications and innovations (e.g. Cognitive, Robotics & Automate, AI, IoT etc.)
Some experience using a range of scripting languages – (e.g. Python, R, SQL etc.)
About Us: Deloitte Culture
Join a high performing culture of talented people, who are highly motivated and passionate about delivering impactful analytics solutions and insight. We are innovative and different because YOU are… we pride ourselves on our team of diverse, high performing Deloitte Professionals who are talented, supportive, inclusive and social – and who are at the heart of our success. Our aim is to ensure that all our people feel comfortable to bring their whole selves to work, and as a result, build a workplace that encourages the true spirit of 'And different'.
From day one at our firm you’ll be considered part of the Deloitte community and our development and career progression framework will help you develop the skills and capabilities that will set you up to succeed – in every sense of the word. At Deloitte, we assume that you perform other roles within your life…you could be a student, a teacher, a passionate hobbyist and a caring family member. We recognise the importance of balance and embrace agility, understanding that this means different things to each and every one of our employees.
If you have questions regarding this role, the Talent Acquisition Team is available to have a confidential discussion. Please contact Aditi Aggarwal via the Our Recruiters section on our careers website."	 - Sydney NSW	EXPRESSION OF INTEREST - Data & Analytics - NationalDeloitte7,167 reviews - Sydney NSW	EXPRESSION OF INTEREST - Data & Analytics - National
440	Job DescriptionThe candidate is a skilled data scientist who will be building deep learning models for medical image diagnosis applications such as segmentation, localisation and classification of abnormalities.ResponsibilitiesThe candidate will write high quality model with high performance and good memory management, together with state-of-the-art accuracies and embed into our proprietary software. Our aim is to align you with the activities which truly interest you; will stretch you technically; help you grow and impact on billions of patients.RequirementsBachelor / Master / PhD in engineering or computer science or mathematics or physicsKnows computer vision / image segmentation, localization, classificationKnows tensorflow or theano or torchStrong python, C++ or java coderGood knowledge of numpy, pandas, sklearn, scipy, seabornKnows how to build deep learning models like RNN and CNN and other neural network models.May require to relocate to China, Beijing.What We OfferMaster, Teach, Learn – The opportunity to work with, learn from and share knowledge with ultra-smart colleagues in a culture of collaboration and technical excellence. We groom our employees and make sure that they stay at the cutting edge of the technology stack.Impact – Huge potential to make a positive contribution across our business, people and partnersRemuneration – Competitive pay with share award for top performers.We are willing to groom engineers and fresh graduates who don’t have a background in deep learning but are interested to learn. You will also have the opportunity to attend top machine learning conferences like NIPS and ICML.Job Types: Full-time, Permanent	 - Sydney NSW	BioMind Data Scientist/Engineer (Relocate to Beijing)biomind.ai - Sydney NSWFull-time, Permanent	BioMind Data Scientist/Engineer (Relocate to Beijing)
441	"Data analysis, feature engineering and deep learning using Big Data
Prominent identity authentication company securing the internet
Work with a great team solving practical problems
Bring your data science experience to the practical problems of securing the internet. The data science team wants to expend into the Sydney development office, and we need you to help the development team understand the new features, data techniques and models that will improve the reliability, security and speed of the next generation of digital authentication products.
You should be a clear thinker, able to understand complex algorithms and give cogent explanations to highly intelligent non-specialists. We also need you to understand the issues they are encountering, and feed that back to the rest of the data science team.
Effective English communications skills
Experience with big data packages such as Hadoop, Spark and Kafka
Strong Python programming skills, and experience with machine learning and scientific frameworks and libraries
Hands-on experience understanding and finding anomalies in large historical data sets
Deep understanding of feature engineering and variable selection
Practical understanding of machine learning models
Java/Linux programming skills
Experience in IT security or fraud detection is highly desirable.
Qualifications:
PhD or MSc in Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Operations Research or a related field
Demonstrated aptitude for improving the efficiency of complex algorithms and working with large data sets in a commercial setting.
MCS Consulting has been a trusted Recruitment advocate for over 25 years to many companies in high value Manufacturing, Finance, R&D, IT&T and Government.

We have an effective personal and honest approach that really makes the difference.

Kevin Moore ; 02-9481 8888 job KM:THETIS. SK923550A
Please send your resume ASAP

A WORD CV IS ESSENTIAL !

A Suburb/Address helps us locate you for roles close to home and often unlocks those hidden jobs.


www.mcs-consulting.com.au

We are more than happy to discuss career aspirations.
At MCS we are here to help, not just recruit"	 - North Shore NSW	Data ScientistMCS Consulting5 reviews - North Shore NSW	Data Scientist
442	"Data Scientist

This leading financial services group finds itself extremely well positioned in the current climate and is currently looking to appoint an energetic and high performing several Data Scientists on a permanent basis to help roll out big data platform and engage with analytics community.

The purpose of the role is;

Application of data mining, predictive analytics and machine learning techniques to support Product, Marketing and Distribution teams to make more informed decisions.
Data scientists will work closely with business partners to understand the business objectives and challenges and helps to design analytical solutions to meet business goals.
The ideal candidate is adept at using large data sets and streaming data to find opportunities to help optimise portfolio performance, identify customer needs and test the effectiveness of different courses of action.
They must have strong experience using a variety of data mining/data analytics methods, using a variety of analytics tools, building and implementing models.
They must have a proven ability to drive business results with their data-based insights and must be comfortable working with a wide range of stakeholders and functional teams.
The right candidate will have a passion for discovering solutions and working with business stakeholders to improve business outcomes.

This is a great role where you will work closely with the business and be pivotal in producing information that can drive the way the business is run. It is incredibly commercial and requires someone just as commercial to come on board.

Qualifications and Key skills

Tertiary education in the Science, Technology, Engineering or Mathematics disciplines
3 + years’ experience in statistical modelling in a big data environment (Hadoop/Spark/R/Python).
Experience using statistical computer languages (R, Python, SQL, etc.) to manipulate data and draw insights from large data sets.
Knowledge of a variety of statistical and data mining techniques (regression, statistical tests and proper usage, random forest, clustering, decision tree learning, deep learning text mining etc.) and their real-world advantages/drawbacks.
Experience of applying machine learning techniques in solving real life problems, preferably in the business or banking domains.


These roles require full working rights and the ability. If you are interested in the role, please apply today or contact Adam at adam@talenza.com.au"	 - Sydney NSW	Data ScientistTalenza - Sydney NSWPermanent	Data Scientist
443	"Desirable qualities:
Enthusiastic to learn and grow
Able to structure data for qualitative and quantitative insights.
Inquisitive about emerging and best-of-breed patterns and technologies for effective data handling and exploration.
Possess relevant industry certifications, tertiary qualifications or evidence of ongoing self-initiated learning.
Significant experience in a Data Science or Data focused role (5+ years)
Demonstrated experience with:
Enterprise architecture or solution architecture frameworks, methodologies, templates and tools.
Enterprise service bus (ESB) and service-oriented architecture (SOA).
Developing and maintaining data integration solutions
Proficient with one or more programming language (e.g. JavaScript, Python, R, .Net, PowerShell, Power BI).
Data Modelling / Simulation
Industry standard Enterprise Architecture Frameworks, (e.g. Zachman, TOGAF).
Working knowledge of:
MS Azure PaaS integration
Big data processing technologies such as Spark or ADLA.
IoT intelligent endpoint configuration and management.
Business Intelligence, Cloud Computing and Analytics/Machine Learning
To Apply, click 'Apply Now'.
You must have current permanent working rights within Australia to be considered for this position."	 - Perth WA	Data ScientistBeacham Group Pty Ltd - Perth WA	Data Scientist
444	"The Company

This rapidly growing Australian consulting startup has devised a game-changing advanced analytic tool that is set to disrupt the market.

The company prides itself on innovating customer centric solutions for its client base and is progressive, forward-thinking and pushing technology. There is an engaging culture with a large focus on learning and development as well as being entrepreneurial and ceasing opportunities.

As a result of strong growth, an opportunity has arisen for a Junior Data Scientist looking be a pivotal member of this collaborative and creative culture.


The Opportunity

As a Junior Data Scientist, your responsibilities and learning will include:
Partnering with world-class business leaders, tech leaders and experts to drive business performance and create deep insights; especially through the marketing and customer analytics arena
Solve business problems and identify opportunities, influence key decisions through your findings and tools
Concepts of learning and application can range anywhere from BI, building Machine Learning models, statistical analysis, visualisation
Build data products - ranging from customer segmentation, predictive modelling, statistical modelling and utilising machine learning techniques and algorithms
Assist with the building and development of analytical solutions for the wider business
Build reports, visualisations and dashboards
Collaborate with engineers, tech specialists, product owners and senior stakeholders.



Skills and Experience
Bachelor, Master or PhD in the areas of Statistics, Mathematics, Physics, Computer Science, Data Science or related areas
Some experience with statistical modelling, machine learning
Some experience with programming languages such as R and Python
Some experience with SQL for data querying
Overall, you may have up to 1.5-2 years' experience as a Data Scientist/upcoming Data Scientist



What's in it for you?
Work with a leadership group who is agile, fluid and has great vision for you and the business
Investment in training in development extends to more than just technical skills
Partner with some of the largest companies in Australia; with diverse industries"	 - Sydney NSW	Junior Data ScientistEvolution Recruitment Solutions - Sydney NSWPermanent	Junior Data Scientist
445	"The Senior Digital Anlayst develops strategic insights around consumer, marketplace and yield performance for our advertising revenues and supports our advertising team.

You will work as part of the Finance, Analytics and Strategy team based in Sydney. Their team’s mission is to enable quicker and better decisions. You will be part of a global analytics community and work closely with other
analytics teams in the group.

Responsibilities:
Provide clear narrative on key drivers / anchors and their relative contribution to advertising business performance
Partner with BU leaders to tackle strategic challenges and guide strategic response via advanced analytical methods
Develop robust demand forecasts and track performance to forecast
Lead problem solving with curiosity and creativity to drive concise and actionable recommendations
Develop a deep understanding of customer, advertiser and partnership dynamics
Test and optimise pricing (in the form of programmatic advertising and listing featured pricing) to deliver optimal yield performance &amp; user experience across all user touch points and platforms
Drive sales revenue by providing robust pricing strategies through accurate pricing and inventory analysis
Set up and maintain tracking requirements to ensure that complete data sets are fed to our central data warehouse for automated reporting
Develop and maintain necessary dashboards to provide insight and drive business decisions
Job Requirements:
Minimum 5 years within the digital media analytics space
A strong academic profile with an advanced degree in Mathematics, Statistics, Econometrics, Engineering or related degree
Proven track record in distilling insights from large scale data analysis and robust predictive models
Expert level skills in Google Analytics, Google DFP, SQL, Hadoop, R/Python, Tableau, Excel and PowerPoint
Exceptional intellectual curiosity, a passion for problem solving and comfortable working w/ ambiguity
Advanced communication skills and business acumen to deliver powerful insights and presentations
Strong interpersonal skills, initiative and integrity
The ideal candidate for the position will have experience in consulting, or the equivalent, working on projects that have enabled them to develop a solid range of quantitative and operational experience.

Please apply online or email your resume to daniela@talentinsights.com.au"	 - Sydney NSW	Senior Digital Analyst/Data ScientistTalent Insights Group - Sydney NSW$130,000 - $140,000 a year	Senior Digital Analyst/Data Scientist
446	"Data Architect

About our Client:

My client is global leader in technology and Big Data Architecture with operations in over 20 countries. They are looking to grow their Big Data Engineering capability with in their Melbourne Office.

The Role:
A Data Architect with strong development capability is needed to join a market leading Big Data team, building enterprise level market leading Data Solutions.
Experience:
Proven experience as a hands-on data scientist, formulating and delivering strategy and data solutions8-10 years of experience working with Java, J2EE Technologies.At least 5 + years of hands-on development in Big data systems using Spark, Pig, Hive, MapReduce, SparkSQL, Apache Nifi, Kakfa etcExperience working with Shell, Python, Hadoop Cluster configurationHands on data modelling experience, specifically operational and dimensional modelling for data warehousesAt least 5 years of experience in Design and warehouse architecture.Demonstrated experience in the use of data science and analytics capability to enhance business decision making.Using analytics finding to select key features relevant for building analytic systems/machine learning models (Feature engineering)

About You:

With both permanent and contract positions available we encourage candidates with skills in the above area to contact the team at Hydrogen for confidential discussions. We are seeking intellectually capable, personable and change driven individuals who want to be part of a market leading consulting organisation. First class communication skills in both the written and verbal form will be required.

What's on offer?

The opportunity to work with world class thought leaders in the digital transformation, Big data, Data science, RPA and AI space. International and local career progression.

Competitive salaries depending on experience (roles range from $150,000 + super – 160,000 + super and bonus).
 #LI-MP3 #LI-96"	 - Melbourne VIC	Big Data ArchitectHydrogen Group6 reviews - Melbourne VIC$150,000 a year - Permanent	Big Data Architect
447	"Here is an amazing opportunity to shape a company's analytical capabilities while working in a cool start-up environment. My client is a digital marketplace with a global reach, headquartered here in Melbourne. Renowned for it's award winning culture this is unique opportunity to help shape the analytic team and influence the analytics strategy across the globe.
As a Data Scientist / Analytics Specialist you will work with stakeholders across the business to help them identify data trends and provide actionable insights to better understand and predict customer behaviour. You will support the business goals through churn prevention, optimising customer reach and finding root cause for customer trends.
The right candidate will have experience analysing large and complex data sets, and creating actionable insights from them. You will be responsible for creating and productionising models to drive customer retention and revenue growth.
Qualifications:
5 years experience in digital analytics and advanced analytics roles
Undergraduate degree in relevant technology or computer engineering field
Expert in SQL and R
Experience with data mining, data modelling and machine learning
Experience with online data and big data
For more information or a confidential conversation please contact Tessa Gould at Tessa.Gould[at]Ambition[dot]com[dot]au."	 - Southbank VIC	Analytics Specialist / Data ScientistAmbition10 reviews - Southbank VICPermanent	Analytics Specialist / Data Scientist
448	"Advanced Analytics Consulting Projects
Permanent role
Perth based
A global professional services firm is seeking an experienced Data Scientist to be a part of their advanced analytics, predictive modelling, Data Science team help drive one of key mining client's engagements in Perth.

In this role, you will be required to work in the client's office in Perth to propose, design, execute and implement advanced analytics solutions across a range of business functions. You will be involved end-to-end with advanced analytics consulting projects. The successful candidate will be hands-on in advanced analytics projects as well as leading and directing the project team.

The role has a focus on Optimisation and the successful candidate will need to have real-world experience in the implementation of large scale industrial problems.

Key responsibilities of the role include:

Implementing the results of ""advanced analytics""Involvement in advanced analytics consulting projectsLeading and directing the project team

The successful candidate will demonstrate:

Master's degree or a PhD in Statistics, Mathematics, Operations Research, Data Science, Engineering, Econometrics or any other heavily analytical fieldExperience in mining or industrial related fields is highly desiredMinimum 3 years hands on experience in delivering advanced analytics or predictive modeling solutionsClient facing experience in project scoping, presenting results, designing solutions, implementationExperience in using R, particularly for data pre-processing and running statistical or machine learning modelsExperience in at least one programming language (C#, C++, Java preferred but Python also acceptable)

If you have the required experience and passion for sales and account management, we encourage you to apply directly or send your CV to sweta.khandelwal@kellyexecutive.com.au"	 - Perth WA	Data ScientistKelly Services12,254 reviews - Perth WA	Data Scientist
449	"Must be Australian Citizen

We are looking for an experienced Data Scientist to work in a cross disciplined team to deliver project outcomes. The role involves gaining an understanding of business needs, and developing machine learning models and other analytics solutions to solve problems using data and robust data science techniques.

Essential skills and experience

Degree in data science (machine learning, artificial intelligence) or a related field e.g. applied mathematics, statistics, computer science, or equivalent industry experience.
Industry experience in delivering data science solutions to improve business outcomes.
Industry experience in development of big data analytics solutions using Scala and Apache Spark.
Industry experience in programming using one or more of R, Python or Scala in creating complex analytic models.
Industry experience in breaking down and communicating complex technical information to business users and senior management.
Nice-to-have skills and experience

Post-graduate degree in data science (machine learning, artificial intelligence) or a related field e.g. applied mathematics, statistics, computer science, or equivalent industry experience.
Experience with federal government and financial/banking sector projects."	 - Canberra ACT	Data scientistPowerdata Group Consulting - Canberra ACT	Data scientist
450	"Work life balance
Python and SQL Data Modelling
Customer personalisation predictive analytics
We are looking for a Pricing Data Scientist for one of our aviation clients based in Melbourne.

The hiring manager wants a Data Scientist with strong analytics technical skills and knows machine learning in a big data environment.

You could have worked in a commercial environment or have a research academic background and want to move into a commercial role.

This is an expanding team in advanced analytics and you will be working alongside another Data Scientist and Data Engineers. Technically, strong skills with Python would serve you well in this environment.

You will be focused on the customer, working closely with pricing, marketing and personalisation in the digital practice. The big data environment was established 10 months ago and you would be working with the business on a major user case for personalisation. This will involve building models that can do things like recommending destinations and next best offers for customers based on behaviour.

In this role, you will need to make sense of customer data and build models and algorithms using predictive and machine learning techniques. The hiring manager also needs somebody that can articulate to the business what the data means for them.

The majority of your time spent in this role will be spent on data modelling, mainly with Python and SQL. The other part of the role is communicating insights to the business stakeholders and making sure that the work you are doing aligns with what the business wants to achieve.

You will need to be able to work independently and have a statistics, programming and data science background. A commercial, technical, academic or operational background will be helpful.

There is lots of variety in the work you will be doing, as part of a diverse team. Work life balance is important to this business and flexible working from home arrangements are available. There are also big company perks, including huge discounts on domestic and international flights for you and your spouse/partner with a number of different airlines.

The ideal candidate will be passionate about analytics and data science. This can be a fast paced and dynamic working environment. You will need to lead, prioritise tasks and work as part of a team.

Junior, intermediate and senior Data Scientists are encouraged to apply, as there are two positions available.

SKILLS & EXPERIENCE

Data Science, programming and statistics background
Data modeling skills
Data query skills
Able to visualise data and present
Desirable to have skills in Machine Learning and / or Artificial Intelligence
Worked with Python and SQL or other similar tools
Desirable to have worked in a Big Data environment
Advantageous to have worked in an AWS and Agile environment
Strong written and verbal communication skills
Strong stakeholder management skills
Passionate about data science
If the above sounds like you, please get in touch. We can wait for a notice period to be served and we are interviewing immediately.
For further information on this role or to confidentially apply, please contact Rik English on 02 8227 9200 or apply directly via the Apply for this job button. Only WORD FORMAT resumes will be accepted."	 - Melbourne VIC	Pricing Data ScientistEthos BeathChapman - Melbourne VIC	Pricing Data Scientist
451	"The role will be focused on stitching together disparate data sources from across the business to enable machine learning and automated reporting and campaigns. Generically, provide a view on business issues/opportunities that cannot be revealed through standard reporting
What’s the role?
Analytics lead on internal strategic marketing projects designed to understand key customer behaviours that drive consumer revenue
Identify new opportunities to improve capability and optimise the business through analytics and modelling
Undertake proactive analysis of customer data processes that produce data driven analysis, reporting, insights and models
Provide data and analytical thought leadership that can be leveraged across the marketing teams
Consistent delivery of data programs that lead to more effective and improved customer experiences
Who are you?
The ability to interpret and convert complex data requests into prescriptive and actionable insights for a non-analytical audience.
Proactivity delivering data driven insights and recommendations
Senior stakeholder engagement and strong presentation skills
Must be advanced multi-lingual across various software languages (SQL, Python, R, SAS)
What’s in it for you?
Supportive and friendly environment. We encourage innovation, collaboration and creative thinking. Fun, fast-paced and excellent opportunities for growth and development.
Lucrative salary
Flexible working arrangements
Discounted health care
Employee discount with multiple brands including BMW, Qantas, Apple, Samsung etc
Work with some of Australia's most recognised and prestigious brands
On-site gym and wellbeing centre

Who are we?
We are Australia’s number one and most influential media organisation with more than 150 prestige brands across news, sport and lifestyle. Each month more than 17 million Australians choose to consume news and information from our digital and print products – more than any other media group in Australia.
Where do I sign?
Apply now or for more information on careers at News Corp Australia visit www.newscorpaustralia.com/careers"	 - Sydney Central Business District NSW	Data ScientistNews Corp Australia66 reviews - Sydney Central Business District NSWPermanent	Data Scientist
452	"There has never been a more exciting time to be part of Domain Group, a dynamic digital media and technology services business and one of Australia's leading property destinations. We provide property advertising and media online, via mobile, social media and in magazines, and technology services to the real estate industry. The business is experiencing rapid growth in digital revenues and investing in all areas to drive future earnings growth. Domain offers a dynamic and innovative culture at the leading edge of digital media in Australia.
We are looking for a lead data scientist to help sales, product and business leadership make decisions with data, give consumers certainty and control when selling their home with a broad mission and build data science and machine learning products to power the next stage of Domain's growth
As part of the Domain Group, you'll have the opportunity to work across all aspects of our property ecosystem, from listing and agent, to consumer behavior, email, and sales data.
What you'll do:
Build scalable models that analyse and extract information from disparate public sources
Develop and improve machine learning algorithms that drive our data pipeline operation
Leverage advanced statistical modeling to improve domain products
Research and implement the latest advances in the world of data
Proven ability to collaboratively and maturely work on a team
Curious with an aptitude to quickly learn
Experience:
At least 3-5 years of industry experience in data science
2+ years of professional experience with Natural Language Processing and/or Image Processing
Thorough knowledge of machine learning modeling processes
Thorough knowledge of supervised and unsupervised learning algorithms
Thorough knowledge of Natural Language Processing
Experience with implementation of Data Systems
Fluency in UNIX, SQL, Python and/or R
Good software engineering principles
Education/Qualifications:
MS or PhD degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Quantitative Psychology or related field.
Portfolio evidence of previous work is appreciated (i.e. blog, GitHub repository, journal/conference publications etc).
So...what happens next?
Once we've received your application we'll give it the attention it deserves and you'll hear from us either way. If you have the right experience, one of our Recruitment Consultants will give you a call (so make sure you keep your phone handy!) and from there we'll support you through the interview process.

Interested?
Go on then, click apply, we'd love to see your application!

A little note to recruitment agencies: We have a superstar recruitment team who are pretty good at filling our own roles, we know you're great at what you do to, but there's no need to get in touch! :)"	 - Sydney NSW	Lead Data ScientistDomain Group6 reviews - Sydney NSWFull-time, Permanent	Lead Data Scientist
454	"Job Description:About IntellifyIntellify is a data science and machine learning consultancy who helps our customers to increase their growth, operate more efficiently and build competitive advantage. Our team consists of leading data scientists, machine learning engineers and consultants that extensively use advanced (statistical) machine learning and optimisation techniques to create state-of-the-art solutions for business. As an emerging AWS consulting partner, we have the ability to scale our solution to any needs through their cloud platform.About the OpportunityAs we are growing at a rapid speed, we are seeking a senior full-time data scientist/machine learning engineer who has extensive experience in data science, machine learning and/or statistical modelling as well as programming. As part of this role, you will supervise and manage junior data scientists, and work on development to build data science solutions using a combination of the latest technologies and business strategies.With a startup culture and applying cutting-edge technology to real-world business problems, you have the opportunity to drive impact at some of Australia’s leading startups and enterprises as well as to learn and grow within a team of like-minded data scientists. Our client problems have ranged from pricing, inventory and workforce optimisation to computer vision applied to radar data for predictive maintenance. The work is varied and challenging, and will require someone who is dynamic in their thinking as well as willing to explore and try new ideas.Being a senior data scientist at Intellify you are charged with both being a mentor and learning from fellow specialist data scientists in an ever evolving and improving atmosphere. We want to see you thrive professionally and personally as we create a leading data science, machine learning and AI company of the future.What we offerThis is a full-time permanent role. This role will provide a unique opportunity to work in a collaborative team and learn from experienced data scientists, so you can advance your knowledge and get hands-on experience with state-of-the-art machine learning methods. Our salaries are competitive, and we offer flexible working hours. We also believe great data science comes from great teams, so invest continuously in upskilling and cross-training our data scientists, with lunch & learn sessions, training courses and certifications, and an opportunity to be a core part of our data science and machine learning communities. Furthermore, we offer the following:1) 10 x paid days of professional development per year (attend/ speak @ conferences, undertake courses and certifications)2) $2,200 Toolkit allowance to go out and buy your own tech3) Profit sharing4) Work with high-profile clients5) A defined career path with your 1-1 mentor6) Great team culture7) Have an impact in a small team where there is no politics8) Flexible & inclusive work-environment9) Work closely with AWS using cutting edge cloud technologiesRequired Skills: A computer science, robotics, maths, statistics, physics or related degree (graduated Bachelors, MSc, PhD or last year MSc/PhD student)5+ years of applied industry machine learning, optimisation and/or statistics experienceStrong Python or R programming experience and related data science libraries (such as scikit-learn, Pandas, Tensorflow/Keras)Strong SQL database and code versioning (e.g., Git) skillsGood software engineering principlesProject management / team management experienceExperience with data visualisation tools or frameworks i.e. tableau, D3.js, ggplot2 etc.Desirable skills: Knowledge or experience of software engineering practicesKnowledge or experience on time series/product forecasting/recommender systemsKnowledge of deep learning/neural networksExperience working with web development technologiesExperience working with cloud technologies i.e. AWS / Microsoft / Google Cloud.Portfolio evidence of your previous work is appreciated (i.e. blog, github repository, conference presentations etc).How to ApplyIf you wish to take the next step in your career working and learning with the best in an innovative data science company, please click on ""Apply now"" and include:Your CVYour portfolio of projects (eg GitHub, blog site etc)Desired salaryYour availabilityBrief details (3-4 sentences) of either:A machine learning or data science project you have developed or delivered previously; orPrevious team leadership experience, where you worked with a team to deliver a project.We are looking forward to hearing from you.*** STRICTLY NO AGENCIES ***Please note that our Company Policy dictates direct recruitment only.Job Types: Full-time, Part-timeSalary: $120,000.00 to $160,000.00 /yearExperience:machine learning, optimisation and/or statistics: 3 years (Required)"	 - Sydney NSW	Senior Data Scientist/ Machine learning engineerIntellify - Sydney NSW$120,000 - $160,000 a year - Full-time, Part-time	Senior Data Scientist/ Machine learning engineer
455	Job DescriptionThe candidate is a skilled data scientist who will be building deep learning models for medical image diagnosis applications such as segmentation, localisation and classification of abnormalities.ResponsibilitiesThe candidate will write high quality model with high performance and good memory management, together with state-of-the-art accuracies and embed into our proprietary software. Our aim is to align you with the activities which truly interest you; will stretch you technically; help you grow and impact on billions of patients.RequirementsBachelor / Master / PhD in engineering or computer science or mathematics or physicsKnows computer vision / image segmentation, localization, classificationKnows tensorflow or theano or torchStrong python, C++ or java coderGood knowledge of numpy, pandas, sklearn, scipy, seabornKnows how to build deep learning models like RNN and CNN and other neural network models.May require to relocate to China, Beijing.What We OfferMaster, Teach, Learn – The opportunity to work with, learn from and share knowledge with ultra-smart colleagues in a culture of collaboration and technical excellence. We groom our employees and make sure that they stay at the cutting edge of the technology stack.Impact – Huge potential to make a positive contribution across our business, people and partnersRemuneration – Competitive pay with share award for top performers.We are willing to groom engineers and fresh graduates who don’t have a background in deep learning but are interested to learn. You will also have the opportunity to attend top machine learning conferences like NIPS and ICML.Job Types: Full-time, Permanent	 - Sydney NSW	BioMind Data Scientist/Engineer (Relocate to Beijing)biomind.ai - Sydney NSWFull-time, Permanent	BioMind Data Scientist/Engineer (Relocate to Beijing)
456	"Long-Term contract
Superannuation paid on all hours
Well-established team

One of our client, a Mining client, is currently requires the services of a SAP Master Data Scientist to start as soon as possible for a 6 - 12 months' contract.

You will be rewarded with competitive industry rates on a desirable Monday - Friday roster in Perth.

This is an opportunity to settle in to one site with a friendly work crew in a safety conscious work environment.

What do I need to qualify?

Extensive experience with the use of SAP in:

Understanding Function Location development and review

Understanding Maintenance Plan and item development and review

Understanding Bills of Materials development and review

Be able to perform FMEA workshops with key stakeholders

Good understanding of the use of excel

As one of the Australia's largest providers of human resources solutions, Chandler Macleod has a proven track record of unleashing potential in people and companies.

For over 40 years Chandler Macleod's recruitment business has connected leading-edge projects and employers with outstanding professionals. Our clients span across a variety of multi-billion dollar projects and large operations.

If the above sounds like you, please use the 'apply now' button to send through your most up to date CV showing the above and I will be in touch

Marike Kenny

Join the Chandler Macleod family today to work on site with a large reputable company."	 - Perth WA	SAP Master Data ScientistChandler Macleod80 reviews - Perth WAContract	SAP Master Data Scientist
457	"This startup is on the hunt for a good Software Engineer to join the team in the capacity of a technical principal. Guiding junior Engineers is part of the culture and this job.

Software Engineers here do these cool things:
Develop automation and infrastructure for development, testing, build and deployment
Build Data Processing and Machine Learning systems
Roll out services to improve analytics
Create a human-like end product
Build tools for their Data Scientist friends
Software Engineers here need to have:
Functional programming such as: Scala, Python, Javascript
Passion for big data technologies and data science
Degree in software engineering/computer science
Impact:

You'll play a critical role in disrupting the analytics industry using artificial intelligence.

Benefits of working here:
Work life balance/Flexibility
A culture of mutual respect
Pet friendly
Cool T-shirts
Pair programming sessions
Weekly, Monthly and Quarterly events
Education centric values

Please contact ronny@theonset.com.au or on 0448 808 848 to learn more."	 - Sydney NSW	Software EngineerOnset Group Pty Ltd - Sydney NSW$135,000 - $140,000 a year	Software Engineer
458	"Crunch data, uncover insights and create knowledge. Join InfoReady, part of Arq Group, where you can design and implement solutions that enable organisations to harness data for competitive advantage

What you get to do.

Working with many of Australia’s leading companies, you will deliver advanced and predictive analytics, segmentation and classification help converting business problems into solutions. What you do will directly impact client’s growth, customer churn, increase efficiencies and predict customer demand.

About you.

We seek candidates with minimum of 5 years experience working on relevant real-world applications, with a minimum Masters degree in Analytics/Machine Learning or other related computer science program from a top program.

You will be leading teams that build solutions using tools such as Python, R, and Machine Learning frameworks that help converting business problems into solutions that may help clients maximise growth, reduce customer churn, increase efficiencies and predict customer demand.

Essential Skills

Fluency in Python, R, or SQL
Experience dealing with large unstructured data sets with multiple sources –
Hands on Machine Learning within a Business Context
Data Vizualisation experience. Using Tableau , Qlik or similar.
Strong Business Analysis experience
Big Data/Cloud technologies
Ability to present finding to C-level stakeholders
We are smart thinkers. We solve complex challenges and provide complete solutions for businesses, big and small. From design thinking, leading mobile apps, cloud and analytical insights, digital marketing, to web design. Arq Group is Australia’s leading digital partner.

#LifeatArq

Our people are our greatest asset. Curiosity is in our DNA. Courage is in our hearts. And collaboration is at our core. “Our Ways” set us apart from others in how we deliver to our customers and work together. From wellness programs, learning and development, social calendars to coffee machines, and more. We've got something for everyone to be themselves. Did we also mention how much fun it is to work with other Arqadians? And yes, it is true; we love what we do. Join Arq Group and find your space to (change).

At Arq Group, we unleash the possibilities between business and people.

#Infoready"	 - Melbourne VIC	Lead Data ScientistARQ Group3 reviews - Melbourne VICFull-time, Permanent	Lead Data Scientist
459	"f2f reference number #9606
Canberra location
Federal Government agency
Australian citizenship and NV1 or higher security clearance is mandatory
Closes at 10 AM, 16-Oct-18
The successful candidate will have the below mentioned skills and experience for the role

Essential:

Degree in data science (machine learning, artificial intelligence) or a related field e.g. applied mathematics, statistics, computer science, or equivalent industry experience
Industry experience in delivering data science solutions to improve business outcomes
Industry experience in development of big data analytics solutions using Scala and Apache Spark
Industry experience in programming using one or more of R, Python or Scala in creating complex analytic models
Desirable:

Post-graduate degree in data science (machine learning, artificial intelligence) or a related field e.g. applied mathematics, statistics, computer science, or equivalent industry experience
Experience with federal government and financial/banking sector projects
To have a confidential discussion regarding this role, please give Vikas a call on 02 6199 5750. Alternatively, forward your application to Vikas directly by clicking the ‘Apply for this Job’ button."	 - Canberra ACT	Data Scientistface2face Recruitment - Canberra ACT	Data Scientist
460	"Do you have a strong interest in spatio-temporal data assimilation?
Prestigious Postdoctoral Fellowship on offer - kick-start your research career
Join CSIRO's Data61 - Australia's largest data innovation group
The Position
Postdoctoral Fellowships at CSIRO provide opportunities to scientists and engineers who have completed their doctorate and have less than three years relevant postdoctoral work experience. These fellowships will help launch their careers, provide experience that will enhance their career prospects, and facilitate the recruitment and development of potential leaders for CSIRO.
CSIRO’s Data61 has an exciting opportunity for a statistician, data scientist or a mathematical modeller with a strong interest in spatio-temporal data assimilation to work at the interface with the agro-environmental sciences. This role will develop novel analytical methods for assimilating field observation data into biophysical models to improve the predictions of spatio-temporal dynamics. There will be a need to overcome challenges of model initialisation, prediction bias, reconciling observation and model output that may be in conflict, and approaches to model learning and updating.
We are seeking an individual with expertise in modelling spatial-temporal data, data assimilation or model-data fusion techniques. Cutting edge machine learning approaches such as deep learning may be relevant. The individual will be familiar with managing and manipulating diverse data sources.
While being able to work with autonomy, you will be expected to contribute solutions to research problems that are appropriate and innovative as part of the team, communicate findings through reports and publications in top forums, and engage closely with the wider research community.
You will work closely with the immediate inter-disciplinary research team, including statisticians, ecological modellers and software engineers. You will also have access to a broad pool of talent with which to collaborate to achieve exciting results.
The position will involve travel within Australia and to international conferences. CSIRO will support flexible working arrangements where required.
Location: Brisbane, QLD or Canberra, ACT
Salary: AU $85K - AU $93K plus up to 15.4% superannuation
Tenure: Specified Term of 3 years
Reference: 58808
To be successful you will need:
A doctorate in applied mathematics or a relevant discipline such as data science with no more than 3 years postdoctoral research experience.
Demonstrated skills in the analysis of spatial and spatio-temporal data including Bayesian models (e.g. hierarchical modelling, sampling methods) and assimilating data of different types, scales and distributional properties.
Demonstrated knowledge of uncertainty analysis techniques, including statistical emulators, applied to deterministic or physical models (particularly environmental and agricultural models).
High level computational and programming skills (e.g. R, Python, BUGS, JAGS, STAN, C++ or equivalent) to undertake customized statistical data analyses and ability to implement optimisation algorithms.
High level written and oral communication skills with the ability to present the research findings effectively internally and externally, including at national and international conferences, and through publishing in quality, peer reviewed journals.
The ability to work effectively as part of a multi-disciplinary, regionally dispersed research team, plus the motivation and discipline to carry out autonomous research.
An interest in ecological, biological and agricultural systems.
Before applying, we encourage you to read the full position description for this role. Position description document
Who we are: The Commonwealth Scientific and Industrial Research Organisation (CSIRO)
At CSIRO, we do the extraordinary every day. We innovate for tomorrow and help improve today - for our customers, all Australians and the world. We imagine. We collaborate. We innovate.We work flexibly at CSIRO, offering a range of options for how, when and where you work. Talk to us about how this role could be flexible for you. Find out more! CSIRO Balance
How to Apply: To apply, please provide a CV as well as a cover letter addressing the selection criteria in brief, and upload these as one document. If your application proceeds to the next stage you may be asked to provide additional information.
Applications Close: 10:59pm (AEDT), 4 November 2018"	 - Brisbane QLD	Postdoctoral Fellowship in spatio-temporal data assimilation for agro-environmental modellingCSIRO35 reviews - Brisbane QLD$93,000 a year	Postdoctoral Fellowship in spatio-temporal data assimilation for agro-environmental modelling
461	"Lead a small team of Data Scientists
Build scalable Predictive ML Models
Work closely with the business
We are looking for a Data Science Team Lead to lead a small team of Data Scientists for one of our AI focused clients based in Sydney CBD.

This business is a well established start-up that has been backed by over $10M of funding from well known global and Australian business and is expected to go through an IPO in 2019.

It is an exciting time to be joining the business and if you genuinely care about the state of the environment in Australia and globally, then this is a role you can be really passionate about and enjoy contributing towards the organisation's purpose.

The hiring manager wants a Data Scientist with strong technical data query skills with SQL or a similar language, strong data modelling skills and preferably big data knowledge.

You will need to have previous leadership or managerial experience or be ready to step up and take on the extra responsibility of leading a team.

The right person for this role needs to be passionate about data science and able to work on large data sets. You will be building predictive models and will have the freedom and flexibility to access large amounts of data.

This person will need to articulate insights to non-technical business people about the value of data in relation to their role. You will have regular stakeholder engagement and interaction with people across different business units.

An attractive salary package is on offer for this role and this is a collaborative, knowledge sharing working environment.

The ideal candidate will be passionate about analytics and data science. If you regularly attend meet-ups, work on kaggle competitions and / or continue to develop your skills in data science outside of working hours, then we want to hear from you.

SKILLS & EXPERIENCE
Strong programming skills
Statistics skills
Data modelling skills
Data query skills
Able to visualise data and present
Desirable to have skills in Machine Learning and / or Artificial Intelligence
Worked with SQL, R, Python, SAS, AWS Redshift, Tableau or other similar tools
Desirable to have Big Data skills in tools like Hadoop and Spark
Leadership and managerial capability
Strong written and verbal communication skills
Strong stakeholder management skills
Passionate about data science
If the above sounds like you, please get in touch. We can wait for a notice period to be served and we are interviewing immediately.


For further information on this role or to confidentially apply, please contact Rik English on 02 8227 9200 or apply directly via the Apply for this job button. Only WORD FORMAT resumes will be accepted."	 - Sydney NSW	Data Science Team Lead - Start upEthos BeathChapman - Sydney NSW	Data Science Team Lead - Start up
462	"Data Scientist | Melbourne CBD | Permanent
Exciting opportunity with a leading AXS listed fintech organisation
Chance to drive the company's Data Science capabilities
Competitive package
About the Company
The client is a leading Australian fintech based in Melbourne's CBD. They are looking to become more data-driven as a business. The organisation has a flat, agile organisation with a great working culture. The business is constantly innovating their products and they want to continue to deliver high quality outcomes for their customers.

About the Role
The Data Scientist will be trusted to set up and drive the organisation's Data Science function and capability. The Data Scientist is also responsible for deriving business insights from data and driving the business' capabilities. The role will involve interacting and working with stakeholders across the business and identifying business problems and strategic goals.

Required Experience and Knowledge:
Strong commercial experience with Python or R
An ability to liaise and consult with various senior stakeholders
Experience working with SQL
Experience setting up and driving a Data Science function is a bonus
How to Apply
Click APPLY or contact Zale Stobbs, Big Data, BI & Data Analytics Consultant on (03) 9982 8489 for a confidential discussion."	 - Melbourne VIC	Data ScientistFourQuarters - Melbourne VIC	Data Scientist
463	"Data Scientist needed for a large financial firm to conduct experiments for customer focused insights


Your new company

Financial Firm in Melbourne

Your new role

Working collaboratively across teams, you will be working to discover actionable insights with a customer end focus. With advanced analytics and machine learning (Where it suits!) you will conduct experiments for various business units.


What you'll need to succeed

Ability to speak and engage with stake holders and influence
Problem solving
Predictive Modelling
Feature Engineering
Text Mining and Sentiment Analytics
Machine Learning
Big data toolsets such as Hadoop, MapReduce, Hive, Pig, Spark
SAS
Python
Strong SQL ability with experience around Oracle and Teradata desired.



What you need to do now
If you're interested in this role, click 'apply now' to forward an up-to-date copy of your CV, or call us now.
If this job isn't quite right for you but you are looking for a new position, please contact us for a confidential discussion on your career."	 - Melbourne City Centre VIC	Data ScientistHays613 reviews - Melbourne City Centre VICPermanent	Data Scientist
464	"The Company

Robert Half Technology are working alongside a well reputable and established Insurance organisation in the CBD and we are currently looking for a talented Data Scientist to join our team on a permanent basis. Our client continue to grow across all areas of the business and this role has been created due to the expansion of the division. This role represents an exciting challenge and career opportunity for a Data Scientist to join our forward thinking client.

The Role

The Role of the Data Scientist will have the opportunity to make their mark using data led decision making and modelling to catalyse industry disuption. Aspects of the role include:

Proportion your role with Modelling, Research, Analysism Data Manipulation and Collaboration.

Work as a data expert and a quantitative researcher.

Translate unstructured, complex business problems into practical, powerful algorithmic solutions.

Be part of a highly innovative team working on interesting and difficult problems, leveraging cutting edge technology to build key data products.

Uncover fresh insights from disparate data sources and data mining

Spearheading machine learning projects on data that has never been touched by the organization.

About You

This is a hands-on position where you will be empowered to be very ambitious and bold, to solve challenging problems and have the potential to directly impact the future of the business. The role requires that you have experience in machine learning and data mining.

Your experience and skills should include most, if not all:
Ability to communicate complex quantitative analysis in a clear, precise and actionable manner

Practical experience using contemporary machine learning frameworks such as, scikit-learn, pytorch and tensorflow.

A proven track record in developing, innovating, and applying advanced algorithms to address practical problems and in building new analytical products of commercial value.

Experience in Python and/or R.

Experience in relational databases and SQL

Apply Today

Please send your resume by clicking on the apply button or for further information, contact our Melbourne office."	 - Melbourne VIC	Data Scientist - Market Leader - CBDRobert Half Australia6,897 reviews - Melbourne VIC$110,000 a year - Permanent	Data Scientist - Market Leader - CBD
465	"Join a leading Australian financial institution
Be part of a hybrid team - Data Engineers and Data Scientists
Full Time Role based in Melbourne CBD.

A leading Australian Financial Institution is currently seeking an experienced Data Scientist with previous experience as a Data Engineer, who is passionate and enthusiastic about data and how it can be used to build real value for the company. They are on a journey to create a hybrid data science and data engineering team, to bring the control of a structured data warehouse for corporate and regulatory reporting together with the fast evolving world of analytics.

Reporting to the Head of Data Science and Data Engineering, you will be collaborating with a team of highly skilled Data Engineers and Data Scientists to design high-quality data stores and analytical platforms to build advanced analytical models across the business.


Key Responsibilities

Address and solve complex business issues using large data sets
Develop advanced analytics model, including the preparation and reconciliation of data, feature engineering and creation of dashboard visualisations
Perform offline and online experiments, with a focus on the digital channels
Implement batch and streaming ETL (Extract, Transform, Load) processes
Engineer/Prototype/Industrialise data assets and platforms needed for analytics

Key Skills

Experience of SQL and NoSQL
Advanced Analytical Modelling in a business context (e.g. Machine Learning)
Technical experience in programming in Python, R and statistical packages (R, SAS)
Commercially and Tech curious
Experience in Data Engineering (highly advantageous)

This is an excellent opportunity to work in an agile environment to deliver high-quality analytical solutions, data assets, tools and insights.

For more information, please call Corrin on 03 8330 5003.
IMPORTANT: By submitting your email address and any other personal information when you APPLY to a job, you consent to such information being collected, held, used and disclosed in accordance with our COLLECTIONS NOTICE and PRIVACY POLICY.

http://www.bluefinresources.com.au/privacy-policy"	 - Melbourne VIC	Data Scientist/EngineerBluefin Resources - Melbourne VIC	Data Scientist/Engineer
466	You remember how to roll up your sleeves and craft data joins in SQL, but you've invested time in learning R, and Python is your friend. You know Hadoop isn't the only approach and you're happiest getting behind the GUI into the real data to uncover the stories.Isn't it about time you took advantage of the benefits from all that knowledge?Our client is looking for data polyglots who enjoy solving complex problems; not the kind you can come to with a canned response, the ones where you really need to use your skills.With some of the biggest names in Australia and around the world throwing their most pressing problems at our client they need curious guides - but they only take the best.Getting in isn't easy, but if it was, it wouldn't be the right place for you.Prove yourself and you can build a team behind you to grow your own patch. The opportunities truly are what you make them.With Udemy on tap, and weekly internal led training sessions, you'll be joining a group of like-minded people who are capable of understanding you when you get on your high horse about relevance over recency (or the other way around).Currently our client has four areas of practice, you can join one these and then explain to them what they need to build another:Data & Analytics - BI/DW, Big Data Analytics, Data Engineering, Data Science and Advanced AnalyticsCustomer Engagement - Marketing Campaigns, Campaign Analysis, Customer InsightsDigital - Full stack Development, UI/UX Design, Mobile DevelopmentCloud & Technology - Cloud Services (AWS, Azure, Google Cloud Platform), Managed ServicesWe're not worried about levels at the moment, if you've got the skills there's a place for you.SEO stuff because you know we need to have it in here;Data engineerData scientistData ConsultantJava, Scala, Python, HadoopApache Spark, Kafka, Hive, Airflow, NiFiAWS, Google Cloud Platform or Azure is helpful but not mandatoryJob Types: Full-time, PermanentExperience:data consulting: 3 years (Preferred)	 - Sydney NSW	Software Architect / Tech LeadKloudPPL - Sydney NSWFull-time, Permanent	Software Architect / Tech Lead
467	"Deloitte is the world’s largest professional service firm, with one of the largest and most experienced Analytics, Information Management (AIM) & Data Automation practices. We have 400+ specialised consultants in Australia and more than 6,000 practitioners in the Deloitte global network.
With the ever increasing complexity and volume of data, the rise of in-memory, high performance computing, data discovery and visualisation solutions and the convergence of Big Data and Advanced Analytics, organisations are faced with increasing number of choices to ensure they are able to exploit their data assets for maximum advantage. Deloitte is able to draw from its vast global experience delivering complex data driven solutions for our clients across the full spectrum of technology and business domains to provide the right strategic advice to help an organisation respond effectively to these changes – as well as partner with our clients to execute on our recommendations.
About the Role
Do you want to be a part of how we help companies utilise their valuable data resources through effective use of the right technology, backed by a clear vision and strong executive sponsorship? Do you want to be part of an award winning team that provides clients with a visionary, yet balanced and pragmatic approach to automating concepts and tools to improve productivity and performance?
This is an opportunity to harness emerging technologies and analytical methodologies to solve real world problems. You will be part of a close, collaborative team that identifies and builds solutions that are practical as well as visionary, and that make an impact that matters.
We are looking for people who love data and want to solve problems with insight. Whether you call yourself a data scientist, analytics nerd or builder of predictive models. We want to hear from you if you are genuinely passionate about this area and have some applied experience.
You will be responsible for delivering insights through a range of corporate data sources through the application of analytics, data mining, Big Data and real-time decision making techniques and applications using various data management, analytics & data visualization tools.
About You
You’ll bring experience in one or more of the following competencies and enabling technologies
A strong background in applying mathematical and analytics approaches and methodologies to identifying complex relationships in data
Ability to communicate technical requirements and outputs in a clear and concise manner
A structured, logical and solution-oriented design mindset
Ability to work autonomously and with minimal oversight
Ability to demonstrate initiative and ownership in the completion of tasks
A demonstrable interest and passion for exploring new data/analytics concepts, applications and innovations (e.g. Cognitive, Robotics & Automate, AI, IoT etc.)
Some experience using a range of scripting languages – (e.g. Python, R, SQL etc.)
About Us: Deloitte Culture
Join a high performing culture of talented people, who are highly motivated and passionate about delivering impactful analytics solutions and insight. We are innovative and different because YOU are… we pride ourselves on our team of diverse, high performing Deloitte Professionals who are talented, supportive, inclusive and social – and who are at the heart of our success. Our aim is to ensure that all our people feel comfortable to bring their whole selves to work, and as a result, build a workplace that encourages the true spirit of 'And different'.
From day one at our firm you’ll be considered part of the Deloitte community and our development and career progression framework will help you develop the skills and capabilities that will set you up to succeed – in every sense of the word. At Deloitte, we assume that you perform other roles within your life…you could be a student, a teacher, a passionate hobbyist and a caring family member. We recognise the importance of balance and embrace agility, understanding that this means different things to each and every one of our employees.
If you have questions regarding this role, the Talent Acquisition Team is available to have a confidential discussion. Please contact Aditi Aggarwal via the Our Recruiters section on our careers website."	 - Sydney NSW	EXPRESSION OF INTEREST - Data & Analytics - NationalDeloitte7,167 reviews - Sydney NSW	EXPRESSION OF INTEREST - Data & Analytics - National
468	"There has never been a more exciting time to be part of Domain Group, a dynamic digital media and technology services business and one of Australia's leading property destinations. We provide property advertising and media online, via mobile, social media and in magazines, and technology services to the real estate industry. The business is experiencing rapid growth in digital revenues and investing in all areas to drive future earnings growth. Domain offers a dynamic and innovative culture at the leading edge of digital media in Australia.
We are looking for a lead data scientist to help sales, product and business leadership make decisions with data, give consumers certainty and control when selling their home with a broad mission and build data science and machine learning products to power the next stage of Domain's growth
As part of the Domain Group, you'll have the opportunity to work across all aspects of our property ecosystem, from listing and agent, to consumer behavior, email, and sales data.
What you'll do:
Build scalable models that analyse and extract information from disparate public sources
Develop and improve machine learning algorithms that drive our data pipeline operation
Leverage advanced statistical modeling to improve domain products
Research and implement the latest advances in the world of data
Proven ability to collaboratively and maturely work on a team
Curious with an aptitude to quickly learn
Experience:
At least 3-5 years of industry experience in data science
2+ years of professional experience with Natural Language Processing and/or Image Processing
Thorough knowledge of machine learning modeling processes
Thorough knowledge of supervised and unsupervised learning algorithms
Thorough knowledge of Natural Language Processing
Experience with implementation of Data Systems
Fluency in UNIX, SQL, Python and/or R
Good software engineering principles
Education/Qualifications:
MS or PhD degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Quantitative Psychology or related field.
Portfolio evidence of previous work is appreciated (i.e. blog, GitHub repository, journal/conference publications etc).
So...what happens next?
Once we've received your application we'll give it the attention it deserves and you'll hear from us either way. If you have the right experience, one of our Recruitment Consultants will give you a call (so make sure you keep your phone handy!) and from there we'll support you through the interview process.

Interested?
Go on then, click apply, we'd love to see your application!

A little note to recruitment agencies: We have a superstar recruitment team who are pretty good at filling our own roles, we know you're great at what you do to, but there's no need to get in touch! :)"	 - Sydney NSW	Lead Data ScientistDomain Group6 reviews - Sydney NSWFull-time, Permanent	Lead Data Scientist
470	"There has never been a more exciting time to be part of Domain Group, a dynamic digital media and technology services business and one of Australia's leading property destinations. We provide property advertising and media online, via mobile, social media and in magazines, and technology services to the real estate industry. The business is experiencing rapid growth in digital revenues and investing in all areas to drive future earnings growth. Domain offers a dynamic and innovative culture at the leading edge of digital media in Australia.
We are looking for a lead data scientist to help sales, product and business leadership make decisions with data, give consumers certainty and control when selling their home with a broad mission and build data science and machine learning products to power the next stage of Domain's growth
As part of the Domain Group, you'll have the opportunity to work across all aspects of our property ecosystem, from listing and agent, to consumer behavior, email, and sales data.
What you'll do:
Build scalable models that analyse and extract information from disparate public sources
Develop and improve machine learning algorithms that drive our data pipeline operation
Leverage advanced statistical modeling to improve domain products
Research and implement the latest advances in the world of data
Proven ability to collaboratively and maturely work on a team
Curious with an aptitude to quickly learn
Experience:
At least 3-5 years of industry experience in data science
2+ years of professional experience with Natural Language Processing and/or Image Processing
Thorough knowledge of machine learning modeling processes
Thorough knowledge of supervised and unsupervised learning algorithms
Thorough knowledge of Natural Language Processing
Experience with implementation of Data Systems
Fluency in UNIX, SQL, Python and/or R
Good software engineering principles
Education/Qualifications:
MS or PhD degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Quantitative Psychology or related field.
Portfolio evidence of previous work is appreciated (i.e. blog, GitHub repository, journal/conference publications etc).
So...what happens next?
Once we've received your application we'll give it the attention it deserves and you'll hear from us either way. If you have the right experience, one of our Recruitment Consultants will give you a call (so make sure you keep your phone handy!) and from there we'll support you through the interview process.

Interested?
Go on then, click apply, we'd love to see your application!

A little note to recruitment agencies: We have a superstar recruitment team who are pretty good at filling our own roles, we know you're great at what you do to, but there's no need to get in touch! :)"	 - Sydney NSW	Lead Data ScientistDomain Group6 reviews - Sydney NSWFull-time, Permanent	Lead Data Scientist
471	"Job Description:About IntellifyIntellify is a data science and machine learning consultancy who helps our customers to increase their growth, operate more efficiently and build competitive advantage. Our team consists of leading data scientists, machine learning engineers and consultants that extensively use advanced (statistical) machine learning and optimisation techniques to create state-of-the-art solutions for business. As an emerging AWS consulting partner, we have the ability to scale our solution to any needs through their cloud platform.About the OpportunityAs we are growing at a rapid speed, we are seeking a senior full-time data scientist/machine learning engineer who has extensive experience in data science, machine learning and/or statistical modelling as well as programming. As part of this role, you will supervise and manage junior data scientists, and work on development to build data science solutions using a combination of the latest technologies and business strategies.With a startup culture and applying cutting-edge technology to real-world business problems, you have the opportunity to drive impact at some of Australia’s leading startups and enterprises as well as to learn and grow within a team of like-minded data scientists. Our client problems have ranged from pricing, inventory and workforce optimisation to computer vision applied to radar data for predictive maintenance. The work is varied and challenging, and will require someone who is dynamic in their thinking as well as willing to explore and try new ideas.Being a senior data scientist at Intellify you are charged with both being a mentor and learning from fellow specialist data scientists in an ever evolving and improving atmosphere. We want to see you thrive professionally and personally as we create a leading data science, machine learning and AI company of the future.What we offerThis is a full-time permanent role. This role will provide a unique opportunity to work in a collaborative team and learn from experienced data scientists, so you can advance your knowledge and get hands-on experience with state-of-the-art machine learning methods. Our salaries are competitive, and we offer flexible working hours. We also believe great data science comes from great teams, so invest continuously in upskilling and cross-training our data scientists, with lunch & learn sessions, training courses and certifications, and an opportunity to be a core part of our data science and machine learning communities. Furthermore, we offer the following:1) 10 x paid days of professional development per year (attend/ speak @ conferences, undertake courses and certifications)2) $2,200 Toolkit allowance to go out and buy your own tech3) Profit sharing4) Work with high-profile clients5) A defined career path with your 1-1 mentor6) Great team culture7) Have an impact in a small team where there is no politics8) Flexible & inclusive work-environment9) Work closely with AWS using cutting edge cloud technologiesRequired Skills: A computer science, robotics, maths, statistics, physics or related degree (graduated Bachelors, MSc, PhD or last year MSc/PhD student)5+ years of applied industry machine learning, optimisation and/or statistics experienceStrong Python or R programming experience and related data science libraries (such as scikit-learn, Pandas, Tensorflow/Keras)Strong SQL database and code versioning (e.g., Git) skillsGood software engineering principlesProject management / team management experienceExperience with data visualisation tools or frameworks i.e. tableau, D3.js, ggplot2 etc.Desirable skills: Knowledge or experience of software engineering practicesKnowledge or experience on time series/product forecasting/recommender systemsKnowledge of deep learning/neural networksExperience working with web development technologiesExperience working with cloud technologies i.e. AWS / Microsoft / Google Cloud.Portfolio evidence of your previous work is appreciated (i.e. blog, github repository, conference presentations etc).How to ApplyIf you wish to take the next step in your career working and learning with the best in an innovative data science company, please click on ""Apply now"" and include:Your CVYour portfolio of projects (eg GitHub, blog site etc)Desired salaryYour availabilityBrief details (3-4 sentences) of either:A machine learning or data science project you have developed or delivered previously; orPrevious team leadership experience, where you worked with a team to deliver a project.We are looking forward to hearing from you.*** STRICTLY NO AGENCIES ***Please note that our Company Policy dictates direct recruitment only.Job Types: Full-time, Part-timeSalary: $120,000.00 to $160,000.00 /yearExperience:machine learning, optimisation and/or statistics: 3 years (Required)"	 - Sydney NSW	Senior Data Scientist/ Machine learning engineerIntellify - Sydney NSW$120,000 - $160,000 a year - Full-time, Part-time	Senior Data Scientist/ Machine learning engineer
472	Job DescriptionThe candidate is a skilled data scientist who will be building deep learning models for medical image diagnosis applications such as segmentation, localisation and classification of abnormalities.ResponsibilitiesThe candidate will write high quality model with high performance and good memory management, together with state-of-the-art accuracies and embed into our proprietary software. Our aim is to align you with the activities which truly interest you; will stretch you technically; help you grow and impact on billions of patients.RequirementsBachelor / Master / PhD in engineering or computer science or mathematics or physicsKnows computer vision / image segmentation, localization, classificationKnows tensorflow or theano or torchStrong python, C++ or java coderGood knowledge of numpy, pandas, sklearn, scipy, seabornKnows how to build deep learning models like RNN and CNN and other neural network models.May require to relocate to China, Beijing.What We OfferMaster, Teach, Learn – The opportunity to work with, learn from and share knowledge with ultra-smart colleagues in a culture of collaboration and technical excellence. We groom our employees and make sure that they stay at the cutting edge of the technology stack.Impact – Huge potential to make a positive contribution across our business, people and partnersRemuneration – Competitive pay with share award for top performers.We are willing to groom engineers and fresh graduates who don’t have a background in deep learning but are interested to learn. You will also have the opportunity to attend top machine learning conferences like NIPS and ICML.Job Types: Full-time, Permanent	 - Sydney NSW	BioMind Data Scientist/Engineer (Relocate to Beijing)biomind.ai - Sydney NSWFull-time, Permanent	BioMind Data Scientist/Engineer (Relocate to Beijing)
473	You remember how to roll up your sleeves and craft data joins in SQL, but you've invested time in learning R, and Python is your friend. You know Hadoop isn't the only approach and you're happiest getting behind the GUI into the real data to uncover the stories.Isn't it about time you took advantage of the benefits from all that knowledge?Our client is looking for data polyglots who enjoy solving complex problems; not the kind you can come to with a canned response, the ones where you really need to use your skills.With some of the biggest names in Australia and around the world throwing their most pressing problems at our client they need curious guides - but they only take the best.Getting in isn't easy, but if it was, it wouldn't be the right place for you.Prove yourself and you can build a team behind you to grow your own patch. The opportunities truly are what you make them.With Udemy on tap, and weekly internal led training sessions, you'll be joining a group of like-minded people who are capable of understanding you when you get on your high horse about relevance over recency (or the other way around).Currently our client has four areas of practice, you can join one these and then explain to them what they need to build another:Data & Analytics - BI/DW, Big Data Analytics, Data Engineering, Data Science and Advanced AnalyticsCustomer Engagement - Marketing Campaigns, Campaign Analysis, Customer InsightsDigital - Full stack Development, UI/UX Design, Mobile DevelopmentCloud & Technology - Cloud Services (AWS, Azure, Google Cloud Platform), Managed ServicesWe're not worried about levels at the moment, if you've got the skills there's a place for you.SEO stuff because you know we need to have it in here;Data engineerData scientistData ConsultantJava, Scala, Python, HadoopApache Spark, Kafka, Hive, Airflow, NiFiAWS, Google Cloud Platform or Azure is helpful but not mandatoryJob Types: Full-time, PermanentExperience:data consulting: 3 years (Preferred)	 - Sydney NSW	Software Architect / Tech LeadKloudPPL - Sydney NSWFull-time, Permanent	Software Architect / Tech Lead
474	"Melbourne CBD Location.

Initial 6 month location, with view for permanent.

About Our Client
Based in Melbourne's CBD with a number of convenient Public Transport options available, this prominent Melbourne organisation is one of the fastest growing, and innovative clients that we work with.

This is one of few organisations that are set on the philosophy of driving sustained success and growth through research, innovation, and engagement.

You must be willing to be part of an inclusive, and collaborative team in order to drive high levels of success across the board.

Job Description
The successful candidate will work to establish the following over the course of the length of this contract:

Work with existing team members to roadmap, and plan the successful enablement of this business unit through Data Science practices.
Maintain and build Big Data structures that currently exist.
Day-to-day, hands-on development of Statistical Analyses, Propensity Models, and Predictive Models.
Examine and refine existing lines of enquiry within the marketing department to optimise and better understand the target market.
The Successful Applicant
The successful candidate will have the following skill-set:

2+ Years of Data Science experience
2+ years of experience of Data Wrangling
Hadoop
Spark
Python
Java
Scala
Exceptional communication skills.
PhD (Preferred)
What's on Offer
Competitive salary
Convenient, central location
Renowned brand in the market
Positive, and collaborative team culture.
Contact:
Tim Dillon"	 - Melbourne VIC	Data Scientist - EducationMichael Page168 reviews - Melbourne VICTemporary	Data Scientist - Education
475	"Work with one of Melbourne's most renowned Data Science teams to analyse and decipher exciting data-sets

Work with one of Melbourne's most renowned Data Science teams to analyse and decipher exciting data-sets
Collaborate with one of Melbournes most respected Data Science teams deciphering huge unstructured Data Sets and creating value organisation-wide!

Due to recent growth within the Data Science team a key player within consulting is looking to add 1 more Data Scientist to their team to begin work on some excitin greenfield projects.

What You'll Do:
Design, develop, and implement creative quality assurance tests that validate source data and production output

Develop efficient, workable production solutions that perform prescribed research methods and business rules

Apply statistical analyses, machine learning, and data visualisation techniques

Partner with developers, statisticians, and product managers to deliver timely, high-quality product data

Support statistical teams that research and evaluate new methods

What's in it for you?

Excellent rates of pay

Work on some of Melbourne's most exciting Data Science projects

Be part of a collaborative and innovative company

Opportunity convert to a permanent role after 6 months.

What You'll Need:
Experience with machine learning algorithms (XG-Boost, Gradient Boosting, Random Forest, Linear Modelling, Neural Networks, K-Means Clustering, Decision Trees)

Big Data Analytics experience - Spark & Scala (predominantly on semi-structured / unstructured data sets - e.g. Adobe)

Proven success managing critical processes and teams in a fast-paced business environment with competing priorities, vague requirements, and rapid iterations

Strong software development skills and expertise designing efficient SQL queries of big data

Excellent verbal and written communication skills

Bachelors degree in a quantitative subject such as Statistics, Operations Research, Engineering or Computer Science

Preferred: Familiarity with JIRA and Git Experience with Hadoop or other comparable distributed file systems Ability to develop advanced analytical solutions in Python or Spark. Knowledge of statistical software (ideally, R) or scientific computation software Experience conducting research and analytics with digital or TV audience data

If you feel the above is the next step you'd like to take in your career, APPLY NOW!

Only successful candidates will be contacted.
Experis ANZ is parent to a portfolio of brands; Greythorn, Safesearch, Marks Sattin, GT-X and Global Attract . These brands make up our core specialisations for Technology & Digital, Accounting & Finance, Engineering and Workplace Health, Safety and Environment. When you apply for this opportunity you will be directed to the parent website www.experis.com.au to lodge your application. Experis is part of the ManpowerGroup , a global leader in offering end to end workforce solutions.

If you're curious and willing to have a conversation about this role, please pick up the phone and speak with our recruitment specialist below. Even if this doesn't sound like the right role for you, we encourage you to join our talent community so your skill set can be the first considered when another opportunity arises. Click register on our website www.experis.com.au .
Tom Bull
Data Science
Recruitment Consultant
+61 3 9604 4209"	 - Melbourne VIC	Data Scientist - 12 month contractGreythorn Specialist Technology Recruitment6 reviews - Melbourne VICTemporary, Contract	Data Scientist - 12 month contract
476	"About Baycorp:

Baycorp is a leading player in the market and aspires to be the leading debt resolution specialist in New Zealand. We partner with our clients and thier customers to deliver intelligent strategies for the successful resolution of debt. We have 4 operations centres across the Asia Pacific region with over 600 staff members.

A career at Baycorp is an opportunity to join an energetic workplace that provides multiple platforms for development and growth.

About the role:

We are looking for a savvy Data Engineer to join our growing team of analytics experts. The hire will be responsible for expanding and optimizing our data and data pipeline architecture, as well as optimizing data flow and collection for cross functional teams. The ideal candidate is an experienced data pipeline builder and data wrangler who enjoys optimizing data systems and building them from the ground up. The Data Engineer will support our data analysts and will ensure optimal data delivery architecture is consistent throughout ongoing projects. They must be self-directed. The right candidate will be excited by the prospect of optimizing or even re-designing our company’s data architecture to support our next generation of products and data initiatives. You should also be willing to conduct workshops and training sessions for the data scientists on AWS, big data tools and Python.

Responsibilities for Data Engineer:
Create and maintain optimal data pipeline architecture,
Assemble large, complex data sets that meet functional / non-functional business requirements.
Identify, design, and implement internal process improvements: automating manual processes, optimizing data delivery, re-designing infrastructure for greater scalability, etc.
Build the infrastructure required for optimal extraction, transformation, and loading of data from a wide variety of data sources using SQL
Establish the infrastructure extraction, transformation, and loading of data for ‘big data’ technologies.
Build analytics tools that utilize the data pipeline to provide actionable insights into \ operational efficiency and other key business performance metrics.
Create data tools for analytics and data scientist team members that assist them in building and optimizing our product into an innovative industry leader.
Work with data and analytics experts to strive for greater functionality in our data systems.
About You:
Advanced working SQL knowledge and experience working with relational databases, query authoring (SQL) as well as working familiarity with a variety of databases.
Experience building and optimizing ‘big data’ data pipelines, architectures and data sets.
Experience performing root cause analysis on internal and external data and processes to answer specific business questions and identify opportunities for improvement.
Strong analytic skills related to working with unstructured datasets.
Build processes supporting data transformation, data structures, metadata, dependency and workload management.
A successful history of manipulating, processing and extracting value from large disconnected datasets.
Working knowledge of message queuing, stream processing, and highly scalable ‘big data’ data stores.
Strong project management and organizational skills.
We are looking for a candidate with 5+ years of experience in a Data Engineer role, who has attained a Graduate degree in Computer Science, Statistics, Informatics, Information Systems or another quantitative field. They should also have experience using the following software/tools:
Experience with big data tools: Hadoop, Spark, Kafka, etc.
Experience with relational SQL and NoSQL databases, including Postgres and Cassandra.
Experience with data pipeline and workflow management tools: Azkaban, Luigi, Airflow, etc.
Experience with AWS cloud services: EC2, EMR, RDS, Redshift
Experience with stream-processing systems: Storm, Spark-Streaming, etc
Experience with object-oriented/object function scripting languages: Python, Java, C++,Scala etc


On offer is a 6 month fixed term contract role working in our Parramatta office."	 - Parramatta NSW	Data EngineerBaycorp7 reviews - Parramatta NSW	Data Engineer
477	"Tier 1 Global Consulting Business
Data Driven / Data Science Consulting
Senior hands on leadership & delivery role

Lead Data Scientist


This Data Driven Consulting practice uses a human-centred design approach to enhance decision-making in all its myriad sizes, scopes, structure and forms.

Through a focus on decision-making, they help clients deliver their customer engagement and operational strategies.

They do this by conceiving and implementing intelligent systems, architectures, processes and new operating models. We design, develop and deploy solutions that digitise and automate clients’ decision making processes.

The work embeds artificial intelligence, machine-based learning, cognitive computing, advanced analytics, probabilistic reasoning and deterministic business rules management into core processes and functions within client organisations.

Your new role

The Lead Data Scientist will design, develop and implement flexible and extensible analytic solutions that typically involve a combination of analytical, process and business transformation outcomes and focus on areas of our client’s business such as customer, product and supply chain, just to name a few. You will be comfortable presenting to senior stakeholders, guiding junior consultants on engagements, scoping and pricing an engagement, designing a practical team structure, structuring and writing a deliverable and coding an algorithm. You will work proactively to:

Explain the business impact and strategic significance of analytic outcomes to non-technical senior stakeholders.
Lead clients in the development of their in-house data, analytics environments, organisational structures and information/analytics governance.
Lead and manage the procurement and installation of analytic toolsets considering the client’s maturity
Lead and manage a co-sourced team of analytics specialists comprising of employees, sub-contractors, vendor specialists and client employees. Define and manage performance, cost, scope, schedule and quality for the team according to the team charter.
Lead and manage the design and development of analytics assets including the identification and collection of applicable data to solve a business problem.
Design, develop and implement optimization algorithms and solutions in areas that might include asset and inventory management, communications, channels, risk and portfolio analysis and supply chain management.
Design, develop and implement predictive analytical models for areas such as customer segmentation, market basket analysis, offer propensity, demand planning & forecasting, fraud detection, inventory management and risk exposure.
Design, develop and implement approaches for productionising model scoring and the closed loop feedback paths require to support true test and learn and model validation.

In addition to your focus on client engagements, you will contribute to the definition and enhancement of analytics and experimental design disciplines within the practice.

You bring to the role
You will possess the following experience and attributes:
A sound understanding of digital and cognitive technologies and analytics, information management and business process based solutions.
A high level understanding of systems integration, relationship databases and non-relational data stores.
Proven ability to:
Design and implement a sophisticated analytical lifecycle management ecosystem including continuous integration, functional performance monitoring and automated model retraining.
Lead the design of analytical solution to maximise code reuse, decouple system components, maximise portability and minimise technical debt.
Apply advanced techniques to data to assess its promise for future analysis.
Construct a reproducible data pipeline with appropriate tooling to transform it into candidate features for machine learning.
Apply a range of visual presentation tools to create customer visualisations for specific purposes including interactive and time dependent visualisations.
Formulate, construct and apply appropriate learning algorithms and optimisation approaches to data.
Apply the techniques of statistical inference to test hypotheses and derive estimates of population statistics from sample data.
Demonstrated experience in one or more of the following: Data Mining, Predictive Analytics, Machine Learning, Segmentation, Optimisation, Business Rules Engines, Marketing Optimisation, Pricing Optimisation, Web Analytics, Geospatial Analysis.
Demonstrated experience with a range of languages/tools/datastores that could include: R, SQL, SAS, Python, SPSS, Pig, Hive, Impala, RapidMiner, Salford Systems, Weka, KXEN, Matlab, Octave, Teradata, Aster, Oracle, Neo4J, Hadoop, Tableau, QlikView, Alteryn, Alphine Data Labs, Unica, SAS CI, SAS MO, Radar, QGIS, MapInfo, PostGIS, Git.
A disciplined approach to problem solving and an ability to critically assess a range of information to differentiate true business needs as opposed to user requests.
Excellent interpersonal, oral and written communication skills with extensive experience explaining complex technical concepts to business focussed senior stakeholders.
Proven ability to develop and manage enduring client relationships, engendering a sense of trust and respect.
Present in a professional manner and have a positive personal presence with a high degree of personal awareness and desire to be a part of a high performing team.
What is on offer

Rewarding careers for outstanding professionals, ongoing learning and development opportunities, a collaborative and inclusive culture, and flexible and agile work practices that focus on our people's wellbeing to drive innovation and entrepreneurship.


Please apply for this position by submitting your confidential application online."	 - Sydney NSW	Data Science Consulting leadHuman Capital Management Australia - Sydney NSWPermanent	Data Science Consulting lead
478	"Join a leading Australian Brand as part of their fast growing team
Opportunity to work on Pricing Optimisation models
Opportunity to work with large big data
A leading Australian Brand is currently looking for an experienced Data Scientist to be a part of their fast growing team. You will have opportunities to work on pricing optimisation and large data sets to draw insights and contribute to their decision making.

Reporting to the Pricing Manager, you will be part of their exciting journey in expanding their data analytics and machine learning capabilities.

Key Responsibilities
Responsible for developing solutions that provide the Pricing team with insights to make critical decisions.
Develop world-class models (hands-on coding) and put in place a framework of automation for productionisation, accuracy and precision testing and version control management.
Develop high-quality insights and recommendations from the Big Data platform
Develop a capability to turn high-throughput, real-time data into rapidly actionable insights.
Be part of the end-to-end process on how to leverage data science in our market including keeping us on the cutting edge of data science applications to other industries
To be successful, you will have:

Extensive experience in the application of statistical modelling, machine learning, deep learning and data mining to commercial ""real-world"" problems
Qualifications in relevant disciplines (Physics, Statistics, Mathematics, Computer Science, Analytics) at Masters level or greater.
Solid skills in SQL for data extraction and manipulation
Solid skills in either Python or R
Strong understanding and experience with AWS technologies Extensive experience in model development, analysis, evaluation and automation.
Extensive experience in hypothesis testing and A/B testing, particularly in a customer analytics and/or digital environment
This is an excellent opportunity to lead the analytical solution delivery to the business on new ideas and provide data driven recommendations to test innovations and optimise their success before industrialising them.

For more information, please call Corrin on 03 8330 5003

IMPORTANT: By submitting your email address and any other personal information when you APPLY to a job, you consent to such information being collected, held, used and disclosed in accordance with our COLLECTIONS NOTICE and PRIVACY POLICY.

http://www.bluefinresources.com.au/privacy-policy"	 - Melbourne VIC	Data ScientistBluefin Resources - Melbourne VIC	Data Scientist
479	"Multiple roles - Lead/Manager
Huge Australian consultancy
Massive client base ranging many Australian household names
Work among an industry leading consultancy on-site for some of the biggest clients in Melbourne! If you'd like exposure to some of the most renowned analytics projects across Australia, alongside a flexible culture offering a great work life balance apply now!
Work among an industry leading consultancy on-site for some of the biggest clients in Melbourne! If you'd like exposure to some of the most renowned analytics projects across Australia, alongside a flexible culture offering a great work life balance apply now!

What You'll Do:

Apply statistical analyses, machine learning, and data visualisation techniques
Develop efficient, workable production solutions that perform prescribed research methods and business rules
Design, develop, and implement creative quality assurance tests that validate source data and production output
Partner with developers, statisticians, and product managers to deliver timely, high-quality product data
Support statistical teams that research and evaluate new methods

What is in it for you?

A flexible culture with great work/life balance
Work with some of Australia's leading household names
What You'll Need:

Experience with R and Python
Proven success managing critical processes and teams in a fast-paced business environment with competing priorities, vague requirements, and rapid iterations
Strong software development skills and expertise designing efficient SQL queries of big data
Bachelors degree in a quantitative subject such as Statistics, Operations Research, Engineering or Computer Science
Excellent verbal and written communication skills - this role is mainly client facing!
Consulting experience will be highly regarded
If you feel the above is the next step you'd like to take in your career, APPLY NOW!

Only successful candidates will be contacted.
Experis ANZ is parent to a portfolio of brands; Greythorn, Safesearch, Marks Sattin, GT-X and Global Attract. These brands make up our core specialisations for Technology & Digital, Accounting & Finance, Engineering and Workplace Health, Safety and Environment. When you apply for this opportunity you will be directed to the parent website www.experis.com.au to lodge your application. Experis is part of the ManpowerGroup, a global leader in offering end to end workforce solutions.

If you're curious and willing to have a conversation about this role, please pick up the phone and speak with our recruitment specialist below. Even if this doesn't sound like the right role for you, we encourage you to join our talent community so your skill set can be the first considered when another opportunity arises. Click register on our website www.experis.com.au.


Tom Bull
Data Science
Recruitment Consultant
+61 3 9604 4209"	 - Melbourne VIC	Senior Data ScientistGreythorn6 reviews - Melbourne VICTemporary, Contract	Senior Data Scientist
480	"Multiple roles - Lead/Manager
Huge Australian consultancy
Massive client base ranging many Australian household names
Work among an industry leading consultancy on-site for some of the biggest clients in Melbourne! If you'd like exposure to some of the most renowned analytics projects across Australia, alongside a flexible culture offering a great work life balance apply now!
Work among an industry leading consultancy on-site for some of the biggest clients in Melbourne! If you'd like exposure to some of the most renowned analytics projects across Australia, alongside a flexible culture offering a great work life balance apply now!

What You'll Do:

Apply statistical analyses, machine learning, and data visualisation techniques
Develop efficient, workable production solutions that perform prescribed research methods and business rules
Design, develop, and implement creative quality assurance tests that validate source data and production output
Partner with developers, statisticians, and product managers to deliver timely, high-quality product data
Support statistical teams that research and evaluate new methods

What is in it for you?

A flexible culture with great work/life balance
Work with some of Australia's leading household names
What You'll Need:

Experience with R and Python
Proven success managing critical processes and teams in a fast-paced business environment with competing priorities, vague requirements, and rapid iterations
Strong software development skills and expertise designing efficient SQL queries of big data
Bachelors degree in a quantitative subject such as Statistics, Operations Research, Engineering or Computer Science
Excellent verbal and written communication skills - this role is mainly client facing!
Consulting experience will be highly regarded
If you feel the above is the next step you'd like to take in your career, APPLY NOW!

Only successful candidates will be contacted.
Experis ANZ is parent to a portfolio of brands; Greythorn, Safesearch, Marks Sattin, GT-X and Global Attract. These brands make up our core specialisations for Technology & Digital, Accounting & Finance, Engineering and Workplace Health, Safety and Environment. When you apply for this opportunity you will be directed to the parent website www.experis.com.au to lodge your application. Experis is part of the ManpowerGroup, a global leader in offering end to end workforce solutions.

If you're curious and willing to have a conversation about this role, please pick up the phone and speak with our recruitment specialist below. Even if this doesn't sound like the right role for you, we encourage you to join our talent community so your skill set can be the first considered when another opportunity arises. Click register on our website www.experis.com.au.


Tom Bull
Data Science
Recruitment Consultant
+61 3 9604 4209"	 - Melbourne VIC	Senior Data ScientistExperis563 reviews - Melbourne VIC$100,000 a year - Temporary, Contract	Senior Data Scientist
481	"This startup is on the hunt for a good Software Engineer to join the team in the capacity of a technical principal. Guiding junior Engineers is part of the culture and this job.

Software Engineers here do these cool things:
Develop automation and infrastructure for development, testing, build and deployment
Build Data Processing and Machine Learning systems
Roll out services to improve analytics
Create a human-like end product
Build tools for their Data Scientist friends
Software Engineers here need to have:
Functional programming such as: Scala, Python, Javascript
Passion for big data technologies and data science
Degree in software engineering/computer science
Impact:

You'll play a critical role in disrupting the analytics industry using artificial intelligence.

Benefits of working here:
Work life balance/Flexibility
A culture of mutual respect
Pet friendly
Cool T-shirts
Pair programming sessions
Weekly, Monthly and Quarterly events
Education centric values

Please contact ronny@theonset.com.au or on 0448 808 848 to learn more."	 - Sydney NSW	Software EngineerOnset Group Pty Ltd - Sydney NSW$135,000 - $140,000 a year	Software Engineer
482	"Data Architect

About our Client:

My client is global leader in technology and Big Data Architecture with operations in over 20 countries. They are looking to grow their Big Data Engineering capability with in their Melbourne Office.

The Role:
A Data Architect with strong development capability is needed to join a market leading Big Data team, building enterprise level market leading Data Solutions.
Experience:
Proven experience as a hands-on data scientist, formulating and delivering strategy and data solutions8-10 years of experience working with Java, J2EE Technologies.At least 5 + years of hands-on development in Big data systems using Spark, Pig, Hive, MapReduce, SparkSQL, Apache Nifi, Kakfa etcExperience working with Shell, Python, Hadoop Cluster configurationHands on data modelling experience, specifically operational and dimensional modelling for data warehousesAt least 5 years of experience in Design and warehouse architecture.Demonstrated experience in the use of data science and analytics capability to enhance business decision making.Using analytics finding to select key features relevant for building analytic systems/machine learning models (Feature engineering)

About You:

With both permanent and contract positions available we encourage candidates with skills in the above area to contact the team at Hydrogen for confidential discussions. We are seeking intellectually capable, personable and change driven individuals who want to be part of a market leading consulting organisation. First class communication skills in both the written and verbal form will be required.

What's on offer?

The opportunity to work with world class thought leaders in the digital transformation, Big data, Data science, RPA and AI space. International and local career progression.

Competitive salaries depending on experience (roles range from $150,000 + super – 160,000 + super and bonus).
 #LI-MP3 #LI-96"	 - Melbourne VIC	Big Data ArchitectHydrogen Group6 reviews - Melbourne VIC$150,000 a year - Permanent	Big Data Architect
483	"Who we are

Tyro is Australia’s largest fintech and newest bank. We’re giving the business banking world a good shake up, with smart technology that save Australian businesses time and money.
We’re born different.
We don’t follow the easy path, we blaze our own unique trail.
And we want like-minded people who understand where we’re coming from and where we’re going.
When it comes to banks, lots of them say they’re different.
But Tyro really is different. We don’t do mortgages, personal loans, or investments. We’re all about business.
We may be new, but what we lack in heritage, we make up for with relentless determination and a focus on the future.
Our singular goal is to make life better for business owners with superior products and services that are simple and seamless so our customers, and our people, can keep blazing our own unique trail.

Your mission is to become Tyro’s marketing data, analytics and marketing automation subject matter expert (SME).
This role will be pivotal in creating and delivering targeted, end-to-end marketing campaigns, coupled with an extensive understanding of the business’ opportunities and risks, which will ultimately translate into sales, deepened relationships and positive customer experience. This role is responsible for establishing the campaign management and marketing analytics function within the marketing team, working closely with the organisation’s broader team of data scientist and analysts. This includes the effective planning, build, execution, deployment and analysis of marketing and customer campaigns across all channels (online and offline) to ensure the right message is delivered to the right customer at the right time.
You will also have accountability for the management, government, and optimisation of our existing CRM and marketing automation software and assume a pivotal role in the scoping and integration of any projects aligned with automated campaign management solutions and the data and digital product team roadmap.
What you'll be doing
Strategy
Consult with internal and external stakeholders on the best way to meet business objectives

Data & Analytics
Partner with product to understand and analyse large and different data systems and translate these into business opportunities / campaigns
Monitor and analyse campaign performance and create a range of best practices by customer segment
Challenge the way we use or source data for marketing and campaigns
Partner with Marketing and Customer teams to build targeted contact lists for acquisition, partner and customer campaigns in the marketing platform
Ensure data integrity through the establishment of campaign and analytical processes including data governance, contact rules and campaign quality / uploading / testing and tracking
Campaign management
Manage campaigns once they are running
Recommend and embed robust test-and-learn methodologies into campaigns
Work closely with the digital team to create custom-built reports and forecast modelling

Insights & Optimisation
Identify and implement any areas to deliver improved quality, speed, response rates and automation
Guide the team in the move towards multi-touch attribution modelling and end-to-end tracking
Effectively extract and analyse the performance of campaigns and provide key insights and recommendations for future improvements and new opportunities

Marketing CRM & Automation
Act like a pioneer in the field and proactively scope for ways to improve our CRM and Marketing automation systems to ensure the set up and the outcomes are in line with the business requirements
Be the expert in the organisation for recommending and selecting the right marketing technology
Be the central point of contact for our marketing automation software
Consult with 3rd party vendors to ensure best practice and value is achieved through CRM and marketing automation

Other projects and duties as required
What we're looking for:
A good understanding and experience with CRM and marketing automation is key for this role - experience with Salesforce and Pardot is preferred
Good interpersonal, negotiation and relationship building skills with the ability to communicate and engage well with stakeholders at all levels and 3rd party vendors
Efficient project planning and execution for deliverables
Analyse and manage data using SQL, SAS or other language and the ability to build queries and prepare data for further analysis
Advanced experience in end-to-end customer / marketing / campaign / analytics including planning and sizing, lead gen and nurturing, list extraction, tag management, website and campaign reporting methodologies and skills (prospect & existing customers)
Advanced technical and analytical skills to analyse customer and marketing profiles, campaigns and website performance including cohort analysis
Familiar with Google Analytics, Google Tag Manager & Mixpanel or any other relevant reporting software
Familiar with multi-touch attribution modelling and adserving
High analytic, problem solving, lateral thinking and interpretive skills
A keen eye to identify new opportunities that present themselves
Ability to explain complex information in simple terms to different audiences
Ability to translate campaign data into actionable insights
Positive approach to change
Self-driven, ability to set, manage and deliver own goals and deliver business objectives
3+ years’ marketing/campaign/customer analytics experience
Advanced marketing automation experience (preferably Pardot)
Advanced CRM experience (ideally Salesforce)
Advanced Excel skills
What we'd like to see:
B2B marketing experience
Financial Services experience
Tableau experience
Why work for us

We're not just like every other bank. Tyro has always been a tech company at heart, but fostering a diverse and inclusive environment, and a passion for continuous learning has always been one of the most important parts of our company's culture.

Tyros are a highly collaborative mix of people. You will work closely with our awesome teams and individuals in engineering, product management, customer support, sales and other functions within the business. Everyone is committed to delivering great outcomes for our customers, and you will have the chance to change the face of banking for Australia businesses.

Our 400 strong team of Tyros, just like our customers, are the lifeblood of our business. We go to great lengths to ensure a positive and enjoyable employee experience for all. We offer some amazing employee benefits such as a generous training budget, regular training for professional and personal development, 16 weeks paid primary carers leave, 3 weeks paid secondary carers leave, annual team based volunteer day, 17.5% leave loading and not to mention our multiple craft beer kegs (selection of beers carefully selected by our beer connoisseurs), wide selection of wine, variety of snacks and a ping pong table, selection of board and video games and an awesome rooftop area for socialising, all available to be enjoyed.

Privacy and Submitting your Application
By proceeding to submit your application, you acknowledge that you have read and understood Tyro’s Privacy Policy (www.tyro.com/privacy-policy/) and Privacy Statement & Consent for Job Applicants (www.tyro.com/privacy-statement-job-applicants/) and consent to Tyro collecting, using, holding and disclosing your personal information in accordance with these policies."	 - Sydney NSW	Marketing Operations AnalystTyro - Sydney NSW	Marketing Operations Analyst
484	SparkBeyond has built an AI-powered research engine, capable of finding complex patterns in data by understanding their meaning. Operating at the intersection of Data Science and Artificial Intelligence fields, our Machine Learning technology is so ground-breaking that it’s been referred to as science fiction on multiple occasions. SparkBeyond Discovery Platform is being used by Fortune 500 companies across industries.What will you do?Solve various problems and make a true impact across unlimited domains and industries (Financial Risk, Health, Ecommerce, Marketing, Oil & Gas Exploration and more.).Deliver business value by translating complex data into meaningful insights.Be the face of the company and the product directly interfacing with our partners around the globe.Partner with our customers’ Data Science teams, helping them optimize their use of SparkBeyond’s Discovery Platform.Work directly with our in-house team comprised of the brightest minds in technology, research and mathematics as well as senior interfaces from leading companies across the globe (fortune 500 companies and many others).Use your analytical skills and deep product understanding to consult our partners and provide them with advice and input of the highest quality.What will you need?Significant relevant work experience - Professional work experience on data science and analytics issuesA very strong academic background - PhDs are very welcome, as are quantitative degrees - Math, Physics, Computer Science and the like.Proven experience in handling large scale end to end data science projects and presenting the findings and insights. Building models is great - creating impact is greaterProven experience in translating business challenges into data pipelines & model frameworkExperience with Machine Learning techniques. Supervised, unsupervised, traditional or deep learning - either is great, but you need to know your stuff, both in theory and in practice (e.g., MICE, scikit-learn, keras or weka)Programming skills that allow you to be self-sufficient in handling data. Python and R are our daily companions, and a solid grasp of SQL is always needed. Big bonus points if you know ScalaAlso welcome: Experience with large datasets and distributed computing (Hive/Hadoop, Spark)Willingness to travel. We understand the need for a work-life balance and family time, but the ability to be on location at our clients is regularly required.Why SparkBeyond?Sense of Purpose: We’re building something bigger than ourselves. Our team is building a machine that can help solve the world’s most critical problems. We do this through our Partner engagements and the pro-bono work we are passionate about.Exposure: Help insurers process claims faster. Or pharmaceutical companies improve their quality control. Or, on a pro bono basis, an NGO to upskill underprivileged teenagers. Choose what you will work on and where you will leave your mark.People: We are proud of the brilliant, passionate and engaged team at SparkBeyond, including our very own Gödel and Wolf Prize winner. Our people are our greatest asset and we believe in empowerment, ownership and constant growth.Platform: Our Data Scientists are passionate about our cutting-edge platform and can’t imagine returning to traditional data science.Credibility: We have established ourselves as an industry leader, partnering and making impact for our Fortune 500 clients. See what the market is saying about us:https://venturebeat.com/2016/04/02/deep-learning-will-be-huge-and-heres-who-will-dominate-it/https://www.gartner.com/doc/3311218/cool-vendors-data-science-Job Type: Full-timeSalary: $100,000.00 to $180,000.00 /year	 - Melbourne VIC	Data ScientistSparkBeyond - Melbourne VIC$100,000 - $180,000 a year	Data Scientist
486	"There has never been a more exciting time to be part of Domain Group, a dynamic digital media and technology services business and one of Australia's leading property destinations. We provide property advertising and media online, via mobile, social media and in magazines, and technology services to the real estate industry. The business is experiencing rapid growth in digital revenues and investing in all areas to drive future earnings growth. Domain offers a dynamic and innovative culture at the leading edge of digital media in Australia.
We are looking for a lead data scientist to help sales, product and business leadership make decisions with data, give consumers certainty and control when selling their home with a broad mission and build data science and machine learning products to power the next stage of Domain's growth
As part of the Domain Group, you'll have the opportunity to work across all aspects of our property ecosystem, from listing and agent, to consumer behavior, email, and sales data.
What you'll do:
Build scalable models that analyse and extract information from disparate public sources
Develop and improve machine learning algorithms that drive our data pipeline operation
Leverage advanced statistical modeling to improve domain products
Research and implement the latest advances in the world of data
Proven ability to collaboratively and maturely work on a team
Curious with an aptitude to quickly learn
Experience:
At least 3-5 years of industry experience in data science
2+ years of professional experience with Natural Language Processing and/or Image Processing
Thorough knowledge of machine learning modeling processes
Thorough knowledge of supervised and unsupervised learning algorithms
Thorough knowledge of Natural Language Processing
Experience with implementation of Data Systems
Fluency in UNIX, SQL, Python and/or R
Good software engineering principles
Education/Qualifications:
MS or PhD degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Quantitative Psychology or related field.
Portfolio evidence of previous work is appreciated (i.e. blog, GitHub repository, journal/conference publications etc).
So...what happens next?
Once we've received your application we'll give it the attention it deserves and you'll hear from us either way. If you have the right experience, one of our Recruitment Consultants will give you a call (so make sure you keep your phone handy!) and from there we'll support you through the interview process.

Interested?
Go on then, click apply, we'd love to see your application!

A little note to recruitment agencies: We have a superstar recruitment team who are pretty good at filling our own roles, we know you're great at what you do to, but there's no need to get in touch! :)"	 - Sydney NSW	Lead Data ScientistDomain Group6 reviews - Sydney NSWFull-time, Permanent	Lead Data Scientist
487	Job DescriptionThe candidate is a skilled data scientist who will be building deep learning models for medical image diagnosis applications such as segmentation, localisation and classification of abnormalities.ResponsibilitiesThe candidate will write high quality model with high performance and good memory management, together with state-of-the-art accuracies and embed into our proprietary software. Our aim is to align you with the activities which truly interest you; will stretch you technically; help you grow and impact on billions of patients.RequirementsBachelor / Master / PhD in engineering or computer science or mathematics or physicsKnows computer vision / image segmentation, localization, classificationKnows tensorflow or theano or torchStrong python, C++ or java coderGood knowledge of numpy, pandas, sklearn, scipy, seabornKnows how to build deep learning models like RNN and CNN and other neural network models.May require to relocate to China, Beijing.What We OfferMaster, Teach, Learn – The opportunity to work with, learn from and share knowledge with ultra-smart colleagues in a culture of collaboration and technical excellence. We groom our employees and make sure that they stay at the cutting edge of the technology stack.Impact – Huge potential to make a positive contribution across our business, people and partnersRemuneration – Competitive pay with share award for top performers.We are willing to groom engineers and fresh graduates who don’t have a background in deep learning but are interested to learn. You will also have the opportunity to attend top machine learning conferences like NIPS and ICML.Job Types: Full-time, Permanent	 - Sydney NSW	BioMind Data Scientist/Engineer (Relocate to Beijing)biomind.ai - Sydney NSWFull-time, Permanent	BioMind Data Scientist/Engineer (Relocate to Beijing)
488	"Our Client seeks a Data Scientist with Pre Sales or Consulting experience to join their Enterprise Information Management team and work with the Pre Sales division to develop custom built Data models for a range of EIM top tier Clients.

You will be a core member of the customer solution team, analyzing complex customer requirements to provide unique solutions for their Enterprise Information Data.

You will be hands on in developing predictive modeling concepts and optimisation algorithms within complex environments. Provide technical know how to deliver successful solutions to large corporations and government agencies.

Create and build solutions to meet unique customer focused business requirements and insights.

Help develop best practices for implementation projects.

You will possess at least 2 years experience within either an Analytics or Data Science working environment.

Experience in Spark with PySpark, Scala, SparkR specifically and ample experience in Python and R.
Experience working with large, multi-dimensional datasets.
Experience or an interest in Deep Learning, AI and Neural Networks.
Experience creating meaningful data visualisations and exposure to analysing unstructured content.
If this sounds like a role that fits your profile or would like to know more please click APPLY NOW below or email james@counterpointgroup.com.au for more details."	 - Sydney NSW	Data Scientist - Sydney, permanent, Spark, Scala, Python - pre sales workCounterpoint - Sydney NSW$160,000 a year - Full-time, Permanent	Data Scientist - Sydney, permanent, Spark, Scala, Python - pre sales work
489	"Work among a fast growing Data Science team who pride themselves on collaboration and innovation alongside a tech stack that is second to none.

Work among a fast growing Data Science team who pride themselves on collaboration and innovation alongside a tech stack that is second to none.
Collaborate with a highly efficient Data Science team deciphering huge unstructured Data Sets and creating value organisation-wide!

Due to recent growth within the Data Science team a key player within aviation is looking to add 1 more Data Scientist to their team.

What You'll Do:
Develop efficient, workable production solutions that perform prescribed research methods and business rules

Apply statistical analyses, machine learning, and data visualisation techniques

Partner with developers, statisticians, and product managers to deliver timely, high-quality product data

Design, develop, and implement creative quality assurance tests that validate source data and production output

Support statistical teams that research and evaluate new methods

What's in it for you?

Fantastic competitive day rate

Work on some of Melbourne's most exciting Data Science projects

Be part of a collaborative and innovative company

Opportunity convert to a permanent role after 6 months.

What You'll Need:
Experience with machine learning algorithms (XG-Boost, Gradient Boosting, Random Forest, Linear Modelling, Neural Networks, K-Means Clustering, Decision Trees)

Big Data Analytics experience - Spark & Scala (predominantly on semi-structured / unstructured data sets - e.g. Adobe)

Proven success managing critical processes and teams in a fast-paced business environment with competing priorities, vague requirements, and rapid iterations

Strong software development skills and expertise designing efficient SQL queries of big data

Excellent verbal and written communication skills

Bachelors degree in a quantitative subject such as Statistics, Operations Research, Engineering or Computer Science

Preferred: Familiarity with JIRA and Git Experience with Hadoop or other comparable distributed file systems Ability to develop advanced analytical solutions in Python or Spark. Knowledge of statistical software (ideally, R) or scientific computation software Experience conducting research and analytics with digital or TV audience data

If you feel the above is the next step you'd like to take in your career, APPLY NOW!

Only successful candidates will be contacted.
Experis ANZ is parent to a portfolio of brands; Greythorn, Safesearch, Marks Sattin, GT-X and Global Attract . These brands make up our core specialisations for Technology & Digital, Accounting & Finance, Engineering and Workplace Health, Safety and Environment. When you apply for this opportunity you will be directed to the parent website www.experis.com.au to lodge your application. Experis is part of the ManpowerGroup , a global leader in offering end to end workforce solutions.

If you're curious and willing to have a conversation about this role, please pick up the phone and speak with our recruitment specialist below. Even if this doesn't sound like the right role for you, we encourage you to join our talent community so your skill set can be the first considered when another opportunity arises. Click register on our website www.experis.com.au .

Tom Bull
Data Science
Recruitment Consultant
+61 3 9604 4209"	 - Melbourne VIC	Senior Data Scientist - 6 month contractGreythorn Specialist Technology Recruitment6 reviews - Melbourne VICTemporary, Contract	Senior Data Scientist - 6 month contract
490	"Greenfield projects
Cutting edge tech
Work/Life balance
Work on exciting greenfield projects as part of a dynamic, fast growing team of data scientists.
Responsibilities

The purpose of the Data Scientist is to take mass sets of data to identify trends and predictions.

Major responsibilities include the following:

Develop and execute upon complex analytics projects
Collaboration with peers to ensure best working practices.
liaise with peers/managers to ensure best practice


Technical requirements:

SASVisual
Python
SASS
Teradata/SQL/MapReduce
Strong SQL skills
Experience with visualisation tools
MapReduce,Hadoop, Hive, Pig, Spark


Qualifications:

The ability to decipher large sets of unstructured data
Experience with advanced data a and data mining
Agile experience
A hunger for problem solving
Strong verbal and written communications skills
Benefits

Flexible working hours - work life balance!Monthly team/individual incentivesKPI based educational incentives (Certifications/Training courses etc.)

If you feel the above is the next step you would like to take in your career, APPLY NOW!
Experis ANZ is parent to a portfolio of brands; Greythorn, Safesearch, Marks Sattin, GT-X and Global Attract. These brands make up our core specialisations for Technology & Digital, Accounting & Finance, Engineering and Workplace Health, Safety and Environment. When you apply for this opportunity you will be directed to the parent website www.experis.com.au to lodge your application. Experis is part of the ManpowerGroup, a global leader in offering end to end workforce solutions.

If you're curious and willing to have a conversation about this role, please pick up the phone and speak with our recruitment specialist below. Even if this doesn't sound like the right role for you, we encourage you to join our talent community so your skill set can be the first considered when another opportunity arises. Click register on our website www.experis.com.au.
Tom Bull
Data Science
Recruitment Consultant
+61 3 9604 4209"	 - Melbourne VIC	Senior Data ScientistGreythorn6 reviews - Melbourne VICFull-time, Permanent	Senior Data Scientist
491	"Join one of Melbourne's iconic institutions
Expand your skill set across a variety of projects
An opportunity to deliver high-quality best-fit solutions
An iconic establishment is currently seeking a Senior Data Scientist for a permanent opportunity to be a part of an exciting new team to build business relationships and provide high-quality best-fit solutions.
Having solid statistical modelling building skills, you will experience an exciting mix of creativity and innovation, within a framework of challenging objectives and a passion for delivering the best.

This role will suit an individual who enjoys tackling new projects to support business planning and decision making through the use of qualitative and quantitative analyses, based on customer and operational data.
Key Responsibilities:
Develop and implement statistical modells based on business requirements
Prepare and present insights and reports to key stakeholders
Provide recommendations across multiple aspects such as source of data and methods used
Extract and transform data for use of analysis, visualisations and statistical modelling
Be an active participant in knowledge sharing with a wide range of stakeholders
Skills Required:
Tertiary Qualification/Ph.D. in a quantitative discipline - mathematics, statistics, operation research (additional qualifications will be highly regarded)
Strong probem-solving, organizing and coordinating skills
Strong communication skills (verbally and written) is essential
Advanced skills SQL
Must have R and/or Python programming skills
Capable of managing multiple projects under pressure and meeting deadlines
Ability to interact proactively with internal and external customers
An inquisitive mind, passionate about deriving insights from data
This opportunity will allow the successful applicant to build strong relationships with internal and external teams, playing an integral role influencing business strategies, delivering customer and operational insights and knowledge through statistical modelling and data analysis.

To discuss the role more in detail, please call Corrin on 03 8330 5003.

IMPORTANT: By submitting your email address and any other personal information when you APPLY to a job, you consent to such information being collected, held, used and disclosed in accordance with our COLLECTIONS NOTICE and PRIVACY POLICY.

http://www.bluefinresources.com.au/privacy-policy"	 - Melbourne VIC	Senior Data ScientistBluefin Resources - Melbourne VIC	Senior Data Scientist
492	You remember how to roll up your sleeves and craft data joins in SQL, but you've invested time in learning R, and Python is your friend. You know Hadoop isn't the only approach and you're happiest getting behind the GUI into the real data to uncover the stories.Isn't it about time you took advantage of the benefits from all that knowledge?Our client is looking for data polyglots who enjoy solving complex problems; not the kind you can come to with a canned response, the ones where you really need to use your skills.With some of the biggest names in Australia and around the world throwing their most pressing problems at our client they need curious guides - but they only take the best.Getting in isn't easy, but if it was, it wouldn't be the right place for you.Prove yourself and you can build a team behind you to grow your own patch. The opportunities truly are what you make them.With Udemy on tap, and weekly internal led training sessions, you'll be joining a group of like-minded people who are capable of understanding you when you get on your high horse about relevance over recency (or the other way around).Currently our client has four areas of practice, you can join one these and then explain to them what they need to build another:Data & Analytics - BI/DW, Big Data Analytics, Data Engineering, Data Science and Advanced AnalyticsCustomer Engagement - Marketing Campaigns, Campaign Analysis, Customer InsightsDigital - Full stack Development, UI/UX Design, Mobile DevelopmentCloud & Technology - Cloud Services (AWS, Azure, Google Cloud Platform), Managed ServicesWe're not worried about levels at the moment, if you've got the skills there's a place for you.SEO stuff because you know we need to have it in here;Data engineerData scientistData ConsultantJava, Scala, Python, HadoopApache Spark, Kafka, Hive, Airflow, NiFiAWS, Google Cloud Platform or Azure is helpful but not mandatoryJob Types: Full-time, PermanentExperience:data consulting: 3 years (Preferred)	 - Sydney NSW	Software Architect / Tech LeadKloudPPL - Sydney NSWFull-time, Permanent	Software Architect / Tech Lead
493	"We are currently recruiting 2 x Contract Data Scientists to work with a respected big data and data science team at a large banking and financial services client in Melbourne CBD. These are initial 6 month contracts, offering attractive daily rates and opportunities to work on challenging modelling and machine learning projects, with real business outcomes.
About you:
We are seeking 2 x data scientists, with over 3 years of experience delivering advanced analytics, commercial modelling, statistics or data science in business environments.
You will have confidence with statistical, predictive and machine learning models and techniques - applied to business problems such as with; marketing, customer outcomes, fraud, pricing, risk or operations.
Excellent communication skills - with the ability to work directly with senior business stakeholders
You can understand high-level business problems and then conceptualise what data sources to leverage, flag potential constraints, determine what questions to ask and which experiments to run to deliver the optimal solutions.
Skills in commercially relevant data tools such as; Python, R, SQL, AWS.
Nice-to-have skills include; Hadoop, Spark, Java, Scala,
Work Rights: Must have valid Australian Work Rights/Visa for 6 months +

Interviews and Start date: ASAP
To apply: Please apply via the links below as soon as possible. We are interviewing immediately and looking for start dates in 2-4 weeks."	 - Melbourne VIC	Contract Data Scientist - 6 months - Banking and Financial ServicesTalent Insights Group - Melbourne VICTemporary, Contract	Contract Data Scientist - 6 months - Banking and Financial Services
494	"Multiple roles - Lead/Manager
Huge Australian consultancy
Massive client base ranging many Australian household names
Work among an industry leading consultancy on-site for some of the biggest clients in Melbourne! If you'd like exposure to some of the most renowned analytics projects across Australia, alongside a flexible culture offering a great work life balance apply now!
Work among an industry leading consultancy on-site for some of the biggest clients in Melbourne! If you'd like exposure to some of the most renowned analytics projects across Australia, alongside a flexible culture offering a great work life balance apply now!

What You'll Do:

Apply statistical analyses, machine learning, and data visualisation techniques
Develop efficient, workable production solutions that perform prescribed research methods and business rules
Design, develop, and implement creative quality assurance tests that validate source data and production output
Partner with developers, statisticians, and product managers to deliver timely, high-quality product data
Support statistical teams that research and evaluate new methods

What is in it for you?

A flexible culture with great work/life balance
Work with some of Australia's leading household names
What You'll Need:

Experience with R and Python
Proven success managing critical processes and teams in a fast-paced business environment with competing priorities, vague requirements, and rapid iterations
Strong software development skills and expertise designing efficient SQL queries of big data
Bachelors degree in a quantitative subject such as Statistics, Operations Research, Engineering or Computer Science
Excellent verbal and written communication skills - this role is mainly client facing!
Consulting experience will be highly regarded
If you feel the above is the next step you'd like to take in your career, APPLY NOW!

Only successful candidates will be contacted.
Experis ANZ is parent to a portfolio of brands; Greythorn, Safesearch, Marks Sattin, GT-X and Global Attract. These brands make up our core specialisations for Technology & Digital, Accounting & Finance, Engineering and Workplace Health, Safety and Environment. When you apply for this opportunity you will be directed to the parent website www.experis.com.au to lodge your application. Experis is part of the ManpowerGroup, a global leader in offering end to end workforce solutions.

If you're curious and willing to have a conversation about this role, please pick up the phone and speak with our recruitment specialist below. Even if this doesn't sound like the right role for you, we encourage you to join our talent community so your skill set can be the first considered when another opportunity arises. Click register on our website www.experis.com.au.


Tom Bull
Data Science
Recruitment Consultant
+61 3 9604 4209"	 - Melbourne VIC	Senior Data ScientistExperis563 reviews - Melbourne VIC$100,000 a year - Temporary, Contract	Senior Data Scientist
495	"Established company with great reputation in Science & Technical Recruitment
Full training, mentoring and support from experienced professionals
Competitive salary including uncapped commission
About Us

Do you want to further your corporate career working with some of the most impressive companies in Australia? As an established boutique recruitment consultancy, we work closely with some of the leading pharmaceutical, medical device, clinical research and FMCG companies in the world, supporting them in finding the best local talent in sales and marketing, regulatory and quality, and clinical research.
At On Q Recruitment we work hard, but we also have lots of fun too. We have been around since 1999 (so quite a while), and have an excellent reputation with clients and candidates alike.
How do we differ from other Recruitment companies out there? Well we're boutique, so we focus on doing a few things really well and are experts in our niche. We're based in St Leonards, have a small team with over 80 years recruitment industry experience combined and are looking forward to sharing that knowledge with the successful applicants.

Typically in recruitment you're expected to work long hours - call us old fashioned but we believe everyone should have a life too. Time at your desk isn't valued, outcomes are. We also believe people should be rewarded for the work they do hence your earning potential is uncapped - you get out what you put in.

You can expect a friendly, professional, open, relaxed team environment where we enjoy what we do and celebrate success. You'll feel valued and supported in your career progression. Sound good?

About the Role:

You will be fully trained to be able to fulfil the complete recruitment role over time which involves:

Building relationships with (new and existing) clients and taking job briefs
Writing and placing job advertisements
Reviewing CVs
Interviewing candidates and advising of suitable job opportunities
Booking client interviews, briefing candidates and follow up
All online administration managing the interview process from start to finish
Who are you?

You'll be a go getter who's looking for a great opportunity to springboard your career in a new direction
You've got at least 3 years work experience doing something else which isn't lighting your fire anymore
You'll be serious about your work and career, but not serious to have around the office
This is a people focused job so you'll need to have exceptional communication skills
Other handy skills are tenacity, resilience, organisational skills and influencing ability
A background in Customer Service or Sales would be advantageous,
You'll have a Bachelor's Degree - ideally in Science, Engineering, Data Science, Pharmacy, Business or HR
You'll be an Australian Citizen (or have Permanent Residency) and have an Australian Drivers Licence
The Rewards are:

A competitive starting base salary (dependent on experience) + super
Uncapped commission - no ceiling on your earning potential
Development plan with full training and mentoring to ensure your best chance of success
Technology to be able to work from home as needed once you have earned your stripes
Work/life balance - after all work and no play isn't good for anyone
A fully stocked kitchen so you'll never go hungry
Extra holiday time - you can accrue one extra days leave per year (up to 5 days)
Casual dress on Fridays (we like to relax into the weekend!)
If you're excited to hear more, we'd be excited to hear from you! Please submit your resume with cover letter and tell us what makes you think this could be the perfect match for you. If you'd like to speak to someone first please call Amanda on 0424 932 721. We look forward to hearing from you. All successful applicants will be notified by 19th October.
Please send your Cover Letter and Resume in Word Doc Format (no text boxes or tables please) and follow the Apply Links. Visit onqrecruitment.com.au to review all our current vacancies."	 - Northern Beaches NSW	Recruitment Consultant Trainee - Pharmacist or Data ScientistOn Q Recruitment - Northern Beaches NSWFull-time, Permanent	Recruitment Consultant Trainee - Pharmacist or Data Scientist
496	"About Hyper Anna and our team:
We’re a rapidly growing startup in the artificial intelligence space – we’ve had lots of traction, are backed by VCs and we’re poised for a huge year. As part of this, we are expanding our engineering team to help us overachieve on our goals while building a sustainable product. Our team is super switched on yet pretty casual and flexible, and we pride ourselves on our diverse, inclusive workplace.

About the opportunity:
We’re looking for Full-Stack Software engineers to entrust with the interesting technical challenges involved in creating and growing our product. You’ll be working with devs from data science, data engineering, backend, web and UX backgrounds to build Anna, an automated data scientist who is already beginning to transform how businesses use data. You’ll also be a huge advocate for Scala or Javascript best practices, mentoring the team and helping to get the most out of our stack. If Anna were a person you’d be her doctor, personal trainer, and nutritionist.

Specifically for this role, we’re looking for someone:

With strong programming skills in Javascript and/or Scala.
Who delights in building great interfaces for users in the front end and/or for developers in the back end.
Enjoys leading and mentoring software engineering teams

Desirably, you’ll also be strong in one of the following areas:

Data: A fan of data science and algorithms, with a deep understanding of big data platforms, data storage and retrieval
Infra: Love devops and building infrastructure and deployment pipelines that make developers jump for joy
People: Love building and nurturing teams, getting them aligned and engaged with the challenges of the product, and creating an environment for success

A day in your life will include:

Being responsible for the development of high performance features, services and algorithms
Working closely with designers, engineers and data scientists to deliver best-in-class solutions
Being involved in software and service architecture
Designing and adopting strong engineering practices

About you:
You’re passionate, up to date on new technologies, and have really strong computer science and engineering fundamentals. You know when to obsess over details and when it’s time to ship. You love working in a team and helping others to grow with you. You’re someone who is laid-back and adaptable but wants to have an impact on the product you’re working on.

To be successful in this role you’ll also need to demonstrate the following:

Commercial experience in at least one of Azure, Ansible and Circle CI or other similar devops, CI and CD infrastructure
Experience with databases (SQL)
A solid background in computer science / software engineering skills and knowledge
A passion for machine learning, data, distributed computing and functional programming
Ability to work in an agile development environment
Tertiary qualifications in software engineering or related disciplines

In return you’ll have the opportunity to join our team at a pivotal stage of our growth! This means you’ll have access to real career opportunities, receive a competitive salary, and work as part of our team in our beautiful, centrally located office.

Sound like you?
Applying is easy. Send an email with your resume, website, Github account, links to apps or anything else you’re proud of.
We love to talk all things tech and we are passionate about connecting with awesome people."	 - Sydney NSW	Hyper Anna: Software Engineer (Full-Stack)AirTree Ventures - Sydney NSW	Hyper Anna: Software Engineer (Full-Stack)
497	"Randstad is on the lookout for a Data Analyst/Scientist to work for a well-established organization and be responsible for providing support of all aspects of data creation and migration for the client’s projects, including identifying, creating, cleaning and validating data extraction, transforming, and loading data into the visualisation tools.
The ideal candidate will need to take an interest in Data Science especially in the subject of Predictive Modelling. You will be working with the Data Scientist lead, Junior Data Scientist and a Data Visualisation specialist.
To succeed in this role you will have:
Experience working with PowerBI and Tableau
Exposure to Python or R language
Strong knowledge of statistical/data mining methods and application in a business environment
Good understanding of Data Science domain, statistical and analytical model development and implementation
Significant data management experience, gained from within the financial services sector
Good understanding of data modelling techniques, tools/language - R, Python
Strong project management, collaboration and communication skills
Ability to apply logic and reasoning to identify solutions to complex business problems and implement solutions
Business and financial acumen
Curiosity to learn and keep up with market trends and innovations
Flexibility to adapt in a complex changing environment
Strong written and verbal communication skills
If you think you have the skills to be successful in this role, then don’t delay and hit the Apply button now! Alternatively you can send your profile to Glenn on glenn.abadilla@randstad.com.au
At Randstad, we are passionate about providing equal employment opportunities and embracing diversity to the benefit of all. We actively encourage applications from any background."	 - Mascot NSW	data analyst/scientist (power bi/tableau)Randstad11,835 reviews - Mascot NSWPermanent	data analyst/scientist (power bi/tableau)
498	"The Company

Robert Half Technology are working alongside a well reputable and established Insurance organisation in the CBD and we are currently looking for a talented Data Scientist to join our team on a permanent basis. Our client continue to grow across all areas of the business and this role has been created due to the expansion of the division. This role represents an exciting challenge and career opportunity for a Data Scientist to join our forward thinking client.

The Role

The Role of the Data Scientist will have the opportunity to make their mark using data led decision making and modelling to catalyse industry disuption. Aspects of the role include:

Proportion your role with Modelling, Research, Analysism Data Manipulation and Collaboration.

Work as a data expert and a quantitative researcher.

Translate unstructured, complex business problems into practical, powerful algorithmic solutions.

Be part of a highly innovative team working on interesting and difficult problems, leveraging cutting edge technology to build key data products.

Uncover fresh insights from disparate data sources and data mining

Spearheading machine learning projects on data that has never been touched by the organization.

About You

This is a hands-on position where you will be empowered to be very ambitious and bold, to solve challenging problems and have the potential to directly impact the future of the business. The role requires that you have experience in machine learning and data mining.

Your experience and skills should include most, if not all:
Ability to communicate complex quantitative analysis in a clear, precise and actionable manner

Practical experience using contemporary machine learning frameworks such as, scikit-learn, pytorch and tensorflow.

A proven track record in developing, innovating, and applying advanced algorithms to address practical problems and in building new analytical products of commercial value.

Experience in Python and/or R.

Experience in relational databases and SQL

Apply Today

Please send your resume by clicking on the apply button or for further information, contact our Melbourne office."	 - Melbourne VIC	Data Scientist - Market Leader - CBDRobert Half Australia6,897 reviews - Melbourne VIC$110,000 a year - Permanent	Data Scientist - Market Leader - CBD
499	"Deloitte is the world’s largest professional service firm, with one of the largest and most experienced Analytics, Information Management (AIM) & Data Automation practices. We have 400+ specialised consultants in Australia and more than 6,000 practitioners in the Deloitte global network.
With the ever increasing complexity and volume of data, the rise of in-memory, high performance computing, data discovery and visualisation solutions and the convergence of Big Data and Advanced Analytics, organisations are faced with increasing number of choices to ensure they are able to exploit their data assets for maximum advantage. Deloitte is able to draw from its vast global experience delivering complex data driven solutions for our clients across the full spectrum of technology and business domains to provide the right strategic advice to help an organisation respond effectively to these changes – as well as partner with our clients to execute on our recommendations.
About the Role
Do you want to be a part of how we help companies utilise their valuable data resources through effective use of the right technology, backed by a clear vision and strong executive sponsorship? Do you want to be part of an award winning team that provides clients with a visionary, yet balanced and pragmatic approach to automating concepts and tools to improve productivity and performance?
This is an opportunity to harness emerging technologies and analytical methodologies to solve real world problems. You will be part of a close, collaborative team that identifies and builds solutions that are practical as well as visionary, and that make an impact that matters.
We are looking for people who love data and want to solve problems with insight. Whether you call yourself a data scientist, analytics nerd or builder of predictive models. We want to hear from you if you are genuinely passionate about this area and have some applied experience.
You will be responsible for delivering insights through a range of corporate data sources through the application of analytics, data mining, Big Data and real-time decision making techniques and applications using various data management, analytics & data visualization tools.
About You
You’ll bring experience in one or more of the following competencies and enabling technologies
A strong background in applying mathematical and analytics approaches and methodologies to identifying complex relationships in data
Ability to communicate technical requirements and outputs in a clear and concise manner
A structured, logical and solution-oriented design mindset
Ability to work autonomously and with minimal oversight
Ability to demonstrate initiative and ownership in the completion of tasks
A demonstrable interest and passion for exploring new data/analytics concepts, applications and innovations (e.g. Cognitive, Robotics & Automate, AI, IoT etc.)
Some experience using a range of scripting languages – (e.g. Python, R, SQL etc.)
About Us: Deloitte Culture
Join a high performing culture of talented people, who are highly motivated and passionate about delivering impactful analytics solutions and insight. We are innovative and different because YOU are… we pride ourselves on our team of diverse, high performing Deloitte Professionals who are talented, supportive, inclusive and social – and who are at the heart of our success. Our aim is to ensure that all our people feel comfortable to bring their whole selves to work, and as a result, build a workplace that encourages the true spirit of 'And different'.
From day one at our firm you’ll be considered part of the Deloitte community and our development and career progression framework will help you develop the skills and capabilities that will set you up to succeed – in every sense of the word. At Deloitte, we assume that you perform other roles within your life…you could be a student, a teacher, a passionate hobbyist and a caring family member. We recognise the importance of balance and embrace agility, understanding that this means different things to each and every one of our employees.
If you have questions regarding this role, the Talent Acquisition Team is available to have a confidential discussion. Please contact Aditi Aggarwal via the Our Recruiters section on our careers website."	 - Sydney NSW	EXPRESSION OF INTEREST - Data & Analytics - NationalDeloitte7,167 reviews - Sydney NSW	EXPRESSION OF INTEREST - Data & Analytics - National
500	"Job Description:About IntellifyIntellify is a data science and machine learning consultancy who helps our customers to increase their growth, operate more efficiently and build competitive advantage. Our team consists of leading data scientists, machine learning engineers and consultants that extensively use advanced (statistical) machine learning and optimisation techniques to create state-of-the-art solutions for business. As an emerging AWS consulting partner, we have the ability to scale our solution to any needs through their cloud platform.About the OpportunityAs we are growing at a rapid speed, we are seeking a senior full-time data scientist/machine learning engineer who has extensive experience in data science, machine learning and/or statistical modelling as well as programming. As part of this role, you will supervise and manage junior data scientists, and work on development to build data science solutions using a combination of the latest technologies and business strategies.With a startup culture and applying cutting-edge technology to real-world business problems, you have the opportunity to drive impact at some of Australia’s leading startups and enterprises as well as to learn and grow within a team of like-minded data scientists. Our client problems have ranged from pricing, inventory and workforce optimisation to computer vision applied to radar data for predictive maintenance. The work is varied and challenging, and will require someone who is dynamic in their thinking as well as willing to explore and try new ideas.Being a senior data scientist at Intellify you are charged with both being a mentor and learning from fellow specialist data scientists in an ever evolving and improving atmosphere. We want to see you thrive professionally and personally as we create a leading data science, machine learning and AI company of the future.What we offerThis is a full-time permanent role. This role will provide a unique opportunity to work in a collaborative team and learn from experienced data scientists, so you can advance your knowledge and get hands-on experience with state-of-the-art machine learning methods. Our salaries are competitive, and we offer flexible working hours. We also believe great data science comes from great teams, so invest continuously in upskilling and cross-training our data scientists, with lunch & learn sessions, training courses and certifications, and an opportunity to be a core part of our data science and machine learning communities. Furthermore, we offer the following:1) 10 x paid days of professional development per year (attend/ speak @ conferences, undertake courses and certifications)2) $2,200 Toolkit allowance to go out and buy your own tech3) Profit sharing4) Work with high-profile clients5) A defined career path with your 1-1 mentor6) Great team culture7) Have an impact in a small team where there is no politics8) Flexible & inclusive work-environment9) Work closely with AWS using cutting edge cloud technologiesRequired Skills: A computer science, robotics, maths, statistics, physics or related degree (graduated Bachelors, MSc, PhD or last year MSc/PhD student)5+ years of applied industry machine learning, optimisation and/or statistics experienceStrong Python or R programming experience and related data science libraries (such as scikit-learn, Pandas, Tensorflow/Keras)Strong SQL database and code versioning (e.g., Git) skillsGood software engineering principlesProject management / team management experienceExperience with data visualisation tools or frameworks i.e. tableau, D3.js, ggplot2 etc.Desirable skills: Knowledge or experience of software engineering practicesKnowledge or experience on time series/product forecasting/recommender systemsKnowledge of deep learning/neural networksExperience working with web development technologiesExperience working with cloud technologies i.e. AWS / Microsoft / Google Cloud.Portfolio evidence of your previous work is appreciated (i.e. blog, github repository, conference presentations etc).How to ApplyIf you wish to take the next step in your career working and learning with the best in an innovative data science company, please click on ""Apply now"" and include:Your CVYour portfolio of projects (eg GitHub, blog site etc)Desired salaryYour availabilityBrief details (3-4 sentences) of either:A machine learning or data science project you have developed or delivered previously; orPrevious team leadership experience, where you worked with a team to deliver a project.We are looking forward to hearing from you.*** STRICTLY NO AGENCIES ***Please note that our Company Policy dictates direct recruitment only.Job Types: Full-time, Part-timeSalary: $120,000.00 to $160,000.00 /yearExperience:machine learning, optimisation and/or statistics: 3 years (Required)"	 - Sydney NSW	Senior Data Scientist/ Machine learning engineerIntellify - Sydney NSW$120,000 - $160,000 a year - Full-time, Part-time	Senior Data Scientist/ Machine learning engineer
502	"Job Description:About IntellifyIntellify is a data science and machine learning consultancy who helps our customers to increase their growth, operate more efficiently and build competitive advantage. Our team consists of leading data scientists, machine learning engineers and consultants that extensively use advanced (statistical) machine learning and optimisation techniques to create state-of-the-art solutions for business. As an emerging AWS consulting partner, we have the ability to scale our solution to any needs through their cloud platform.About the OpportunityAs we are growing at a rapid speed, we are seeking a senior full-time data scientist/machine learning engineer who has extensive experience in data science, machine learning and/or statistical modelling as well as programming. As part of this role, you will supervise and manage junior data scientists, and work on development to build data science solutions using a combination of the latest technologies and business strategies.With a startup culture and applying cutting-edge technology to real-world business problems, you have the opportunity to drive impact at some of Australia’s leading startups and enterprises as well as to learn and grow within a team of like-minded data scientists. Our client problems have ranged from pricing, inventory and workforce optimisation to computer vision applied to radar data for predictive maintenance. The work is varied and challenging, and will require someone who is dynamic in their thinking as well as willing to explore and try new ideas.Being a senior data scientist at Intellify you are charged with both being a mentor and learning from fellow specialist data scientists in an ever evolving and improving atmosphere. We want to see you thrive professionally and personally as we create a leading data science, machine learning and AI company of the future.What we offerThis is a full-time permanent role. This role will provide a unique opportunity to work in a collaborative team and learn from experienced data scientists, so you can advance your knowledge and get hands-on experience with state-of-the-art machine learning methods. Our salaries are competitive, and we offer flexible working hours. We also believe great data science comes from great teams, so invest continuously in upskilling and cross-training our data scientists, with lunch & learn sessions, training courses and certifications, and an opportunity to be a core part of our data science and machine learning communities. Furthermore, we offer the following:1) 10 x paid days of professional development per year (attend/ speak @ conferences, undertake courses and certifications)2) $2,200 Toolkit allowance to go out and buy your own tech3) Profit sharing4) Work with high-profile clients5) A defined career path with your 1-1 mentor6) Great team culture7) Have an impact in a small team where there is no politics8) Flexible & inclusive work-environment9) Work closely with AWS using cutting edge cloud technologiesRequired Skills: A computer science, robotics, maths, statistics, physics or related degree (graduated Bachelors, MSc, PhD or last year MSc/PhD student)5+ years of applied industry machine learning, optimisation and/or statistics experienceStrong Python or R programming experience and related data science libraries (such as scikit-learn, Pandas, Tensorflow/Keras)Strong SQL database and code versioning (e.g., Git) skillsGood software engineering principlesProject management / team management experienceExperience with data visualisation tools or frameworks i.e. tableau, D3.js, ggplot2 etc.Desirable skills: Knowledge or experience of software engineering practicesKnowledge or experience on time series/product forecasting/recommender systemsKnowledge of deep learning/neural networksExperience working with web development technologiesExperience working with cloud technologies i.e. AWS / Microsoft / Google Cloud.Portfolio evidence of your previous work is appreciated (i.e. blog, github repository, conference presentations etc).How to ApplyIf you wish to take the next step in your career working and learning with the best in an innovative data science company, please click on ""Apply now"" and include:Your CVYour portfolio of projects (eg GitHub, blog site etc)Desired salaryYour availabilityBrief details (3-4 sentences) of either:A machine learning or data science project you have developed or delivered previously; orPrevious team leadership experience, where you worked with a team to deliver a project.We are looking forward to hearing from you.*** STRICTLY NO AGENCIES ***Please note that our Company Policy dictates direct recruitment only.Job Types: Full-time, Part-timeSalary: $120,000.00 to $160,000.00 /yearExperience:machine learning, optimisation and/or statistics: 3 years (Required)"	 - Sydney NSW	Senior Data Scientist/ Machine learning engineerIntellify - Sydney NSW$120,000 - $160,000 a year - Full-time, Part-time	Senior Data Scientist/ Machine learning engineer
503	SparkBeyond has built an AI-powered research engine, capable of finding complex patterns in data by understanding their meaning. Operating at the intersection of Data Science and Artificial Intelligence fields, our Machine Learning technology is so ground-breaking that it’s been referred to as science fiction on multiple occasions. SparkBeyond Discovery Platform is being used by Fortune 500 companies across industries.What will you do?Solve various problems and make a true impact across unlimited domains and industries (Financial Risk, Health, Ecommerce, Marketing, Oil & Gas Exploration and more.).Deliver business value by translating complex data into meaningful insights.Be the face of the company and the product directly interfacing with our partners around the globe.Partner with our customers’ Data Science teams, helping them optimize their use of SparkBeyond’s Discovery Platform.Work directly with our in-house team comprised of the brightest minds in technology, research and mathematics as well as senior interfaces from leading companies across the globe (fortune 500 companies and many others).Use your analytical skills and deep product understanding to consult our partners and provide them with advice and input of the highest quality.What will you need?Significant relevant work experience - Professional work experience on data science and analytics issuesA very strong academic background - PhDs are very welcome, as are quantitative degrees - Math, Physics, Computer Science and the like.Proven experience in handling large scale end to end data science projects and presenting the findings and insights. Building models is great - creating impact is greaterProven experience in translating business challenges into data pipelines & model frameworkExperience with Machine Learning techniques. Supervised, unsupervised, traditional or deep learning - either is great, but you need to know your stuff, both in theory and in practice (e.g., MICE, scikit-learn, keras or weka)Programming skills that allow you to be self-sufficient in handling data. Python and R are our daily companions, and a solid grasp of SQL is always needed. Big bonus points if you know ScalaAlso welcome: Experience with large datasets and distributed computing (Hive/Hadoop, Spark)Willingness to travel. We understand the need for a work-life balance and family time, but the ability to be on location at our clients is regularly required.Why SparkBeyond?Sense of Purpose: We’re building something bigger than ourselves. Our team is building a machine that can help solve the world’s most critical problems. We do this through our Partner engagements and the pro-bono work we are passionate about.Exposure: Help insurers process claims faster. Or pharmaceutical companies improve their quality control. Or, on a pro bono basis, an NGO to upskill underprivileged teenagers. Choose what you will work on and where you will leave your mark.People: We are proud of the brilliant, passionate and engaged team at SparkBeyond, including our very own Gödel and Wolf Prize winner. Our people are our greatest asset and we believe in empowerment, ownership and constant growth.Platform: Our Data Scientists are passionate about our cutting-edge platform and can’t imagine returning to traditional data science.Credibility: We have established ourselves as an industry leader, partnering and making impact for our Fortune 500 clients. See what the market is saying about us:https://venturebeat.com/2016/04/02/deep-learning-will-be-huge-and-heres-who-will-dominate-it/https://www.gartner.com/doc/3311218/cool-vendors-data-science-Job Type: Full-timeSalary: $100,000.00 to $180,000.00 /year	 - Melbourne VIC	Data ScientistSparkBeyond - Melbourne VIC$100,000 - $180,000 a year	Data Scientist
504	"Who we are

Tyro is Australia’s largest fintech and newest bank. We’re giving the business banking world a good shake up, with smart technology that save Australian businesses time and money.
We’re born different.
We don’t follow the easy path, we blaze our own unique trail.
And we want like-minded people who understand where we’re coming from and where we’re going.
When it comes to banks, lots of them say they’re different.
But Tyro really is different. We don’t do mortgages, personal loans, or investments. We’re all about business.
We may be new, but what we lack in heritage, we make up for with relentless determination and a focus on the future.
Our singular goal is to make life better for business owners with superior products and services that are simple and seamless so our customers, and our people, can keep blazing our own unique trail.

Your mission is to become Tyro’s marketing data, analytics and marketing automation subject matter expert (SME).
This role will be pivotal in creating and delivering targeted, end-to-end marketing campaigns, coupled with an extensive understanding of the business’ opportunities and risks, which will ultimately translate into sales, deepened relationships and positive customer experience. This role is responsible for establishing the campaign management and marketing analytics function within the marketing team, working closely with the organisation’s broader team of data scientist and analysts. This includes the effective planning, build, execution, deployment and analysis of marketing and customer campaigns across all channels (online and offline) to ensure the right message is delivered to the right customer at the right time.
You will also have accountability for the management, government, and optimisation of our existing CRM and marketing automation software and assume a pivotal role in the scoping and integration of any projects aligned with automated campaign management solutions and the data and digital product team roadmap.
What you'll be doing
Strategy
Consult with internal and external stakeholders on the best way to meet business objectives

Data & Analytics
Partner with product to understand and analyse large and different data systems and translate these into business opportunities / campaigns
Monitor and analyse campaign performance and create a range of best practices by customer segment
Challenge the way we use or source data for marketing and campaigns
Partner with Marketing and Customer teams to build targeted contact lists for acquisition, partner and customer campaigns in the marketing platform
Ensure data integrity through the establishment of campaign and analytical processes including data governance, contact rules and campaign quality / uploading / testing and tracking
Campaign management
Manage campaigns once they are running
Recommend and embed robust test-and-learn methodologies into campaigns
Work closely with the digital team to create custom-built reports and forecast modelling

Insights & Optimisation
Identify and implement any areas to deliver improved quality, speed, response rates and automation
Guide the team in the move towards multi-touch attribution modelling and end-to-end tracking
Effectively extract and analyse the performance of campaigns and provide key insights and recommendations for future improvements and new opportunities

Marketing CRM & Automation
Act like a pioneer in the field and proactively scope for ways to improve our CRM and Marketing automation systems to ensure the set up and the outcomes are in line with the business requirements
Be the expert in the organisation for recommending and selecting the right marketing technology
Be the central point of contact for our marketing automation software
Consult with 3rd party vendors to ensure best practice and value is achieved through CRM and marketing automation

Other projects and duties as required
What we're looking for:
A good understanding and experience with CRM and marketing automation is key for this role - experience with Salesforce and Pardot is preferred
Good interpersonal, negotiation and relationship building skills with the ability to communicate and engage well with stakeholders at all levels and 3rd party vendors
Efficient project planning and execution for deliverables
Analyse and manage data using SQL, SAS or other language and the ability to build queries and prepare data for further analysis
Advanced experience in end-to-end customer / marketing / campaign / analytics including planning and sizing, lead gen and nurturing, list extraction, tag management, website and campaign reporting methodologies and skills (prospect & existing customers)
Advanced technical and analytical skills to analyse customer and marketing profiles, campaigns and website performance including cohort analysis
Familiar with Google Analytics, Google Tag Manager & Mixpanel or any other relevant reporting software
Familiar with multi-touch attribution modelling and adserving
High analytic, problem solving, lateral thinking and interpretive skills
A keen eye to identify new opportunities that present themselves
Ability to explain complex information in simple terms to different audiences
Ability to translate campaign data into actionable insights
Positive approach to change
Self-driven, ability to set, manage and deliver own goals and deliver business objectives
3+ years’ marketing/campaign/customer analytics experience
Advanced marketing automation experience (preferably Pardot)
Advanced CRM experience (ideally Salesforce)
Advanced Excel skills
What we'd like to see:
B2B marketing experience
Financial Services experience
Tableau experience
Why work for us

We're not just like every other bank. Tyro has always been a tech company at heart, but fostering a diverse and inclusive environment, and a passion for continuous learning has always been one of the most important parts of our company's culture.

Tyros are a highly collaborative mix of people. You will work closely with our awesome teams and individuals in engineering, product management, customer support, sales and other functions within the business. Everyone is committed to delivering great outcomes for our customers, and you will have the chance to change the face of banking for Australia businesses.

Our 400 strong team of Tyros, just like our customers, are the lifeblood of our business. We go to great lengths to ensure a positive and enjoyable employee experience for all. We offer some amazing employee benefits such as a generous training budget, regular training for professional and personal development, 16 weeks paid primary carers leave, 3 weeks paid secondary carers leave, annual team based volunteer day, 17.5% leave loading and not to mention our multiple craft beer kegs (selection of beers carefully selected by our beer connoisseurs), wide selection of wine, variety of snacks and a ping pong table, selection of board and video games and an awesome rooftop area for socialising, all available to be enjoyed.

Privacy and Submitting your Application
By proceeding to submit your application, you acknowledge that you have read and understood Tyro’s Privacy Policy (www.tyro.com/privacy-policy/) and Privacy Statement & Consent for Job Applicants (www.tyro.com/privacy-statement-job-applicants/) and consent to Tyro collecting, using, holding and disclosing your personal information in accordance with these policies."	 - Sydney NSW	Marketing Automation SpecialistTyro - Sydney NSW	Marketing Automation Specialist
505	"Currently looking for a highly experience Engineer to join a team working on a greenfield project. You will join a team of 4 which will consist of two developers, one Data Scientist and one Devops. Becoming part of this highly successful insurance based organisation you will have the opportunity to decide on what technologies are used to build this product.

When working on this team you will be building backend features, highly scalable code and writing test cases. You will be interested in all areas of development and want to work in a strong team of developers.

Key Skills:

4 + years of Programming ExperienceStrong Experience with Laravel, Symfony OR Yii
- Exposure to Python - Writing Spark Applications
AWSReactGULP Or Webpack
- Testing Frameworks - PHPUnit Or Selenium
Extensive Experience With NoSQL And SQLCan Use DevOps ToolsGit/SVN
Desirable Skills:

Like Working In Agile EnvironementExposure to Machine Learning and Artifical InteligenceEnjoys Working On New TechnologiesElastic Search
This is an amazing opportunity to join one of the best start up success stories that are marching on to achieve great things and work on some really exciting projects with the latest technologies.
If you think that this is the role for you please send your up to date CV to michael.fahy@opusrs.com.au or call Michael on 02 8089 0125.

I look forward to receiving your CV."	 - Melbourne VIC	Senior Software Engineer - PHPOpus Recruitment Solutions - Melbourne VIC$120,000 - $130,000 a year	Senior Software Engineer - PHP
506	"Trade behaviour analytics
Financial markets risk - FX, Interest Rates, Commodities (Options/Futures)
Attractive Remuneration Package + Great Bonus Potential
Trade behaviour analytics
Financial markets risk - FX, Interest Rates, Commodities (Options/Futures)
Attractive Remuneration Package + Great Bonus Potential
Renowned banking institution and known for their expansion into Asia, my client is seeking a market risk manager or data scientist to work in their global markets division. This is a unique opportunity, which combines data science, financial markets risk, and compliance.

We are looking for an experienced financial markets specialist from either a market risk, compliance or data analytics background. The candidate will lead a team of data, and market risk analysts to develop, monitor and maintain controls and ensure that financial markets trading is in accordance with global regulatory conditions. The incumbent will be the main point of contact for the management of trading oversight. We are looking for experienced candidates with strong financial markets knowledge as well as trading practices and data analytics.

Ideally candidates with have

Strong financial markets experience from any asset classes but preferably rates, FX, fixed income or commodities (options and futures).
Strong programming skills (Python, R, Matlab, VBA).
Strong knowledge of financial market data infrastructure.
Excellent communication skills. Must be able to work with front office stakeholders.
For more information please contact Maria Shevelev at Bluefin Resources on 02 9270 2612
IMPORTANT: By submitting your email address and any other personal information when you APPLY to a job, you consent to such information being collected, held, used and disclosed in accordance with our COLLECTIONS NOTICE and PRIVACY POLICY.

http://www.bluefinresources.com.au/privacy-policy"	 - Sydney NSW	Senior Manager - Trade Surveillance (Markets Risk)Bluefin Resources - Sydney NSW	Senior Manager - Trade Surveillance (Markets Risk)
507	"About Hyper Anna and our team
We’re a rapidly growing startup in the artificial intelligence space – we’ve had lots of traction, are backed by VCs and we’re poised for a huge 2018. As a part of this, we’re looking for great people to help us overachieve on our goals to delight our customers whilst building a sustainable and sticky product. Our team is super switched on yet pretty casual and flexible, and we pride ourselves on our diverse, inclusive environment.
About the opportunity
We’re looking for a Senior UX / UI Designer to entrust with the interesting design challenges involved in creating and growing our AI product. You’ll be working with devs from data science, data engineering, backend, web and UX backgrounds to build Anna, an automated data scientist who is already beginning to transform how businesses use data. You’ll be a huge advocate for user experience best practices and mentoring the team to helping them to put themselves into the shoes of the customer. If Anna was a person, you’d be her communications coach, life mentor and image consultant.

We’re looking for someone with:

A passion for data, analytics and data-driven decision making
Familiarity with design and prototyping tools (Adobe suite, Sketch, or similar)
Commercial experience in designing, building and shipping applications or software
Exposure to front-end programming (HTML, CSS, Javascript) and data visualisation tools/libraries (Highcharts, D3)
Qualifications in HCI, Design, design computing, data visualization or related disciplines
A particular understanding or interest in how to best represent and communicate data analysis and insights
An interest in interaction, visual and UX design, as well as the ability to geek out and implement your designs in code

A day in your life will include:

Contributing to strategic product thinking and refining these concepts into something that creates value for our users every day
Working closely with designers, engineers and data scientists to deliver solutions that delight
Running workshops to draw out ideas, then communicate plans and align team members on the vision
Being involved in the full life-cycle of delivery, from ideation, discovery, prototyping, implementation and testing through to collecting data and feedback on features

About you
You’re passionate about new technologies and have a really strong understanding of what makes users tick, backed up by a grasp of the best practices in visual and UI design and development. You know when to obsess over details and when it’s time to ship. You love working in a team and helping others to grow with you. You’re someone who is laid-back and adaptable but wants to have an impact on the product you’re working on.
In return you’ll have the opportunity to join our team at a pivotal stage of our growth! This means you’ll have access to real career opportunities, receive a competitive salary, and work as part of our team in our beautiful, centrally located office.
Hyper Anna is an open and inclusive employer. We never discriminate on the basis of race, religion, national origin, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, age, or marital, veteran, or disability status.
Sound like you?
We love to talk all things tech and we are passionate about connecting with awesome people."	 - Sydney NSW	HyperAnna: Senior UX / UI DesignerAirTree Ventures - Sydney NSW	HyperAnna: Senior UX / UI Designer
508	"Deloitte is the world’s largest professional service firm, with one of the largest and most experienced Analytics, Information Management (AIM) & Data Automation practices. We have 400+ specialised consultants in Australia and more than 6,000 practitioners in the Deloitte global network.
With the ever increasing complexity and volume of data, the rise of in-memory, high performance computing, data discovery and visualisation solutions and the convergence of Big Data and Advanced Analytics, organisations are faced with increasing number of choices to ensure they are able to exploit their data assets for maximum advantage. Deloitte is able to draw from its vast global experience delivering complex data driven solutions for our clients across the full spectrum of technology and business domains to provide the right strategic advice to help an organisation respond effectively to these changes – as well as partner with our clients to execute on our recommendations.
About the Role
Do you want to be a part of how we help companies utilise their valuable data resources through effective use of the right technology, backed by a clear vision and strong executive sponsorship? Do you want to be part of an award winning team that provides clients with a visionary, yet balanced and pragmatic approach to automating concepts and tools to improve productivity and performance?
This is an opportunity to harness emerging technologies and analytical methodologies to solve real world problems. You will be part of a close, collaborative team that identifies and builds solutions that are practical as well as visionary, and that make an impact that matters.
We are looking for people who love data and want to solve problems with insight. Whether you call yourself a data scientist, analytics nerd or builder of predictive models. We want to hear from you if you are genuinely passionate about this area and have some applied experience.
You will be responsible for delivering insights through a range of corporate data sources through the application of analytics, data mining, Big Data and real-time decision making techniques and applications using various data management, analytics & data visualization tools.
About You
You’ll bring experience in one or more of the following competencies and enabling technologies
A strong background in applying mathematical and analytics approaches and methodologies to identifying complex relationships in data
Ability to communicate technical requirements and outputs in a clear and concise manner
A structured, logical and solution-oriented design mindset
Ability to work autonomously and with minimal oversight
Ability to demonstrate initiative and ownership in the completion of tasks
A demonstrable interest and passion for exploring new data/analytics concepts, applications and innovations (e.g. Cognitive, Robotics & Automate, AI, IoT etc.)
Some experience using a range of scripting languages – (e.g. Python, R, SQL etc.)
About Us: Deloitte Culture
Join a high performing culture of talented people, who are highly motivated and passionate about delivering impactful analytics solutions and insight. We are innovative and different because YOU are… we pride ourselves on our team of diverse, high performing Deloitte Professionals who are talented, supportive, inclusive and social – and who are at the heart of our success. Our aim is to ensure that all our people feel comfortable to bring their whole selves to work, and as a result, build a workplace that encourages the true spirit of 'And different'.
From day one at our firm you’ll be considered part of the Deloitte community and our development and career progression framework will help you develop the skills and capabilities that will set you up to succeed – in every sense of the word. At Deloitte, we assume that you perform other roles within your life…you could be a student, a teacher, a passionate hobbyist and a caring family member. We recognise the importance of balance and embrace agility, understanding that this means different things to each and every one of our employees.
If you have questions regarding this role, the Talent Acquisition Team is available to have a confidential discussion. Please contact Aditi Aggarwal via the Our Recruiters section on our careers website."	 - Sydney NSW	EXPRESSION OF INTEREST - Data & Analytics - NationalDeloitte7,167 reviews - Sydney NSW	EXPRESSION OF INTEREST - Data & Analytics - National
509	You remember how to roll up your sleeves and craft data joins in SQL, but you've invested time in learning R, and Python is your friend. You know Hadoop isn't the only approach and you're happiest getting behind the GUI into the real data to uncover the stories.Isn't it about time you took advantage of the benefits from all that knowledge?Our client is looking for data polyglots who enjoy solving complex problems; not the kind you can come to with a canned response, the ones where you really need to use your skills.With some of the biggest names in Australia and around the world throwing their most pressing problems at our client they need curious guides - but they only take the best.Getting in isn't easy, but if it was, it wouldn't be the right place for you.Prove yourself and you can build a team behind you to grow your own patch. The opportunities truly are what you make them.With Udemy on tap, and weekly internal led training sessions, you'll be joining a group of like-minded people who are capable of understanding you when you get on your high horse about relevance over recency (or the other way around).Currently our client has four areas of practice, you can join one these and then explain to them what they need to build another:Data & Analytics - BI/DW, Big Data Analytics, Data Engineering, Data Science and Advanced AnalyticsCustomer Engagement - Marketing Campaigns, Campaign Analysis, Customer InsightsDigital - Full stack Development, UI/UX Design, Mobile DevelopmentCloud & Technology - Cloud Services (AWS, Azure, Google Cloud Platform), Managed ServicesWe're not worried about levels at the moment, if you've got the skills there's a place for you.SEO stuff because you know we need to have it in here;Data engineerData scientistData ConsultantJava, Scala, Python, HadoopApache Spark, Kafka, Hive, Airflow, NiFiAWS, Google Cloud Platform or Azure is helpful but not mandatoryJob Types: Full-time, PermanentExperience:data consulting: 3 years (Preferred)	 - Sydney NSW	Software Architect / Tech LeadKloudPPL - Sydney NSWFull-time, Permanent	Software Architect / Tech Lead
510	"There has never been a more exciting time to be part of Domain Group, a dynamic digital media and technology services business and one of Australia's leading property destinations. We provide property advertising and media online, via mobile, social media and in magazines, and technology services to the real estate industry. The business is experiencing rapid growth in digital revenues and investing in all areas to drive future earnings growth. Domain offers a dynamic and innovative culture at the leading edge of digital media in Australia.
We are looking for a lead data scientist to help sales, product and business leadership make decisions with data, give consumers certainty and control when selling their home with a broad mission and build data science and machine learning products to power the next stage of Domain's growth
As part of the Domain Group, you'll have the opportunity to work across all aspects of our property ecosystem, from listing and agent, to consumer behavior, email, and sales data.
What you'll do:
Build scalable models that analyse and extract information from disparate public sources
Develop and improve machine learning algorithms that drive our data pipeline operation
Leverage advanced statistical modeling to improve domain products
Research and implement the latest advances in the world of data
Proven ability to collaboratively and maturely work on a team
Curious with an aptitude to quickly learn
Experience:
At least 3-5 years of industry experience in data science
2+ years of professional experience with Natural Language Processing and/or Image Processing
Thorough knowledge of machine learning modeling processes
Thorough knowledge of supervised and unsupervised learning algorithms
Thorough knowledge of Natural Language Processing
Experience with implementation of Data Systems
Fluency in UNIX, SQL, Python and/or R
Good software engineering principles
Education/Qualifications:
MS or PhD degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Quantitative Psychology or related field.
Portfolio evidence of previous work is appreciated (i.e. blog, GitHub repository, journal/conference publications etc).
So...what happens next?
Once we've received your application we'll give it the attention it deserves and you'll hear from us either way. If you have the right experience, one of our Recruitment Consultants will give you a call (so make sure you keep your phone handy!) and from there we'll support you through the interview process.

Interested?
Go on then, click apply, we'd love to see your application!

A little note to recruitment agencies: We have a superstar recruitment team who are pretty good at filling our own roles, we know you're great at what you do to, but there's no need to get in touch! :)"	 - Sydney NSW	Lead Data ScientistDomain Group6 reviews - Sydney NSWFull-time, Permanent	Lead Data Scientist
511	"The Company

Robert Half Technology are working alongside a well reputable and established Insurance organisation in the CBD and we are currently looking for a talented Data Scientist to join our team on a permanent basis. Our client continue to grow across all areas of the business and this role has been created due to the expansion of the division. This role represents an exciting challenge and career opportunity for a Data Scientist to join our forward thinking client.

The Role

The Role of the Data Scientist will have the opportunity to make their mark using data led decision making and modelling to catalyse industry disuption. Aspects of the role include:

Proportion your role with Modelling, Research, Analysism Data Manipulation and Collaboration.

Work as a data expert and a quantitative researcher.

Translate unstructured, complex business problems into practical, powerful algorithmic solutions.

Be part of a highly innovative team working on interesting and difficult problems, leveraging cutting edge technology to build key data products.

Uncover fresh insights from disparate data sources and data mining

Spearheading machine learning projects on data that has never been touched by the organization.

About You

This is a hands-on position where you will be empowered to be very ambitious and bold, to solve challenging problems and have the potential to directly impact the future of the business. The role requires that you have experience in machine learning and data mining.

Your experience and skills should include most, if not all:
Ability to communicate complex quantitative analysis in a clear, precise and actionable manner

Practical experience using contemporary machine learning frameworks such as, scikit-learn, pytorch and tensorflow.

A proven track record in developing, innovating, and applying advanced algorithms to address practical problems and in building new analytical products of commercial value.

Experience in Python and/or R.

Experience in relational databases and SQL

Apply Today

Please send your resume by clicking on the apply button or for further information, contact our Melbourne office."	 - Melbourne VIC	Data Scientist - Market Leader - CBDRobert Half Australia6,897 reviews - Melbourne VIC$110,000 a year - Permanent	Data Scientist - Market Leader - CBD
512	"The role will be focused on stitching together disparate data sources from across the business to enable machine learning and automated reporting and campaigns. Generically, provide a view on business issues/opportunities that cannot be revealed through standard reporting
What’s the role?
Analytics lead on internal strategic marketing projects designed to understand key customer behaviours that drive consumer revenue
Identify new opportunities to improve capability and optimise the business through analytics and modelling
Undertake proactive analysis of customer data processes that produce data driven analysis, reporting, insights and models
Provide data and analytical thought leadership that can be leveraged across the marketing teams
Consistent delivery of data programs that lead to more effective and improved customer experiences
Who are you?
The ability to interpret and convert complex data requests into prescriptive and actionable insights for a non-analytical audience.
Proactivity delivering data driven insights and recommendations
Senior stakeholder engagement and strong presentation skills
Must be advanced multi-lingual across various software languages (SQL, Python, R, SAS)
What’s in it for you?
Supportive and friendly environment. We encourage innovation, collaboration and creative thinking. Fun, fast-paced and excellent opportunities for growth and development.
Lucrative salary
Flexible working arrangements
Discounted health care
Employee discount with multiple brands including BMW, Qantas, Apple, Samsung etc
Work with some of Australia's most recognised and prestigious brands
On-site gym and wellbeing centre

Who are we?
We are Australia’s number one and most influential media organisation with more than 150 prestige brands across news, sport and lifestyle. Each month more than 17 million Australians choose to consume news and information from our digital and print products – more than any other media group in Australia.
Where do I sign?
Apply now or for more information on careers at News Corp Australia visit www.newscorpaustralia.com/careers"	 - Sydney Central Business District NSW	Data ScientistNews Corp Australia66 reviews - Sydney Central Business District NSWPermanent	Data Scientist
513	Job DescriptionThe candidate is a skilled data scientist who will be building deep learning models for medical image diagnosis applications such as segmentation, localisation and classification of abnormalities.ResponsibilitiesThe candidate will write high quality model with high performance and good memory management, together with state-of-the-art accuracies and embed into our proprietary software. Our aim is to align you with the activities which truly interest you; will stretch you technically; help you grow and impact on billions of patients.RequirementsBachelor / Master / PhD in engineering or computer science or mathematics or physicsKnows computer vision / image segmentation, localization, classificationKnows tensorflow or theano or torchStrong python, C++ or java coderGood knowledge of numpy, pandas, sklearn, scipy, seabornKnows how to build deep learning models like RNN and CNN and other neural network models.May require to relocate to China, Beijing.What We OfferMaster, Teach, Learn – The opportunity to work with, learn from and share knowledge with ultra-smart colleagues in a culture of collaboration and technical excellence. We groom our employees and make sure that they stay at the cutting edge of the technology stack.Impact – Huge potential to make a positive contribution across our business, people and partnersRemuneration – Competitive pay with share award for top performers.We are willing to groom engineers and fresh graduates who don’t have a background in deep learning but are interested to learn. You will also have the opportunity to attend top machine learning conferences like NIPS and ICML.Job Types: Full-time, Permanent	 - Sydney NSW	BioMind Data Scientist/Engineer (Relocate to Beijing)biomind.ai - Sydney NSWFull-time, Permanent	BioMind Data Scientist/Engineer (Relocate to Beijing)
515	"Job Description:About IntellifyIntellify is a data science and machine learning consultancy who helps our customers to increase their growth, operate more efficiently and build competitive advantage. Our team consists of leading data scientists, machine learning engineers and consultants that extensively use advanced (statistical) machine learning and optimisation techniques to create state-of-the-art solutions for business. As an emerging AWS consulting partner, we have the ability to scale our solution to any needs through their cloud platform.About the OpportunityAs we are growing at a rapid speed, we are seeking a senior full-time data scientist/machine learning engineer who has extensive experience in data science, machine learning and/or statistical modelling as well as programming. As part of this role, you will supervise and manage junior data scientists, and work on development to build data science solutions using a combination of the latest technologies and business strategies.With a startup culture and applying cutting-edge technology to real-world business problems, you have the opportunity to drive impact at some of Australia’s leading startups and enterprises as well as to learn and grow within a team of like-minded data scientists. Our client problems have ranged from pricing, inventory and workforce optimisation to computer vision applied to radar data for predictive maintenance. The work is varied and challenging, and will require someone who is dynamic in their thinking as well as willing to explore and try new ideas.Being a senior data scientist at Intellify you are charged with both being a mentor and learning from fellow specialist data scientists in an ever evolving and improving atmosphere. We want to see you thrive professionally and personally as we create a leading data science, machine learning and AI company of the future.What we offerThis is a full-time permanent role. This role will provide a unique opportunity to work in a collaborative team and learn from experienced data scientists, so you can advance your knowledge and get hands-on experience with state-of-the-art machine learning methods. Our salaries are competitive, and we offer flexible working hours. We also believe great data science comes from great teams, so invest continuously in upskilling and cross-training our data scientists, with lunch & learn sessions, training courses and certifications, and an opportunity to be a core part of our data science and machine learning communities. Furthermore, we offer the following:1) 10 x paid days of professional development per year (attend/ speak @ conferences, undertake courses and certifications)2) $2,200 Toolkit allowance to go out and buy your own tech3) Profit sharing4) Work with high-profile clients5) A defined career path with your 1-1 mentor6) Great team culture7) Have an impact in a small team where there is no politics8) Flexible & inclusive work-environment9) Work closely with AWS using cutting edge cloud technologiesRequired Skills: A computer science, robotics, maths, statistics, physics or related degree (graduated Bachelors, MSc, PhD or last year MSc/PhD student)5+ years of applied industry machine learning, optimisation and/or statistics experienceStrong Python or R programming experience and related data science libraries (such as scikit-learn, Pandas, Tensorflow/Keras)Strong SQL database and code versioning (e.g., Git) skillsGood software engineering principlesProject management / team management experienceExperience with data visualisation tools or frameworks i.e. tableau, D3.js, ggplot2 etc.Desirable skills: Knowledge or experience of software engineering practicesKnowledge or experience on time series/product forecasting/recommender systemsKnowledge of deep learning/neural networksExperience working with web development technologiesExperience working with cloud technologies i.e. AWS / Microsoft / Google Cloud.Portfolio evidence of your previous work is appreciated (i.e. blog, github repository, conference presentations etc).How to ApplyIf you wish to take the next step in your career working and learning with the best in an innovative data science company, please click on ""Apply now"" and include:Your CVYour portfolio of projects (eg GitHub, blog site etc)Desired salaryYour availabilityBrief details (3-4 sentences) of either:A machine learning or data science project you have developed or delivered previously; orPrevious team leadership experience, where you worked with a team to deliver a project.We are looking forward to hearing from you.*** STRICTLY NO AGENCIES ***Please note that our Company Policy dictates direct recruitment only.Job Types: Full-time, Part-timeSalary: $120,000.00 to $160,000.00 /yearExperience:machine learning, optimisation and/or statistics: 3 years (Required)"	 - Sydney NSW	Senior Data Scientist/ Machine learning engineerIntellify - Sydney NSW$120,000 - $160,000 a year - Full-time, Part-time	Senior Data Scientist/ Machine learning engineer
516	"Deloitte is the world’s largest professional service firm, with one of the largest and most experienced Analytics, Information Management (AIM) & Data Automation practices. We have 400+ specialised consultants in Australia and more than 6,000 practitioners in the Deloitte global network.
With the ever increasing complexity and volume of data, the rise of in-memory, high performance computing, data discovery and visualisation solutions and the convergence of Big Data and Advanced Analytics, organisations are faced with increasing number of choices to ensure they are able to exploit their data assets for maximum advantage. Deloitte is able to draw from its vast global experience delivering complex data driven solutions for our clients across the full spectrum of technology and business domains to provide the right strategic advice to help an organisation respond effectively to these changes – as well as partner with our clients to execute on our recommendations.
About the Role
Do you want to be a part of how we help companies utilise their valuable data resources through effective use of the right technology, backed by a clear vision and strong executive sponsorship? Do you want to be part of an award winning team that provides clients with a visionary, yet balanced and pragmatic approach to automating concepts and tools to improve productivity and performance?
This is an opportunity to harness emerging technologies and analytical methodologies to solve real world problems. You will be part of a close, collaborative team that identifies and builds solutions that are practical as well as visionary, and that make an impact that matters.
We are looking for people who love data and want to solve problems with insight. Whether you call yourself a data scientist, analytics nerd or builder of predictive models. We want to hear from you if you are genuinely passionate about this area and have some applied experience.
You will be responsible for delivering insights through a range of corporate data sources through the application of analytics, data mining, Big Data and real-time decision making techniques and applications using various data management, analytics & data visualization tools.
About You
You’ll bring experience in one or more of the following competencies and enabling technologies
A strong background in applying mathematical and analytics approaches and methodologies to identifying complex relationships in data
Ability to communicate technical requirements and outputs in a clear and concise manner
A structured, logical and solution-oriented design mindset
Ability to work autonomously and with minimal oversight
Ability to demonstrate initiative and ownership in the completion of tasks
A demonstrable interest and passion for exploring new data/analytics concepts, applications and innovations (e.g. Cognitive, Robotics & Automate, AI, IoT etc.)
Some experience using a range of scripting languages – (e.g. Python, R, SQL etc.)
About Us: Deloitte Culture
Join a high performing culture of talented people, who are highly motivated and passionate about delivering impactful analytics solutions and insight. We are innovative and different because YOU are… we pride ourselves on our team of diverse, high performing Deloitte Professionals who are talented, supportive, inclusive and social – and who are at the heart of our success. Our aim is to ensure that all our people feel comfortable to bring their whole selves to work, and as a result, build a workplace that encourages the true spirit of 'And different'.
From day one at our firm you’ll be considered part of the Deloitte community and our development and career progression framework will help you develop the skills and capabilities that will set you up to succeed – in every sense of the word. At Deloitte, we assume that you perform other roles within your life…you could be a student, a teacher, a passionate hobbyist and a caring family member. We recognise the importance of balance and embrace agility, understanding that this means different things to each and every one of our employees.
If you have questions regarding this role, the Talent Acquisition Team is available to have a confidential discussion. Please contact Aditi Aggarwal via the Our Recruiters section on our careers website."	 - Sydney NSW	EXPRESSION OF INTEREST - Data & Analytics - NationalDeloitte7,167 reviews - Sydney NSW	EXPRESSION OF INTEREST - Data & Analytics - National
517	SparkBeyond has built an AI-powered research engine, capable of finding complex patterns in data by understanding their meaning. Operating at the intersection of Data Science and Artificial Intelligence fields, our Machine Learning technology is so ground-breaking that it’s been referred to as science fiction on multiple occasions. SparkBeyond Discovery Platform is being used by Fortune 500 companies across industries.What will you do?Solve various problems and make a true impact across unlimited domains and industries (Financial Risk, Health, Ecommerce, Marketing, Oil & Gas Exploration and more.).Deliver business value by translating complex data into meaningful insights.Be the face of the company and the product directly interfacing with our partners around the globe.Partner with our customers’ Data Science teams, helping them optimize their use of SparkBeyond’s Discovery Platform.Work directly with our in-house team comprised of the brightest minds in technology, research and mathematics as well as senior interfaces from leading companies across the globe (fortune 500 companies and many others).Use your analytical skills and deep product understanding to consult our partners and provide them with advice and input of the highest quality.What will you need?Significant relevant work experience - Professional work experience on data science and analytics issuesA very strong academic background - PhDs are very welcome, as are quantitative degrees - Math, Physics, Computer Science and the like.Proven experience in handling large scale end to end data science projects and presenting the findings and insights. Building models is great - creating impact is greaterProven experience in translating business challenges into data pipelines & model frameworkExperience with Machine Learning techniques. Supervised, unsupervised, traditional or deep learning - either is great, but you need to know your stuff, both in theory and in practice (e.g., MICE, scikit-learn, keras or weka)Programming skills that allow you to be self-sufficient in handling data. Python and R are our daily companions, and a solid grasp of SQL is always needed. Big bonus points if you know ScalaAlso welcome: Experience with large datasets and distributed computing (Hive/Hadoop, Spark)Willingness to travel. We understand the need for a work-life balance and family time, but the ability to be on location at our clients is regularly required.Why SparkBeyond?Sense of Purpose: We’re building something bigger than ourselves. Our team is building a machine that can help solve the world’s most critical problems. We do this through our Partner engagements and the pro-bono work we are passionate about.Exposure: Help insurers process claims faster. Or pharmaceutical companies improve their quality control. Or, on a pro bono basis, an NGO to upskill underprivileged teenagers. Choose what you will work on and where you will leave your mark.People: We are proud of the brilliant, passionate and engaged team at SparkBeyond, including our very own Gödel and Wolf Prize winner. Our people are our greatest asset and we believe in empowerment, ownership and constant growth.Platform: Our Data Scientists are passionate about our cutting-edge platform and can’t imagine returning to traditional data science.Credibility: We have established ourselves as an industry leader, partnering and making impact for our Fortune 500 clients. See what the market is saying about us:https://venturebeat.com/2016/04/02/deep-learning-will-be-huge-and-heres-who-will-dominate-it/https://www.gartner.com/doc/3311218/cool-vendors-data-science-Job Type: Full-timeSalary: $100,000.00 to $180,000.00 /year	 - Melbourne VIC	Data ScientistSparkBeyond - Melbourne VIC$100,000 - $180,000 a year	Data Scientist
518	"Work among a fast growing Data Science team who pride themselves on collaboration and innovation alongside a tech stack that is second to none.

Work among a fast growing Data Science team who pride themselves on collaboration and innovation alongside a tech stack that is second to none.
Collaborate with a highly efficient Data Science team deciphering huge unstructured Data Sets and creating value organisation-wide!

Due to recent growth within the Data Science team a key player within aviation is looking to add 1 more Data Scientist to their team.

What You'll Do:
Develop efficient, workable production solutions that perform prescribed research methods and business rules

Apply statistical analyses, machine learning, and data visualisation techniques

Partner with developers, statisticians, and product managers to deliver timely, high-quality product data

Design, develop, and implement creative quality assurance tests that validate source data and production output

Support statistical teams that research and evaluate new methods

What's in it for you?

Fantastic competitive day rate

Work on some of Melbourne's most exciting Data Science projects

Be part of a collaborative and innovative company

Opportunity convert to a permanent role after 6 months.

What You'll Need:
Experience with machine learning algorithms (XG-Boost, Gradient Boosting, Random Forest, Linear Modelling, Neural Networks, K-Means Clustering, Decision Trees)

Big Data Analytics experience - Spark & Scala (predominantly on semi-structured / unstructured data sets - e.g. Adobe)

Proven success managing critical processes and teams in a fast-paced business environment with competing priorities, vague requirements, and rapid iterations

Strong software development skills and expertise designing efficient SQL queries of big data

Excellent verbal and written communication skills

Bachelors degree in a quantitative subject such as Statistics, Operations Research, Engineering or Computer Science

Preferred: Familiarity with JIRA and Git Experience with Hadoop or other comparable distributed file systems Ability to develop advanced analytical solutions in Python or Spark. Knowledge of statistical software (ideally, R) or scientific computation software Experience conducting research and analytics with digital or TV audience data

If you feel the above is the next step you'd like to take in your career, APPLY NOW!

Only successful candidates will be contacted.
Experis ANZ is parent to a portfolio of brands; Greythorn, Safesearch, Marks Sattin, GT-X and Global Attract . These brands make up our core specialisations for Technology & Digital, Accounting & Finance, Engineering and Workplace Health, Safety and Environment. When you apply for this opportunity you will be directed to the parent website www.experis.com.au to lodge your application. Experis is part of the ManpowerGroup , a global leader in offering end to end workforce solutions.

If you're curious and willing to have a conversation about this role, please pick up the phone and speak with our recruitment specialist below. Even if this doesn't sound like the right role for you, we encourage you to join our talent community so your skill set can be the first considered when another opportunity arises. Click register on our website www.experis.com.au .

Tom Bull
Data Science
Recruitment Consultant
+61 3 9604 4209"	 - Melbourne VIC	Senior Data Scientist - 6 month contractGreythorn Specialist Technology Recruitment6 reviews - Melbourne VICTemporary, Contract	Senior Data Scientist - 6 month contract
519	"Multiple roles - Lead/Manager
Huge Australian consultancy
Massive client base ranging many Australian household names
Work among an industry leading consultancy on-site for some of the biggest clients in Melbourne! If you'd like exposure to some of the most renowned analytics projects across Australia, alongside a flexible culture offering a great work life balance apply now!
Work among an industry leading consultancy on-site for some of the biggest clients in Melbourne! If you'd like exposure to some of the most renowned analytics projects across Australia, alongside a flexible culture offering a great work life balance apply now!

What You'll Do:

Apply statistical analyses, machine learning, and data visualisation techniques
Develop efficient, workable production solutions that perform prescribed research methods and business rules
Design, develop, and implement creative quality assurance tests that validate source data and production output
Partner with developers, statisticians, and product managers to deliver timely, high-quality product data
Support statistical teams that research and evaluate new methods

What is in it for you?

A flexible culture with great work/life balance
Work with some of Australia's leading household names
What You'll Need:

Experience with R and Python
Proven success managing critical processes and teams in a fast-paced business environment with competing priorities, vague requirements, and rapid iterations
Strong software development skills and expertise designing efficient SQL queries of big data
Bachelors degree in a quantitative subject such as Statistics, Operations Research, Engineering or Computer Science
Excellent verbal and written communication skills - this role is mainly client facing!
Consulting experience will be highly regarded
If you feel the above is the next step you'd like to take in your career, APPLY NOW!

Only successful candidates will be contacted.
Experis ANZ is parent to a portfolio of brands; Greythorn, Safesearch, Marks Sattin, GT-X and Global Attract. These brands make up our core specialisations for Technology & Digital, Accounting & Finance, Engineering and Workplace Health, Safety and Environment. When you apply for this opportunity you will be directed to the parent website www.experis.com.au to lodge your application. Experis is part of the ManpowerGroup, a global leader in offering end to end workforce solutions.

If you're curious and willing to have a conversation about this role, please pick up the phone and speak with our recruitment specialist below. Even if this doesn't sound like the right role for you, we encourage you to join our talent community so your skill set can be the first considered when another opportunity arises. Click register on our website www.experis.com.au.


Tom Bull
Data Science
Recruitment Consultant
+61 3 9604 4209"	 - Melbourne VIC	Senior Data ScientistGreythorn6 reviews - Melbourne VICTemporary, Contract	Senior Data Scientist
520	"Join one of Melbourne's iconic institutions
Expand your skill set across a variety of projects
An opportunity to deliver high-quality best-fit solutions
An iconic establishment is currently seeking a Senior Data Scientist for a permanent opportunity to be a part of an exciting new team to build business relationships and provide high-quality best-fit solutions.
Having solid statistical modelling building skills, you will experience an exciting mix of creativity and innovation, within a framework of challenging objectives and a passion for delivering the best.

This role will suit an individual who enjoys tackling new projects to support business planning and decision making through the use of qualitative and quantitative analyses, based on customer and operational data.
Key Responsibilities:
Develop and implement statistical modells based on business requirements
Prepare and present insights and reports to key stakeholders
Provide recommendations across multiple aspects such as source of data and methods used
Extract and transform data for use of analysis, visualisations and statistical modelling
Be an active participant in knowledge sharing with a wide range of stakeholders
Skills Required:
Tertiary Qualification/Ph.D. in a quantitative discipline - mathematics, statistics, operation research (additional qualifications will be highly regarded)
Strong probem-solving, organizing and coordinating skills
Strong communication skills (verbally and written) is essential
Advanced skills SQL
Must have R and/or Python programming skills
Capable of managing multiple projects under pressure and meeting deadlines
Ability to interact proactively with internal and external customers
An inquisitive mind, passionate about deriving insights from data
This opportunity will allow the successful applicant to build strong relationships with internal and external teams, playing an integral role influencing business strategies, delivering customer and operational insights and knowledge through statistical modelling and data analysis.

To discuss the role more in detail, please call Corrin on 03 8330 5003.

IMPORTANT: By submitting your email address and any other personal information when you APPLY to a job, you consent to such information being collected, held, used and disclosed in accordance with our COLLECTIONS NOTICE and PRIVACY POLICY.

http://www.bluefinresources.com.au/privacy-policy"	 - Melbourne VIC	Senior Data ScientistBluefin Resources - Melbourne VIC	Senior Data Scientist
521	"Join a leading Australian financial institution
Be part of a hybrid team - Data Engineers and Data Scientists
Full Time Role based in Melbourne CBD.

A leading Australian Financial Institution is currently seeking an experienced Data Scientist with previous experience as a Data Engineer, who is passionate and enthusiastic about data and how it can be used to build real value for the company. They are on a journey to create a hybrid data science and data engineering team, to bring the control of a structured data warehouse for corporate and regulatory reporting together with the fast evolving world of analytics.

Reporting to the Head of Data Science and Data Engineering, you will be collaborating with a team of highly skilled Data Engineers and Data Scientists to design high-quality data stores and analytical platforms to build advanced analytical models across the business.


Key Responsibilities

Address and solve complex business issues using large data sets
Develop advanced analytics model, including the preparation and reconciliation of data, feature engineering and creation of dashboard visualisations
Perform offline and online experiments, with a focus on the digital channels
Implement batch and streaming ETL (Extract, Transform, Load) processes
Engineer/Prototype/Industrialise data assets and platforms needed for analytics

Key Skills

Experience of SQL and NoSQL
Advanced Analytical Modelling in a business context (e.g. Machine Learning)
Technical experience in programming in Python, R and statistical packages (R, SAS)
Commercially and Tech curious
Experience in Data Engineering (highly advantageous)

This is an excellent opportunity to work in an agile environment to deliver high-quality analytical solutions, data assets, tools and insights.

For more information, please call Corrin on 03 8330 5003.
IMPORTANT: By submitting your email address and any other personal information when you APPLY to a job, you consent to such information being collected, held, used and disclosed in accordance with our COLLECTIONS NOTICE and PRIVACY POLICY.

http://www.bluefinresources.com.au/privacy-policy"	 - Melbourne VIC	Data Scientist/EngineerBluefin Resources - Melbourne VIC	Data Scientist/Engineer
522	"About Hyper Anna and our team:
We’re a rapidly growing startup in the artificial intelligence space – we’ve had lots of traction, are backed by VCs and we’re poised for a huge year. As part of this, we are expanding our engineering team to help us overachieve on our goals while building a sustainable product. Our team is super switched on yet pretty casual and flexible, and we pride ourselves on our diverse, inclusive workplace.

About the opportunity:
We’re looking for Full-Stack Software engineers to entrust with the interesting technical challenges involved in creating and growing our product. You’ll be working with devs from data science, data engineering, backend, web and UX backgrounds to build Anna, an automated data scientist who is already beginning to transform how businesses use data. You’ll also be a huge advocate for Scala or Javascript best practices, mentoring the team and helping to get the most out of our stack. If Anna were a person you’d be her doctor, personal trainer, and nutritionist.

Specifically for this role, we’re looking for someone:

With strong programming skills in Javascript and/or Scala.
Who delights in building great interfaces for users in the front end and/or for developers in the back end.
Enjoys leading and mentoring software engineering teams

Desirably, you’ll also be strong in one of the following areas:

Data: A fan of data science and algorithms, with a deep understanding of big data platforms, data storage and retrieval
Infra: Love devops and building infrastructure and deployment pipelines that make developers jump for joy
People: Love building and nurturing teams, getting them aligned and engaged with the challenges of the product, and creating an environment for success

A day in your life will include:

Being responsible for the development of high performance features, services and algorithms
Working closely with designers, engineers and data scientists to deliver best-in-class solutions
Being involved in software and service architecture
Designing and adopting strong engineering practices

About you:
You’re passionate, up to date on new technologies, and have really strong computer science and engineering fundamentals. You know when to obsess over details and when it’s time to ship. You love working in a team and helping others to grow with you. You’re someone who is laid-back and adaptable but wants to have an impact on the product you’re working on.

To be successful in this role you’ll also need to demonstrate the following:

Commercial experience in at least one of Azure, Ansible and Circle CI or other similar devops, CI and CD infrastructure
Experience with databases (SQL)
A solid background in computer science / software engineering skills and knowledge
A passion for machine learning, data, distributed computing and functional programming
Ability to work in an agile development environment
Tertiary qualifications in software engineering or related disciplines

In return you’ll have the opportunity to join our team at a pivotal stage of our growth! This means you’ll have access to real career opportunities, receive a competitive salary, and work as part of our team in our beautiful, centrally located office.

Sound like you?
Applying is easy. Send an email with your resume, website, Github account, links to apps or anything else you’re proud of.
We love to talk all things tech and we are passionate about connecting with awesome people."	 - Sydney NSW	Hyper Anna: Software Engineer (Full-Stack)AirTree Ventures - Sydney NSW	Hyper Anna: Software Engineer (Full-Stack)
523	You remember how to roll up your sleeves and craft data joins in SQL, but you've invested time in learning R, and Python is your friend. You know Hadoop isn't the only approach and you're happiest getting behind the GUI into the real data to uncover the stories.Isn't it about time you took advantage of the benefits from all that knowledge?Our client is looking for data polyglots who enjoy solving complex problems; not the kind you can come to with a canned response, the ones where you really need to use your skills.With some of the biggest names in Australia and around the world throwing their most pressing problems at our client they need curious guides - but they only take the best.Getting in isn't easy, but if it was, it wouldn't be the right place for you.Prove yourself and you can build a team behind you to grow your own patch. The opportunities truly are what you make them.With Udemy on tap, and weekly internal led training sessions, you'll be joining a group of like-minded people who are capable of understanding you when you get on your high horse about relevance over recency (or the other way around).Currently our client has four areas of practice, you can join one these and then explain to them what they need to build another:Data & Analytics - BI/DW, Big Data Analytics, Data Engineering, Data Science and Advanced AnalyticsCustomer Engagement - Marketing Campaigns, Campaign Analysis, Customer InsightsDigital - Full stack Development, UI/UX Design, Mobile DevelopmentCloud & Technology - Cloud Services (AWS, Azure, Google Cloud Platform), Managed ServicesWe're not worried about levels at the moment, if you've got the skills there's a place for you.SEO stuff because you know we need to have it in here;Data engineerData scientistData ConsultantJava, Scala, Python, HadoopApache Spark, Kafka, Hive, Airflow, NiFiAWS, Google Cloud Platform or Azure is helpful but not mandatoryJob Types: Full-time, PermanentExperience:data consulting: 3 years (Preferred)	 - Sydney NSW	Software Architect / Tech LeadKloudPPL - Sydney NSWFull-time, Permanent	Software Architect / Tech Lead
524	"Trade behaviour analytics
Financial markets risk - FX, Interest Rates, Commodities (Options/Futures)
Attractive Remuneration Package + Great Bonus Potential
Trade behaviour analytics
Financial markets risk - FX, Interest Rates, Commodities (Options/Futures)
Attractive Remuneration Package + Great Bonus Potential
Renowned banking institution and known for their expansion into Asia, my client is seeking a market risk manager or data scientist to work in their global markets division. This is a unique opportunity, which combines data science, financial markets risk, and compliance.

We are looking for an experienced financial markets specialist from either a market risk, compliance or data analytics background. The candidate will lead a team of data, and market risk analysts to develop, monitor and maintain controls and ensure that financial markets trading is in accordance with global regulatory conditions. The incumbent will be the main point of contact for the management of trading oversight. We are looking for experienced candidates with strong financial markets knowledge as well as trading practices and data analytics.

Ideally candidates with have

Strong financial markets experience from any asset classes but preferably rates, FX, fixed income or commodities (options and futures).
Strong programming skills (Python, R, Matlab, VBA).
Strong knowledge of financial market data infrastructure.
Excellent communication skills. Must be able to work with front office stakeholders.
For more information please contact Maria Shevelev at Bluefin Resources on 02 9270 2612
IMPORTANT: By submitting your email address and any other personal information when you APPLY to a job, you consent to such information being collected, held, used and disclosed in accordance with our COLLECTIONS NOTICE and PRIVACY POLICY.

http://www.bluefinresources.com.au/privacy-policy"	 - Sydney NSW	Senior Manager - Trade Surveillance (Markets Risk)Bluefin Resources - Sydney NSW	Senior Manager - Trade Surveillance (Markets Risk)
525	"About Hyper Anna and our team
We’re a rapidly growing startup in the artificial intelligence space – we’ve had lots of traction, are backed by VCs and we’re poised for a huge 2018. As a part of this, we’re looking for great people to help us overachieve on our goals to delight our customers whilst building a sustainable and sticky product. Our team is super switched on yet pretty casual and flexible, and we pride ourselves on our diverse, inclusive environment.
About the opportunity
We’re looking for a Senior UX / UI Designer to entrust with the interesting design challenges involved in creating and growing our AI product. You’ll be working with devs from data science, data engineering, backend, web and UX backgrounds to build Anna, an automated data scientist who is already beginning to transform how businesses use data. You’ll be a huge advocate for user experience best practices and mentoring the team to helping them to put themselves into the shoes of the customer. If Anna was a person, you’d be her communications coach, life mentor and image consultant.

We’re looking for someone with:

A passion for data, analytics and data-driven decision making
Familiarity with design and prototyping tools (Adobe suite, Sketch, or similar)
Commercial experience in designing, building and shipping applications or software
Exposure to front-end programming (HTML, CSS, Javascript) and data visualisation tools/libraries (Highcharts, D3)
Qualifications in HCI, Design, design computing, data visualization or related disciplines
A particular understanding or interest in how to best represent and communicate data analysis and insights
An interest in interaction, visual and UX design, as well as the ability to geek out and implement your designs in code

A day in your life will include:

Contributing to strategic product thinking and refining these concepts into something that creates value for our users every day
Working closely with designers, engineers and data scientists to deliver solutions that delight
Running workshops to draw out ideas, then communicate plans and align team members on the vision
Being involved in the full life-cycle of delivery, from ideation, discovery, prototyping, implementation and testing through to collecting data and feedback on features

About you
You’re passionate about new technologies and have a really strong understanding of what makes users tick, backed up by a grasp of the best practices in visual and UI design and development. You know when to obsess over details and when it’s time to ship. You love working in a team and helping others to grow with you. You’re someone who is laid-back and adaptable but wants to have an impact on the product you’re working on.
In return you’ll have the opportunity to join our team at a pivotal stage of our growth! This means you’ll have access to real career opportunities, receive a competitive salary, and work as part of our team in our beautiful, centrally located office.
Hyper Anna is an open and inclusive employer. We never discriminate on the basis of race, religion, national origin, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, age, or marital, veteran, or disability status.
Sound like you?
We love to talk all things tech and we are passionate about connecting with awesome people."	 - Sydney NSW	HyperAnna: Senior UX / UI DesignerAirTree Ventures - Sydney NSW	HyperAnna: Senior UX / UI Designer
526	"High likelihood of extension
Use the latest Big Data/Data Science tech
Fast-growing Data Science team - progression opportunities
Work among a fast growing Data Science team who pride themselves on collaboration and innovation alongside a tech stack that is second to none.
Collaborate with a highly efficient Data Science team deciphering huge unstructured Data Sets and creating value organisation-wide!

Due to recent growth within the Data Science team a key player within aviation is looking to add 1 more Data Scientist to their team.

What You'll Do:

Develop efficient, workable production solutions that perform prescribed research methods and business rules
Apply statistical analyses, machine learning, and data visualisation techniques
Partner with developers, statisticians, and product managers to deliver timely, high-quality product data
Design, develop, and implement creative quality assurance tests that validate source data and production output
Support statistical teams that research and evaluate new methods
What's in it for you?

Fantastic competitive day rate
Work on some of Melbourne's most exciting Data Science projects
Be part of a collaborative and innovative company
Opportunity convert to a permanent role after 6 months.
What You'll Need:

Experience with machine learning algorithms (XG-Boost, Gradient Boosting, Random Forest, Linear Modelling, Neural Networks, K-Means Clustering, Decision Trees)
Big Data Analytics experience - Spark & Scala (predominantly on semi-structured / unstructured data sets - e.g. Adobe)
Proven success managing critical processes and teams in a fast-paced business environment with competing priorities, vague requirements, and rapid iterations
Strong software development skills and expertise designing efficient SQL queries of big data
Excellent verbal and written communication skills
Bachelors degree in a quantitative subject such as Statistics, Operations Research, Engineering or Computer Science
Preferred: Familiarity with JIRA and Git Experience with Hadoop or other comparable distributed file systems Ability to develop advanced analytical solutions in Python or Spark. Knowledge of statistical software (ideally, R) or scientific computation software Experience conducting research and analytics with digital or TV audience data
If you feel the above is the next step you'd like to take in your career, APPLY NOW!

Only successful candidates will be contacted.
Experis ANZ is parent to a portfolio of brands; Greythorn, Safesearch, Marks Sattin, GT-X and Global Attract. These brands make up our core specialisations for Technology & Digital, Accounting & Finance, Engineering and Workplace Health, Safety and Environment. When you apply for this opportunity you will be directed to the parent website www.experis.com.au to lodge your application. Experis is part of the ManpowerGroup, a global leader in offering end to end workforce solutions.

If you're curious and willing to have a conversation about this role, please pick up the phone and speak with our recruitment specialist below. Even if this doesn't sound like the right role for you, we encourage you to join our talent community so your skill set can be the first considered when another opportunity arises. Click register on our website www.experis.com.au.
Tom Bull
Data Science
Recruitment Consultant
+61 3 9604 4209"	 - Melbourne VIC	Senior Data ScientistExperis563 reviews - Melbourne VICTemporary, Contract	Senior Data Scientist
527	"Currently looking for a highly experience Engineer to join a team working on a greenfield project. You will join a team of 4 which will consist of two developers, one Data Scientist and one Devops. Becoming part of this highly successful insurance based organisation you will have the opportunity to decide on what technologies are used to build this product.

When working on this team you will be building backend features, highly scalable code and writing test cases. You will be interested in all areas of development and want to work in a strong team of developers.

Key Skills:

4 + years of Programming ExperienceStrong Experience with Laravel, Symfony OR Yii
- Exposure to Python - Writing Spark Applications
AWSReactGULP Or Webpack
- Testing Frameworks - PHPUnit Or Selenium
Extensive Experience With NoSQL And SQLCan Use DevOps ToolsGit/SVN
Desirable Skills:

Like Working In Agile EnvironementExposure to Machine Learning and Artifical InteligenceEnjoys Working On New TechnologiesElastic Search
This is an amazing opportunity to join one of the best start up success stories that are marching on to achieve great things and work on some really exciting projects with the latest technologies.
If you think that this is the role for you please send your up to date CV to michael.fahy@opusrs.com.au or call Michael on 02 8089 0125.

I look forward to receiving your CV."	 - Melbourne VIC	Senior Software Engineer - PHPOpus Recruitment Solutions - Melbourne VIC$120,000 - $130,000 a year	Senior Software Engineer - PHP
528	You remember how to roll up your sleeves and craft data joins in SQL, but you've invested time in learning R, and Python is your friend. You know Hadoop isn't the only approach and you're happiest getting behind the GUI into the real data to uncover the stories.Isn't it about time you took advantage of the benefits from all that knowledge?Our client is looking for data polyglots who enjoy solving complex problems; not the kind you can come to with a canned response, the ones where you really need to use your skills.With some of the biggest names in Australia and around the world throwing their most pressing problems at our client they need curious guides - but they only take the best.Getting in isn't easy, but if it was, it wouldn't be the right place for you.Prove yourself and you can build a team behind you to grow your own patch. The opportunities truly are what you make them.With Udemy on tap, and weekly internal led training sessions, you'll be joining a group of like-minded people who are capable of understanding you when you get on your high horse about relevance over recency (or the other way around).Currently our client has four areas of practice, you can join one these and then explain to them what they need to build another:Data & Analytics - BI/DW, Big Data Analytics, Data Engineering, Data Science and Advanced AnalyticsCustomer Engagement - Marketing Campaigns, Campaign Analysis, Customer InsightsDigital - Full stack Development, UI/UX Design, Mobile DevelopmentCloud & Technology - Cloud Services (AWS, Azure, Google Cloud Platform), Managed ServicesWe're not worried about levels at the moment, if you've got the skills there's a place for you.SEO stuff because you know we need to have it in here;Data engineerData scientistData ConsultantJava, Scala, Python, HadoopApache Spark, Kafka, Hive, Airflow, NiFiAWS, Google Cloud Platform or Azure is helpful but not mandatoryJob Types: Full-time, PermanentExperience:data consulting: 3 years (Preferred)	 - Sydney NSW	Software Architect / Tech LeadKloudPPL - Sydney NSWFull-time, Permanent	Software Architect / Tech Lead
529	"The role will be focused on stitching together disparate data sources from across the business to enable machine learning and automated reporting and campaigns. Generically, provide a view on business issues/opportunities that cannot be revealed through standard reporting
What’s the role?
Analytics lead on internal strategic marketing projects designed to understand key customer behaviours that drive consumer revenue
Identify new opportunities to improve capability and optimise the business through analytics and modelling
Undertake proactive analysis of customer data processes that produce data driven analysis, reporting, insights and models
Provide data and analytical thought leadership that can be leveraged across the marketing teams
Consistent delivery of data programs that lead to more effective and improved customer experiences
Who are you?
The ability to interpret and convert complex data requests into prescriptive and actionable insights for a non-analytical audience.
Proactivity delivering data driven insights and recommendations
Senior stakeholder engagement and strong presentation skills
Must be advanced multi-lingual across various software languages (SQL, Python, R, SAS)
What’s in it for you?
Supportive and friendly environment. We encourage innovation, collaboration and creative thinking. Fun, fast-paced and excellent opportunities for growth and development.
Lucrative salary
Flexible working arrangements
Discounted health care
Employee discount with multiple brands including BMW, Qantas, Apple, Samsung etc
Work with some of Australia's most recognised and prestigious brands
On-site gym and wellbeing centre

Who are we?
We are Australia’s number one and most influential media organisation with more than 150 prestige brands across news, sport and lifestyle. Each month more than 17 million Australians choose to consume news and information from our digital and print products – more than any other media group in Australia.
Where do I sign?
Apply now or for more information on careers at News Corp Australia visit www.newscorpaustralia.com/careers"	 - Sydney Central Business District NSW	Data ScientistNews Corp Australia66 reviews - Sydney Central Business District NSWPermanent	Data Scientist
530	"There has never been a more exciting time to be part of Domain Group, a dynamic digital media and technology services business and one of Australia's leading property destinations. We provide property advertising and media online, via mobile, social media and in magazines, and technology services to the real estate industry. The business is experiencing rapid growth in digital revenues and investing in all areas to drive future earnings growth. Domain offers a dynamic and innovative culture at the leading edge of digital media in Australia.
We are looking for a lead data scientist to help sales, product and business leadership make decisions with data, give consumers certainty and control when selling their home with a broad mission and build data science and machine learning products to power the next stage of Domain's growth
As part of the Domain Group, you'll have the opportunity to work across all aspects of our property ecosystem, from listing and agent, to consumer behavior, email, and sales data.
What you'll do:
Build scalable models that analyse and extract information from disparate public sources
Develop and improve machine learning algorithms that drive our data pipeline operation
Leverage advanced statistical modeling to improve domain products
Research and implement the latest advances in the world of data
Proven ability to collaboratively and maturely work on a team
Curious with an aptitude to quickly learn
Experience:
At least 3-5 years of industry experience in data science
2+ years of professional experience with Natural Language Processing and/or Image Processing
Thorough knowledge of machine learning modeling processes
Thorough knowledge of supervised and unsupervised learning algorithms
Thorough knowledge of Natural Language Processing
Experience with implementation of Data Systems
Fluency in UNIX, SQL, Python and/or R
Good software engineering principles
Education/Qualifications:
MS or PhD degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Quantitative Psychology or related field.
Portfolio evidence of previous work is appreciated (i.e. blog, GitHub repository, journal/conference publications etc).
So...what happens next?
Once we've received your application we'll give it the attention it deserves and you'll hear from us either way. If you have the right experience, one of our Recruitment Consultants will give you a call (so make sure you keep your phone handy!) and from there we'll support you through the interview process.

Interested?
Go on then, click apply, we'd love to see your application!

A little note to recruitment agencies: We have a superstar recruitment team who are pretty good at filling our own roles, we know you're great at what you do to, but there's no need to get in touch! :)"	 - Sydney NSW	Lead Data ScientistDomain Group6 reviews - Sydney NSWFull-time, Permanent	Lead Data Scientist
532	"The role will be focused on stitching together disparate data sources from across the business to enable machine learning and automated reporting and campaigns. Generically, provide a view on business issues/opportunities that cannot be revealed through standard reporting
What’s the role?
Analytics lead on internal strategic marketing projects designed to understand key customer behaviours that drive consumer revenue
Identify new opportunities to improve capability and optimise the business through analytics and modelling
Undertake proactive analysis of customer data processes that produce data driven analysis, reporting, insights and models
Provide data and analytical thought leadership that can be leveraged across the marketing teams
Consistent delivery of data programs that lead to more effective and improved customer experiences
Who are you?
The ability to interpret and convert complex data requests into prescriptive and actionable insights for a non-analytical audience.
Proactivity delivering data driven insights and recommendations
Senior stakeholder engagement and strong presentation skills
Must be advanced multi-lingual across various software languages (SQL, Python, R, SAS)
What’s in it for you?
Supportive and friendly environment. We encourage innovation, collaboration and creative thinking. Fun, fast-paced and excellent opportunities for growth and development.
Lucrative salary
Flexible working arrangements
Discounted health care
Employee discount with multiple brands including BMW, Qantas, Apple, Samsung etc
Work with some of Australia's most recognised and prestigious brands
On-site gym and wellbeing centre

Who are we?
We are Australia’s number one and most influential media organisation with more than 150 prestige brands across news, sport and lifestyle. Each month more than 17 million Australians choose to consume news and information from our digital and print products – more than any other media group in Australia.
Where do I sign?
Apply now or for more information on careers at News Corp Australia visit www.newscorpaustralia.com/careers"	 - Sydney Central Business District NSW	Data ScientistNews Corp Australia66 reviews - Sydney Central Business District NSWPermanent	Data Scientist
533	SparkBeyond has built an AI-powered research engine, capable of finding complex patterns in data by understanding their meaning. Operating at the intersection of Data Science and Artificial Intelligence fields, our Machine Learning technology is so ground-breaking that it’s been referred to as science fiction on multiple occasions. SparkBeyond Discovery Platform is being used by Fortune 500 companies across industries.What will you do?Solve various problems and make a true impact across unlimited domains and industries (Financial Risk, Health, Ecommerce, Marketing, Oil & Gas Exploration and more.).Deliver business value by translating complex data into meaningful insights.Be the face of the company and the product directly interfacing with our partners around the globe.Partner with our customers’ Data Science teams, helping them optimize their use of SparkBeyond’s Discovery Platform.Work directly with our in-house team comprised of the brightest minds in technology, research and mathematics as well as senior interfaces from leading companies across the globe (fortune 500 companies and many others).Use your analytical skills and deep product understanding to consult our partners and provide them with advice and input of the highest quality.What will you need?Significant relevant work experience - Professional work experience on data science and analytics issuesA very strong academic background - PhDs are very welcome, as are quantitative degrees - Math, Physics, Computer Science and the like.Proven experience in handling large scale end to end data science projects and presenting the findings and insights. Building models is great - creating impact is greaterProven experience in translating business challenges into data pipelines & model frameworkExperience with Machine Learning techniques. Supervised, unsupervised, traditional or deep learning - either is great, but you need to know your stuff, both in theory and in practice (e.g., MICE, scikit-learn, keras or weka)Programming skills that allow you to be self-sufficient in handling data. Python and R are our daily companions, and a solid grasp of SQL is always needed. Big bonus points if you know ScalaAlso welcome: Experience with large datasets and distributed computing (Hive/Hadoop, Spark)Willingness to travel. We understand the need for a work-life balance and family time, but the ability to be on location at our clients is regularly required.Why SparkBeyond?Sense of Purpose: We’re building something bigger than ourselves. Our team is building a machine that can help solve the world’s most critical problems. We do this through our Partner engagements and the pro-bono work we are passionate about.Exposure: Help insurers process claims faster. Or pharmaceutical companies improve their quality control. Or, on a pro bono basis, an NGO to upskill underprivileged teenagers. Choose what you will work on and where you will leave your mark.People: We are proud of the brilliant, passionate and engaged team at SparkBeyond, including our very own Gödel and Wolf Prize winner. Our people are our greatest asset and we believe in empowerment, ownership and constant growth.Platform: Our Data Scientists are passionate about our cutting-edge platform and can’t imagine returning to traditional data science.Credibility: We have established ourselves as an industry leader, partnering and making impact for our Fortune 500 clients. See what the market is saying about us:https://venturebeat.com/2016/04/02/deep-learning-will-be-huge-and-heres-who-will-dominate-it/https://www.gartner.com/doc/3311218/cool-vendors-data-science-Job Type: Full-timeSalary: $100,000.00 to $180,000.00 /year	 - Melbourne VIC	Data ScientistSparkBeyond - Melbourne VIC$100,000 - $180,000 a year	Data Scientist
534	You remember how to roll up your sleeves and craft data joins in SQL, but you've invested time in learning R, and Python is your friend. You know Hadoop isn't the only approach and you're happiest getting behind the GUI into the real data to uncover the stories.Isn't it about time you took advantage of the benefits from all that knowledge?Our client is looking for data polyglots who enjoy solving complex problems; not the kind you can come to with a canned response, the ones where you really need to use your skills.With some of the biggest names in Australia and around the world throwing their most pressing problems at our client they need curious guides - but they only take the best.Getting in isn't easy, but if it was, it wouldn't be the right place for you.Prove yourself and you can build a team behind you to grow your own patch. The opportunities truly are what you make them.With Udemy on tap, and weekly internal led training sessions, you'll be joining a group of like-minded people who are capable of understanding you when you get on your high horse about relevance over recency (or the other way around).Currently our client has four areas of practice, you can join one these and then explain to them what they need to build another:Data & Analytics - BI/DW, Big Data Analytics, Data Engineering, Data Science and Advanced AnalyticsCustomer Engagement - Marketing Campaigns, Campaign Analysis, Customer InsightsDigital - Full stack Development, UI/UX Design, Mobile DevelopmentCloud & Technology - Cloud Services (AWS, Azure, Google Cloud Platform), Managed ServicesWe're not worried about levels at the moment, if you've got the skills there's a place for you.SEO stuff because you know we need to have it in here;Data engineerData scientistData ConsultantJava, Scala, Python, HadoopApache Spark, Kafka, Hive, Airflow, NiFiAWS, Google Cloud Platform or Azure is helpful but not mandatoryJob Types: Full-time, PermanentExperience:data consulting: 3 years (Preferred)	 - Sydney NSW	Software Architect / Tech LeadKloudPPL - Sydney NSWFull-time, Permanent	Software Architect / Tech Lead
535	"Join one of Melbourne's iconic institutions
Expand your skill set across a variety of projects
An opportunity to deliver high-quality best-fit solutions
An iconic establishment is currently seeking a Senior Data Scientist for a permanent opportunity to be a part of an exciting new team to build business relationships and provide high-quality best-fit solutions.
Having solid statistical modelling building skills, you will experience an exciting mix of creativity and innovation, within a framework of challenging objectives and a passion for delivering the best.

This role will suit an individual who enjoys tackling new projects to support business planning and decision making through the use of qualitative and quantitative analyses, based on customer and operational data.
Key Responsibilities:
Develop and implement statistical modells based on business requirements
Prepare and present insights and reports to key stakeholders
Provide recommendations across multiple aspects such as source of data and methods used
Extract and transform data for use of analysis, visualisations and statistical modelling
Be an active participant in knowledge sharing with a wide range of stakeholders
Skills Required:
Tertiary Qualification/Ph.D. in a quantitative discipline - mathematics, statistics, operation research (additional qualifications will be highly regarded)
Strong probem-solving, organizing and coordinating skills
Strong communication skills (verbally and written) is essential
Advanced skills SQL
Must have R and/or Python programming skills
Capable of managing multiple projects under pressure and meeting deadlines
Ability to interact proactively with internal and external customers
An inquisitive mind, passionate about deriving insights from data
This opportunity will allow the successful applicant to build strong relationships with internal and external teams, playing an integral role influencing business strategies, delivering customer and operational insights and knowledge through statistical modelling and data analysis.

To discuss the role more in detail, please call Corrin on 03 8330 5003.

IMPORTANT: By submitting your email address and any other personal information when you APPLY to a job, you consent to such information being collected, held, used and disclosed in accordance with our COLLECTIONS NOTICE and PRIVACY POLICY.

http://www.bluefinresources.com.au/privacy-policy"	 - Melbourne VIC	Senior Data ScientistBluefin Resources - Melbourne VIC	Senior Data Scientist
536	"Multiple roles - Lead/Manager
Huge Australian consultancy
Massive client base ranging many Australian household names
Work among an industry leading consultancy on-site for some of the biggest clients in Melbourne! If you'd like exposure to some of the most renowned analytics projects across Australia, alongside a flexible culture offering a great work life balance apply now!
Work among an industry leading consultancy on-site for some of the biggest clients in Melbourne! If you'd like exposure to some of the most renowned analytics projects across Australia, alongside a flexible culture offering a great work life balance apply now!

What You'll Do:

Apply statistical analyses, machine learning, and data visualisation techniques
Develop efficient, workable production solutions that perform prescribed research methods and business rules
Design, develop, and implement creative quality assurance tests that validate source data and production output
Partner with developers, statisticians, and product managers to deliver timely, high-quality product data
Support statistical teams that research and evaluate new methods

What is in it for you?

A flexible culture with great work/life balance
Work with some of Australia's leading household names
What You'll Need:

Experience with R and Python
Proven success managing critical processes and teams in a fast-paced business environment with competing priorities, vague requirements, and rapid iterations
Strong software development skills and expertise designing efficient SQL queries of big data
Bachelors degree in a quantitative subject such as Statistics, Operations Research, Engineering or Computer Science
Excellent verbal and written communication skills - this role is mainly client facing!
Consulting experience will be highly regarded
If you feel the above is the next step you'd like to take in your career, APPLY NOW!

Only successful candidates will be contacted.
Experis ANZ is parent to a portfolio of brands; Greythorn, Safesearch, Marks Sattin, GT-X and Global Attract. These brands make up our core specialisations for Technology & Digital, Accounting & Finance, Engineering and Workplace Health, Safety and Environment. When you apply for this opportunity you will be directed to the parent website www.experis.com.au to lodge your application. Experis is part of the ManpowerGroup, a global leader in offering end to end workforce solutions.

If you're curious and willing to have a conversation about this role, please pick up the phone and speak with our recruitment specialist below. Even if this doesn't sound like the right role for you, we encourage you to join our talent community so your skill set can be the first considered when another opportunity arises. Click register on our website www.experis.com.au.


Tom Bull
Data Science
Recruitment Consultant
+61 3 9604 4209"	 - Melbourne VIC	Senior Data ScientistExperis563 reviews - Melbourne VIC$100,000 a year - Temporary, Contract	Senior Data Scientist
537	"Trade behaviour analytics
Financial markets risk - FX, Interest Rates, Commodities (Options/Futures)
Attractive Remuneration Package + Great Bonus Potential
Trade behaviour analytics
Financial markets risk - FX, Interest Rates, Commodities (Options/Futures)
Attractive Remuneration Package + Great Bonus Potential
Renowned banking institution and known for their expansion into Asia, my client is seeking a market risk manager or data scientist to work in their global markets division. This is a unique opportunity, which combines data science, financial markets risk, and compliance.

We are looking for an experienced financial markets specialist from either a market risk, compliance or data analytics background. The candidate will lead a team of data, and market risk analysts to develop, monitor and maintain controls and ensure that financial markets trading is in accordance with global regulatory conditions. The incumbent will be the main point of contact for the management of trading oversight. We are looking for experienced candidates with strong financial markets knowledge as well as trading practices and data analytics.

Ideally candidates with have

Strong financial markets experience from any asset classes but preferably rates, FX, fixed income or commodities (options and futures).
Strong programming skills (Python, R, Matlab, VBA).
Strong knowledge of financial market data infrastructure.
Excellent communication skills. Must be able to work with front office stakeholders.
For more information please contact Maria Shevelev at Bluefin Resources on 02 9270 2612
IMPORTANT: By submitting your email address and any other personal information when you APPLY to a job, you consent to such information being collected, held, used and disclosed in accordance with our COLLECTIONS NOTICE and PRIVACY POLICY.

http://www.bluefinresources.com.au/privacy-policy"	 - Sydney NSW	Senior Manager - Trade Surveillance (Markets Risk)Bluefin Resources - Sydney NSW	Senior Manager - Trade Surveillance (Markets Risk)
538	"Established company with great reputation in Science & Technical Recruitment
Full training, mentoring and support from experienced professionals
Competitive salary including uncapped commission
About Us

Do you want to further your corporate career working with some of the most impressive companies in Australia? As an established boutique recruitment consultancy, we work closely with some of the leading pharmaceutical, medical device, clinical research and FMCG companies in the world, supporting them in finding the best local talent in sales and marketing, regulatory and quality, and clinical research.
At On Q Recruitment we work hard, but we also have lots of fun too. We have been around since 1999 (so quite a while), and have an excellent reputation with clients and candidates alike.
How do we differ from other Recruitment companies out there? Well we're boutique, so we focus on doing a few things really well and are experts in our niche. We're based in St Leonards, have a small team with over 80 years recruitment industry experience combined and are looking forward to sharing that knowledge with the successful applicants.

Typically in recruitment you're expected to work long hours - call us old fashioned but we believe everyone should have a life too. Time at your desk isn't valued, outcomes are. We also believe people should be rewarded for the work they do hence your earning potential is uncapped - you get out what you put in.

You can expect a friendly, professional, open, relaxed team environment where we enjoy what we do and celebrate success. You'll feel valued and supported in your career progression. Sound good?

About the Role:

You will be fully trained to be able to fulfil the complete recruitment role over time which involves:

Building relationships with (new and existing) clients and taking job briefs
Writing and placing job advertisements
Reviewing CVs
Interviewing candidates and advising of suitable job opportunities
Booking client interviews, briefing candidates and follow up
All online administration managing the interview process from start to finish
Who are you?

You'll be a go getter who's looking for a great opportunity to springboard your career in a new direction
You've got at least 3 years work experience doing something else which isn't lighting your fire anymore
You'll be serious about your work and career, but not serious to have around the office
This is a people focused job so you'll need to have exceptional communication skills
Other handy skills are tenacity, resilience, organisational skills and influencing ability
A background in Customer Service or Sales would be advantageous,
You'll have a Bachelor's Degree - ideally in Science, Engineering, Data Science, Pharmacy, Business or HR
You'll be an Australian Citizen (or have Permanent Residency) and have an Australian Drivers Licence
The Rewards are:

A competitive starting base salary (dependent on experience) + super
Uncapped commission - no ceiling on your earning potential
Development plan with full training and mentoring to ensure your best chance of success
Technology to be able to work from home as needed once you have earned your stripes
Work/life balance - after all work and no play isn't good for anyone
A fully stocked kitchen so you'll never go hungry
Extra holiday time - you can accrue one extra days leave per year (up to 5 days)
Casual dress on Fridays (we like to relax into the weekend!)
If you're excited to hear more, we'd be excited to hear from you! Please submit your resume with cover letter and tell us what makes you think this could be the perfect match for you. If you'd like to speak to someone first please call Amanda on 0424 932 721. We look forward to hearing from you. All successful applicants will be notified by 19th October.
Please send your Cover Letter and Resume in Word Doc Format (no text boxes or tables please) and follow the Apply Links. Visit onqrecruitment.com.au to review all our current vacancies."	 - Northern Beaches NSW	Recruitment Consultant Trainee - Pharmacist or Data ScientistOn Q Recruitment - Northern Beaches NSWFull-time, Permanent	Recruitment Consultant Trainee - Pharmacist or Data Scientist
539	"Work among a fast growing Data Science team who pride themselves on collaboration and innovation alongside a tech stack that is second to none.

Work among a fast growing Data Science team who pride themselves on collaboration and innovation alongside a tech stack that is second to none.
Collaborate with a highly efficient Data Science team deciphering huge unstructured Data Sets and creating value organisation-wide!

Due to recent growth within the Data Science team a key player within aviation is looking to add 1 more Data Scientist to their team.

What You'll Do:
Develop efficient, workable production solutions that perform prescribed research methods and business rules

Apply statistical analyses, machine learning, and data visualisation techniques

Partner with developers, statisticians, and product managers to deliver timely, high-quality product data

Design, develop, and implement creative quality assurance tests that validate source data and production output

Support statistical teams that research and evaluate new methods

What's in it for you?

Fantastic competitive day rate

Work on some of Melbourne's most exciting Data Science projects

Be part of a collaborative and innovative company

Opportunity convert to a permanent role after 6 months.

What You'll Need:
Experience with machine learning algorithms (XG-Boost, Gradient Boosting, Random Forest, Linear Modelling, Neural Networks, K-Means Clustering, Decision Trees)

Big Data Analytics experience - Spark & Scala (predominantly on semi-structured / unstructured data sets - e.g. Adobe)

Proven success managing critical processes and teams in a fast-paced business environment with competing priorities, vague requirements, and rapid iterations

Strong software development skills and expertise designing efficient SQL queries of big data

Excellent verbal and written communication skills

Bachelors degree in a quantitative subject such as Statistics, Operations Research, Engineering or Computer Science

Preferred: Familiarity with JIRA and Git Experience with Hadoop or other comparable distributed file systems Ability to develop advanced analytical solutions in Python or Spark. Knowledge of statistical software (ideally, R) or scientific computation software Experience conducting research and analytics with digital or TV audience data

If you feel the above is the next step you'd like to take in your career, APPLY NOW!

Only successful candidates will be contacted.
Experis ANZ is parent to a portfolio of brands; Greythorn, Safesearch, Marks Sattin, GT-X and Global Attract . These brands make up our core specialisations for Technology & Digital, Accounting & Finance, Engineering and Workplace Health, Safety and Environment. When you apply for this opportunity you will be directed to the parent website www.experis.com.au to lodge your application. Experis is part of the ManpowerGroup , a global leader in offering end to end workforce solutions.

If you're curious and willing to have a conversation about this role, please pick up the phone and speak with our recruitment specialist below. Even if this doesn't sound like the right role for you, we encourage you to join our talent community so your skill set can be the first considered when another opportunity arises. Click register on our website www.experis.com.au .

Tom Bull
Data Science
Recruitment Consultant
+61 3 9604 4209"	 - Melbourne VIC	Senior Data Scientist - 6 month contractGreythorn Specialist Technology Recruitment6 reviews - Melbourne VICTemporary, Contract	Senior Data Scientist - 6 month contract
540	"Randstad is on the lookout for a Data Analyst/Scientist to work for a well-established organization and be responsible for providing support of all aspects of data creation and migration for the client’s projects, including identifying, creating, cleaning and validating data extraction, transforming, and loading data into the visualisation tools.
The ideal candidate will need to take an interest in Data Science especially in the subject of Predictive Modelling. You will be working with the Data Scientist lead, Junior Data Scientist and a Data Visualisation specialist.
To succeed in this role you will have:
Experience working with PowerBI and Tableau
Exposure to Python or R language
Strong knowledge of statistical/data mining methods and application in a business environment
Good understanding of Data Science domain, statistical and analytical model development and implementation
Significant data management experience, gained from within the financial services sector
Good understanding of data modelling techniques, tools/language - R, Python
Strong project management, collaboration and communication skills
Ability to apply logic and reasoning to identify solutions to complex business problems and implement solutions
Business and financial acumen
Curiosity to learn and keep up with market trends and innovations
Flexibility to adapt in a complex changing environment
Strong written and verbal communication skills
If you think you have the skills to be successful in this role, then don’t delay and hit the Apply button now! Alternatively you can send your profile to Glenn on glenn.abadilla@randstad.com.au
At Randstad, we are passionate about providing equal employment opportunities and embracing diversity to the benefit of all. We actively encourage applications from any background."	 - Mascot NSW	data analyst/scientist (power bi/tableau)Randstad11,835 reviews - Mascot NSWPermanent	data analyst/scientist (power bi/tableau)
541	"Data Scientist

The Data Scientist will collaborate with business stakeholders on discovery activities, and deliver advanced analytic insights to improve customer experience and add shareholder value. You will work within cross functional experiment teams, conducting experiments using advanced analytics and machine learning techniques to discover actionable insights.


What you’ll be doing…
Working on analytic experiments in the Analytics Hub
Sharing knowledge and uplifting capabilities with analysts in the business
Thought leadership in the approach to analytics
Demonstrating value and benefit from advanced analytics to senior stakeholders

What you will bring...
Effective stakeholder management and capability to influence
Ability to understand and interpret problems
Predictive Modelling
Feature Engineering
Text Mining and Sentiment Analytics
Machine Learning
Teradata Aster/SQL MapReduce
Hadoop, MapReduce, Hive, Pig, Spark
SAS and SAS Visual Analytics
Python (NumPy, SciPy, etc)
Strong SQL skills using Oracle and Teradata


What's in it for you?


This is a fast growing organisation with lots of career opportunities and the ability to earn an excellent package.
To learn more and have access to a more complete job description listing the full responsibilities, please apply by sending your CV via the big button below or contact Geraint for a confidential discussion on (03) 8637 7370."	 - Melbourne VIC	Data Science ConsultantXpand Group - Melbourne VIC$130,000 - $145,000 a year	Data Science Consultant
542	"Randstad is on the lookout for a Data Analyst/Scientist to work for a well-established organization and be responsible for providing support of all aspects of data creation and migration for the client’s projects, including identifying, creating, cleaning and validating data extraction, transforming, and loading data into the visualisation tools.
The ideal candidate will need to take an interest in Data Science especially in the subject of Predictive Modelling. You will be working with the Data Scientist lead, Junior Data Scientist and a Data Visualisation specialist.
To succeed in this role you will have:
Experience working with PowerBI and Tableau
Exposure to Python or R language
Strong knowledge of statistical/data mining methods and application in a business environment
Good understanding of Data Science domain, statistical and analytical model development and implementation
Significant data management experience, gained from within the financial services sector
Good understanding of data modelling techniques, tools/language - R, Python
Strong project management, collaboration and communication skills
Ability to apply logic and reasoning to identify solutions to complex business problems and implement solutions
Business and financial acumen
Curiosity to learn and keep up with market trends and innovations
Flexibility to adapt in a complex changing environment
Strong written and verbal communication skills
Bonus - experience with Azure Data Factory (ADF)
If you think you have the skills to be successful in this role, then don’t delay and hit the Apply button now! Alternatively you can send your profile to Glenn on glenn.abadilla@randstad.com.au
At Randstad, we are passionate about providing equal employment opportunities and embracing diversity to the benefit of all. We actively encourage applications from any background."	 - Mascot NSW	data analyst (power bi/tableau)Randstad11,835 reviews - Mascot NSWPermanent	data analyst (power bi/tableau)
543	"Currently looking for a highly experience Engineer to join a team working on a greenfield project. You will join a team of 4 which will consist of two developers, one Data Scientist and one Devops. Becoming part of this highly successful insurance based organisation you will have the opportunity to decide on what technologies are used to build this product.

When working on this team you will be building backend features, highly scalable code and writing test cases. You will be interested in all areas of development and want to work in a strong team of developers.

Key Skills:

4 + years of Programming ExperienceStrong Experience with Laravel, Symfony OR Yii
- Exposure to Python - Writing Spark Applications
AWSReactGULP Or Webpack
- Testing Frameworks - PHPUnit Or Selenium
Extensive Experience With NoSQL And SQLCan Use DevOps ToolsGit/SVN
Desirable Skills:

Like Working In Agile EnvironementExposure to Machine Learning and Artifical InteligenceEnjoys Working On New TechnologiesElastic Search
This is an amazing opportunity to join one of the best start up success stories that are marching on to achieve great things and work on some really exciting projects with the latest technologies.
If you think that this is the role for you please send your up to date CV to michael.fahy@opusrs.com.au or call Michael on 02 8089 0125.

I look forward to receiving your CV."	 - Melbourne VIC	Senior Software Engineer - PHPOpus Recruitment Solutions - Melbourne VIC$120,000 - $130,000 a year	Senior Software Engineer - PHP
544	"Who we are

Tyro is Australia’s largest fintech and newest bank. We’re giving the business banking world a good shake up, with smart technology that save Australian businesses time and money.
We’re born different.
We don’t follow the easy path, we blaze our own unique trail.
And we want like-minded people who understand where we’re coming from and where we’re going.
When it comes to banks, lots of them say they’re different.
But Tyro really is different. We don’t do mortgages, personal loans, or investments. We’re all about business.
We may be new, but what we lack in heritage, we make up for with relentless determination and a focus on the future.
Our singular goal is to make life better for business owners with superior products and services that are simple and seamless so our customers, and our people, can keep blazing our own unique trail.

Your mission is to become Tyro’s marketing data, analytics and marketing automation subject matter expert (SME).
This role will be pivotal in creating and delivering targeted, end-to-end marketing campaigns, coupled with an extensive understanding of the business’ opportunities and risks, which will ultimately translate into sales, deepened relationships and positive customer experience. This role is responsible for establishing the campaign management and marketing analytics function within the marketing team, working closely with the organisation’s broader team of data scientist and analysts. This includes the effective planning, build, execution, deployment and analysis of marketing and customer campaigns across all channels (online and offline) to ensure the right message is delivered to the right customer at the right time.
You will also have accountability for the management, government, and optimisation of our existing CRM and marketing automation software and assume a pivotal role in the scoping and integration of any projects aligned with automated campaign management solutions and the data and digital product team roadmap.
What you'll be doing
Strategy
Consult with internal and external stakeholders on the best way to meet business objectives

Data & Analytics
Partner with product to understand and analyse large and different data systems and translate these into business opportunities / campaigns
Monitor and analyse campaign performance and create a range of best practices by customer segment
Challenge the way we use or source data for marketing and campaigns
Partner with Marketing and Customer teams to build targeted contact lists for acquisition, partner and customer campaigns in the marketing platform
Ensure data integrity through the establishment of campaign and analytical processes including data governance, contact rules and campaign quality / uploading / testing and tracking
Campaign management
Manage campaigns once they are running
Recommend and embed robust test-and-learn methodologies into campaigns
Work closely with the digital team to create custom-built reports and forecast modelling

Insights & Optimisation
Identify and implement any areas to deliver improved quality, speed, response rates and automation
Guide the team in the move towards multi-touch attribution modelling and end-to-end tracking
Effectively extract and analyse the performance of campaigns and provide key insights and recommendations for future improvements and new opportunities

Marketing CRM & Automation
Act like a pioneer in the field and proactively scope for ways to improve our CRM and Marketing automation systems to ensure the set up and the outcomes are in line with the business requirements
Be the expert in the organisation for recommending and selecting the right marketing technology
Be the central point of contact for our marketing automation software
Consult with 3rd party vendors to ensure best practice and value is achieved through CRM and marketing automation

Other projects and duties as required
What we're looking for:
A good understanding and experience with CRM and marketing automation is key for this role - experience with Salesforce and Pardot is preferred
Good interpersonal, negotiation and relationship building skills with the ability to communicate and engage well with stakeholders at all levels and 3rd party vendors
Efficient project planning and execution for deliverables
Analyse and manage data using SQL, SAS or other language and the ability to build queries and prepare data for further analysis
Advanced experience in end-to-end customer / marketing / campaign / analytics including planning and sizing, lead gen and nurturing, list extraction, tag management, website and campaign reporting methodologies and skills (prospect & existing customers)
Advanced technical and analytical skills to analyse customer and marketing profiles, campaigns and website performance including cohort analysis
Familiar with Google Analytics, Google Tag Manager & Mixpanel or any other relevant reporting software
Familiar with multi-touch attribution modelling and adserving
High analytic, problem solving, lateral thinking and interpretive skills
A keen eye to identify new opportunities that present themselves
Ability to explain complex information in simple terms to different audiences
Ability to translate campaign data into actionable insights
Positive approach to change
Self-driven, ability to set, manage and deliver own goals and deliver business objectives
3+ years’ marketing/campaign/customer analytics experience
Advanced marketing automation experience (preferably Pardot)
Advanced CRM experience (ideally Salesforce)
Advanced Excel skills
What we'd like to see:
B2B marketing experience
Financial Services experience
Tableau experience
Why work for us

We're not just like every other bank. Tyro has always been a tech company at heart, but fostering a diverse and inclusive environment, and a passion for continuous learning has always been one of the most important parts of our company's culture.

Tyros are a highly collaborative mix of people. You will work closely with our awesome teams and individuals in engineering, product management, customer support, sales and other functions within the business. Everyone is committed to delivering great outcomes for our customers, and you will have the chance to change the face of banking for Australia businesses.

Our 400 strong team of Tyros, just like our customers, are the lifeblood of our business. We go to great lengths to ensure a positive and enjoyable employee experience for all. We offer some amazing employee benefits such as a generous training budget, regular training for professional and personal development, 16 weeks paid primary carers leave, 3 weeks paid secondary carers leave, annual team based volunteer day, 17.5% leave loading and not to mention our multiple craft beer kegs (selection of beers carefully selected by our beer connoisseurs), wide selection of wine, variety of snacks and a ping pong table, selection of board and video games and an awesome rooftop area for socialising, all available to be enjoyed.

Privacy and Submitting your Application
By proceeding to submit your application, you acknowledge that you have read and understood Tyro’s Privacy Policy (www.tyro.com/privacy-policy/) and Privacy Statement & Consent for Job Applicants (www.tyro.com/privacy-statement-job-applicants/) and consent to Tyro collecting, using, holding and disclosing your personal information in accordance with these policies."	 - Sydney NSW	Marketing Automation SpecialistTyro - Sydney NSW	Marketing Automation Specialist
545	"Job Description:About IntellifyIntellify is a data science and machine learning consultancy who helps our customers to increase their growth, operate more efficiently and build competitive advantage. Our team consists of leading data scientists, machine learning engineers and consultants that extensively use advanced (statistical) machine learning and optimisation techniques to create state-of-the-art solutions for business. As an emerging AWS consulting partner, we have the ability to scale our solution to any needs through their cloud platform.About the OpportunityAs we are growing at a rapid speed, we are seeking a senior full-time data scientist/machine learning engineer who has extensive experience in data science, machine learning and/or statistical modelling as well as programming. As part of this role, you will supervise and manage junior data scientists, and work on development to build data science solutions using a combination of the latest technologies and business strategies.With a startup culture and applying cutting-edge technology to real-world business problems, you have the opportunity to drive impact at some of Australia’s leading startups and enterprises as well as to learn and grow within a team of like-minded data scientists. Our client problems have ranged from pricing, inventory and workforce optimisation to computer vision applied to radar data for predictive maintenance. The work is varied and challenging, and will require someone who is dynamic in their thinking as well as willing to explore and try new ideas.Being a senior data scientist at Intellify you are charged with both being a mentor and learning from fellow specialist data scientists in an ever evolving and improving atmosphere. We want to see you thrive professionally and personally as we create a leading data science, machine learning and AI company of the future.What we offerThis is a full-time permanent role. This role will provide a unique opportunity to work in a collaborative team and learn from experienced data scientists, so you can advance your knowledge and get hands-on experience with state-of-the-art machine learning methods. Our salaries are competitive, and we offer flexible working hours. We also believe great data science comes from great teams, so invest continuously in upskilling and cross-training our data scientists, with lunch & learn sessions, training courses and certifications, and an opportunity to be a core part of our data science and machine learning communities. Furthermore, we offer the following:1) 10 x paid days of professional development per year (attend/ speak @ conferences, undertake courses and certifications)2) $2,200 Toolkit allowance to go out and buy your own tech3) Profit sharing4) Work with high-profile clients5) A defined career path with your 1-1 mentor6) Great team culture7) Have an impact in a small team where there is no politics8) Flexible & inclusive work-environment9) Work closely with AWS using cutting edge cloud technologiesRequired Skills: A computer science, robotics, maths, statistics, physics or related degree (graduated Bachelors, MSc, PhD or last year MSc/PhD student)5+ years of applied industry machine learning, optimisation and/or statistics experienceStrong Python or R programming experience and related data science libraries (such as scikit-learn, Pandas, Tensorflow/Keras)Strong SQL database and code versioning (e.g., Git) skillsGood software engineering principlesProject management / team management experienceExperience with data visualisation tools or frameworks i.e. tableau, D3.js, ggplot2 etc.Desirable skills: Knowledge or experience of software engineering practicesKnowledge or experience on time series/product forecasting/recommender systemsKnowledge of deep learning/neural networksExperience working with web development technologiesExperience working with cloud technologies i.e. AWS / Microsoft / Google Cloud.Portfolio evidence of your previous work is appreciated (i.e. blog, github repository, conference presentations etc).How to ApplyIf you wish to take the next step in your career working and learning with the best in an innovative data science company, please click on ""Apply now"" and include:Your CVYour portfolio of projects (eg GitHub, blog site etc)Desired salaryYour availabilityBrief details (3-4 sentences) of either:A machine learning or data science project you have developed or delivered previously; orPrevious team leadership experience, where you worked with a team to deliver a project.We are looking forward to hearing from you.*** STRICTLY NO AGENCIES ***Please note that our Company Policy dictates direct recruitment only.Job Types: Full-time, Part-timeSalary: $120,000.00 to $160,000.00 /yearExperience:machine learning, optimisation and/or statistics: 3 years (Required)"	 - Sydney NSW	Senior Data Scientist/ Machine learning engineerIntellify - Sydney NSW$120,000 - $160,000 a year - Full-time, Part-time	Senior Data Scientist/ Machine learning engineer
546	Job DescriptionThe candidate is a skilled data scientist who will be building deep learning models for medical image diagnosis applications such as segmentation, localisation and classification of abnormalities.ResponsibilitiesThe candidate will write high quality model with high performance and good memory management, together with state-of-the-art accuracies and embed into our proprietary software. Our aim is to align you with the activities which truly interest you; will stretch you technically; help you grow and impact on billions of patients.RequirementsBachelor / Master / PhD in engineering or computer science or mathematics or physicsKnows computer vision / image segmentation, localization, classificationKnows tensorflow or theano or torchStrong python, C++ or java coderGood knowledge of numpy, pandas, sklearn, scipy, seabornKnows how to build deep learning models like RNN and CNN and other neural network models.May require to relocate to China, Beijing.What We OfferMaster, Teach, Learn – The opportunity to work with, learn from and share knowledge with ultra-smart colleagues in a culture of collaboration and technical excellence. We groom our employees and make sure that they stay at the cutting edge of the technology stack.Impact – Huge potential to make a positive contribution across our business, people and partnersRemuneration – Competitive pay with share award for top performers.We are willing to groom engineers and fresh graduates who don’t have a background in deep learning but are interested to learn. You will also have the opportunity to attend top machine learning conferences like NIPS and ICML.Job Types: Full-time, Permanent	 - Sydney NSW	BioMind Data Scientist/Engineer (Relocate to Beijing)biomind.ai - Sydney NSWFull-time, Permanent	BioMind Data Scientist/Engineer (Relocate to Beijing)
547	"There has never been a more exciting time to be part of Domain Group, a dynamic digital media and technology services business and one of Australia's leading property destinations. We provide property advertising and media online, via mobile, social media and in magazines, and technology services to the real estate industry. The business is experiencing rapid growth in digital revenues and investing in all areas to drive future earnings growth. Domain offers a dynamic and innovative culture at the leading edge of digital media in Australia.
We are looking for a lead data scientist to help sales, product and business leadership make decisions with data, give consumers certainty and control when selling their home with a broad mission and build data science and machine learning products to power the next stage of Domain's growth
As part of the Domain Group, you'll have the opportunity to work across all aspects of our property ecosystem, from listing and agent, to consumer behavior, email, and sales data.
What you'll do:
Build scalable models that analyse and extract information from disparate public sources
Develop and improve machine learning algorithms that drive our data pipeline operation
Leverage advanced statistical modeling to improve domain products
Research and implement the latest advances in the world of data
Proven ability to collaboratively and maturely work on a team
Curious with an aptitude to quickly learn
Experience:
At least 3-5 years of industry experience in data science
2+ years of professional experience with Natural Language Processing and/or Image Processing
Thorough knowledge of machine learning modeling processes
Thorough knowledge of supervised and unsupervised learning algorithms
Thorough knowledge of Natural Language Processing
Experience with implementation of Data Systems
Fluency in UNIX, SQL, Python and/or R
Good software engineering principles
Education/Qualifications:
MS or PhD degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Quantitative Psychology or related field.
Portfolio evidence of previous work is appreciated (i.e. blog, GitHub repository, journal/conference publications etc).
So...what happens next?
Once we've received your application we'll give it the attention it deserves and you'll hear from us either way. If you have the right experience, one of our Recruitment Consultants will give you a call (so make sure you keep your phone handy!) and from there we'll support you through the interview process.

Interested?
Go on then, click apply, we'd love to see your application!

A little note to recruitment agencies: We have a superstar recruitment team who are pretty good at filling our own roles, we know you're great at what you do to, but there's no need to get in touch! :)"	 - Sydney NSW	Lead Data ScientistDomain Group6 reviews - Sydney NSWFull-time, Permanent	Lead Data Scientist
549	"There has never been a more exciting time to be part of Domain Group, a dynamic digital media and technology services business and one of Australia's leading property destinations. We provide property advertising and media online, via mobile, social media and in magazines, and technology services to the real estate industry. The business is experiencing rapid growth in digital revenues and investing in all areas to drive future earnings growth. Domain offers a dynamic and innovative culture at the leading edge of digital media in Australia.
We are looking for a lead data scientist to help sales, product and business leadership make decisions with data, give consumers certainty and control when selling their home with a broad mission and build data science and machine learning products to power the next stage of Domain's growth
As part of the Domain Group, you'll have the opportunity to work across all aspects of our property ecosystem, from listing and agent, to consumer behavior, email, and sales data.
What you'll do:
Build scalable models that analyse and extract information from disparate public sources
Develop and improve machine learning algorithms that drive our data pipeline operation
Leverage advanced statistical modeling to improve domain products
Research and implement the latest advances in the world of data
Proven ability to collaboratively and maturely work on a team
Curious with an aptitude to quickly learn
Experience:
At least 3-5 years of industry experience in data science
2+ years of professional experience with Natural Language Processing and/or Image Processing
Thorough knowledge of machine learning modeling processes
Thorough knowledge of supervised and unsupervised learning algorithms
Thorough knowledge of Natural Language Processing
Experience with implementation of Data Systems
Fluency in UNIX, SQL, Python and/or R
Good software engineering principles
Education/Qualifications:
MS or PhD degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Quantitative Psychology or related field.
Portfolio evidence of previous work is appreciated (i.e. blog, GitHub repository, journal/conference publications etc).
So...what happens next?
Once we've received your application we'll give it the attention it deserves and you'll hear from us either way. If you have the right experience, one of our Recruitment Consultants will give you a call (so make sure you keep your phone handy!) and from there we'll support you through the interview process.

Interested?
Go on then, click apply, we'd love to see your application!

A little note to recruitment agencies: We have a superstar recruitment team who are pretty good at filling our own roles, we know you're great at what you do to, but there's no need to get in touch! :)"	 - Sydney NSW	Lead Data ScientistDomain Group6 reviews - Sydney NSWFull-time, Permanent	Lead Data Scientist
550	"Job Description:About IntellifyIntellify is a data science and machine learning consultancy who helps our customers to increase their growth, operate more efficiently and build competitive advantage. Our team consists of leading data scientists, machine learning engineers and consultants that extensively use advanced (statistical) machine learning and optimisation techniques to create state-of-the-art solutions for business. As an emerging AWS consulting partner, we have the ability to scale our solution to any needs through their cloud platform.About the OpportunityAs we are growing at a rapid speed, we are seeking a senior full-time data scientist/machine learning engineer who has extensive experience in data science, machine learning and/or statistical modelling as well as programming. As part of this role, you will supervise and manage junior data scientists, and work on development to build data science solutions using a combination of the latest technologies and business strategies.With a startup culture and applying cutting-edge technology to real-world business problems, you have the opportunity to drive impact at some of Australia’s leading startups and enterprises as well as to learn and grow within a team of like-minded data scientists. Our client problems have ranged from pricing, inventory and workforce optimisation to computer vision applied to radar data for predictive maintenance. The work is varied and challenging, and will require someone who is dynamic in their thinking as well as willing to explore and try new ideas.Being a senior data scientist at Intellify you are charged with both being a mentor and learning from fellow specialist data scientists in an ever evolving and improving atmosphere. We want to see you thrive professionally and personally as we create a leading data science, machine learning and AI company of the future.What we offerThis is a full-time permanent role. This role will provide a unique opportunity to work in a collaborative team and learn from experienced data scientists, so you can advance your knowledge and get hands-on experience with state-of-the-art machine learning methods. Our salaries are competitive, and we offer flexible working hours. We also believe great data science comes from great teams, so invest continuously in upskilling and cross-training our data scientists, with lunch & learn sessions, training courses and certifications, and an opportunity to be a core part of our data science and machine learning communities. Furthermore, we offer the following:1) 10 x paid days of professional development per year (attend/ speak @ conferences, undertake courses and certifications)2) $2,200 Toolkit allowance to go out and buy your own tech3) Profit sharing4) Work with high-profile clients5) A defined career path with your 1-1 mentor6) Great team culture7) Have an impact in a small team where there is no politics8) Flexible & inclusive work-environment9) Work closely with AWS using cutting edge cloud technologiesRequired Skills: A computer science, robotics, maths, statistics, physics or related degree (graduated Bachelors, MSc, PhD or last year MSc/PhD student)5+ years of applied industry machine learning, optimisation and/or statistics experienceStrong Python or R programming experience and related data science libraries (such as scikit-learn, Pandas, Tensorflow/Keras)Strong SQL database and code versioning (e.g., Git) skillsGood software engineering principlesProject management / team management experienceExperience with data visualisation tools or frameworks i.e. tableau, D3.js, ggplot2 etc.Desirable skills: Knowledge or experience of software engineering practicesKnowledge or experience on time series/product forecasting/recommender systemsKnowledge of deep learning/neural networksExperience working with web development technologiesExperience working with cloud technologies i.e. AWS / Microsoft / Google Cloud.Portfolio evidence of your previous work is appreciated (i.e. blog, github repository, conference presentations etc).How to ApplyIf you wish to take the next step in your career working and learning with the best in an innovative data science company, please click on ""Apply now"" and include:Your CVYour portfolio of projects (eg GitHub, blog site etc)Desired salaryYour availabilityBrief details (3-4 sentences) of either:A machine learning or data science project you have developed or delivered previously; orPrevious team leadership experience, where you worked with a team to deliver a project.We are looking forward to hearing from you.*** STRICTLY NO AGENCIES ***Please note that our Company Policy dictates direct recruitment only.Job Types: Full-time, Part-timeSalary: $120,000.00 to $160,000.00 /yearExperience:machine learning, optimisation and/or statistics: 3 years (Required)"	 - Sydney NSW	Senior Data Scientist/ Machine learning engineerIntellify - Sydney NSW$120,000 - $160,000 a year - Full-time, Part-time	Senior Data Scientist/ Machine learning engineer
551	"Join one of Melbourne's iconic institutions
Expand your skill set across a variety of projects
An opportunity to deliver high-quality best-fit solutions
An iconic establishment is currently seeking a Senior Data Scientist for a permanent opportunity to be a part of an exciting new team to build business relationships and provide high-quality best-fit solutions.
Having solid statistical modelling building skills, you will experience an exciting mix of creativity and innovation, within a framework of challenging objectives and a passion for delivering the best.

This role will suit an individual who enjoys tackling new projects to support business planning and decision making through the use of qualitative and quantitative analyses, based on customer and operational data.
Key Responsibilities:
Develop and implement statistical modells based on business requirements
Prepare and present insights and reports to key stakeholders
Provide recommendations across multiple aspects such as source of data and methods used
Extract and transform data for use of analysis, visualisations and statistical modelling
Be an active participant in knowledge sharing with a wide range of stakeholders
Skills Required:
Tertiary Qualification/Ph.D. in a quantitative discipline - mathematics, statistics, operation research (additional qualifications will be highly regarded)
Strong probem-solving, organizing and coordinating skills
Strong communication skills (verbally and written) is essential
Advanced skills SQL
Must have R and/or Python programming skills
Capable of managing multiple projects under pressure and meeting deadlines
Ability to interact proactively with internal and external customers
An inquisitive mind, passionate about deriving insights from data
This opportunity will allow the successful applicant to build strong relationships with internal and external teams, playing an integral role influencing business strategies, delivering customer and operational insights and knowledge through statistical modelling and data analysis.

To discuss the role more in detail, please call Corrin on 03 8330 5003.

IMPORTANT: By submitting your email address and any other personal information when you APPLY to a job, you consent to such information being collected, held, used and disclosed in accordance with our COLLECTIONS NOTICE and PRIVACY POLICY.

http://www.bluefinresources.com.au/privacy-policy"	 - Melbourne VIC	Senior Data ScientistBluefin Resources - Melbourne VIC	Senior Data Scientist
552	"Multiple roles - Lead/Manager
Huge Australian consultancy
Massive client base ranging many Australian household names
Work among an industry leading consultancy on-site for some of the biggest clients in Melbourne! If you'd like exposure to some of the most renowned analytics projects across Australia, alongside a flexible culture offering a great work life balance apply now!
Work among an industry leading consultancy on-site for some of the biggest clients in Melbourne! If you'd like exposure to some of the most renowned analytics projects across Australia, alongside a flexible culture offering a great work life balance apply now!

What You'll Do:

Apply statistical analyses, machine learning, and data visualisation techniques
Develop efficient, workable production solutions that perform prescribed research methods and business rules
Design, develop, and implement creative quality assurance tests that validate source data and production output
Partner with developers, statisticians, and product managers to deliver timely, high-quality product data
Support statistical teams that research and evaluate new methods

What is in it for you?

A flexible culture with great work/life balance
Work with some of Australia's leading household names
What You'll Need:

Experience with R and Python
Proven success managing critical processes and teams in a fast-paced business environment with competing priorities, vague requirements, and rapid iterations
Strong software development skills and expertise designing efficient SQL queries of big data
Bachelors degree in a quantitative subject such as Statistics, Operations Research, Engineering or Computer Science
Excellent verbal and written communication skills - this role is mainly client facing!
Consulting experience will be highly regarded
If you feel the above is the next step you'd like to take in your career, APPLY NOW!

Only successful candidates will be contacted.
Experis ANZ is parent to a portfolio of brands; Greythorn, Safesearch, Marks Sattin, GT-X and Global Attract. These brands make up our core specialisations for Technology & Digital, Accounting & Finance, Engineering and Workplace Health, Safety and Environment. When you apply for this opportunity you will be directed to the parent website www.experis.com.au to lodge your application. Experis is part of the ManpowerGroup, a global leader in offering end to end workforce solutions.

If you're curious and willing to have a conversation about this role, please pick up the phone and speak with our recruitment specialist below. Even if this doesn't sound like the right role for you, we encourage you to join our talent community so your skill set can be the first considered when another opportunity arises. Click register on our website www.experis.com.au.


Tom Bull
Data Science
Recruitment Consultant
+61 3 9604 4209"	 - Melbourne VIC	Senior Data ScientistExperis563 reviews - Melbourne VIC$100,000 a year - Temporary, Contract	Senior Data Scientist
553	"Our Client seeks a Data Scientist with Pre Sales or Consulting experience to join their Enterprise Information Management team and work with the Pre Sales division to develop custom built Data models for a range of EIM top tier Clients.

You will be a core member of the customer solution team, analyzing complex customer requirements to provide unique solutions for their Enterprise Information Data.

You will be hands on in developing predictive modeling concepts and optimisation algorithms within complex environments. Provide technical know how to deliver successful solutions to large corporations and government agencies.

Create and build solutions to meet unique customer focused business requirements and insights.

Help develop best practices for implementation projects.

You will possess at least 2 years experience within either an Analytics or Data Science working environment.

Experience in Spark with PySpark, Scala, SparkR specifically and ample experience in Python and R.
Experience working with large, multi-dimensional datasets.
Experience or an interest in Deep Learning, AI and Neural Networks.
Experience creating meaningful data visualisations and exposure to analysing unstructured content.
If this sounds like a role that fits your profile or would like to know more please click APPLY NOW below or email james@counterpointgroup.com.au for more details."	 - Sydney NSW	Data Scientist - Sydney, permanent, Spark, Scala, Python - pre sales workCounterpoint - Sydney NSW$160,000 a year - Full-time, Permanent	Data Scientist - Sydney, permanent, Spark, Scala, Python - pre sales work
554	"Randstad is on the lookout for a Data Analyst/Scientist to work for a well-established organization and be responsible for providing support of all aspects of data creation and migration for the client’s projects, including identifying, creating, cleaning and validating data extraction, transforming, and loading data into the visualisation tools.
The ideal candidate will need to take an interest in Data Science especially in the subject of Predictive Modelling. You will be working with the Data Scientist lead, Junior Data Scientist and a Data Visualisation specialist.
To succeed in this role you will have:
Experience working with PowerBI and Tableau
Exposure to Python or R language
Strong knowledge of statistical/data mining methods and application in a business environment
Good understanding of Data Science domain, statistical and analytical model development and implementation
Significant data management experience, gained from within the financial services sector
Good understanding of data modelling techniques, tools/language - R, Python
Strong project management, collaboration and communication skills
Ability to apply logic and reasoning to identify solutions to complex business problems and implement solutions
Business and financial acumen
Curiosity to learn and keep up with market trends and innovations
Flexibility to adapt in a complex changing environment
Strong written and verbal communication skills
If you think you have the skills to be successful in this role, then don’t delay and hit the Apply button now! Alternatively you can send your profile to Glenn on glenn.abadilla@randstad.com.au
At Randstad, we are passionate about providing equal employment opportunities and embracing diversity to the benefit of all. We actively encourage applications from any background."	 - Mascot NSW	data analyst/scientist (power bi/tableau)Randstad11,835 reviews - Mascot NSWPermanent	data analyst/scientist (power bi/tableau)
555	"Randstad is on the lookout for a Data Analyst/Scientist to work for a well-established organization and be responsible for providing support of all aspects of data creation and migration for the client’s projects, including identifying, creating, cleaning and validating data extraction, transforming, and loading data into the visualisation tools.
The ideal candidate will need to take an interest in Data Science especially in the subject of Predictive Modelling. You will be working with the Data Scientist lead, Junior Data Scientist and a Data Visualisation specialist.
To succeed in this role you will have:
Experience working with PowerBI and Tableau
Exposure to Python or R language
Strong knowledge of statistical/data mining methods and application in a business environment
Good understanding of Data Science domain, statistical and analytical model development and implementation
Significant data management experience, gained from within the financial services sector
Good understanding of data modelling techniques, tools/language - R, Python
Strong project management, collaboration and communication skills
Ability to apply logic and reasoning to identify solutions to complex business problems and implement solutions
Business and financial acumen
Curiosity to learn and keep up with market trends and innovations
Flexibility to adapt in a complex changing environment
Strong written and verbal communication skills
Bonus - experience with Azure Data Factory (ADF)
If you think you have the skills to be successful in this role, then don’t delay and hit the Apply button now! Alternatively you can send your profile to Glenn on glenn.abadilla@randstad.com.au
At Randstad, we are passionate about providing equal employment opportunities and embracing diversity to the benefit of all. We actively encourage applications from any background."	 - Mascot NSW	data analyst (power bi/tableau)Randstad11,835 reviews - Mascot NSWPermanent	data analyst (power bi/tableau)
556	You remember how to roll up your sleeves and craft data joins in SQL, but you've invested time in learning R, and Python is your friend. You know Hadoop isn't the only approach and you're happiest getting behind the GUI into the real data to uncover the stories.Isn't it about time you took advantage of the benefits from all that knowledge?Our client is looking for data polyglots who enjoy solving complex problems; not the kind you can come to with a canned response, the ones where you really need to use your skills.With some of the biggest names in Australia and around the world throwing their most pressing problems at our client they need curious guides - but they only take the best.Getting in isn't easy, but if it was, it wouldn't be the right place for you.Prove yourself and you can build a team behind you to grow your own patch. The opportunities truly are what you make them.With Udemy on tap, and weekly internal led training sessions, you'll be joining a group of like-minded people who are capable of understanding you when you get on your high horse about relevance over recency (or the other way around).Currently our client has four areas of practice, you can join one these and then explain to them what they need to build another:Data & Analytics - BI/DW, Big Data Analytics, Data Engineering, Data Science and Advanced AnalyticsCustomer Engagement - Marketing Campaigns, Campaign Analysis, Customer InsightsDigital - Full stack Development, UI/UX Design, Mobile DevelopmentCloud & Technology - Cloud Services (AWS, Azure, Google Cloud Platform), Managed ServicesWe're not worried about levels at the moment, if you've got the skills there's a place for you.SEO stuff because you know we need to have it in here;Data engineerData scientistData ConsultantJava, Scala, Python, HadoopApache Spark, Kafka, Hive, Airflow, NiFiAWS, Google Cloud Platform or Azure is helpful but not mandatoryJob Types: Full-time, PermanentExperience:data consulting: 3 years (Preferred)	 - Sydney NSW	Software Architect / Tech LeadKloudPPL - Sydney NSWFull-time, Permanent	Software Architect / Tech Lead
557	"Trade behaviour analytics
Financial markets risk - FX, Interest Rates, Commodities (Options/Futures)
Attractive Remuneration Package + Great Bonus Potential
Trade behaviour analytics
Financial markets risk - FX, Interest Rates, Commodities (Options/Futures)
Attractive Remuneration Package + Great Bonus Potential
Renowned banking institution and known for their expansion into Asia, my client is seeking a market risk manager or data scientist to work in their global markets division. This is a unique opportunity, which combines data science, financial markets risk, and compliance.

We are looking for an experienced financial markets specialist from either a market risk, compliance or data analytics background. The candidate will lead a team of data, and market risk analysts to develop, monitor and maintain controls and ensure that financial markets trading is in accordance with global regulatory conditions. The incumbent will be the main point of contact for the management of trading oversight. We are looking for experienced candidates with strong financial markets knowledge as well as trading practices and data analytics.

Ideally candidates with have

Strong financial markets experience from any asset classes but preferably rates, FX, fixed income or commodities (options and futures).
Strong programming skills (Python, R, Matlab, VBA).
Strong knowledge of financial market data infrastructure.
Excellent communication skills. Must be able to work with front office stakeholders.
For more information please contact Maria Shevelev at Bluefin Resources on 02 9270 2612
IMPORTANT: By submitting your email address and any other personal information when you APPLY to a job, you consent to such information being collected, held, used and disclosed in accordance with our COLLECTIONS NOTICE and PRIVACY POLICY.

http://www.bluefinresources.com.au/privacy-policy"	 - Sydney NSW	Senior Manager - Trade Surveillance (Markets Risk)Bluefin Resources - Sydney NSW	Senior Manager - Trade Surveillance (Markets Risk)
558	"About Hyper Anna and our team:
We’re a rapidly growing startup in the artificial intelligence space – we’ve had lots of traction, are backed by VCs and we’re poised for a huge year. As part of this, we are expanding our engineering team to help us overachieve on our goals while building a sustainable product. Our team is super switched on yet pretty casual and flexible, and we pride ourselves on our diverse, inclusive workplace.

About the opportunity:
We’re looking for Full-Stack Software engineers to entrust with the interesting technical challenges involved in creating and growing our product. You’ll be working with devs from data science, data engineering, backend, web and UX backgrounds to build Anna, an automated data scientist who is already beginning to transform how businesses use data. You’ll also be a huge advocate for Scala or Javascript best practices, mentoring the team and helping to get the most out of our stack. If Anna were a person you’d be her doctor, personal trainer, and nutritionist.

Specifically for this role, we’re looking for someone:

With strong programming skills in Javascript and/or Scala.
Who delights in building great interfaces for users in the front end and/or for developers in the back end.
Enjoys leading and mentoring software engineering teams

Desirably, you’ll also be strong in one of the following areas:

Data: A fan of data science and algorithms, with a deep understanding of big data platforms, data storage and retrieval
Infra: Love devops and building infrastructure and deployment pipelines that make developers jump for joy
People: Love building and nurturing teams, getting them aligned and engaged with the challenges of the product, and creating an environment for success

A day in your life will include:

Being responsible for the development of high performance features, services and algorithms
Working closely with designers, engineers and data scientists to deliver best-in-class solutions
Being involved in software and service architecture
Designing and adopting strong engineering practices

About you:
You’re passionate, up to date on new technologies, and have really strong computer science and engineering fundamentals. You know when to obsess over details and when it’s time to ship. You love working in a team and helping others to grow with you. You’re someone who is laid-back and adaptable but wants to have an impact on the product you’re working on.

To be successful in this role you’ll also need to demonstrate the following:

Commercial experience in at least one of Azure, Ansible and Circle CI or other similar devops, CI and CD infrastructure
Experience with databases (SQL)
A solid background in computer science / software engineering skills and knowledge
A passion for machine learning, data, distributed computing and functional programming
Ability to work in an agile development environment
Tertiary qualifications in software engineering or related disciplines

In return you’ll have the opportunity to join our team at a pivotal stage of our growth! This means you’ll have access to real career opportunities, receive a competitive salary, and work as part of our team in our beautiful, centrally located office.

Sound like you?
Applying is easy. Send an email with your resume, website, Github account, links to apps or anything else you’re proud of.
We love to talk all things tech and we are passionate about connecting with awesome people."	 - Sydney NSW	Hyper Anna: Software Engineer (Full-Stack)AirTree Ventures - Sydney NSW	Hyper Anna: Software Engineer (Full-Stack)
559	"Currently looking for a highly experience Engineer to join a team working on a greenfield project. You will join a team of 4 which will consist of two developers, one Data Scientist and one Devops. Becoming part of this highly successful insurance based organisation you will have the opportunity to decide on what technologies are used to build this product.

When working on this team you will be building backend features, highly scalable code and writing test cases. You will be interested in all areas of development and want to work in a strong team of developers.

Key Skills:

4 + years of Programming ExperienceStrong Experience with Laravel, Symfony OR Yii
- Exposure to Python - Writing Spark Applications
AWSReactGULP Or Webpack
- Testing Frameworks - PHPUnit Or Selenium
Extensive Experience With NoSQL And SQLCan Use DevOps ToolsGit/SVN
Desirable Skills:

Like Working In Agile EnvironementExposure to Machine Learning and Artifical InteligenceEnjoys Working On New TechnologiesElastic Search
This is an amazing opportunity to join one of the best start up success stories that are marching on to achieve great things and work on some really exciting projects with the latest technologies.
If you think that this is the role for you please send your up to date CV to michael.fahy@opusrs.com.au or call Michael on 02 8089 0125.

I look forward to receiving your CV."	 - Melbourne VIC	Senior Software Engineer - PHPOpus Recruitment Solutions - Melbourne VIC$120,000 - $130,000 a year	Senior Software Engineer - PHP
560	"About Hyper Anna and our team
We’re a rapidly growing startup in the artificial intelligence space – we’ve had lots of traction, are backed by VCs and we’re poised for a huge 2018. As a part of this, we’re looking for great people to help us overachieve on our goals to delight our customers whilst building a sustainable and sticky product. Our team is super switched on yet pretty casual and flexible, and we pride ourselves on our diverse, inclusive environment.
About the opportunity
We’re looking for a Senior UX / UI Designer to entrust with the interesting design challenges involved in creating and growing our AI product. You’ll be working with devs from data science, data engineering, backend, web and UX backgrounds to build Anna, an automated data scientist who is already beginning to transform how businesses use data. You’ll be a huge advocate for user experience best practices and mentoring the team to helping them to put themselves into the shoes of the customer. If Anna was a person, you’d be her communications coach, life mentor and image consultant.

We’re looking for someone with:

A passion for data, analytics and data-driven decision making
Familiarity with design and prototyping tools (Adobe suite, Sketch, or similar)
Commercial experience in designing, building and shipping applications or software
Exposure to front-end programming (HTML, CSS, Javascript) and data visualisation tools/libraries (Highcharts, D3)
Qualifications in HCI, Design, design computing, data visualization or related disciplines
A particular understanding or interest in how to best represent and communicate data analysis and insights
An interest in interaction, visual and UX design, as well as the ability to geek out and implement your designs in code

A day in your life will include:

Contributing to strategic product thinking and refining these concepts into something that creates value for our users every day
Working closely with designers, engineers and data scientists to deliver solutions that delight
Running workshops to draw out ideas, then communicate plans and align team members on the vision
Being involved in the full life-cycle of delivery, from ideation, discovery, prototyping, implementation and testing through to collecting data and feedback on features

About you
You’re passionate about new technologies and have a really strong understanding of what makes users tick, backed up by a grasp of the best practices in visual and UI design and development. You know when to obsess over details and when it’s time to ship. You love working in a team and helping others to grow with you. You’re someone who is laid-back and adaptable but wants to have an impact on the product you’re working on.
In return you’ll have the opportunity to join our team at a pivotal stage of our growth! This means you’ll have access to real career opportunities, receive a competitive salary, and work as part of our team in our beautiful, centrally located office.
Hyper Anna is an open and inclusive employer. We never discriminate on the basis of race, religion, national origin, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, age, or marital, veteran, or disability status.
Sound like you?
We love to talk all things tech and we are passionate about connecting with awesome people."	 - Sydney NSW	HyperAnna: Senior UX / UI DesignerAirTree Ventures - Sydney NSW	HyperAnna: Senior UX / UI Designer
561	"Work for Financial services employer of choice
Proven skills from Financial Services
Up to $850 a day plus super
6 month role on offer with an attractive rate which can offer you the chance to gain skills in a large scale and complex environment working with some of the best in the business.

In short come join them. Learn and grow!

A well known and market leading organisation has partnered with us to source a skilled Data Scientist / Data Analyst to work directly for the Analytics team that will allow the area to continue developing its data capability.

For this to be a success a number of plans are in the pipeline and will include:

Lead generation incorporating pre and post campaign analysis work and direct interaction with key technical business stakeholders
A new Governance framework to be rolled out
Overall targeted business analytics



To be successful once you feel comfortable assisting and driving the above you r resume will need to clearly illustrate data cleansing and building datasets

Working directly with the business
The usual Data science experience including Machine Learning, Linear and non linear programming, random forest as well as R/Python
As always the ability to illustrate technical terms to non technical stakeholders is a must to ensure success for all
Financial Services experience



This is initially a 6 month role but there is an expectation for this to extend so please only those will full and unrestricted working rights need apply!



Experis ANZ is parent to a portfolio of brands; Greythorn, Safesearch, Marks Sattin, GT-X and Global Attract. These brands make up our core specialisations for Technology & Digital, Accounting & Finance, Engineering and Workplace Health, Safety and Environment. When you apply for this opportunity you will be directed to the parent website www.experis.com.au to lodge your application. Experis is part of the ManpowerGroup, a global leader in offering end to end workforce solutions.

If you're curious and willing to have a conversation about this role, please pick up the phone and speak with our recruitment specialist below. Even if this doesn't sound like the right role for you, we encourage you to join our talent community so your skill set can be the first considered when another opportunity arises. Click register on our website www.experis.com.au.




Rebecca Ward
Technology & Digital
Resource Recruitment Associate
Let's Connect
https://www.linkedin.com/in/rebecca-ward-0b41b6120/
+61 2 9249 8041"	 - Sydney NSW	Data Scientist/AnalystGreythorn6 reviews - Sydney NSW$850 a day - Temporary, Contract	Data Scientist/Analyst
562	"A little about us:
There has never been a more exciting time to be part of Domain Group, a dynamic media and technology services business and one of Australia's leading property destinations. We provide property advertising and media online, via mobile, social media and in magazines, and technology services to the real estate industry. Our customers include real estate agencies, property buyers and sellers, property developers, financial institutions, retailers, media and government.
Used by millions of Australians, Domain's purpose is to inform, inspire and connect people throughout the property lifecycle. The business is experiencing rapid growth in digital revenues and investing across all areas to drive future earnings growth. Domain offers a dynamic and innovative culture at the leading edge of digital media in Australia.
Domain Group has recently gone through a separation process from Fairfax Media, and has become a separately listed company on the Australian Securities Exchange.
A lot about you:
As a Data Analyst in our SEO (search engine optimization) team, you will leverage your deep experience in data analysis and data mining to drive significant organic search traffic and user engagement growth for Domain Group's network of websites including Domain.com.au, CommercialRealEstate.com.au and Allhomes.com.au.
You will be someone who is enthusiastic and positive with a strong drive to learn new skills and a passion for learning SEO. You will be someone who thrives on working in a fast paced environment and a quick learner of new concepts.
Our industry-leading SEO team is the driving force for our business and maintains high standards and has exceeded performance goals each year.
Our success is dependent on our ability capture and convert qualified traffic from search engines like Google and Bing. Google is taking an AI-first approach company-wide, including their search algorithms, and we need to be on the front foot of these trends to continue our levels of growth and exceed our goals.
Your day to day will look something like this:
Create visualizations for specific organic search performance metrics and performance time series modelling and forecasting of our core SEO metrics. Write automated scripts to monitor and send alerts when significant changes occur outside of expected values.
Build data collection (from API's and websites), processing and analysis programs to help grow Domain's organic audience. This includes integrating with data sources such as keyword rankings, website link data, competitive data and website log files.
Uncover improvements in search engine crawl speed to quantify the time search engines spend crawling the site and the response that we served on each visit. This involves writing programs to analyse very large raw log files.
Capture high level goals and KPI metrics and integrate them with Google Data Studio and Tableau and set a data driven decision making example for the wider business.
You must enjoy working with large data sets and have a passion for spotting trends and insights along with a genuine curiosity about how search engines work with a focus on document retrieval. You will be responsible for deriving meaning from the data, and develop and promote a list of actions as a result of the analysis, plus any learnings on how to improve the collection and upkeep of our datasets.
You will be a critical cross-functional member of the SEO team that takes your data analyst skills and evaluates SEO opportunities that deliver business goals. You will act as a role model throughout our team by maintaining the highest professional standards, promoting data driven decision making, data analysis, creative thinking and pushing us to always be our best.
Skills and Qualifications we would love you to have:
Highly proficient in data analysis and presenting and communicating findings to technical and business stakeholders.
Experience in performing data analysis using SQL and (Python or R).
Experience parsing and cleansing unstructured datasets such as XML and HTML.
Some prior experience creating beautiful data visualisations using a tool such as Tableau.
Experience writing programs to collect, clean and analyse data from the web.
A proactive mindset in identifying opportunities where data science can be applied to SEO.
Experience analysing the results of A/B tests and experiments, providing recommendations for product rollout based on results and generating ideas for new experiments.
Knowledge of statistics and machine learning.
A basic understanding of how the web works and how crawlers/bots work.
A strong desire and curiosity to learn new tools, techniques and gain further knowledge in SEO and data science.
It would be extra special if you have:
Familiarity with Google Analytics, Google Search Console and Bing Webmaster Tools.
Previous experience supporting an SEO team or general knowledge of the search engine optimisation industry.
Knowledge of AWS products such as EC2 and S3.
Prior experience building production ETL pipelines.
Some prior experience working with or in a software development team.
Experience building R-Shiny applications.
Understanding of Git.
Knowledge of bash commands and scripting.
[default close copy script below]
Why you will love us:
We are certain you will love our brand new offices in Pyrmont. We have just opened a new level which has a zen space, gym and yoga studio. We also have a games room, ping pong table and comfy meeting spaces such as bean bags and the tree house. When you commence you will be given a choice of a Lenovo or Mac book laptop and you can take advantage of our cool sit-stand desks!
You will be part of and working closely with two awesome teams at Domain; the Data Team and the SEO Team. Both teams follow industry best practices and use modern tools and technologies. We have a great team culture that is both laid back (think t-shirts and shorts in summer) but hard working. There are very little barriers outside of your control to getting your job done at Domain, we have all the tools available to enable you to easily analyse billions of records in our datasets. If you need more compute, you can increase the size of your virtual machine/s yourself, you can use any ML or analytics AWS product available in the Sydney region. You have the power to spin up and spin down your own Snowflake data warehouse cluster of any size depending on the job at hand. You have access to some massive and interesting datasets at Domain across a wide range of businesses in the real estate industry.
So…what happens next?
We will give your application the attention it deserves and you will hear from us either way! If you have the right experience, one of our Recruitment Consultants will give you a call (so make sure you keep your phone handy!) and from there the interviews will commence!
Interested?
Go on then, click apply, we would love to see your application pop up!
A little note to recruitment agencies: We have this role covered; there is no need to get in touch :). We do not accept unsolicited agency resumes and Domain Group is not responsible for any fees related to unsolicited resumes. Thanks!"	 - Sydney NSW	Data AnalystDomain Group6 reviews - Sydney NSWFull-time, Permanent	Data Analyst
563	"Junior Data Scientist :: FinTech Start-up :: Sydney CBD :: $90K + Super + Bonus

Our client is an exciting start up in the FinTech / Property sector are looking to hire a Junior Data Scientist to join their expanding analytics team. Based in a FinTech incubator in the heart of the CBD, this organisation has a truly collaborative working environment. Reporting to the Head of Analytics this opportunity is paying up to $90K + Super + Bonus.

As a Junior Data Scientist, the responsibilities of this role will involve but not be limited to:

Develop creative and intuitive, insights driven dashboards leveraging cutting edge data visualisation tools such as Tableau, QlikView, PowerBI, etc.
Work within a supportive team of industry pioneers on Blue Chip clients to map out complex customer strategies to be optimised through Data Science and Machine Learning techniques.
Leverage strong programming skills in Python, R, SQL or SAS to manage and manipulate and supplement large volumes of customer data in preparation for modelling and analysis assignments.
Support delivery of a range of bespoke Data Science, Machine Learning, Statistical Modelling led projects leveraging techniques that may include; Linear/Logistic Regression, Confidence Interval, Test of Hypotheses, Clustering - Unsupervised & Supervised Learning, Time Series, Decision Trees , Monte-Carlo Simulation, Bayesian Statistics, Principal Component Analysis, Neural Networks, Gradient Boosting, Nearest Neighbors, (Geo-) Spatial Modeling, Recommendation Engines, Attribution Modeling, Segmentation, Predictive Modeling, Scoring Engine, Survival Analysis, Lift Modeling, Yield Optimization, Cross-Validation, Model Fitting, Experimental Design, etc.

The successful applicant will come from a strong academic and commercial background working in a data driven analytics and insights environment and be able to demonstrate:



Experience using R, Python, SQL or SAS to extract, manipulate and merge large customer behaviour or transactional data sets from a variety of source systems (SQL Teradata, Oracle SQL, SQL Server, AWS, SAS Base or R).
At least 1yr of commercial experience extracting 'Customer Insights' from large and complex datasets relating to; customer strategy (acquisition, retention & growth), statistical modelling, marketing campaigns or credit risk analysis, etc.
Educated to a minimum of degree level in an analytical discipline such as - Mathematics, Statistics, Econometrics, Actuarial Studies, Data Science, Computer Science etc.
A genuine passion to build a career in Data Analytics / Data Science, implementing analytical techniques and concepts such as; Linear/Logistic Regression, Confidence Interval, Test of Hypotheses, Clustering - Unsupervised & Supervised Learning, Time Series, Decision Trees, Monte-Carlo Simulation, Bayesian Statistics, Principal Component Analysis, Neural Networks, Gradient Boosting, Nearest Neighbors, (Geo-) Spatial Modeling, Recommendation Engines, Attribution Modeling, Segmentation, Predictive Modeling, Scoring Engine, Survival Analysis, Lift Modeling, Yield Optimization, Cross-Validation, Model Fitting, Experimental Design, etc

If this opportunity is of interest, please send your resume without delay to iain@correlateresources.com"	 - Sydney NSW	Junior Data ScientistCorrelate Resources - Sydney NSW$70,000 - $90,000 a year	Junior Data Scientist
565	Job DescriptionThe candidate is a skilled data scientist who will be building deep learning models for medical image diagnosis applications such as segmentation, localisation and classification of abnormalities.ResponsibilitiesThe candidate will write high quality model with high performance and good memory management, together with state-of-the-art accuracies and embed into our proprietary software. Our aim is to align you with the activities which truly interest you; will stretch you technically; help you grow and impact on billions of patients.RequirementsBachelor / Master / PhD in engineering or computer science or mathematics or physicsKnows computer vision / image segmentation, localization, classificationKnows tensorflow or theano or torchStrong python, C++ or java coderGood knowledge of numpy, pandas, sklearn, scipy, seabornKnows how to build deep learning models like RNN and CNN and other neural network models.May require to relocate to China, Beijing.What We OfferMaster, Teach, Learn – The opportunity to work with, learn from and share knowledge with ultra-smart colleagues in a culture of collaboration and technical excellence. We groom our employees and make sure that they stay at the cutting edge of the technology stack.Impact – Huge potential to make a positive contribution across our business, people and partnersRemuneration – Competitive pay with share award for top performers.We are willing to groom engineers and fresh graduates who don’t have a background in deep learning but are interested to learn. You will also have the opportunity to attend top machine learning conferences like NIPS and ICML.Job Types: Full-time, Permanent	 - Sydney NSW	BioMind Data Scientist/Engineer (Relocate to Beijing)biomind.ai - Sydney NSWFull-time, Permanent	BioMind Data Scientist/Engineer (Relocate to Beijing)
566	"Randstad is on the lookout for a Data Analyst/Scientist to work for a well-established organization and be responsible for providing support of all aspects of data creation and migration for the client’s projects, including identifying, creating, cleaning and validating data extraction, transforming, and loading data into the visualisation tools.
The ideal candidate will need to take an interest in Data Science especially in the subject of Predictive Modelling. You will be working with the Data Scientist lead, Junior Data Scientist and a Data Visualisation specialist.
To succeed in this role you will have:
Experience working with PowerBI and Tableau
Exposure to Python or R language
Strong knowledge of statistical/data mining methods and application in a business environment
Good understanding of Data Science domain, statistical and analytical model development and implementation
Significant data management experience, gained from within the financial services sector
Good understanding of data modelling techniques, tools/language - R, Python
Strong project management, collaboration and communication skills
Ability to apply logic and reasoning to identify solutions to complex business problems and implement solutions
Business and financial acumen
Curiosity to learn and keep up with market trends and innovations
Flexibility to adapt in a complex changing environment
Strong written and verbal communication skills
Bonus - experience with Azure Data Factory (ADF)
If you think you have the skills to be successful in this role, then don’t delay and hit the Apply button now! Alternatively you can send your profile to Glenn on glenn.abadilla@randstad.com.au
At Randstad, we are passionate about providing equal employment opportunities and embracing diversity to the benefit of all. We actively encourage applications from any background."	 - Mascot NSW	data analyst (power bi/tableau)Randstad11,835 reviews - Mascot NSWPermanent	data analyst (power bi/tableau)
567	"Join one of Melbourne's iconic institutions
Expand your skill set across a variety of projects
An opportunity to deliver high-quality best-fit solutions
An iconic establishment is currently seeking a Senior Data Scientist for a permanent opportunity to be a part of an exciting new team to build business relationships and provide high-quality best-fit solutions.
Having solid statistical modelling building skills, you will experience an exciting mix of creativity and innovation, within a framework of challenging objectives and a passion for delivering the best.

This role will suit an individual who enjoys tackling new projects to support business planning and decision making through the use of qualitative and quantitative analyses, based on customer and operational data.
Key Responsibilities:
Develop and implement statistical modells based on business requirements
Prepare and present insights and reports to key stakeholders
Provide recommendations across multiple aspects such as source of data and methods used
Extract and transform data for use of analysis, visualisations and statistical modelling
Be an active participant in knowledge sharing with a wide range of stakeholders
Skills Required:
Tertiary Qualification/Ph.D. in a quantitative discipline - mathematics, statistics, operation research (additional qualifications will be highly regarded)
Strong probem-solving, organizing and coordinating skills
Strong communication skills (verbally and written) is essential
Advanced skills SQL
Must have R and/or Python programming skills
Capable of managing multiple projects under pressure and meeting deadlines
Ability to interact proactively with internal and external customers
An inquisitive mind, passionate about deriving insights from data
This opportunity will allow the successful applicant to build strong relationships with internal and external teams, playing an integral role influencing business strategies, delivering customer and operational insights and knowledge through statistical modelling and data analysis.

To discuss the role more in detail, please call Corrin on 03 8330 5003.

IMPORTANT: By submitting your email address and any other personal information when you APPLY to a job, you consent to such information being collected, held, used and disclosed in accordance with our COLLECTIONS NOTICE and PRIVACY POLICY.

http://www.bluefinresources.com.au/privacy-policy"	 - Melbourne VIC	Senior Data ScientistBluefin Resources - Melbourne VIC	Senior Data Scientist
568	"Established company with great reputation in Science & Technical Recruitment
Full training, mentoring and support from experienced professionals
Competitive salary including uncapped commission
About Us

Do you want to further your corporate career working with some of the most impressive companies in Australia? As an established boutique recruitment consultancy, we work closely with some of the leading pharmaceutical, medical device, clinical research and FMCG companies in the world, supporting them in finding the best local talent in sales and marketing, regulatory and quality, and clinical research.
At On Q Recruitment we work hard, but we also have lots of fun too. We have been around since 1999 (so quite a while), and have an excellent reputation with clients and candidates alike.
How do we differ from other Recruitment companies out there? Well we're boutique, so we focus on doing a few things really well and are experts in our niche. We're based in St Leonards, have a small team with over 80 years recruitment industry experience combined and are looking forward to sharing that knowledge with the successful applicants.

Typically in recruitment you're expected to work long hours - call us old fashioned but we believe everyone should have a life too. Time at your desk isn't valued, outcomes are. We also believe people should be rewarded for the work they do hence your earning potential is uncapped - you get out what you put in.

You can expect a friendly, professional, open, relaxed team environment where we enjoy what we do and celebrate success. You'll feel valued and supported in your career progression. Sound good?

About the Role:

You will be fully trained to be able to fulfil the complete recruitment role over time which involves:

Building relationships with (new and existing) clients and taking job briefs
Writing and placing job advertisements
Reviewing CVs
Interviewing candidates and advising of suitable job opportunities
Booking client interviews, briefing candidates and follow up
All online administration managing the interview process from start to finish
Who are you?

You'll be a go getter who's looking for a great opportunity to springboard your career in a new direction
You've got at least 3 years work experience doing something else which isn't lighting your fire anymore
You'll be serious about your work and career, but not serious to have around the office
This is a people focused job so you'll need to have exceptional communication skills
Other handy skills are tenacity, resilience, organisational skills and influencing ability
A background in Customer Service or Sales would be advantageous,
You'll have a Bachelor's Degree - ideally in Science, Engineering, Data Science, Pharmacy, Business or HR
You'll be an Australian Citizen (or have Permanent Residency) and have an Australian Drivers Licence
The Rewards are:

A competitive starting base salary (dependent on experience) + super
Uncapped commission - no ceiling on your earning potential
Development plan with full training and mentoring to ensure your best chance of success
Technology to be able to work from home as needed once you have earned your stripes
Work/life balance - after all work and no play isn't good for anyone
A fully stocked kitchen so you'll never go hungry
Extra holiday time - you can accrue one extra days leave per year (up to 5 days)
Casual dress on Fridays (we like to relax into the weekend!)
If you're excited to hear more, we'd be excited to hear from you! Please submit your resume with cover letter and tell us what makes you think this could be the perfect match for you. If you'd like to speak to someone first please call Amanda on 0424 932 721. We look forward to hearing from you. All successful applicants will be notified by 19th October.
Please send your Cover Letter and Resume in Word Doc Format (no text boxes or tables please) and follow the Apply Links. Visit onqrecruitment.com.au to review all our current vacancies."	 - Northern Beaches NSW	Recruitment Consultant Trainee - Pharmacist or Data ScientistOn Q Recruitment - Northern Beaches NSWFull-time, Permanent	Recruitment Consultant Trainee - Pharmacist or Data Scientist
569	"About Hyper Anna and our team
We’re a rapidly growing startup in the artificial intelligence space – we’ve had lots of traction, are backed by VCs and we’re poised for a huge 2018. As a part of this, we’re looking for great people to help us overachieve on our goals to delight our customers whilst building a sustainable and sticky product. Our team is super switched on yet pretty casual and flexible, and we pride ourselves on our diverse, inclusive environment.
About the opportunity
We’re looking for a Senior UX / UI Designer to entrust with the interesting design challenges involved in creating and growing our AI product. You’ll be working with devs from data science, data engineering, backend, web and UX backgrounds to build Anna, an automated data scientist who is already beginning to transform how businesses use data. You’ll be a huge advocate for user experience best practices and mentoring the team to helping them to put themselves into the shoes of the customer. If Anna was a person, you’d be her communications coach, life mentor and image consultant.

We’re looking for someone with:

A passion for data, analytics and data-driven decision making
Familiarity with design and prototyping tools (Adobe suite, Sketch, or similar)
Commercial experience in designing, building and shipping applications or software
Exposure to front-end programming (HTML, CSS, Javascript) and data visualisation tools/libraries (Highcharts, D3)
Qualifications in HCI, Design, design computing, data visualization or related disciplines
A particular understanding or interest in how to best represent and communicate data analysis and insights
An interest in interaction, visual and UX design, as well as the ability to geek out and implement your designs in code

A day in your life will include:

Contributing to strategic product thinking and refining these concepts into something that creates value for our users every day
Working closely with designers, engineers and data scientists to deliver solutions that delight
Running workshops to draw out ideas, then communicate plans and align team members on the vision
Being involved in the full life-cycle of delivery, from ideation, discovery, prototyping, implementation and testing through to collecting data and feedback on features

About you
You’re passionate about new technologies and have a really strong understanding of what makes users tick, backed up by a grasp of the best practices in visual and UI design and development. You know when to obsess over details and when it’s time to ship. You love working in a team and helping others to grow with you. You’re someone who is laid-back and adaptable but wants to have an impact on the product you’re working on.
In return you’ll have the opportunity to join our team at a pivotal stage of our growth! This means you’ll have access to real career opportunities, receive a competitive salary, and work as part of our team in our beautiful, centrally located office.
Hyper Anna is an open and inclusive employer. We never discriminate on the basis of race, religion, national origin, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, age, or marital, veteran, or disability status.
Sound like you?
We love to talk all things tech and we are passionate about connecting with awesome people."	 - Sydney NSW	HyperAnna: Senior UX / UI DesignerAirTree Ventures - Sydney NSW	HyperAnna: Senior UX / UI Designer
570	"Work among a fast growing Data Science team who pride themselves on collaboration and innovation alongside a tech stack that is second to none.

Work among a fast growing Data Science team who pride themselves on collaboration and innovation alongside a tech stack that is second to none.
Collaborate with a highly efficient Data Science team deciphering huge unstructured Data Sets and creating value organisation-wide!

Due to recent growth within the Data Science team a key player within aviation is looking to add 1 more Data Scientist to their team.

What You'll Do:
Develop efficient, workable production solutions that perform prescribed research methods and business rules

Apply statistical analyses, machine learning, and data visualisation techniques

Partner with developers, statisticians, and product managers to deliver timely, high-quality product data

Design, develop, and implement creative quality assurance tests that validate source data and production output

Support statistical teams that research and evaluate new methods

What's in it for you?

Fantastic competitive day rate

Work on some of Melbourne's most exciting Data Science projects

Be part of a collaborative and innovative company

Opportunity convert to a permanent role after 6 months.

What You'll Need:
Experience with machine learning algorithms (XG-Boost, Gradient Boosting, Random Forest, Linear Modelling, Neural Networks, K-Means Clustering, Decision Trees)

Big Data Analytics experience - Spark & Scala (predominantly on semi-structured / unstructured data sets - e.g. Adobe)

Proven success managing critical processes and teams in a fast-paced business environment with competing priorities, vague requirements, and rapid iterations

Strong software development skills and expertise designing efficient SQL queries of big data

Excellent verbal and written communication skills

Bachelors degree in a quantitative subject such as Statistics, Operations Research, Engineering or Computer Science

Preferred: Familiarity with JIRA and Git Experience with Hadoop or other comparable distributed file systems Ability to develop advanced analytical solutions in Python or Spark. Knowledge of statistical software (ideally, R) or scientific computation software Experience conducting research and analytics with digital or TV audience data

If you feel the above is the next step you'd like to take in your career, APPLY NOW!

Only successful candidates will be contacted.
Experis ANZ is parent to a portfolio of brands; Greythorn, Safesearch, Marks Sattin, GT-X and Global Attract . These brands make up our core specialisations for Technology & Digital, Accounting & Finance, Engineering and Workplace Health, Safety and Environment. When you apply for this opportunity you will be directed to the parent website www.experis.com.au to lodge your application. Experis is part of the ManpowerGroup , a global leader in offering end to end workforce solutions.

If you're curious and willing to have a conversation about this role, please pick up the phone and speak with our recruitment specialist below. Even if this doesn't sound like the right role for you, we encourage you to join our talent community so your skill set can be the first considered when another opportunity arises. Click register on our website www.experis.com.au .

Tom Bull
Data Science
Recruitment Consultant
+61 3 9604 4209"	 - Melbourne VIC	Senior Data Scientist - 6 month contractGreythorn Specialist Technology Recruitment6 reviews - Melbourne VICTemporary, Contract	Senior Data Scientist - 6 month contract
571	"Data Scientist

The Data Scientist will collaborate with business stakeholders on discovery activities, and deliver advanced analytic insights to improve customer experience and add shareholder value. You will work within cross functional experiment teams, conducting experiments using advanced analytics and machine learning techniques to discover actionable insights.


What you’ll be doing…
Working on analytic experiments in the Analytics Hub
Sharing knowledge and uplifting capabilities with analysts in the business
Thought leadership in the approach to analytics
Demonstrating value and benefit from advanced analytics to senior stakeholders

What you will bring...
Effective stakeholder management and capability to influence
Ability to understand and interpret problems
Predictive Modelling
Feature Engineering
Text Mining and Sentiment Analytics
Machine Learning
Teradata Aster/SQL MapReduce
Hadoop, MapReduce, Hive, Pig, Spark
SAS and SAS Visual Analytics
Python (NumPy, SciPy, etc)
Strong SQL skills using Oracle and Teradata


What's in it for you?


This is a fast growing organisation with lots of career opportunities and the ability to earn an excellent package.
To learn more and have access to a more complete job description listing the full responsibilities, please apply by sending your CV via the big button below or contact Geraint for a confidential discussion on (03) 8637 7370."	 - Melbourne VIC	Data Science ConsultantXpand Group - Melbourne VIC$130,000 - $145,000 a year	Data Science Consultant
572	"Trade behaviour analytics
Financial markets risk - FX, Interest Rates, Commodities (Options/Futures)
Attractive Remuneration Package + Great Bonus Potential
Trade behaviour analytics
Financial markets risk - FX, Interest Rates, Commodities (Options/Futures)
Attractive Remuneration Package + Great Bonus Potential
Renowned banking institution and known for their expansion into Asia, my client is seeking a market risk manager or data scientist to work in their global markets division. This is a unique opportunity, which combines data science, financial markets risk, and compliance.

We are looking for an experienced financial markets specialist from either a market risk, compliance or data analytics background. The candidate will lead a team of data, and market risk analysts to develop, monitor and maintain controls and ensure that financial markets trading is in accordance with global regulatory conditions. The incumbent will be the main point of contact for the management of trading oversight. We are looking for experienced candidates with strong financial markets knowledge as well as trading practices and data analytics.

Ideally candidates with have

Strong financial markets experience from any asset classes but preferably rates, FX, fixed income or commodities (options and futures).
Strong programming skills (Python, R, Matlab, VBA).
Strong knowledge of financial market data infrastructure.
Excellent communication skills. Must be able to work with front office stakeholders.
For more information please contact Maria Shevelev at Bluefin Resources on 02 9270 2612
IMPORTANT: By submitting your email address and any other personal information when you APPLY to a job, you consent to such information being collected, held, used and disclosed in accordance with our COLLECTIONS NOTICE and PRIVACY POLICY.

http://www.bluefinresources.com.au/privacy-policy"	 - Sydney NSW	Senior Manager - Trade Surveillance (Markets Risk)Bluefin Resources - Sydney NSW	Senior Manager - Trade Surveillance (Markets Risk)
573	"We are currently recruiting 2 x Contract Data Scientists to work with a respected big data and data science team at a large banking and financial services client in Melbourne CBD. These are initial 6 month contracts, offering attractive daily rates and opportunities to work on challenging modelling and machine learning projects, with real business outcomes.
About you:
We are seeking 2 x data scientists, with over 3 years of experience delivering advanced analytics, commercial modelling, statistics or data science in business environments.
You will have confidence with statistical, predictive and machine learning models and techniques - applied to business problems such as with; marketing, customer outcomes, fraud, pricing, risk or operations.
Excellent communication skills - with the ability to work directly with senior business stakeholders
You can understand high-level business problems and then conceptualise what data sources to leverage, flag potential constraints, determine what questions to ask and which experiments to run to deliver the optimal solutions.
Skills in commercially relevant data tools such as; Python, R, SQL, AWS.
Nice-to-have skills include; Hadoop, Spark, Java, Scala,
Work Rights: Must have valid Australian Work Rights/Visa for 6 months +

Interviews and Start date: ASAP
To apply: Please apply via the links below as soon as possible. We are interviewing immediately and looking for start dates in 2-4 weeks."	 - Melbourne VIC	Contract Data Scientist - 6 months - Banking and Financial ServicesTalent Insights Group - Melbourne VICTemporary, Contract	Contract Data Scientist - 6 months - Banking and Financial Services
574	"Who we are

Tyro is Australia’s largest fintech and newest bank. We’re giving the business banking world a good shake up, with smart technology that save Australian businesses time and money.
We’re born different.
We don’t follow the easy path, we blaze our own unique trail.
And we want like-minded people who understand where we’re coming from and where we’re going.
When it comes to banks, lots of them say they’re different.
But Tyro really is different. We don’t do mortgages, personal loans, or investments. We’re all about business.
We may be new, but what we lack in heritage, we make up for with relentless determination and a focus on the future.
Our singular goal is to make life better for business owners with superior products and services that are simple and seamless so our customers, and our people, can keep blazing our own unique trail.

Your mission is to become Tyro’s marketing data, analytics and marketing automation subject matter expert (SME).
This role will be pivotal in creating and delivering targeted, end-to-end marketing campaigns, coupled with an extensive understanding of the business’ opportunities and risks, which will ultimately translate into sales, deepened relationships and positive customer experience. This role is responsible for establishing the campaign management and marketing analytics function within the marketing team, working closely with the organisation’s broader team of data scientist and analysts. This includes the effective planning, build, execution, deployment and analysis of marketing and customer campaigns across all channels (online and offline) to ensure the right message is delivered to the right customer at the right time.
You will also have accountability for the management, government, and optimisation of our existing CRM and marketing automation software and assume a pivotal role in the scoping and integration of any projects aligned with automated campaign management solutions and the data and digital product team roadmap.
What you'll be doing
Strategy
Consult with internal and external stakeholders on the best way to meet business objectives

Data & Analytics
Partner with product to understand and analyse large and different data systems and translate these into business opportunities / campaigns
Monitor and analyse campaign performance and create a range of best practices by customer segment
Challenge the way we use or source data for marketing and campaigns
Partner with Marketing and Customer teams to build targeted contact lists for acquisition, partner and customer campaigns in the marketing platform
Ensure data integrity through the establishment of campaign and analytical processes including data governance, contact rules and campaign quality / uploading / testing and tracking
Campaign management
Manage campaigns once they are running
Recommend and embed robust test-and-learn methodologies into campaigns
Work closely with the digital team to create custom-built reports and forecast modelling

Insights & Optimisation
Identify and implement any areas to deliver improved quality, speed, response rates and automation
Guide the team in the move towards multi-touch attribution modelling and end-to-end tracking
Effectively extract and analyse the performance of campaigns and provide key insights and recommendations for future improvements and new opportunities

Marketing CRM & Automation
Act like a pioneer in the field and proactively scope for ways to improve our CRM and Marketing automation systems to ensure the set up and the outcomes are in line with the business requirements
Be the expert in the organisation for recommending and selecting the right marketing technology
Be the central point of contact for our marketing automation software
Consult with 3rd party vendors to ensure best practice and value is achieved through CRM and marketing automation

Other projects and duties as required
What we're looking for:
A good understanding and experience with CRM and marketing automation is key for this role - experience with Salesforce and Pardot is preferred
Good interpersonal, negotiation and relationship building skills with the ability to communicate and engage well with stakeholders at all levels and 3rd party vendors
Efficient project planning and execution for deliverables
Analyse and manage data using SQL, SAS or other language and the ability to build queries and prepare data for further analysis
Advanced experience in end-to-end customer / marketing / campaign / analytics including planning and sizing, lead gen and nurturing, list extraction, tag management, website and campaign reporting methodologies and skills (prospect & existing customers)
Advanced technical and analytical skills to analyse customer and marketing profiles, campaigns and website performance including cohort analysis
Familiar with Google Analytics, Google Tag Manager & Mixpanel or any other relevant reporting software
Familiar with multi-touch attribution modelling and adserving
High analytic, problem solving, lateral thinking and interpretive skills
A keen eye to identify new opportunities that present themselves
Ability to explain complex information in simple terms to different audiences
Ability to translate campaign data into actionable insights
Positive approach to change
Self-driven, ability to set, manage and deliver own goals and deliver business objectives
3+ years’ marketing/campaign/customer analytics experience
Advanced marketing automation experience (preferably Pardot)
Advanced CRM experience (ideally Salesforce)
Advanced Excel skills
What we'd like to see:
B2B marketing experience
Financial Services experience
Tableau experience
Why work for us

We're not just like every other bank. Tyro has always been a tech company at heart, but fostering a diverse and inclusive environment, and a passion for continuous learning has always been one of the most important parts of our company's culture.

Tyros are a highly collaborative mix of people. You will work closely with our awesome teams and individuals in engineering, product management, customer support, sales and other functions within the business. Everyone is committed to delivering great outcomes for our customers, and you will have the chance to change the face of banking for Australia businesses.

Our 400 strong team of Tyros, just like our customers, are the lifeblood of our business. We go to great lengths to ensure a positive and enjoyable employee experience for all. We offer some amazing employee benefits such as a generous training budget, regular training for professional and personal development, 16 weeks paid primary carers leave, 3 weeks paid secondary carers leave, annual team based volunteer day, 17.5% leave loading and not to mention our multiple craft beer kegs (selection of beers carefully selected by our beer connoisseurs), wide selection of wine, variety of snacks and a ping pong table, selection of board and video games and an awesome rooftop area for socialising, all available to be enjoyed.

Privacy and Submitting your Application
By proceeding to submit your application, you acknowledge that you have read and understood Tyro’s Privacy Policy (www.tyro.com/privacy-policy/) and Privacy Statement & Consent for Job Applicants (www.tyro.com/privacy-statement-job-applicants/) and consent to Tyro collecting, using, holding and disclosing your personal information in accordance with these policies."	 - Sydney NSW	Marketing Automation SpecialistTyro - Sydney NSW	Marketing Automation Specialist
575	"Currently looking for a highly experience Engineer to join a team working on a greenfield project. You will join a team of 4 which will consist of two developers, one Data Scientist and one Devops. Becoming part of this highly successful insurance based organisation you will have the opportunity to decide on what technologies are used to build this product.

When working on this team you will be building backend features, highly scalable code and writing test cases. You will be interested in all areas of development and want to work in a strong team of developers.

Key Skills:

4 + years of Programming ExperienceStrong Experience with Laravel, Symfony OR Yii
- Exposure to Python - Writing Spark Applications
AWSReactGULP Or Webpack
- Testing Frameworks - PHPUnit Or Selenium
Extensive Experience With NoSQL And SQLCan Use DevOps ToolsGit/SVN
Desirable Skills:

Like Working In Agile EnvironementExposure to Machine Learning and Artifical InteligenceEnjoys Working On New TechnologiesElastic Search
This is an amazing opportunity to join one of the best start up success stories that are marching on to achieve great things and work on some really exciting projects with the latest technologies.
If you think that this is the role for you please send your up to date CV to michael.fahy@opusrs.com.au or call Michael on 02 8089 0125.

I look forward to receiving your CV."	 - Melbourne VIC	Senior Software Engineer - PHPOpus Recruitment Solutions - Melbourne VIC$120,000 - $130,000 a year	Senior Software Engineer - PHP
576	"Job Description:About IntellifyIntellify is a data science and machine learning consultancy who helps our customers to increase their growth, operate more efficiently and build competitive advantage. Our team consists of leading data scientists, machine learning engineers and consultants that extensively use advanced (statistical) machine learning and optimisation techniques to create state-of-the-art solutions for business. As an emerging AWS consulting partner, we have the ability to scale our solution to any needs through their cloud platform.About the OpportunityAs we are growing at a rapid speed, we are seeking a senior full-time data scientist/machine learning engineer who has extensive experience in data science, machine learning and/or statistical modelling as well as programming. As part of this role, you will supervise and manage junior data scientists, and work on development to build data science solutions using a combination of the latest technologies and business strategies.With a startup culture and applying cutting-edge technology to real-world business problems, you have the opportunity to drive impact at some of Australia’s leading startups and enterprises as well as to learn and grow within a team of like-minded data scientists. Our client problems have ranged from pricing, inventory and workforce optimisation to computer vision applied to radar data for predictive maintenance. The work is varied and challenging, and will require someone who is dynamic in their thinking as well as willing to explore and try new ideas.Being a senior data scientist at Intellify you are charged with both being a mentor and learning from fellow specialist data scientists in an ever evolving and improving atmosphere. We want to see you thrive professionally and personally as we create a leading data science, machine learning and AI company of the future.What we offerThis is a full-time permanent role. This role will provide a unique opportunity to work in a collaborative team and learn from experienced data scientists, so you can advance your knowledge and get hands-on experience with state-of-the-art machine learning methods. Our salaries are competitive, and we offer flexible working hours. We also believe great data science comes from great teams, so invest continuously in upskilling and cross-training our data scientists, with lunch & learn sessions, training courses and certifications, and an opportunity to be a core part of our data science and machine learning communities. Furthermore, we offer the following:1) 10 x paid days of professional development per year (attend/ speak @ conferences, undertake courses and certifications)2) $2,200 Toolkit allowance to go out and buy your own tech3) Profit sharing4) Work with high-profile clients5) A defined career path with your 1-1 mentor6) Great team culture7) Have an impact in a small team where there is no politics8) Flexible & inclusive work-environment9) Work closely with AWS using cutting edge cloud technologiesRequired Skills: A computer science, robotics, maths, statistics, physics or related degree (graduated Bachelors, MSc, PhD or last year MSc/PhD student)5+ years of applied industry machine learning, optimisation and/or statistics experienceStrong Python or R programming experience and related data science libraries (such as scikit-learn, Pandas, Tensorflow/Keras)Strong SQL database and code versioning (e.g., Git) skillsGood software engineering principlesProject management / team management experienceExperience with data visualisation tools or frameworks i.e. tableau, D3.js, ggplot2 etc.Desirable skills: Knowledge or experience of software engineering practicesKnowledge or experience on time series/product forecasting/recommender systemsKnowledge of deep learning/neural networksExperience working with web development technologiesExperience working with cloud technologies i.e. AWS / Microsoft / Google Cloud.Portfolio evidence of your previous work is appreciated (i.e. blog, github repository, conference presentations etc).How to ApplyIf you wish to take the next step in your career working and learning with the best in an innovative data science company, please click on ""Apply now"" and include:Your CVYour portfolio of projects (eg GitHub, blog site etc)Desired salaryYour availabilityBrief details (3-4 sentences) of either:A machine learning or data science project you have developed or delivered previously; orPrevious team leadership experience, where you worked with a team to deliver a project.We are looking forward to hearing from you.*** STRICTLY NO AGENCIES ***Please note that our Company Policy dictates direct recruitment only.Job Types: Full-time, Part-timeSalary: $120,000.00 to $160,000.00 /yearExperience:machine learning, optimisation and/or statistics: 3 years (Required)"	 - Sydney NSW	Senior Data Scientist/ Machine learning engineerIntellify - Sydney NSW$120,000 - $160,000 a year - Full-time, Part-time	Senior Data Scientist/ Machine learning engineer
577	"There has never been a more exciting time to be part of Domain Group, a dynamic digital media and technology services business and one of Australia's leading property destinations. We provide property advertising and media online, via mobile, social media and in magazines, and technology services to the real estate industry. The business is experiencing rapid growth in digital revenues and investing in all areas to drive future earnings growth. Domain offers a dynamic and innovative culture at the leading edge of digital media in Australia.
We are looking for a lead data scientist to help sales, product and business leadership make decisions with data, give consumers certainty and control when selling their home with a broad mission and build data science and machine learning products to power the next stage of Domain's growth
As part of the Domain Group, you'll have the opportunity to work across all aspects of our property ecosystem, from listing and agent, to consumer behavior, email, and sales data.
What you'll do:
Build scalable models that analyse and extract information from disparate public sources
Develop and improve machine learning algorithms that drive our data pipeline operation
Leverage advanced statistical modeling to improve domain products
Research and implement the latest advances in the world of data
Proven ability to collaboratively and maturely work on a team
Curious with an aptitude to quickly learn
Experience:
At least 3-5 years of industry experience in data science
2+ years of professional experience with Natural Language Processing and/or Image Processing
Thorough knowledge of machine learning modeling processes
Thorough knowledge of supervised and unsupervised learning algorithms
Thorough knowledge of Natural Language Processing
Experience with implementation of Data Systems
Fluency in UNIX, SQL, Python and/or R
Good software engineering principles
Education/Qualifications:
MS or PhD degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Quantitative Psychology or related field.
Portfolio evidence of previous work is appreciated (i.e. blog, GitHub repository, journal/conference publications etc).
So...what happens next?
Once we've received your application we'll give it the attention it deserves and you'll hear from us either way. If you have the right experience, one of our Recruitment Consultants will give you a call (so make sure you keep your phone handy!) and from there we'll support you through the interview process.

Interested?
Go on then, click apply, we'd love to see your application!

A little note to recruitment agencies: We have a superstar recruitment team who are pretty good at filling our own roles, we know you're great at what you do to, but there's no need to get in touch! :)"	 - Sydney NSW	Lead Data ScientistDomain Group6 reviews - Sydney NSWFull-time, Permanent	Lead Data Scientist
578	SparkBeyond has built an AI-powered research engine, capable of finding complex patterns in data by understanding their meaning. Operating at the intersection of Data Science and Artificial Intelligence fields, our Machine Learning technology is so ground-breaking that it’s been referred to as science fiction on multiple occasions. SparkBeyond Discovery Platform is being used by Fortune 500 companies across industries.What will you do?Solve various problems and make a true impact across unlimited domains and industries (Financial Risk, Health, Ecommerce, Marketing, Oil & Gas Exploration and more.).Deliver business value by translating complex data into meaningful insights.Be the face of the company and the product directly interfacing with our partners around the globe.Partner with our customers’ Data Science teams, helping them optimize their use of SparkBeyond’s Discovery Platform.Work directly with our in-house team comprised of the brightest minds in technology, research and mathematics as well as senior interfaces from leading companies across the globe (fortune 500 companies and many others).Use your analytical skills and deep product understanding to consult our partners and provide them with advice and input of the highest quality.What will you need?Significant relevant work experience - Professional work experience on data science and analytics issuesA very strong academic background - PhDs are very welcome, as are quantitative degrees - Math, Physics, Computer Science and the like.Proven experience in handling large scale end to end data science projects and presenting the findings and insights. Building models is great - creating impact is greaterProven experience in translating business challenges into data pipelines & model frameworkExperience with Machine Learning techniques. Supervised, unsupervised, traditional or deep learning - either is great, but you need to know your stuff, both in theory and in practice (e.g., MICE, scikit-learn, keras or weka)Programming skills that allow you to be self-sufficient in handling data. Python and R are our daily companions, and a solid grasp of SQL is always needed. Big bonus points if you know ScalaAlso welcome: Experience with large datasets and distributed computing (Hive/Hadoop, Spark)Willingness to travel. We understand the need for a work-life balance and family time, but the ability to be on location at our clients is regularly required.Why SparkBeyond?Sense of Purpose: We’re building something bigger than ourselves. Our team is building a machine that can help solve the world’s most critical problems. We do this through our Partner engagements and the pro-bono work we are passionate about.Exposure: Help insurers process claims faster. Or pharmaceutical companies improve their quality control. Or, on a pro bono basis, an NGO to upskill underprivileged teenagers. Choose what you will work on and where you will leave your mark.People: We are proud of the brilliant, passionate and engaged team at SparkBeyond, including our very own Gödel and Wolf Prize winner. Our people are our greatest asset and we believe in empowerment, ownership and constant growth.Platform: Our Data Scientists are passionate about our cutting-edge platform and can’t imagine returning to traditional data science.Credibility: We have established ourselves as an industry leader, partnering and making impact for our Fortune 500 clients. See what the market is saying about us:https://venturebeat.com/2016/04/02/deep-learning-will-be-huge-and-heres-who-will-dominate-it/https://www.gartner.com/doc/3311218/cool-vendors-data-science-Job Type: Full-timeSalary: $100,000.00 to $180,000.00 /year	 - Melbourne VIC	Data ScientistSparkBeyond - Melbourne VIC$100,000 - $180,000 a year	Data Scientist
580	"There has never been a more exciting time to be part of Domain Group, a dynamic digital media and technology services business and one of Australia's leading property destinations. We provide property advertising and media online, via mobile, social media and in magazines, and technology services to the real estate industry. The business is experiencing rapid growth in digital revenues and investing in all areas to drive future earnings growth. Domain offers a dynamic and innovative culture at the leading edge of digital media in Australia.
We are looking for a lead data scientist to help sales, product and business leadership make decisions with data, give consumers certainty and control when selling their home with a broad mission and build data science and machine learning products to power the next stage of Domain's growth
As part of the Domain Group, you'll have the opportunity to work across all aspects of our property ecosystem, from listing and agent, to consumer behavior, email, and sales data.
What you'll do:
Build scalable models that analyse and extract information from disparate public sources
Develop and improve machine learning algorithms that drive our data pipeline operation
Leverage advanced statistical modeling to improve domain products
Research and implement the latest advances in the world of data
Proven ability to collaboratively and maturely work on a team
Curious with an aptitude to quickly learn
Experience:
At least 3-5 years of industry experience in data science
2+ years of professional experience with Natural Language Processing and/or Image Processing
Thorough knowledge of machine learning modeling processes
Thorough knowledge of supervised and unsupervised learning algorithms
Thorough knowledge of Natural Language Processing
Experience with implementation of Data Systems
Fluency in UNIX, SQL, Python and/or R
Good software engineering principles
Education/Qualifications:
MS or PhD degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Quantitative Psychology or related field.
Portfolio evidence of previous work is appreciated (i.e. blog, GitHub repository, journal/conference publications etc).
So...what happens next?
Once we've received your application we'll give it the attention it deserves and you'll hear from us either way. If you have the right experience, one of our Recruitment Consultants will give you a call (so make sure you keep your phone handy!) and from there we'll support you through the interview process.

Interested?
Go on then, click apply, we'd love to see your application!

A little note to recruitment agencies: We have a superstar recruitment team who are pretty good at filling our own roles, we know you're great at what you do to, but there's no need to get in touch! :)"	 - Sydney NSW	Lead Data ScientistDomain Group6 reviews - Sydney NSWFull-time, Permanent	Lead Data Scientist
581	"Job Description:About IntellifyIntellify is a data science and machine learning consultancy who helps our customers to increase their growth, operate more efficiently and build competitive advantage. Our team consists of leading data scientists, machine learning engineers and consultants that extensively use advanced (statistical) machine learning and optimisation techniques to create state-of-the-art solutions for business. As an emerging AWS consulting partner, we have the ability to scale our solution to any needs through their cloud platform.About the OpportunityAs we are growing at a rapid speed, we are seeking a senior full-time data scientist/machine learning engineer who has extensive experience in data science, machine learning and/or statistical modelling as well as programming. As part of this role, you will supervise and manage junior data scientists, and work on development to build data science solutions using a combination of the latest technologies and business strategies.With a startup culture and applying cutting-edge technology to real-world business problems, you have the opportunity to drive impact at some of Australia’s leading startups and enterprises as well as to learn and grow within a team of like-minded data scientists. Our client problems have ranged from pricing, inventory and workforce optimisation to computer vision applied to radar data for predictive maintenance. The work is varied and challenging, and will require someone who is dynamic in their thinking as well as willing to explore and try new ideas.Being a senior data scientist at Intellify you are charged with both being a mentor and learning from fellow specialist data scientists in an ever evolving and improving atmosphere. We want to see you thrive professionally and personally as we create a leading data science, machine learning and AI company of the future.What we offerThis is a full-time permanent role. This role will provide a unique opportunity to work in a collaborative team and learn from experienced data scientists, so you can advance your knowledge and get hands-on experience with state-of-the-art machine learning methods. Our salaries are competitive, and we offer flexible working hours. We also believe great data science comes from great teams, so invest continuously in upskilling and cross-training our data scientists, with lunch & learn sessions, training courses and certifications, and an opportunity to be a core part of our data science and machine learning communities. Furthermore, we offer the following:1) 10 x paid days of professional development per year (attend/ speak @ conferences, undertake courses and certifications)2) $2,200 Toolkit allowance to go out and buy your own tech3) Profit sharing4) Work with high-profile clients5) A defined career path with your 1-1 mentor6) Great team culture7) Have an impact in a small team where there is no politics8) Flexible & inclusive work-environment9) Work closely with AWS using cutting edge cloud technologiesRequired Skills: A computer science, robotics, maths, statistics, physics or related degree (graduated Bachelors, MSc, PhD or last year MSc/PhD student)5+ years of applied industry machine learning, optimisation and/or statistics experienceStrong Python or R programming experience and related data science libraries (such as scikit-learn, Pandas, Tensorflow/Keras)Strong SQL database and code versioning (e.g., Git) skillsGood software engineering principlesProject management / team management experienceExperience with data visualisation tools or frameworks i.e. tableau, D3.js, ggplot2 etc.Desirable skills: Knowledge or experience of software engineering practicesKnowledge or experience on time series/product forecasting/recommender systemsKnowledge of deep learning/neural networksExperience working with web development technologiesExperience working with cloud technologies i.e. AWS / Microsoft / Google Cloud.Portfolio evidence of your previous work is appreciated (i.e. blog, github repository, conference presentations etc).How to ApplyIf you wish to take the next step in your career working and learning with the best in an innovative data science company, please click on ""Apply now"" and include:Your CVYour portfolio of projects (eg GitHub, blog site etc)Desired salaryYour availabilityBrief details (3-4 sentences) of either:A machine learning or data science project you have developed or delivered previously; orPrevious team leadership experience, where you worked with a team to deliver a project.We are looking forward to hearing from you.*** STRICTLY NO AGENCIES ***Please note that our Company Policy dictates direct recruitment only.Job Types: Full-time, Part-timeSalary: $120,000.00 to $160,000.00 /yearExperience:machine learning, optimisation and/or statistics: 3 years (Required)"	 - Sydney NSW	Senior Data Scientist/ Machine learning engineerIntellify - Sydney NSW$120,000 - $160,000 a year - Full-time, Part-time	Senior Data Scientist/ Machine learning engineer
582	"Randstad is on the lookout for a Data Analyst/Scientist to work for a well-established organization and be responsible for providing support of all aspects of data creation and migration for the client’s projects, including identifying, creating, cleaning and validating data extraction, transforming, and loading data into the visualisation tools.
The ideal candidate will need to take an interest in Data Science especially in the subject of Predictive Modelling. You will be working with the Data Scientist lead, Junior Data Scientist and a Data Visualisation specialist.
To succeed in this role you will have:
Experience working with PowerBI and Tableau
Exposure to Python or R language
Strong knowledge of statistical/data mining methods and application in a business environment
Good understanding of Data Science domain, statistical and analytical model development and implementation
Significant data management experience, gained from within the financial services sector
Good understanding of data modelling techniques, tools/language - R, Python
Strong project management, collaboration and communication skills
Ability to apply logic and reasoning to identify solutions to complex business problems and implement solutions
Business and financial acumen
Curiosity to learn and keep up with market trends and innovations
Flexibility to adapt in a complex changing environment
Strong written and verbal communication skills
Bonus - experience with Azure Data Factory (ADF)
If you think you have the skills to be successful in this role, then don’t delay and hit the Apply button now! Alternatively you can send your profile to Glenn on glenn.abadilla@randstad.com.au
At Randstad, we are passionate about providing equal employment opportunities and embracing diversity to the benefit of all. We actively encourage applications from any background."	 - Mascot NSW	data analyst (power bi/tableau)Randstad11,835 reviews - Mascot NSWPermanent	data analyst (power bi/tableau)
583	"This startup is on the hunt for a good Software Engineer to join the team in the capacity of a technical principal. Guiding junior Engineers is part of the culture and this job.

Software Engineers here do these cool things:
Develop automation and infrastructure for development, testing, build and deployment
Build Data Processing and Machine Learning systems
Roll out services to improve analytics
Create a human-like end product
Build tools for their Data Scientist friends
Software Engineers here need to have:
Functional programming such as: Scala, Python, Javascript
Passion for big data technologies and data science
Degree in software engineering/computer science
Impact:

You'll play a critical role in disrupting the analytics industry using artificial intelligence.

Benefits of working here:
Work life balance/Flexibility
A culture of mutual respect
Pet friendly
Cool T-shirts
Pair programming sessions
Weekly, Monthly and Quarterly events
Education centric values

Please contact ronny@theonset.com.au or on 0448 808 848 to learn more."	 - Sydney NSW	Software EngineerOnset Group Pty Ltd - Sydney NSW$135,000 - $140,000 a year	Software Engineer
584	"Join a leading Australian financial institution
Be part of a hybrid team - Data Engineers and Data Scientists
Full Time Role based in Melbourne CBD.

A leading Australian Financial Institution is currently seeking an experienced Data Scientist with previous experience as a Data Engineer, who is passionate and enthusiastic about data and how it can be used to build real value for the company. They are on a journey to create a hybrid data science and data engineering team, to bring the control of a structured data warehouse for corporate and regulatory reporting together with the fast evolving world of analytics.

Reporting to the Head of Data Science and Data Engineering, you will be collaborating with a team of highly skilled Data Engineers and Data Scientists to design high-quality data stores and analytical platforms to build advanced analytical models across the business.


Key Responsibilities

Address and solve complex business issues using large data sets
Develop advanced analytics model, including the preparation and reconciliation of data, feature engineering and creation of dashboard visualisations
Perform offline and online experiments, with a focus on the digital channels
Implement batch and streaming ETL (Extract, Transform, Load) processes
Engineer/Prototype/Industrialise data assets and platforms needed for analytics

Key Skills

Experience of SQL and NoSQL
Advanced Analytical Modelling in a business context (e.g. Machine Learning)
Technical experience in programming in Python, R and statistical packages (R, SAS)
Commercially and Tech curious
Experience in Data Engineering (highly advantageous)

This is an excellent opportunity to work in an agile environment to deliver high-quality analytical solutions, data assets, tools and insights.

For more information, please call Corrin on 03 8330 5003.
IMPORTANT: By submitting your email address and any other personal information when you APPLY to a job, you consent to such information being collected, held, used and disclosed in accordance with our COLLECTIONS NOTICE and PRIVACY POLICY.

http://www.bluefinresources.com.au/privacy-policy"	 - Melbourne VIC	Data Scientist/EngineerBluefin Resources - Melbourne VIC	Data Scientist/Engineer
585	"Our Client seeks a Data Scientist with Pre Sales or Consulting experience to join their Enterprise Information Management team and work with the Pre Sales division to develop custom built Data models for a range of EIM top tier Clients.

You will be a core member of the customer solution team, analyzing complex customer requirements to provide unique solutions for their Enterprise Information Data.

You will be hands on in developing predictive modeling concepts and optimisation algorithms within complex environments. Provide technical know how to deliver successful solutions to large corporations and government agencies.

Create and build solutions to meet unique customer focused business requirements and insights.

Help develop best practices for implementation projects.

You will possess at least 2 years experience within either an Analytics or Data Science working environment.

Experience in Spark with PySpark, Scala, SparkR specifically and ample experience in Python and R.
Experience working with large, multi-dimensional datasets.
Experience or an interest in Deep Learning, AI and Neural Networks.
Experience creating meaningful data visualisations and exposure to analysing unstructured content.
If this sounds like a role that fits your profile or would like to know more please click APPLY NOW below or email james@counterpointgroup.com.au for more details."	 - Sydney NSW	Data Scientist - Sydney, permanent, Spark, Scala, Python - pre sales workCounterpoint - Sydney NSW$160,000 a year - Full-time, Permanent	Data Scientist - Sydney, permanent, Spark, Scala, Python - pre sales work
586	"High likelihood of extension
Use the latest Big Data/Data Science tech
Fast-growing Data Science team - progression opportunities
Work among a fast growing Data Science team who pride themselves on collaboration and innovation alongside a tech stack that is second to none.
Collaborate with a highly efficient Data Science team deciphering huge unstructured Data Sets and creating value organisation-wide!

Due to recent growth within the Data Science team a key player within aviation is looking to add 1 more Data Scientist to their team.

What You'll Do:

Develop efficient, workable production solutions that perform prescribed research methods and business rules
Apply statistical analyses, machine learning, and data visualisation techniques
Partner with developers, statisticians, and product managers to deliver timely, high-quality product data
Design, develop, and implement creative quality assurance tests that validate source data and production output
Support statistical teams that research and evaluate new methods
What's in it for you?

Fantastic competitive day rate
Work on some of Melbourne's most exciting Data Science projects
Be part of a collaborative and innovative company
Opportunity convert to a permanent role after 6 months.
What You'll Need:

Experience with machine learning algorithms (XG-Boost, Gradient Boosting, Random Forest, Linear Modelling, Neural Networks, K-Means Clustering, Decision Trees)
Big Data Analytics experience - Spark & Scala (predominantly on semi-structured / unstructured data sets - e.g. Adobe)
Proven success managing critical processes and teams in a fast-paced business environment with competing priorities, vague requirements, and rapid iterations
Strong software development skills and expertise designing efficient SQL queries of big data
Excellent verbal and written communication skills
Bachelors degree in a quantitative subject such as Statistics, Operations Research, Engineering or Computer Science
Preferred: Familiarity with JIRA and Git Experience with Hadoop or other comparable distributed file systems Ability to develop advanced analytical solutions in Python or Spark. Knowledge of statistical software (ideally, R) or scientific computation software Experience conducting research and analytics with digital or TV audience data
If you feel the above is the next step you'd like to take in your career, APPLY NOW!

Only successful candidates will be contacted.
Experis ANZ is parent to a portfolio of brands; Greythorn, Safesearch, Marks Sattin, GT-X and Global Attract. These brands make up our core specialisations for Technology & Digital, Accounting & Finance, Engineering and Workplace Health, Safety and Environment. When you apply for this opportunity you will be directed to the parent website www.experis.com.au to lodge your application. Experis is part of the ManpowerGroup, a global leader in offering end to end workforce solutions.

If you're curious and willing to have a conversation about this role, please pick up the phone and speak with our recruitment specialist below. Even if this doesn't sound like the right role for you, we encourage you to join our talent community so your skill set can be the first considered when another opportunity arises. Click register on our website www.experis.com.au.
Tom Bull
Data Science
Recruitment Consultant
+61 3 9604 4209"	 - Melbourne VIC	Senior Data ScientistExperis563 reviews - Melbourne VICTemporary, Contract	Senior Data Scientist
587	"About Hyper Anna and our team
We’re a rapidly growing startup in the artificial intelligence space – we’ve had lots of traction, are backed by VCs and we’re poised for a huge 2018. As a part of this, we’re looking for great people to help us overachieve on our goals to delight our customers whilst building a sustainable and sticky product. Our team is super switched on yet pretty casual and flexible, and we pride ourselves on our diverse, inclusive environment.
About the opportunity
We’re looking for a Senior UX / UI Designer to entrust with the interesting design challenges involved in creating and growing our AI product. You’ll be working with devs from data science, data engineering, backend, web and UX backgrounds to build Anna, an automated data scientist who is already beginning to transform how businesses use data. You’ll be a huge advocate for user experience best practices and mentoring the team to helping them to put themselves into the shoes of the customer. If Anna was a person, you’d be her communications coach, life mentor and image consultant.

We’re looking for someone with:

A passion for data, analytics and data-driven decision making
Familiarity with design and prototyping tools (Adobe suite, Sketch, or similar)
Commercial experience in designing, building and shipping applications or software
Exposure to front-end programming (HTML, CSS, Javascript) and data visualisation tools/libraries (Highcharts, D3)
Qualifications in HCI, Design, design computing, data visualization or related disciplines
A particular understanding or interest in how to best represent and communicate data analysis and insights
An interest in interaction, visual and UX design, as well as the ability to geek out and implement your designs in code

A day in your life will include:

Contributing to strategic product thinking and refining these concepts into something that creates value for our users every day
Working closely with designers, engineers and data scientists to deliver solutions that delight
Running workshops to draw out ideas, then communicate plans and align team members on the vision
Being involved in the full life-cycle of delivery, from ideation, discovery, prototyping, implementation and testing through to collecting data and feedback on features

About you
You’re passionate about new technologies and have a really strong understanding of what makes users tick, backed up by a grasp of the best practices in visual and UI design and development. You know when to obsess over details and when it’s time to ship. You love working in a team and helping others to grow with you. You’re someone who is laid-back and adaptable but wants to have an impact on the product you’re working on.
In return you’ll have the opportunity to join our team at a pivotal stage of our growth! This means you’ll have access to real career opportunities, receive a competitive salary, and work as part of our team in our beautiful, centrally located office.
Hyper Anna is an open and inclusive employer. We never discriminate on the basis of race, religion, national origin, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, age, or marital, veteran, or disability status.
Sound like you?
We love to talk all things tech and we are passionate about connecting with awesome people."	 - Sydney NSW	HyperAnna: Senior UX / UI DesignerAirTree Ventures - Sydney NSW	HyperAnna: Senior UX / UI Designer
588	You remember how to roll up your sleeves and craft data joins in SQL, but you've invested time in learning R, and Python is your friend. You know Hadoop isn't the only approach and you're happiest getting behind the GUI into the real data to uncover the stories.Isn't it about time you took advantage of the benefits from all that knowledge?Our client is looking for data polyglots who enjoy solving complex problems; not the kind you can come to with a canned response, the ones where you really need to use your skills.With some of the biggest names in Australia and around the world throwing their most pressing problems at our client they need curious guides - but they only take the best.Getting in isn't easy, but if it was, it wouldn't be the right place for you.Prove yourself and you can build a team behind you to grow your own patch. The opportunities truly are what you make them.With Udemy on tap, and weekly internal led training sessions, you'll be joining a group of like-minded people who are capable of understanding you when you get on your high horse about relevance over recency (or the other way around).Currently our client has four areas of practice, you can join one these and then explain to them what they need to build another:Data & Analytics - BI/DW, Big Data Analytics, Data Engineering, Data Science and Advanced AnalyticsCustomer Engagement - Marketing Campaigns, Campaign Analysis, Customer InsightsDigital - Full stack Development, UI/UX Design, Mobile DevelopmentCloud & Technology - Cloud Services (AWS, Azure, Google Cloud Platform), Managed ServicesWe're not worried about levels at the moment, if you've got the skills there's a place for you.SEO stuff because you know we need to have it in here;Data engineerData scientistData ConsultantJava, Scala, Python, HadoopApache Spark, Kafka, Hive, Airflow, NiFiAWS, Google Cloud Platform or Azure is helpful but not mandatoryJob Types: Full-time, PermanentExperience:data consulting: 3 years (Preferred)	 - Sydney NSW	Software Architect / Tech LeadKloudPPL - Sydney NSWFull-time, Permanent	Software Architect / Tech Lead
589	"Trade behaviour analytics
Financial markets risk - FX, Interest Rates, Commodities (Options/Futures)
Attractive Remuneration Package + Great Bonus Potential
Trade behaviour analytics
Financial markets risk - FX, Interest Rates, Commodities (Options/Futures)
Attractive Remuneration Package + Great Bonus Potential
Renowned banking institution and known for their expansion into Asia, my client is seeking a market risk manager or data scientist to work in their global markets division. This is a unique opportunity, which combines data science, financial markets risk, and compliance.

We are looking for an experienced financial markets specialist from either a market risk, compliance or data analytics background. The candidate will lead a team of data, and market risk analysts to develop, monitor and maintain controls and ensure that financial markets trading is in accordance with global regulatory conditions. The incumbent will be the main point of contact for the management of trading oversight. We are looking for experienced candidates with strong financial markets knowledge as well as trading practices and data analytics.

Ideally candidates with have

Strong financial markets experience from any asset classes but preferably rates, FX, fixed income or commodities (options and futures).
Strong programming skills (Python, R, Matlab, VBA).
Strong knowledge of financial market data infrastructure.
Excellent communication skills. Must be able to work with front office stakeholders.
For more information please contact Maria Shevelev at Bluefin Resources on 02 9270 2612
IMPORTANT: By submitting your email address and any other personal information when you APPLY to a job, you consent to such information being collected, held, used and disclosed in accordance with our COLLECTIONS NOTICE and PRIVACY POLICY.

http://www.bluefinresources.com.au/privacy-policy"	 - Sydney NSW	Senior Manager - Trade Surveillance (Markets Risk)Bluefin Resources - Sydney NSW	Senior Manager - Trade Surveillance (Markets Risk)
590	"About Hyper Anna and our team:
We’re a rapidly growing startup in the artificial intelligence space – we’ve had lots of traction, are backed by VCs and we’re poised for a huge year. As part of this, we are expanding our engineering team to help us overachieve on our goals while building a sustainable product. Our team is super switched on yet pretty casual and flexible, and we pride ourselves on our diverse, inclusive workplace.

About the opportunity:
We’re looking for Full-Stack Software engineers to entrust with the interesting technical challenges involved in creating and growing our product. You’ll be working with devs from data science, data engineering, backend, web and UX backgrounds to build Anna, an automated data scientist who is already beginning to transform how businesses use data. You’ll also be a huge advocate for Scala or Javascript best practices, mentoring the team and helping to get the most out of our stack. If Anna were a person you’d be her doctor, personal trainer, and nutritionist.

Specifically for this role, we’re looking for someone:

With strong programming skills in Javascript and/or Scala.
Who delights in building great interfaces for users in the front end and/or for developers in the back end.
Enjoys leading and mentoring software engineering teams

Desirably, you’ll also be strong in one of the following areas:

Data: A fan of data science and algorithms, with a deep understanding of big data platforms, data storage and retrieval
Infra: Love devops and building infrastructure and deployment pipelines that make developers jump for joy
People: Love building and nurturing teams, getting them aligned and engaged with the challenges of the product, and creating an environment for success

A day in your life will include:

Being responsible for the development of high performance features, services and algorithms
Working closely with designers, engineers and data scientists to deliver best-in-class solutions
Being involved in software and service architecture
Designing and adopting strong engineering practices

About you:
You’re passionate, up to date on new technologies, and have really strong computer science and engineering fundamentals. You know when to obsess over details and when it’s time to ship. You love working in a team and helping others to grow with you. You’re someone who is laid-back and adaptable but wants to have an impact on the product you’re working on.

To be successful in this role you’ll also need to demonstrate the following:

Commercial experience in at least one of Azure, Ansible and Circle CI or other similar devops, CI and CD infrastructure
Experience with databases (SQL)
A solid background in computer science / software engineering skills and knowledge
A passion for machine learning, data, distributed computing and functional programming
Ability to work in an agile development environment
Tertiary qualifications in software engineering or related disciplines

In return you’ll have the opportunity to join our team at a pivotal stage of our growth! This means you’ll have access to real career opportunities, receive a competitive salary, and work as part of our team in our beautiful, centrally located office.

Sound like you?
Applying is easy. Send an email with your resume, website, Github account, links to apps or anything else you’re proud of.
We love to talk all things tech and we are passionate about connecting with awesome people."	 - Sydney NSW	Hyper Anna: Software Engineer (Full-Stack)AirTree Ventures - Sydney NSW	Hyper Anna: Software Engineer (Full-Stack)
591	"Currently looking for a highly experience Engineer to join a team working on a greenfield project. You will join a team of 4 which will consist of two developers, one Data Scientist and one Devops. Becoming part of this highly successful insurance based organisation you will have the opportunity to decide on what technologies are used to build this product.

When working on this team you will be building backend features, highly scalable code and writing test cases. You will be interested in all areas of development and want to work in a strong team of developers.

Key Skills:

4 + years of Programming ExperienceStrong Experience with Laravel, Symfony OR Yii
- Exposure to Python - Writing Spark Applications
AWSReactGULP Or Webpack
- Testing Frameworks - PHPUnit Or Selenium
Extensive Experience With NoSQL And SQLCan Use DevOps ToolsGit/SVN
Desirable Skills:

Like Working In Agile EnvironementExposure to Machine Learning and Artifical InteligenceEnjoys Working On New TechnologiesElastic Search
This is an amazing opportunity to join one of the best start up success stories that are marching on to achieve great things and work on some really exciting projects with the latest technologies.
If you think that this is the role for you please send your up to date CV to michael.fahy@opusrs.com.au or call Michael on 02 8089 0125.

I look forward to receiving your CV."	 - Melbourne VIC	Senior Software Engineer - PHPOpus Recruitment Solutions - Melbourne VIC$120,000 - $130,000 a year	Senior Software Engineer - PHP
592	"Working for one of Australia’s top four banks, you will be a key part of their digital analytics team. Benefitting from ongoing opportunities for personal and career development, plus working on leading edge digital analytics platforms, while being supported by an established innovative manager.

Responsibilities:
Working across the bank's digital analytics platform.
Working with business stakeholders to ensure their reporting and tracking requirements are achieved.
Working through BAU data tasks, i.e.: transaction patterns, customer insights, campaign analysis.

What you will bring to the table:
Strong analytical mindset
Preferably 6 months experience in digital analytics, Adobe analytics, Google analytics or similar.
Team player
Good communication skills
Strong problem solver.
If you have the required experience to be successful in this role hit APPLY today."	 - Sydney NSW	Junior Digital AnalystXpand Group - Sydney NSW	Junior Digital Analyst
593	"Apply now!

A leading banks are looking to add an strong data professional with a focus on working with the key finance departments to provide data insights to the business. This is a commercially strong team with a core focus on finance and working with the business.

My client is looking for a strong BI specialist with a background in the MSBI stack and the ability to bring data to life with engaging data visualisations with tool such as tableau. You will have a passion for Insights and working with the business. This is a big role and in an area that has an appetite for data and leadership that is passionate about having a data driven culture.

The ideal candidate will have:

Strong MSBI stack experience

Experience data warehousing and ETL expertise

Can do attitude with the ability to get stuck in

Solid Data visualisation experience ideally with tableau but also open to power BI, Qlikview etc

Ability to work with a range of technical and non technical stakeholders

Experience automating reports and improving efficiencies is essential

Degree qualified in IT, Finance, Commerce or other Business-related discipline

Please not only candidates who are in Australia and have full working rights can be considered. Apply now or for info on the analytics and data market contact Leon via email on lyoung@morganmckinley.com.au or call 0289863147

Morgan McKinley is acting as an Employment Agency in relation to this vacancy."	 - Sydney Central Business District NSW	Insights Tech lead - Data VisualisationMorgan McKinley19 reviews - Sydney Central Business District NSW$120,000 - $160,000 a year - Permanent	Insights Tech lead - Data Visualisation
594	"Do you want to join a Major Media business that is challenging the market and quickly becoming the leader of Video, Programmatic and Addressable TV as an AdTech and Platforms Manager?

This is an amazing opportunity to join a hyper-growth digital team with some of the most forward-thinking operations and adtech pioneers in the game. They launched their in-house team 14 months ago and as the 3rd person in the AdTech, Product and Platforms Team, you will be exposed to a heap of exciting projects where you can really make a difference in a business’s growth!

You will be a key part in continuing to scale out the department, and help set the standard of new platforms, technology, and campaign management within a business that’s innovating the space as they go. They are now delivering ads to 12 different platforms!

This is exciting as you will be constantly trialing new technology around adserving, which is constantly evolving. You will be at the cutting edge of advertising so will learn a lot. You will be doing a lot of customised work around how they deliver their ads in a complex ecosystem – so you must be a curious problem solver at heart!

As AdTech, Platforms Manager, you would be responsible for a variety of things:

You would be looking, after all, Ad tech Scoping, recommendations and implementation for all new digital deployments across the business. You would be spearheading everything to do with video ad serving and client side and server side ad insertions.
You would also be looking after programmatic delivery and technology and the development of the latest ways of working.
You would be working with SSPs and other vendors as well as managing their programmatic guaranteed campaigns in-house, monitoring their delivery, setting process and ensuring they work effectively.
You would be the lynchpin between commercial, operations, and development to ensure the ad tech roadmap fit all commercial and business objectives and project managing any new builds with the developers.
You would also be subject matter expert – making strategic and adtech recommendations, and insights on emerging ad tech platforms and best practices relating to video, programmatic and data that can be implemented within the business.
Is this you?

You will need 2+ years of Ad Technology and Operations Management experience, specifically with ad server, programmatic and data management ad tech. Experienced in digital media monetization within a large media publisher, particularly with video.
Experience working alongside and collaboratively with front end developers, project managers and technology teams as part of new digital platform builds, particularly apps.
Detailed understanding of ad serving, analytics and optimization technologies, as well as the digital media industry. Be a strategic and commercial focused thinker who can bring insights both digital sales and operations, along with deep product knowledge of Ad servers, SSPs, RTB and publisher products.
Experience in a digital media agency, client or publisher
Experience in senior-level internal/external stakeholder relationships
Any experience working with video, live streaming and the OTT space, who understands client side and server side ad insertions and programmatic would be an advantage.
Please apply HERE, call Gillian Kane on 0451191779 or email your cv to gillian@digitalgurus.com.au"	 - Sydney NSW	AdTech and Platforms Manager – Publisher SideDigital Gurus - Sydney NSW$100,000 - $120,000 a year	AdTech and Platforms Manager – Publisher Side
596	"The role will be focused on stitching together disparate data sources from across the business to enable machine learning and automated reporting and campaigns. Generically, provide a view on business issues/opportunities that cannot be revealed through standard reporting
What’s the role?
Analytics lead on internal strategic marketing projects designed to understand key customer behaviours that drive consumer revenue
Identify new opportunities to improve capability and optimise the business through analytics and modelling
Undertake proactive analysis of customer data processes that produce data driven analysis, reporting, insights and models
Provide data and analytical thought leadership that can be leveraged across the marketing teams
Consistent delivery of data programs that lead to more effective and improved customer experiences
Who are you?
The ability to interpret and convert complex data requests into prescriptive and actionable insights for a non-analytical audience.
Proactivity delivering data driven insights and recommendations
Senior stakeholder engagement and strong presentation skills
Must be advanced multi-lingual across various software languages (SQL, Python, R, SAS)
What’s in it for you?
Supportive and friendly environment. We encourage innovation, collaboration and creative thinking. Fun, fast-paced and excellent opportunities for growth and development.
Lucrative salary
Flexible working arrangements
Discounted health care
Employee discount with multiple brands including BMW, Qantas, Apple, Samsung etc
Work with some of Australia's most recognised and prestigious brands
On-site gym and wellbeing centre

Who are we?
We are Australia’s number one and most influential media organisation with more than 150 prestige brands across news, sport and lifestyle. Each month more than 17 million Australians choose to consume news and information from our digital and print products – more than any other media group in Australia.
Where do I sign?
Apply now or for more information on careers at News Corp Australia visit www.newscorpaustralia.com/careers"	 - Sydney Central Business District NSW	Data ScientistNews Corp Australia66 reviews - Sydney Central Business District NSWPermanent	Data Scientist
597	"Randstad is on the lookout for a Data Analyst/Scientist to work for a well-established organization and be responsible for providing support of all aspects of data creation and migration for the client’s projects, including identifying, creating, cleaning and validating data extraction, transforming, and loading data into the visualisation tools.
The ideal candidate will need to take an interest in Data Science especially in the subject of Predictive Modelling. You will be working with the Data Scientist lead, Junior Data Scientist and a Data Visualisation specialist.
To succeed in this role you will have:
Experience working with PowerBI and Tableau
Exposure to Python or R language
Strong knowledge of statistical/data mining methods and application in a business environment
Good understanding of Data Science domain, statistical and analytical model development and implementation
Significant data management experience, gained from within the financial services sector
Good understanding of data modelling techniques, tools/language - R, Python
Strong project management, collaboration and communication skills
Ability to apply logic and reasoning to identify solutions to complex business problems and implement solutions
Business and financial acumen
Curiosity to learn and keep up with market trends and innovations
Flexibility to adapt in a complex changing environment
Strong written and verbal communication skills
Bonus - experience with Azure Data Factory (ADF)
If you think you have the skills to be successful in this role, then don’t delay and hit the Apply button now! Alternatively you can send your profile to Glenn on glenn.abadilla@randstad.com.au
At Randstad, we are passionate about providing equal employment opportunities and embracing diversity to the benefit of all. We actively encourage applications from any background."	 - Mascot NSW	data analyst (power bi/tableau)Randstad11,835 reviews - Mascot NSWPermanent	data analyst (power bi/tableau)
598	"Join one of Melbourne's iconic institutions
Expand your skill set across a variety of projects
An opportunity to deliver high-quality best-fit solutions
An iconic establishment is currently seeking a Senior Data Scientist for a permanent opportunity to be a part of an exciting new team to build business relationships and provide high-quality best-fit solutions.
Having solid statistical modelling building skills, you will experience an exciting mix of creativity and innovation, within a framework of challenging objectives and a passion for delivering the best.

This role will suit an individual who enjoys tackling new projects to support business planning and decision making through the use of qualitative and quantitative analyses, based on customer and operational data.
Key Responsibilities:
Develop and implement statistical modells based on business requirements
Prepare and present insights and reports to key stakeholders
Provide recommendations across multiple aspects such as source of data and methods used
Extract and transform data for use of analysis, visualisations and statistical modelling
Be an active participant in knowledge sharing with a wide range of stakeholders
Skills Required:
Tertiary Qualification/Ph.D. in a quantitative discipline - mathematics, statistics, operation research (additional qualifications will be highly regarded)
Strong probem-solving, organizing and coordinating skills
Strong communication skills (verbally and written) is essential
Advanced skills SQL
Must have R and/or Python programming skills
Capable of managing multiple projects under pressure and meeting deadlines
Ability to interact proactively with internal and external customers
An inquisitive mind, passionate about deriving insights from data
This opportunity will allow the successful applicant to build strong relationships with internal and external teams, playing an integral role influencing business strategies, delivering customer and operational insights and knowledge through statistical modelling and data analysis.

To discuss the role more in detail, please call Corrin on 03 8330 5003.

IMPORTANT: By submitting your email address and any other personal information when you APPLY to a job, you consent to such information being collected, held, used and disclosed in accordance with our COLLECTIONS NOTICE and PRIVACY POLICY.

http://www.bluefinresources.com.au/privacy-policy"	 - Melbourne VIC	Senior Data ScientistBluefin Resources - Melbourne VIC	Senior Data Scientist
599	"Established company with great reputation in Science & Technical Recruitment
Full training, mentoring and support from experienced professionals
Competitive salary including uncapped commission
About Us

Do you want to further your corporate career working with some of the most impressive companies in Australia? As an established boutique recruitment consultancy, we work closely with some of the leading pharmaceutical, medical device, clinical research and FMCG companies in the world, supporting them in finding the best local talent in sales and marketing, regulatory and quality, and clinical research.
At On Q Recruitment we work hard, but we also have lots of fun too. We have been around since 1999 (so quite a while), and have an excellent reputation with clients and candidates alike.
How do we differ from other Recruitment companies out there? Well we're boutique, so we focus on doing a few things really well and are experts in our niche. We're based in St Leonards, have a small team with over 80 years recruitment industry experience combined and are looking forward to sharing that knowledge with the successful applicants.

Typically in recruitment you're expected to work long hours - call us old fashioned but we believe everyone should have a life too. Time at your desk isn't valued, outcomes are. We also believe people should be rewarded for the work they do hence your earning potential is uncapped - you get out what you put in.

You can expect a friendly, professional, open, relaxed team environment where we enjoy what we do and celebrate success. You'll feel valued and supported in your career progression. Sound good?

About the Role:

You will be fully trained to be able to fulfil the complete recruitment role over time which involves:

Building relationships with (new and existing) clients and taking job briefs
Writing and placing job advertisements
Reviewing CVs
Interviewing candidates and advising of suitable job opportunities
Booking client interviews, briefing candidates and follow up
All online administration managing the interview process from start to finish
Who are you?

You'll be a go getter who's looking for a great opportunity to springboard your career in a new direction
You've got at least 3 years work experience doing something else which isn't lighting your fire anymore
You'll be serious about your work and career, but not serious to have around the office
This is a people focused job so you'll need to have exceptional communication skills
Other handy skills are tenacity, resilience, organisational skills and influencing ability
A background in Customer Service or Sales would be advantageous,
You'll have a Bachelor's Degree - ideally in Science, Engineering, Data Science, Pharmacy, Business or HR
You'll be an Australian Citizen (or have Permanent Residency) and have an Australian Drivers Licence
The Rewards are:

A competitive starting base salary (dependent on experience) + super
Uncapped commission - no ceiling on your earning potential
Development plan with full training and mentoring to ensure your best chance of success
Technology to be able to work from home as needed once you have earned your stripes
Work/life balance - after all work and no play isn't good for anyone
A fully stocked kitchen so you'll never go hungry
Extra holiday time - you can accrue one extra days leave per year (up to 5 days)
Casual dress on Fridays (we like to relax into the weekend!)
If you're excited to hear more, we'd be excited to hear from you! Please submit your resume with cover letter and tell us what makes you think this could be the perfect match for you. If you'd like to speak to someone first please call Amanda on 0424 932 721. We look forward to hearing from you. All successful applicants will be notified by 19th October.
Please send your Cover Letter and Resume in Word Doc Format (no text boxes or tables please) and follow the Apply Links. Visit onqrecruitment.com.au to review all our current vacancies."	 - Northern Beaches NSW	Recruitment Consultant Trainee - Pharmacist or Data ScientistOn Q Recruitment - Northern Beaches NSWFull-time, Permanent	Recruitment Consultant Trainee - Pharmacist or Data Scientist
600	"About Hyper Anna and our team
We’re a rapidly growing startup in the artificial intelligence space – we’ve had lots of traction, are backed by VCs and we’re poised for a huge 2018. As a part of this, we’re looking for great people to help us overachieve on our goals to delight our customers whilst building a sustainable and sticky product. Our team is super switched on yet pretty casual and flexible, and we pride ourselves on our diverse, inclusive environment.
About the opportunity
We’re looking for a Senior UX / UI Designer to entrust with the interesting design challenges involved in creating and growing our AI product. You’ll be working with devs from data science, data engineering, backend, web and UX backgrounds to build Anna, an automated data scientist who is already beginning to transform how businesses use data. You’ll be a huge advocate for user experience best practices and mentoring the team to helping them to put themselves into the shoes of the customer. If Anna was a person, you’d be her communications coach, life mentor and image consultant.

We’re looking for someone with:

A passion for data, analytics and data-driven decision making
Familiarity with design and prototyping tools (Adobe suite, Sketch, or similar)
Commercial experience in designing, building and shipping applications or software
Exposure to front-end programming (HTML, CSS, Javascript) and data visualisation tools/libraries (Highcharts, D3)
Qualifications in HCI, Design, design computing, data visualization or related disciplines
A particular understanding or interest in how to best represent and communicate data analysis and insights
An interest in interaction, visual and UX design, as well as the ability to geek out and implement your designs in code

A day in your life will include:

Contributing to strategic product thinking and refining these concepts into something that creates value for our users every day
Working closely with designers, engineers and data scientists to deliver solutions that delight
Running workshops to draw out ideas, then communicate plans and align team members on the vision
Being involved in the full life-cycle of delivery, from ideation, discovery, prototyping, implementation and testing through to collecting data and feedback on features

About you
You’re passionate about new technologies and have a really strong understanding of what makes users tick, backed up by a grasp of the best practices in visual and UI design and development. You know when to obsess over details and when it’s time to ship. You love working in a team and helping others to grow with you. You’re someone who is laid-back and adaptable but wants to have an impact on the product you’re working on.
In return you’ll have the opportunity to join our team at a pivotal stage of our growth! This means you’ll have access to real career opportunities, receive a competitive salary, and work as part of our team in our beautiful, centrally located office.
Hyper Anna is an open and inclusive employer. We never discriminate on the basis of race, religion, national origin, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, age, or marital, veteran, or disability status.
Sound like you?
We love to talk all things tech and we are passionate about connecting with awesome people."	 - Sydney NSW	HyperAnna: Senior UX / UI DesignerAirTree Ventures - Sydney NSW	HyperAnna: Senior UX / UI Designer
601	"Work among a fast growing Data Science team who pride themselves on collaboration and innovation alongside a tech stack that is second to none.

Work among a fast growing Data Science team who pride themselves on collaboration and innovation alongside a tech stack that is second to none.
Collaborate with a highly efficient Data Science team deciphering huge unstructured Data Sets and creating value organisation-wide!

Due to recent growth within the Data Science team a key player within aviation is looking to add 1 more Data Scientist to their team.

What You'll Do:
Develop efficient, workable production solutions that perform prescribed research methods and business rules

Apply statistical analyses, machine learning, and data visualisation techniques

Partner with developers, statisticians, and product managers to deliver timely, high-quality product data

Design, develop, and implement creative quality assurance tests that validate source data and production output

Support statistical teams that research and evaluate new methods

What's in it for you?

Fantastic competitive day rate

Work on some of Melbourne's most exciting Data Science projects

Be part of a collaborative and innovative company

Opportunity convert to a permanent role after 6 months.

What You'll Need:
Experience with machine learning algorithms (XG-Boost, Gradient Boosting, Random Forest, Linear Modelling, Neural Networks, K-Means Clustering, Decision Trees)

Big Data Analytics experience - Spark & Scala (predominantly on semi-structured / unstructured data sets - e.g. Adobe)

Proven success managing critical processes and teams in a fast-paced business environment with competing priorities, vague requirements, and rapid iterations

Strong software development skills and expertise designing efficient SQL queries of big data

Excellent verbal and written communication skills

Bachelors degree in a quantitative subject such as Statistics, Operations Research, Engineering or Computer Science

Preferred: Familiarity with JIRA and Git Experience with Hadoop or other comparable distributed file systems Ability to develop advanced analytical solutions in Python or Spark. Knowledge of statistical software (ideally, R) or scientific computation software Experience conducting research and analytics with digital or TV audience data

If you feel the above is the next step you'd like to take in your career, APPLY NOW!

Only successful candidates will be contacted.
Experis ANZ is parent to a portfolio of brands; Greythorn, Safesearch, Marks Sattin, GT-X and Global Attract . These brands make up our core specialisations for Technology & Digital, Accounting & Finance, Engineering and Workplace Health, Safety and Environment. When you apply for this opportunity you will be directed to the parent website www.experis.com.au to lodge your application. Experis is part of the ManpowerGroup , a global leader in offering end to end workforce solutions.

If you're curious and willing to have a conversation about this role, please pick up the phone and speak with our recruitment specialist below. Even if this doesn't sound like the right role for you, we encourage you to join our talent community so your skill set can be the first considered when another opportunity arises. Click register on our website www.experis.com.au .

Tom Bull
Data Science
Recruitment Consultant
+61 3 9604 4209"	 - Melbourne VIC	Senior Data Scientist - 6 month contractGreythorn Specialist Technology Recruitment6 reviews - Melbourne VICTemporary, Contract	Senior Data Scientist - 6 month contract
602	"Data Scientist

The Data Scientist will collaborate with business stakeholders on discovery activities, and deliver advanced analytic insights to improve customer experience and add shareholder value. You will work within cross functional experiment teams, conducting experiments using advanced analytics and machine learning techniques to discover actionable insights.


What you’ll be doing…
Working on analytic experiments in the Analytics Hub
Sharing knowledge and uplifting capabilities with analysts in the business
Thought leadership in the approach to analytics
Demonstrating value and benefit from advanced analytics to senior stakeholders

What you will bring...
Effective stakeholder management and capability to influence
Ability to understand and interpret problems
Predictive Modelling
Feature Engineering
Text Mining and Sentiment Analytics
Machine Learning
Teradata Aster/SQL MapReduce
Hadoop, MapReduce, Hive, Pig, Spark
SAS and SAS Visual Analytics
Python (NumPy, SciPy, etc)
Strong SQL skills using Oracle and Teradata


What's in it for you?


This is a fast growing organisation with lots of career opportunities and the ability to earn an excellent package.
To learn more and have access to a more complete job description listing the full responsibilities, please apply by sending your CV via the big button below or contact Geraint for a confidential discussion on (03) 8637 7370."	 - Melbourne VIC	Data Science ConsultantXpand Group - Melbourne VIC$130,000 - $145,000 a year	Data Science Consultant
603	"Trade behaviour analytics
Financial markets risk - FX, Interest Rates, Commodities (Options/Futures)
Attractive Remuneration Package + Great Bonus Potential
Trade behaviour analytics
Financial markets risk - FX, Interest Rates, Commodities (Options/Futures)
Attractive Remuneration Package + Great Bonus Potential
Renowned banking institution and known for their expansion into Asia, my client is seeking a market risk manager or data scientist to work in their global markets division. This is a unique opportunity, which combines data science, financial markets risk, and compliance.

We are looking for an experienced financial markets specialist from either a market risk, compliance or data analytics background. The candidate will lead a team of data, and market risk analysts to develop, monitor and maintain controls and ensure that financial markets trading is in accordance with global regulatory conditions. The incumbent will be the main point of contact for the management of trading oversight. We are looking for experienced candidates with strong financial markets knowledge as well as trading practices and data analytics.

Ideally candidates with have

Strong financial markets experience from any asset classes but preferably rates, FX, fixed income or commodities (options and futures).
Strong programming skills (Python, R, Matlab, VBA).
Strong knowledge of financial market data infrastructure.
Excellent communication skills. Must be able to work with front office stakeholders.
For more information please contact Maria Shevelev at Bluefin Resources on 02 9270 2612
IMPORTANT: By submitting your email address and any other personal information when you APPLY to a job, you consent to such information being collected, held, used and disclosed in accordance with our COLLECTIONS NOTICE and PRIVACY POLICY.

http://www.bluefinresources.com.au/privacy-policy"	 - Sydney NSW	Senior Manager - Trade Surveillance (Markets Risk)Bluefin Resources - Sydney NSW	Senior Manager - Trade Surveillance (Markets Risk)
604	"We are currently recruiting 2 x Contract Data Scientists to work with a respected big data and data science team at a large banking and financial services client in Melbourne CBD. These are initial 6 month contracts, offering attractive daily rates and opportunities to work on challenging modelling and machine learning projects, with real business outcomes.
About you:
We are seeking 2 x data scientists, with over 3 years of experience delivering advanced analytics, commercial modelling, statistics or data science in business environments.
You will have confidence with statistical, predictive and machine learning models and techniques - applied to business problems such as with; marketing, customer outcomes, fraud, pricing, risk or operations.
Excellent communication skills - with the ability to work directly with senior business stakeholders
You can understand high-level business problems and then conceptualise what data sources to leverage, flag potential constraints, determine what questions to ask and which experiments to run to deliver the optimal solutions.
Skills in commercially relevant data tools such as; Python, R, SQL, AWS.
Nice-to-have skills include; Hadoop, Spark, Java, Scala,
Work Rights: Must have valid Australian Work Rights/Visa for 6 months +

Interviews and Start date: ASAP
To apply: Please apply via the links below as soon as possible. We are interviewing immediately and looking for start dates in 2-4 weeks."	 - Melbourne VIC	Contract Data Scientist - 6 months - Banking and Financial ServicesTalent Insights Group - Melbourne VICTemporary, Contract	Contract Data Scientist - 6 months - Banking and Financial Services
605	"Who we are

Tyro is Australia’s largest fintech and newest bank. We’re giving the business banking world a good shake up, with smart technology that save Australian businesses time and money.
We’re born different.
We don’t follow the easy path, we blaze our own unique trail.
And we want like-minded people who understand where we’re coming from and where we’re going.
When it comes to banks, lots of them say they’re different.
But Tyro really is different. We don’t do mortgages, personal loans, or investments. We’re all about business.
We may be new, but what we lack in heritage, we make up for with relentless determination and a focus on the future.
Our singular goal is to make life better for business owners with superior products and services that are simple and seamless so our customers, and our people, can keep blazing our own unique trail.

Your mission is to become Tyro’s marketing data, analytics and marketing automation subject matter expert (SME).
This role will be pivotal in creating and delivering targeted, end-to-end marketing campaigns, coupled with an extensive understanding of the business’ opportunities and risks, which will ultimately translate into sales, deepened relationships and positive customer experience. This role is responsible for establishing the campaign management and marketing analytics function within the marketing team, working closely with the organisation’s broader team of data scientist and analysts. This includes the effective planning, build, execution, deployment and analysis of marketing and customer campaigns across all channels (online and offline) to ensure the right message is delivered to the right customer at the right time.
You will also have accountability for the management, government, and optimisation of our existing CRM and marketing automation software and assume a pivotal role in the scoping and integration of any projects aligned with automated campaign management solutions and the data and digital product team roadmap.
What you'll be doing
Strategy
Consult with internal and external stakeholders on the best way to meet business objectives

Data & Analytics
Partner with product to understand and analyse large and different data systems and translate these into business opportunities / campaigns
Monitor and analyse campaign performance and create a range of best practices by customer segment
Challenge the way we use or source data for marketing and campaigns
Partner with Marketing and Customer teams to build targeted contact lists for acquisition, partner and customer campaigns in the marketing platform
Ensure data integrity through the establishment of campaign and analytical processes including data governance, contact rules and campaign quality / uploading / testing and tracking
Campaign management
Manage campaigns once they are running
Recommend and embed robust test-and-learn methodologies into campaigns
Work closely with the digital team to create custom-built reports and forecast modelling

Insights & Optimisation
Identify and implement any areas to deliver improved quality, speed, response rates and automation
Guide the team in the move towards multi-touch attribution modelling and end-to-end tracking
Effectively extract and analyse the performance of campaigns and provide key insights and recommendations for future improvements and new opportunities

Marketing CRM & Automation
Act like a pioneer in the field and proactively scope for ways to improve our CRM and Marketing automation systems to ensure the set up and the outcomes are in line with the business requirements
Be the expert in the organisation for recommending and selecting the right marketing technology
Be the central point of contact for our marketing automation software
Consult with 3rd party vendors to ensure best practice and value is achieved through CRM and marketing automation

Other projects and duties as required
What we're looking for:
A good understanding and experience with CRM and marketing automation is key for this role - experience with Salesforce and Pardot is preferred
Good interpersonal, negotiation and relationship building skills with the ability to communicate and engage well with stakeholders at all levels and 3rd party vendors
Efficient project planning and execution for deliverables
Analyse and manage data using SQL, SAS or other language and the ability to build queries and prepare data for further analysis
Advanced experience in end-to-end customer / marketing / campaign / analytics including planning and sizing, lead gen and nurturing, list extraction, tag management, website and campaign reporting methodologies and skills (prospect & existing customers)
Advanced technical and analytical skills to analyse customer and marketing profiles, campaigns and website performance including cohort analysis
Familiar with Google Analytics, Google Tag Manager & Mixpanel or any other relevant reporting software
Familiar with multi-touch attribution modelling and adserving
High analytic, problem solving, lateral thinking and interpretive skills
A keen eye to identify new opportunities that present themselves
Ability to explain complex information in simple terms to different audiences
Ability to translate campaign data into actionable insights
Positive approach to change
Self-driven, ability to set, manage and deliver own goals and deliver business objectives
3+ years’ marketing/campaign/customer analytics experience
Advanced marketing automation experience (preferably Pardot)
Advanced CRM experience (ideally Salesforce)
Advanced Excel skills
What we'd like to see:
B2B marketing experience
Financial Services experience
Tableau experience
Why work for us

We're not just like every other bank. Tyro has always been a tech company at heart, but fostering a diverse and inclusive environment, and a passion for continuous learning has always been one of the most important parts of our company's culture.

Tyros are a highly collaborative mix of people. You will work closely with our awesome teams and individuals in engineering, product management, customer support, sales and other functions within the business. Everyone is committed to delivering great outcomes for our customers, and you will have the chance to change the face of banking for Australia businesses.

Our 400 strong team of Tyros, just like our customers, are the lifeblood of our business. We go to great lengths to ensure a positive and enjoyable employee experience for all. We offer some amazing employee benefits such as a generous training budget, regular training for professional and personal development, 16 weeks paid primary carers leave, 3 weeks paid secondary carers leave, annual team based volunteer day, 17.5% leave loading and not to mention our multiple craft beer kegs (selection of beers carefully selected by our beer connoisseurs), wide selection of wine, variety of snacks and a ping pong table, selection of board and video games and an awesome rooftop area for socialising, all available to be enjoyed.

Privacy and Submitting your Application
By proceeding to submit your application, you acknowledge that you have read and understood Tyro’s Privacy Policy (www.tyro.com/privacy-policy/) and Privacy Statement & Consent for Job Applicants (www.tyro.com/privacy-statement-job-applicants/) and consent to Tyro collecting, using, holding and disclosing your personal information in accordance with these policies."	 - Sydney NSW	Marketing Automation SpecialistTyro - Sydney NSW	Marketing Automation Specialist
606	"Currently looking for a highly experience Engineer to join a team working on a greenfield project. You will join a team of 4 which will consist of two developers, one Data Scientist and one Devops. Becoming part of this highly successful insurance based organisation you will have the opportunity to decide on what technologies are used to build this product.

When working on this team you will be building backend features, highly scalable code and writing test cases. You will be interested in all areas of development and want to work in a strong team of developers.

Key Skills:

4 + years of Programming ExperienceStrong Experience with Laravel, Symfony OR Yii
- Exposure to Python - Writing Spark Applications
AWSReactGULP Or Webpack
- Testing Frameworks - PHPUnit Or Selenium
Extensive Experience With NoSQL And SQLCan Use DevOps ToolsGit/SVN
Desirable Skills:

Like Working In Agile EnvironementExposure to Machine Learning and Artifical InteligenceEnjoys Working On New TechnologiesElastic Search
This is an amazing opportunity to join one of the best start up success stories that are marching on to achieve great things and work on some really exciting projects with the latest technologies.
If you think that this is the role for you please send your up to date CV to michael.fahy@opusrs.com.au or call Michael on 02 8089 0125.

I look forward to receiving your CV."	 - Melbourne VIC	Senior Software Engineer - PHPOpus Recruitment Solutions - Melbourne VIC$120,000 - $130,000 a year	Senior Software Engineer - PHP
607	"There has never been a more exciting time to be part of Domain Group, a dynamic digital media and technology services business and one of Australia's leading property destinations. We provide property advertising and media online, via mobile, social media and in magazines, and technology services to the real estate industry. The business is experiencing rapid growth in digital revenues and investing in all areas to drive future earnings growth. Domain offers a dynamic and innovative culture at the leading edge of digital media in Australia.
We are looking for a lead data scientist to help sales, product and business leadership make decisions with data, give consumers certainty and control when selling their home with a broad mission and build data science and machine learning products to power the next stage of Domain's growth
As part of the Domain Group, you'll have the opportunity to work across all aspects of our property ecosystem, from listing and agent, to consumer behavior, email, and sales data.
What you'll do:
Build scalable models that analyse and extract information from disparate public sources
Develop and improve machine learning algorithms that drive our data pipeline operation
Leverage advanced statistical modeling to improve domain products
Research and implement the latest advances in the world of data
Proven ability to collaboratively and maturely work on a team
Curious with an aptitude to quickly learn
Experience:
At least 3-5 years of industry experience in data science
2+ years of professional experience with Natural Language Processing and/or Image Processing
Thorough knowledge of machine learning modeling processes
Thorough knowledge of supervised and unsupervised learning algorithms
Thorough knowledge of Natural Language Processing
Experience with implementation of Data Systems
Fluency in UNIX, SQL, Python and/or R
Good software engineering principles
Education/Qualifications:
MS or PhD degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Quantitative Psychology or related field.
Portfolio evidence of previous work is appreciated (i.e. blog, GitHub repository, journal/conference publications etc).
So...what happens next?
Once we've received your application we'll give it the attention it deserves and you'll hear from us either way. If you have the right experience, one of our Recruitment Consultants will give you a call (so make sure you keep your phone handy!) and from there we'll support you through the interview process.

Interested?
Go on then, click apply, we'd love to see your application!

A little note to recruitment agencies: We have a superstar recruitment team who are pretty good at filling our own roles, we know you're great at what you do to, but there's no need to get in touch! :)"	 - Sydney NSW	Lead Data ScientistDomain Group6 reviews - Sydney NSWFull-time, Permanent	Lead Data Scientist
608	"Job Description:About IntellifyIntellify is a data science and machine learning consultancy who helps our customers to increase their growth, operate more efficiently and build competitive advantage. Our team consists of leading data scientists, machine learning engineers and consultants that extensively use advanced (statistical) machine learning and optimisation techniques to create state-of-the-art solutions for business. As an emerging AWS consulting partner, we have the ability to scale our solution to any needs through their cloud platform.About the OpportunityAs we are growing at a rapid speed, we are seeking a senior full-time data scientist/machine learning engineer who has extensive experience in data science, machine learning and/or statistical modelling as well as programming. As part of this role, you will supervise and manage junior data scientists, and work on development to build data science solutions using a combination of the latest technologies and business strategies.With a startup culture and applying cutting-edge technology to real-world business problems, you have the opportunity to drive impact at some of Australia’s leading startups and enterprises as well as to learn and grow within a team of like-minded data scientists. Our client problems have ranged from pricing, inventory and workforce optimisation to computer vision applied to radar data for predictive maintenance. The work is varied and challenging, and will require someone who is dynamic in their thinking as well as willing to explore and try new ideas.Being a senior data scientist at Intellify you are charged with both being a mentor and learning from fellow specialist data scientists in an ever evolving and improving atmosphere. We want to see you thrive professionally and personally as we create a leading data science, machine learning and AI company of the future.What we offerThis is a full-time permanent role. This role will provide a unique opportunity to work in a collaborative team and learn from experienced data scientists, so you can advance your knowledge and get hands-on experience with state-of-the-art machine learning methods. Our salaries are competitive, and we offer flexible working hours. We also believe great data science comes from great teams, so invest continuously in upskilling and cross-training our data scientists, with lunch & learn sessions, training courses and certifications, and an opportunity to be a core part of our data science and machine learning communities. Furthermore, we offer the following:1) 10 x paid days of professional development per year (attend/ speak @ conferences, undertake courses and certifications)2) $2,200 Toolkit allowance to go out and buy your own tech3) Profit sharing4) Work with high-profile clients5) A defined career path with your 1-1 mentor6) Great team culture7) Have an impact in a small team where there is no politics8) Flexible & inclusive work-environment9) Work closely with AWS using cutting edge cloud technologiesRequired Skills: A computer science, robotics, maths, statistics, physics or related degree (graduated Bachelors, MSc, PhD or last year MSc/PhD student)5+ years of applied industry machine learning, optimisation and/or statistics experienceStrong Python or R programming experience and related data science libraries (such as scikit-learn, Pandas, Tensorflow/Keras)Strong SQL database and code versioning (e.g., Git) skillsGood software engineering principlesProject management / team management experienceExperience with data visualisation tools or frameworks i.e. tableau, D3.js, ggplot2 etc.Desirable skills: Knowledge or experience of software engineering practicesKnowledge or experience on time series/product forecasting/recommender systemsKnowledge of deep learning/neural networksExperience working with web development technologiesExperience working with cloud technologies i.e. AWS / Microsoft / Google Cloud.Portfolio evidence of your previous work is appreciated (i.e. blog, github repository, conference presentations etc).How to ApplyIf you wish to take the next step in your career working and learning with the best in an innovative data science company, please click on ""Apply now"" and include:Your CVYour portfolio of projects (eg GitHub, blog site etc)Desired salaryYour availabilityBrief details (3-4 sentences) of either:A machine learning or data science project you have developed or delivered previously; orPrevious team leadership experience, where you worked with a team to deliver a project.We are looking forward to hearing from you.*** STRICTLY NO AGENCIES ***Please note that our Company Policy dictates direct recruitment only.Job Types: Full-time, Part-timeSalary: $120,000.00 to $160,000.00 /yearExperience:machine learning, optimisation and/or statistics: 3 years (Required)"	 - Sydney NSW	Senior Data Scientist/ Machine learning engineerIntellify - Sydney NSW$120,000 - $160,000 a year - Full-time, Part-time	Senior Data Scientist/ Machine learning engineer
609	SparkBeyond has built an AI-powered research engine, capable of finding complex patterns in data by understanding their meaning. Operating at the intersection of Data Science and Artificial Intelligence fields, our Machine Learning technology is so ground-breaking that it’s been referred to as science fiction on multiple occasions. SparkBeyond Discovery Platform is being used by Fortune 500 companies across industries.What will you do?Solve various problems and make a true impact across unlimited domains and industries (Financial Risk, Health, Ecommerce, Marketing, Oil & Gas Exploration and more.).Deliver business value by translating complex data into meaningful insights.Be the face of the company and the product directly interfacing with our partners around the globe.Partner with our customers’ Data Science teams, helping them optimize their use of SparkBeyond’s Discovery Platform.Work directly with our in-house team comprised of the brightest minds in technology, research and mathematics as well as senior interfaces from leading companies across the globe (fortune 500 companies and many others).Use your analytical skills and deep product understanding to consult our partners and provide them with advice and input of the highest quality.What will you need?Significant relevant work experience - Professional work experience on data science and analytics issuesA very strong academic background - PhDs are very welcome, as are quantitative degrees - Math, Physics, Computer Science and the like.Proven experience in handling large scale end to end data science projects and presenting the findings and insights. Building models is great - creating impact is greaterProven experience in translating business challenges into data pipelines & model frameworkExperience with Machine Learning techniques. Supervised, unsupervised, traditional or deep learning - either is great, but you need to know your stuff, both in theory and in practice (e.g., MICE, scikit-learn, keras or weka)Programming skills that allow you to be self-sufficient in handling data. Python and R are our daily companions, and a solid grasp of SQL is always needed. Big bonus points if you know ScalaAlso welcome: Experience with large datasets and distributed computing (Hive/Hadoop, Spark)Willingness to travel. We understand the need for a work-life balance and family time, but the ability to be on location at our clients is regularly required.Why SparkBeyond?Sense of Purpose: We’re building something bigger than ourselves. Our team is building a machine that can help solve the world’s most critical problems. We do this through our Partner engagements and the pro-bono work we are passionate about.Exposure: Help insurers process claims faster. Or pharmaceutical companies improve their quality control. Or, on a pro bono basis, an NGO to upskill underprivileged teenagers. Choose what you will work on and where you will leave your mark.People: We are proud of the brilliant, passionate and engaged team at SparkBeyond, including our very own Gödel and Wolf Prize winner. Our people are our greatest asset and we believe in empowerment, ownership and constant growth.Platform: Our Data Scientists are passionate about our cutting-edge platform and can’t imagine returning to traditional data science.Credibility: We have established ourselves as an industry leader, partnering and making impact for our Fortune 500 clients. See what the market is saying about us:https://venturebeat.com/2016/04/02/deep-learning-will-be-huge-and-heres-who-will-dominate-it/https://www.gartner.com/doc/3311218/cool-vendors-data-science-Job Type: Full-timeSalary: $100,000.00 to $180,000.00 /year	 - Melbourne VIC	Data ScientistSparkBeyond - Melbourne VIC$100,000 - $180,000 a year	Data Scientist
611	SparkBeyond has built an AI-powered research engine, capable of finding complex patterns in data by understanding their meaning. Operating at the intersection of Data Science and Artificial Intelligence fields, our Machine Learning technology is so ground-breaking that it’s been referred to as science fiction on multiple occasions. SparkBeyond Discovery Platform is being used by Fortune 500 companies across industries.What will you do?Solve various problems and make a true impact across unlimited domains and industries (Financial Risk, Health, Ecommerce, Marketing, Oil & Gas Exploration and more.).Deliver business value by translating complex data into meaningful insights.Be the face of the company and the product directly interfacing with our partners around the globe.Partner with our customers’ Data Science teams, helping them optimize their use of SparkBeyond’s Discovery Platform.Work directly with our in-house team comprised of the brightest minds in technology, research and mathematics as well as senior interfaces from leading companies across the globe (fortune 500 companies and many others).Use your analytical skills and deep product understanding to consult our partners and provide them with advice and input of the highest quality.What will you need?Significant relevant work experience - Professional work experience on data science and analytics issuesA very strong academic background - PhDs are very welcome, as are quantitative degrees - Math, Physics, Computer Science and the like.Proven experience in handling large scale end to end data science projects and presenting the findings and insights. Building models is great - creating impact is greaterProven experience in translating business challenges into data pipelines & model frameworkExperience with Machine Learning techniques. Supervised, unsupervised, traditional or deep learning - either is great, but you need to know your stuff, both in theory and in practice (e.g., MICE, scikit-learn, keras or weka)Programming skills that allow you to be self-sufficient in handling data. Python and R are our daily companions, and a solid grasp of SQL is always needed. Big bonus points if you know ScalaAlso welcome: Experience with large datasets and distributed computing (Hive/Hadoop, Spark)Willingness to travel. We understand the need for a work-life balance and family time, but the ability to be on location at our clients is regularly required.Why SparkBeyond?Sense of Purpose: We’re building something bigger than ourselves. Our team is building a machine that can help solve the world’s most critical problems. We do this through our Partner engagements and the pro-bono work we are passionate about.Exposure: Help insurers process claims faster. Or pharmaceutical companies improve their quality control. Or, on a pro bono basis, an NGO to upskill underprivileged teenagers. Choose what you will work on and where you will leave your mark.People: We are proud of the brilliant, passionate and engaged team at SparkBeyond, including our very own Gödel and Wolf Prize winner. Our people are our greatest asset and we believe in empowerment, ownership and constant growth.Platform: Our Data Scientists are passionate about our cutting-edge platform and can’t imagine returning to traditional data science.Credibility: We have established ourselves as an industry leader, partnering and making impact for our Fortune 500 clients. See what the market is saying about us:https://venturebeat.com/2016/04/02/deep-learning-will-be-huge-and-heres-who-will-dominate-it/https://www.gartner.com/doc/3311218/cool-vendors-data-science-Job Type: Full-timeSalary: $100,000.00 to $180,000.00 /year	 - Melbourne VIC	Data ScientistSparkBeyond - Melbourne VIC$100,000 - $180,000 a year	Data Scientist
612	"Randstad is on the lookout for a Data Analyst/Scientist to work for a well-established organization and be responsible for providing support of all aspects of data creation and migration for the client’s projects, including identifying, creating, cleaning and validating data extraction, transforming, and loading data into the visualisation tools.
The ideal candidate will need to take an interest in Data Science especially in the subject of Predictive Modelling. You will be working with the Data Scientist lead, Junior Data Scientist and a Data Visualisation specialist.
To succeed in this role you will have:
Experience working with PowerBI and Tableau
Exposure to Python or R language
Strong knowledge of statistical/data mining methods and application in a business environment
Good understanding of Data Science domain, statistical and analytical model development and implementation
Significant data management experience, gained from within the financial services sector
Good understanding of data modelling techniques, tools/language - R, Python
Strong project management, collaboration and communication skills
Ability to apply logic and reasoning to identify solutions to complex business problems and implement solutions
Business and financial acumen
Curiosity to learn and keep up with market trends and innovations
Flexibility to adapt in a complex changing environment
Strong written and verbal communication skills
Bonus - experience with Azure Data Factory (ADF)
If you think you have the skills to be successful in this role, then don’t delay and hit the Apply button now! Alternatively you can send your profile to Glenn on glenn.abadilla@randstad.com.au
At Randstad, we are passionate about providing equal employment opportunities and embracing diversity to the benefit of all. We actively encourage applications from any background."	 - Mascot NSW	data analyst (power bi/tableau)Randstad11,835 reviews - Mascot NSWPermanent	data analyst (power bi/tableau)
613	"This startup is on the hunt for a good Software Engineer to join the team in the capacity of a technical principal. Guiding junior Engineers is part of the culture and this job.

Software Engineers here do these cool things:
Develop automation and infrastructure for development, testing, build and deployment
Build Data Processing and Machine Learning systems
Roll out services to improve analytics
Create a human-like end product
Build tools for their Data Scientist friends
Software Engineers here need to have:
Functional programming such as: Scala, Python, Javascript
Passion for big data technologies and data science
Degree in software engineering/computer science
Impact:

You'll play a critical role in disrupting the analytics industry using artificial intelligence.

Benefits of working here:
Work life balance/Flexibility
A culture of mutual respect
Pet friendly
Cool T-shirts
Pair programming sessions
Weekly, Monthly and Quarterly events
Education centric values

Please contact ronny@theonset.com.au or on 0448 808 848 to learn more."	 - Sydney NSW	Software EngineerOnset Group Pty Ltd - Sydney NSW$135,000 - $140,000 a year	Software Engineer
614	"Join a leading Australian financial institution
Be part of a hybrid team - Data Engineers and Data Scientists
Full Time Role based in Melbourne CBD.

A leading Australian Financial Institution is currently seeking an experienced Data Scientist with previous experience as a Data Engineer, who is passionate and enthusiastic about data and how it can be used to build real value for the company. They are on a journey to create a hybrid data science and data engineering team, to bring the control of a structured data warehouse for corporate and regulatory reporting together with the fast evolving world of analytics.

Reporting to the Head of Data Science and Data Engineering, you will be collaborating with a team of highly skilled Data Engineers and Data Scientists to design high-quality data stores and analytical platforms to build advanced analytical models across the business.


Key Responsibilities

Address and solve complex business issues using large data sets
Develop advanced analytics model, including the preparation and reconciliation of data, feature engineering and creation of dashboard visualisations
Perform offline and online experiments, with a focus on the digital channels
Implement batch and streaming ETL (Extract, Transform, Load) processes
Engineer/Prototype/Industrialise data assets and platforms needed for analytics

Key Skills

Experience of SQL and NoSQL
Advanced Analytical Modelling in a business context (e.g. Machine Learning)
Technical experience in programming in Python, R and statistical packages (R, SAS)
Commercially and Tech curious
Experience in Data Engineering (highly advantageous)

This is an excellent opportunity to work in an agile environment to deliver high-quality analytical solutions, data assets, tools and insights.

For more information, please call Corrin on 03 8330 5003.
IMPORTANT: By submitting your email address and any other personal information when you APPLY to a job, you consent to such information being collected, held, used and disclosed in accordance with our COLLECTIONS NOTICE and PRIVACY POLICY.

http://www.bluefinresources.com.au/privacy-policy"	 - Melbourne VIC	Data Scientist/EngineerBluefin Resources - Melbourne VIC	Data Scientist/Engineer
615	"Our Client seeks a Data Scientist with Pre Sales or Consulting experience to join their Enterprise Information Management team and work with the Pre Sales division to develop custom built Data models for a range of EIM top tier Clients.

You will be a core member of the customer solution team, analyzing complex customer requirements to provide unique solutions for their Enterprise Information Data.

You will be hands on in developing predictive modeling concepts and optimisation algorithms within complex environments. Provide technical know how to deliver successful solutions to large corporations and government agencies.

Create and build solutions to meet unique customer focused business requirements and insights.

Help develop best practices for implementation projects.

You will possess at least 2 years experience within either an Analytics or Data Science working environment.

Experience in Spark with PySpark, Scala, SparkR specifically and ample experience in Python and R.
Experience working with large, multi-dimensional datasets.
Experience or an interest in Deep Learning, AI and Neural Networks.
Experience creating meaningful data visualisations and exposure to analysing unstructured content.
If this sounds like a role that fits your profile or would like to know more please click APPLY NOW below or email james@counterpointgroup.com.au for more details."	 - Sydney NSW	Data Scientist - Sydney, permanent, Spark, Scala, Python - pre sales workCounterpoint - Sydney NSW$160,000 a year - Full-time, Permanent	Data Scientist - Sydney, permanent, Spark, Scala, Python - pre sales work
616	"High likelihood of extension
Use the latest Big Data/Data Science tech
Fast-growing Data Science team - progression opportunities
Work among a fast growing Data Science team who pride themselves on collaboration and innovation alongside a tech stack that is second to none.
Collaborate with a highly efficient Data Science team deciphering huge unstructured Data Sets and creating value organisation-wide!

Due to recent growth within the Data Science team a key player within aviation is looking to add 1 more Data Scientist to their team.

What You'll Do:

Develop efficient, workable production solutions that perform prescribed research methods and business rules
Apply statistical analyses, machine learning, and data visualisation techniques
Partner with developers, statisticians, and product managers to deliver timely, high-quality product data
Design, develop, and implement creative quality assurance tests that validate source data and production output
Support statistical teams that research and evaluate new methods
What's in it for you?

Fantastic competitive day rate
Work on some of Melbourne's most exciting Data Science projects
Be part of a collaborative and innovative company
Opportunity convert to a permanent role after 6 months.
What You'll Need:

Experience with machine learning algorithms (XG-Boost, Gradient Boosting, Random Forest, Linear Modelling, Neural Networks, K-Means Clustering, Decision Trees)
Big Data Analytics experience - Spark & Scala (predominantly on semi-structured / unstructured data sets - e.g. Adobe)
Proven success managing critical processes and teams in a fast-paced business environment with competing priorities, vague requirements, and rapid iterations
Strong software development skills and expertise designing efficient SQL queries of big data
Excellent verbal and written communication skills
Bachelors degree in a quantitative subject such as Statistics, Operations Research, Engineering or Computer Science
Preferred: Familiarity with JIRA and Git Experience with Hadoop or other comparable distributed file systems Ability to develop advanced analytical solutions in Python or Spark. Knowledge of statistical software (ideally, R) or scientific computation software Experience conducting research and analytics with digital or TV audience data
If you feel the above is the next step you'd like to take in your career, APPLY NOW!

Only successful candidates will be contacted.
Experis ANZ is parent to a portfolio of brands; Greythorn, Safesearch, Marks Sattin, GT-X and Global Attract. These brands make up our core specialisations for Technology & Digital, Accounting & Finance, Engineering and Workplace Health, Safety and Environment. When you apply for this opportunity you will be directed to the parent website www.experis.com.au to lodge your application. Experis is part of the ManpowerGroup, a global leader in offering end to end workforce solutions.

If you're curious and willing to have a conversation about this role, please pick up the phone and speak with our recruitment specialist below. Even if this doesn't sound like the right role for you, we encourage you to join our talent community so your skill set can be the first considered when another opportunity arises. Click register on our website www.experis.com.au.
Tom Bull
Data Science
Recruitment Consultant
+61 3 9604 4209"	 - Melbourne VIC	Senior Data ScientistExperis563 reviews - Melbourne VICTemporary, Contract	Senior Data Scientist
617	"About Hyper Anna and our team
We’re a rapidly growing startup in the artificial intelligence space – we’ve had lots of traction, are backed by VCs and we’re poised for a huge 2018. As a part of this, we’re looking for great people to help us overachieve on our goals to delight our customers whilst building a sustainable and sticky product. Our team is super switched on yet pretty casual and flexible, and we pride ourselves on our diverse, inclusive environment.
About the opportunity
We’re looking for a Senior UX / UI Designer to entrust with the interesting design challenges involved in creating and growing our AI product. You’ll be working with devs from data science, data engineering, backend, web and UX backgrounds to build Anna, an automated data scientist who is already beginning to transform how businesses use data. You’ll be a huge advocate for user experience best practices and mentoring the team to helping them to put themselves into the shoes of the customer. If Anna was a person, you’d be her communications coach, life mentor and image consultant.

We’re looking for someone with:

A passion for data, analytics and data-driven decision making
Familiarity with design and prototyping tools (Adobe suite, Sketch, or similar)
Commercial experience in designing, building and shipping applications or software
Exposure to front-end programming (HTML, CSS, Javascript) and data visualisation tools/libraries (Highcharts, D3)
Qualifications in HCI, Design, design computing, data visualization or related disciplines
A particular understanding or interest in how to best represent and communicate data analysis and insights
An interest in interaction, visual and UX design, as well as the ability to geek out and implement your designs in code

A day in your life will include:

Contributing to strategic product thinking and refining these concepts into something that creates value for our users every day
Working closely with designers, engineers and data scientists to deliver solutions that delight
Running workshops to draw out ideas, then communicate plans and align team members on the vision
Being involved in the full life-cycle of delivery, from ideation, discovery, prototyping, implementation and testing through to collecting data and feedback on features

About you
You’re passionate about new technologies and have a really strong understanding of what makes users tick, backed up by a grasp of the best practices in visual and UI design and development. You know when to obsess over details and when it’s time to ship. You love working in a team and helping others to grow with you. You’re someone who is laid-back and adaptable but wants to have an impact on the product you’re working on.
In return you’ll have the opportunity to join our team at a pivotal stage of our growth! This means you’ll have access to real career opportunities, receive a competitive salary, and work as part of our team in our beautiful, centrally located office.
Hyper Anna is an open and inclusive employer. We never discriminate on the basis of race, religion, national origin, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, age, or marital, veteran, or disability status.
Sound like you?
We love to talk all things tech and we are passionate about connecting with awesome people."	 - Sydney NSW	HyperAnna: Senior UX / UI DesignerAirTree Ventures - Sydney NSW	HyperAnna: Senior UX / UI Designer
618	You remember how to roll up your sleeves and craft data joins in SQL, but you've invested time in learning R, and Python is your friend. You know Hadoop isn't the only approach and you're happiest getting behind the GUI into the real data to uncover the stories.Isn't it about time you took advantage of the benefits from all that knowledge?Our client is looking for data polyglots who enjoy solving complex problems; not the kind you can come to with a canned response, the ones where you really need to use your skills.With some of the biggest names in Australia and around the world throwing their most pressing problems at our client they need curious guides - but they only take the best.Getting in isn't easy, but if it was, it wouldn't be the right place for you.Prove yourself and you can build a team behind you to grow your own patch. The opportunities truly are what you make them.With Udemy on tap, and weekly internal led training sessions, you'll be joining a group of like-minded people who are capable of understanding you when you get on your high horse about relevance over recency (or the other way around).Currently our client has four areas of practice, you can join one these and then explain to them what they need to build another:Data & Analytics - BI/DW, Big Data Analytics, Data Engineering, Data Science and Advanced AnalyticsCustomer Engagement - Marketing Campaigns, Campaign Analysis, Customer InsightsDigital - Full stack Development, UI/UX Design, Mobile DevelopmentCloud & Technology - Cloud Services (AWS, Azure, Google Cloud Platform), Managed ServicesWe're not worried about levels at the moment, if you've got the skills there's a place for you.SEO stuff because you know we need to have it in here;Data engineerData scientistData ConsultantJava, Scala, Python, HadoopApache Spark, Kafka, Hive, Airflow, NiFiAWS, Google Cloud Platform or Azure is helpful but not mandatoryJob Types: Full-time, PermanentExperience:data consulting: 3 years (Preferred)	 - Sydney NSW	Software Architect / Tech LeadKloudPPL - Sydney NSWFull-time, Permanent	Software Architect / Tech Lead
619	"Trade behaviour analytics
Financial markets risk - FX, Interest Rates, Commodities (Options/Futures)
Attractive Remuneration Package + Great Bonus Potential
Trade behaviour analytics
Financial markets risk - FX, Interest Rates, Commodities (Options/Futures)
Attractive Remuneration Package + Great Bonus Potential
Renowned banking institution and known for their expansion into Asia, my client is seeking a market risk manager or data scientist to work in their global markets division. This is a unique opportunity, which combines data science, financial markets risk, and compliance.

We are looking for an experienced financial markets specialist from either a market risk, compliance or data analytics background. The candidate will lead a team of data, and market risk analysts to develop, monitor and maintain controls and ensure that financial markets trading is in accordance with global regulatory conditions. The incumbent will be the main point of contact for the management of trading oversight. We are looking for experienced candidates with strong financial markets knowledge as well as trading practices and data analytics.

Ideally candidates with have

Strong financial markets experience from any asset classes but preferably rates, FX, fixed income or commodities (options and futures).
Strong programming skills (Python, R, Matlab, VBA).
Strong knowledge of financial market data infrastructure.
Excellent communication skills. Must be able to work with front office stakeholders.
For more information please contact Maria Shevelev at Bluefin Resources on 02 9270 2612
IMPORTANT: By submitting your email address and any other personal information when you APPLY to a job, you consent to such information being collected, held, used and disclosed in accordance with our COLLECTIONS NOTICE and PRIVACY POLICY.

http://www.bluefinresources.com.au/privacy-policy"	 - Sydney NSW	Senior Manager - Trade Surveillance (Markets Risk)Bluefin Resources - Sydney NSW	Senior Manager - Trade Surveillance (Markets Risk)
620	"About Hyper Anna and our team:
We’re a rapidly growing startup in the artificial intelligence space – we’ve had lots of traction, are backed by VCs and we’re poised for a huge year. As part of this, we are expanding our engineering team to help us overachieve on our goals while building a sustainable product. Our team is super switched on yet pretty casual and flexible, and we pride ourselves on our diverse, inclusive workplace.

About the opportunity:
We’re looking for Full-Stack Software engineers to entrust with the interesting technical challenges involved in creating and growing our product. You’ll be working with devs from data science, data engineering, backend, web and UX backgrounds to build Anna, an automated data scientist who is already beginning to transform how businesses use data. You’ll also be a huge advocate for Scala or Javascript best practices, mentoring the team and helping to get the most out of our stack. If Anna were a person you’d be her doctor, personal trainer, and nutritionist.

Specifically for this role, we’re looking for someone:

With strong programming skills in Javascript and/or Scala.
Who delights in building great interfaces for users in the front end and/or for developers in the back end.
Enjoys leading and mentoring software engineering teams

Desirably, you’ll also be strong in one of the following areas:

Data: A fan of data science and algorithms, with a deep understanding of big data platforms, data storage and retrieval
Infra: Love devops and building infrastructure and deployment pipelines that make developers jump for joy
People: Love building and nurturing teams, getting them aligned and engaged with the challenges of the product, and creating an environment for success

A day in your life will include:

Being responsible for the development of high performance features, services and algorithms
Working closely with designers, engineers and data scientists to deliver best-in-class solutions
Being involved in software and service architecture
Designing and adopting strong engineering practices

About you:
You’re passionate, up to date on new technologies, and have really strong computer science and engineering fundamentals. You know when to obsess over details and when it’s time to ship. You love working in a team and helping others to grow with you. You’re someone who is laid-back and adaptable but wants to have an impact on the product you’re working on.

To be successful in this role you’ll also need to demonstrate the following:

Commercial experience in at least one of Azure, Ansible and Circle CI or other similar devops, CI and CD infrastructure
Experience with databases (SQL)
A solid background in computer science / software engineering skills and knowledge
A passion for machine learning, data, distributed computing and functional programming
Ability to work in an agile development environment
Tertiary qualifications in software engineering or related disciplines

In return you’ll have the opportunity to join our team at a pivotal stage of our growth! This means you’ll have access to real career opportunities, receive a competitive salary, and work as part of our team in our beautiful, centrally located office.

Sound like you?
Applying is easy. Send an email with your resume, website, Github account, links to apps or anything else you’re proud of.
We love to talk all things tech and we are passionate about connecting with awesome people."	 - Sydney NSW	Hyper Anna: Software Engineer (Full-Stack)AirTree Ventures - Sydney NSW	Hyper Anna: Software Engineer (Full-Stack)
621	"Currently looking for a highly experience Engineer to join a team working on a greenfield project. You will join a team of 4 which will consist of two developers, one Data Scientist and one Devops. Becoming part of this highly successful insurance based organisation you will have the opportunity to decide on what technologies are used to build this product.

When working on this team you will be building backend features, highly scalable code and writing test cases. You will be interested in all areas of development and want to work in a strong team of developers.

Key Skills:

4 + years of Programming ExperienceStrong Experience with Laravel, Symfony OR Yii
- Exposure to Python - Writing Spark Applications
AWSReactGULP Or Webpack
- Testing Frameworks - PHPUnit Or Selenium
Extensive Experience With NoSQL And SQLCan Use DevOps ToolsGit/SVN
Desirable Skills:

Like Working In Agile EnvironementExposure to Machine Learning and Artifical InteligenceEnjoys Working On New TechnologiesElastic Search
This is an amazing opportunity to join one of the best start up success stories that are marching on to achieve great things and work on some really exciting projects with the latest technologies.
If you think that this is the role for you please send your up to date CV to michael.fahy@opusrs.com.au or call Michael on 02 8089 0125.

I look forward to receiving your CV."	 - Melbourne VIC	Senior Software Engineer - PHPOpus Recruitment Solutions - Melbourne VIC$120,000 - $130,000 a year	Senior Software Engineer - PHP
622	"Deloitte is the world’s largest professional service firm, with one of the largest and most experienced Analytics, Information Management (AIM) & Data Automation practices. We have 400+ specialised consultants in Australia and more than 6,000 practitioners in the Deloitte global network.
With the ever increasing complexity and volume of data, the rise of in-memory, high performance computing, data discovery and visualisation solutions and the convergence of Big Data and Advanced Analytics, organisations are faced with increasing number of choices to ensure they are able to exploit their data assets for maximum advantage. Deloitte is able to draw from its vast global experience delivering complex data driven solutions for our clients across the full spectrum of technology and business domains to provide the right strategic advice to help an organisation respond effectively to these changes – as well as partner with our clients to execute on our recommendations.
About the Role
Do you want to be a part of how we help companies utilise their valuable data resources through effective use of the right technology, backed by a clear vision and strong executive sponsorship? Do you want to be part of an award winning team that provides clients with a visionary, yet balanced and pragmatic approach to automating concepts and tools to improve productivity and performance?
This is an opportunity to harness emerging technologies and analytical methodologies to solve real world problems. You will be part of a close, collaborative team that identifies and builds solutions that are practical as well as visionary, and that make an impact that matters.
We are looking for people who love data and want to solve problems with insight. Whether you call yourself a data scientist, analytics nerd or builder of predictive models. We want to hear from you if you are genuinely passionate about this area and have some applied experience.
You will be responsible for delivering insights through a range of corporate data sources through the application of analytics, data mining, Big Data and real-time decision making techniques and applications using various data management, analytics & data visualization tools.
About You
You’ll bring experience in one or more of the following competencies and enabling technologies
A strong background in applying mathematical and analytics approaches and methodologies to identifying complex relationships in data
Ability to communicate technical requirements and outputs in a clear and concise manner
A structured, logical and solution-oriented design mindset
Ability to work autonomously and with minimal oversight
Ability to demonstrate initiative and ownership in the completion of tasks
A demonstrable interest and passion for exploring new data/analytics concepts, applications and innovations (e.g. Cognitive, Robotics & Automate, AI, IoT etc.)
Some experience using a range of scripting languages – (e.g. Python, R, SQL etc.)
About Us: Deloitte Culture
Join a high performing culture of talented people, who are highly motivated and passionate about delivering impactful analytics solutions and insight. We are innovative and different because YOU are… we pride ourselves on our team of diverse, high performing Deloitte Professionals who are talented, supportive, inclusive and social – and who are at the heart of our success. Our aim is to ensure that all our people feel comfortable to bring their whole selves to work, and as a result, build a workplace that encourages the true spirit of 'And different'.
From day one at our firm you’ll be considered part of the Deloitte community and our development and career progression framework will help you develop the skills and capabilities that will set you up to succeed – in every sense of the word. At Deloitte, we assume that you perform other roles within your life…you could be a student, a teacher, a passionate hobbyist and a caring family member. We recognise the importance of balance and embrace agility, understanding that this means different things to each and every one of our employees.
If you have questions regarding this role, the Talent Acquisition Team is available to have a confidential discussion. Please contact Aditi Aggarwal via the Our Recruiters section on our careers website."	 - Sydney NSW	EXPRESSION OF INTEREST - Data & Analytics - NationalDeloitte7,167 reviews - Sydney NSW	EXPRESSION OF INTEREST - Data & Analytics - National
623	"There has never been a more exciting time to be part of Domain Group, a dynamic digital media and technology services business and one of Australia's leading property destinations. We provide property advertising and media online, via mobile, social media and in magazines, and technology services to the real estate industry. The business is experiencing rapid growth in digital revenues and investing in all areas to drive future earnings growth. Domain offers a dynamic and innovative culture at the leading edge of digital media in Australia.
We are looking for a lead data scientist to help sales, product and business leadership make decisions with data, give consumers certainty and control when selling their home with a broad mission and build data science and machine learning products to power the next stage of Domain's growth
As part of the Domain Group, you'll have the opportunity to work across all aspects of our property ecosystem, from listing and agent, to consumer behavior, email, and sales data.
What you'll do:
Build scalable models that analyse and extract information from disparate public sources
Develop and improve machine learning algorithms that drive our data pipeline operation
Leverage advanced statistical modeling to improve domain products
Research and implement the latest advances in the world of data
Proven ability to collaboratively and maturely work on a team
Curious with an aptitude to quickly learn
Experience:
At least 3-5 years of industry experience in data science
2+ years of professional experience with Natural Language Processing and/or Image Processing
Thorough knowledge of machine learning modeling processes
Thorough knowledge of supervised and unsupervised learning algorithms
Thorough knowledge of Natural Language Processing
Experience with implementation of Data Systems
Fluency in UNIX, SQL, Python and/or R
Good software engineering principles
Education/Qualifications:
MS or PhD degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Quantitative Psychology or related field.
Portfolio evidence of previous work is appreciated (i.e. blog, GitHub repository, journal/conference publications etc).
So...what happens next?
Once we've received your application we'll give it the attention it deserves and you'll hear from us either way. If you have the right experience, one of our Recruitment Consultants will give you a call (so make sure you keep your phone handy!) and from there we'll support you through the interview process.

Interested?
Go on then, click apply, we'd love to see your application!

A little note to recruitment agencies: We have a superstar recruitment team who are pretty good at filling our own roles, we know you're great at what you do to, but there's no need to get in touch! :)"	 - Sydney NSW	Lead Data ScientistDomain Group6 reviews - Sydney NSWFull-time, Permanent	Lead Data Scientist
624	"Job Description:About IntellifyIntellify is a data science and machine learning consultancy who helps our customers to increase their growth, operate more efficiently and build competitive advantage. Our team consists of leading data scientists, machine learning engineers and consultants that extensively use advanced (statistical) machine learning and optimisation techniques to create state-of-the-art solutions for business. As an emerging AWS consulting partner, we have the ability to scale our solution to any needs through their cloud platform.About the OpportunityAs we are growing at a rapid speed, we are seeking a senior full-time data scientist/machine learning engineer who has extensive experience in data science, machine learning and/or statistical modelling as well as programming. As part of this role, you will supervise and manage junior data scientists, and work on development to build data science solutions using a combination of the latest technologies and business strategies.With a startup culture and applying cutting-edge technology to real-world business problems, you have the opportunity to drive impact at some of Australia’s leading startups and enterprises as well as to learn and grow within a team of like-minded data scientists. Our client problems have ranged from pricing, inventory and workforce optimisation to computer vision applied to radar data for predictive maintenance. The work is varied and challenging, and will require someone who is dynamic in their thinking as well as willing to explore and try new ideas.Being a senior data scientist at Intellify you are charged with both being a mentor and learning from fellow specialist data scientists in an ever evolving and improving atmosphere. We want to see you thrive professionally and personally as we create a leading data science, machine learning and AI company of the future.What we offerThis is a full-time permanent role. This role will provide a unique opportunity to work in a collaborative team and learn from experienced data scientists, so you can advance your knowledge and get hands-on experience with state-of-the-art machine learning methods. Our salaries are competitive, and we offer flexible working hours. We also believe great data science comes from great teams, so invest continuously in upskilling and cross-training our data scientists, with lunch & learn sessions, training courses and certifications, and an opportunity to be a core part of our data science and machine learning communities. Furthermore, we offer the following:1) 10 x paid days of professional development per year (attend/ speak @ conferences, undertake courses and certifications)2) $2,200 Toolkit allowance to go out and buy your own tech3) Profit sharing4) Work with high-profile clients5) A defined career path with your 1-1 mentor6) Great team culture7) Have an impact in a small team where there is no politics8) Flexible & inclusive work-environment9) Work closely with AWS using cutting edge cloud technologiesRequired Skills: A computer science, robotics, maths, statistics, physics or related degree (graduated Bachelors, MSc, PhD or last year MSc/PhD student)5+ years of applied industry machine learning, optimisation and/or statistics experienceStrong Python or R programming experience and related data science libraries (such as scikit-learn, Pandas, Tensorflow/Keras)Strong SQL database and code versioning (e.g., Git) skillsGood software engineering principlesProject management / team management experienceExperience with data visualisation tools or frameworks i.e. tableau, D3.js, ggplot2 etc.Desirable skills: Knowledge or experience of software engineering practicesKnowledge or experience on time series/product forecasting/recommender systemsKnowledge of deep learning/neural networksExperience working with web development technologiesExperience working with cloud technologies i.e. AWS / Microsoft / Google Cloud.Portfolio evidence of your previous work is appreciated (i.e. blog, github repository, conference presentations etc).How to ApplyIf you wish to take the next step in your career working and learning with the best in an innovative data science company, please click on ""Apply now"" and include:Your CVYour portfolio of projects (eg GitHub, blog site etc)Desired salaryYour availabilityBrief details (3-4 sentences) of either:A machine learning or data science project you have developed or delivered previously; orPrevious team leadership experience, where you worked with a team to deliver a project.We are looking forward to hearing from you.*** STRICTLY NO AGENCIES ***Please note that our Company Policy dictates direct recruitment only.Job Types: Full-time, Part-timeSalary: $120,000.00 to $160,000.00 /yearExperience:machine learning, optimisation and/or statistics: 3 years (Required)"	 - Sydney NSW	Senior Data Scientist/ Machine learning engineerIntellify - Sydney NSW$120,000 - $160,000 a year - Full-time, Part-time	Senior Data Scientist/ Machine learning engineer
